Measurement of serum and peritoneal fluid LH concentrations as a diagnostic tool for human endometriosis.A rapid, sensitive enzymeimmunoassay for the measurement of LH concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid samples of healthy women and women with endometriosis is reported. The ligand (LH) was captured by a readily available, widely used and well-characterized monoclonal antibody (mAb, 518B7) generated against the beta subunit of bovine LH. This mAb, although specific for LH, shows very little species specificity and detects LH by radioimmunoassay in humans. A polyclonal antiserum raised in rabbits against hCG was conjugated to horseradish peroxidase and was used as the second antibody signal. This anti-hCG antiserum crossreacts with LH. The enzymeimmunoassay uses the standard human LH (hLH) preparations (NIADDK-hLH-I-3, AFP-827OB) and results are based on the relative concentrations of LH in serum and peritoneal fluid. Total assay time was < 3 h. The range of the standard curve was 0.002-0.500 ng LH per well and the lowest concentration of hLH that could be distinguished from zero concentration was 0.15 +/- 0.02 ng ml(-1) serum and 0.058 +/- 0.021 ng ml(-1) peritoneal fluid. Clinical diagnostic parameters for the LH enzymeimmunoassay showed a sensitivity of 85.71%, specificity 92.50%, efficiency 88.54%, positive predictive value 94.11% and negative predictive value 82.22%. The study was retrospective. Serum LH concentrations of women with endometriosis were 13.67 +/- 7.21 ng ml(-1), whereas serum LH concentrations of women in the control group were 4.52 +/- 2.03 ng ml(-1). One-way ANOVA showed significant differences (P < 0.001) between women with endometriosis and control groups. Women in the control group had peritoneal fluid LH values of 5.65 +/- 2.43 ng ml(-1), whereas peritoneal fluid LH values of 64.06 +/- 16.44 ng ml(-1) were obtained in women with endometriosis (P < 0.001). A cycle-dependent pattern of serum and peritoneal fluid LH concentration was observed in women in the control group, which was not observed in the peritoneal fluid of the group with endometriosis. The application of this assay to serum or peritoneal fluid samples provides the attractive possibility that it could be included in the panel of markers used for diagnosis of endometriosis.Plasma microRNAs as novel biomarkers for endometriosis and endometriosis-associated ovarian cancer.Endometriosis, a largely benign, chronic inflammatory disease, is an independent risk factor for endometrioid and clear cell epithelial ovarian tumors. We aimed to identify plasma miRNAs that can be used to differentiate patients with endometriosis and ovarian cancer from healthy individuals.We conducted a two-stage exploratory study to investigate the use of plasma miRNA profiling to differentiate between patients with endometriosis, patients with endometriosis-associated ovarian cancer (EAOC), and healthy individuals. In the first stage, using global profiling of more than 1,000 miRNAs via reverse transcriptase quantitative PCR (RT-qPCR) in a 20-patient initial screening cohort, we identified 23 candidate miRNAs, which are differentially expressed between healthy controls (n = 6), patients with endometriosis (n = 7), and patients with EAOC (n = 7) based on the fold changes. In the second stage, the 23 miRNAs were further tested in an expanded cohort (n = 88) of healthy individuals (n = 20), endometriosis (n = 33), EAOC (n = 14), and serous ovarian cancer cases (SOC; n = 21, included as controls).We identified three distinct miRNA signatures with reliable differential expression between healthy individuals, patients with endometriosis, and patients with EAOC. When profiled against the control SOC category, our results revealed different miRNAs, suggesting that the identified signatures are reflective of disease-specific pathogenic mechanisms. This was further supported by the fact that the majority of miRNAs differentially expressed in human EAOCs were mirrored in a double transgenic mouse EAOC model.Our study reports for the first time that distinct plasma miRNA expression patterns may serve as highly specific and sensitive diagnostic biomarkers to discriminate between healthy, endometriosis, and EAOC cases.Serum soluble E-cadherin level in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the serum sE-cadherin level in patients with endometriosis and the alterations of that level in healthy control during the menstrual cycle.Thirty-two patients with endometriosis and 30 healthy women were tested for serum sE-cadherin levels by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.The serum sE-cadherin levels in healthy control did not vary throughout the menstrual cycle, which were lower than those in patients with endometriosis.E-cadherin might be involved in endometrial shedding during menstruation in endometriosis patients. The serum sE-cadherin assay might be helpful as a serum marker for the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.Usefulness and limits of CA-125 in diagnosis of endometriosis without associated ovarian endometriomas.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic significance of CA-125 for endometriosis without ovarian endometriomas.Preoperative serum CA-125 levels were measured in 775 consecutive women diagnosed by laparoscopy or laparotomy with endometriosis, adenomyosis, leiomyomas, or normal pelvis.Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis revealed that the area under the curve for endometriosis without endometriomas was 0.788, significantly smaller than that for endometriosis with endometriomas (0.935, P < 0.05). In diagnosis of endometriosis without endometriomas, both the maximal accuracy of 78.8% and the maximal diagnostic value of 61.2% were obtained at the cutoff value of 20 U/mL. Negative predictive value was 78.0% at the cutoff value of 20 U/mL, whereas positive predictive value was 92.9% at the cutoff value of 30 U/mL. This range is clearly superior to the empirical single cutoff of 35 U/mL.In the diagnosis of endometriosis without endometriomas, combined use of two cutoff values for CA-125, 20 and 30 U/mL, provides improved diagnostic performance. However, the accuracy of using only CA-125 testing for diagnosis is still limited. Serum CA-125 testing can be done during initial screenings of women with possible endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels in endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels were assayed in 20 women with endometriosis and 20 control women at the time of laparoscopy. Serum levels of CA-125 were significantly higher in women with endometriosis. Peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels were significantly higher than serum levels but showed no significant difference between control and endometriosis patients. Peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 did not follow expected dilution curves when attempts were made to validate the assay. Serum CA-125 levels were a more sensitive indicator of endometriosis, than peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels.Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of IGF I and II and insulinlike growth binding protein-3 in endometriosis.To examine whether insulinlike growth factor I (IGF I), IGF II and IGF binding protein 3 (IGFBP 3) in serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) correlate with the presence and severity of endometriosis.Case-control study including 29 patients with endometriosis and 15 controls. The revised American Fertility Society classification stages of I and II were pooled as early-stage (n = 15), and stages III and IV were taken as late stage (n = 14). Simultaneous sampling of blood and PF was performed during laparoscopy, and IGF I, IGF II and IGFBP 3 levels were determined by immunoradiometric assay.The serum levels of all three proteins were higher than PF levels except for a reversed IGF I PF: serum ratio in the early stage. There were no significant differences in IGF II and IGFBP 3 levels among the groups. The mean serum IGF I levels of controls and early-stage patients were significantly lower than those in the late stage. Also, mean PF IGF I levels in controls were significantly lower than in the late stage.IGF I may be an important mediator in the development and/or maintenance of endometriosis or progression to late-stage disease.CD4⁺ CD25⁺ FOXP3⁺ regulatory T cells in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis.Is endometriosis associated with changes in CD4⁺ CD25⁺ FOXP3⁺ regulatory T cells (Treg cells)?Endometriosis is associated with disturbed compartmentalization of CD25(high) FOXP3⁺ Treg cells.Endometriosis is associated with an abrogated immune response and displays some features of an autoimmune disorder. Treg cells play a part in the development of autoimmune reactions; however, their role in pathogenesis of endometriosis is still poorly recognized.Case-control study comparing 17 women with laparoscopically and histopathologically confirmed ovarian endometriosis with 15 control women without visible endometriosis foci, pelvic inflammation or related pathology who were subjected to laparoscopic surgery between 2010 and 2011.Peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid were collected during laparoscopy and T cell subpopulations were analysed by flow cytometry using specific monoclonal antibodies recognizing CD4⁺, CD25⁺ and FOXP3⁺ markers.The percentage of CD25(high) FOXP3⁺ Treg cells was significantly decreased in the peripheral blood of women with ovarian endometriosis compared with control women. On the other hand, the proportion of these cells was significantly increased in the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.The present study is limited to patients with ovarian endometrioma and further investigations are needed, including patients with lower grade of endometriosis.The present results suggest that Treg cells may play a part in immunopathogenesis of endometriosis being responsible for abrogated local cellular immune responses and facilitation and development of autoimmune reactions. Treg cells may be thus a potential target in the treatment of endometriosis.This study was supported by 1M15/N/2011 and NK1W grants from the I Faculty of Medicine, Warsaw Medical University. None of the authors has any competing interests to declare.Autoantibodies to markers of oxidative stress are elevated in women with endometriosis.To measure autoantibodies that recognize oxidatively modified proteins in the sera of women with surgically proven endometriosis.Prospective study.Tertiary care academic medical center.Women undergoing surgery for endometriosis or tubal ligation.None.Serum and peritoneal fluid autoantibody titers to malondialdehyde-modified low-density lipoprotein, oxidized low-density lipoprotein, and lipid peroxide-modified rabbit serum albumin determined by ELISA. Correlation of autoantibody titers with revised American Fertility Society staging classification, symptoms, and morphologic type of endometriosis.Mean (+/-SEM) serum autoantibody titers (in optical density units) to the three antigens were as follows: [1] lipid peroxide-modified rabbit serum albumin, 0.49 +/- 0.12 units in the patients with endometriosis and 0.2 +/- 0.02 units in the controls; [2] oxidized low-density lipoprotein, 0.22 +/- 0.005 units in the patients with endometriosis and 0.18 +/- 0.006 units in the controls; and [3] malondialdehyde-modified low-density lipoprotein, 0.21 +/- 0.005 units in the patients with endometriosis and 0.16 +/- 0.003 units in the controls. There was no correlation between autoantibody titers and revised American Fertility Society stage, symptoms, or morphologic type of endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid did not contain autoantibodies to any of the three antigens.Autoantibodies to markers of oxidative stress were significantly increased in women with endometriosis. These findings strongly support our data demonstrating that women with endometriosis have enhanced oxidative stress.Tumor markers and transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To evaluate the accuracy of CA 19.9 plasma levels (with or without CA 125 levels) combined with transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of endometrioma.One hundred eighteen consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women had laparoscopy or laparotomy between November 1994 and November 1995 because of the presence of a persistent adnexal mass. They underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and measurement of CA 19.9 and CA 125 plasma levels within 2 days before surgery. The ultrasonographic impression and the tumor marker values were compared with the histopathologic diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa statistic.Transvaginal ultrasonography had a strong agreement between test result and surgery (kappa value 0.84), whereas the combined methods were associated with a lower kappa value (range 0.24-0.80).Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone is the most cost-effective method in the preoperative differential diagnosis of endometrioma.Progesterone increases serum CA-125 in endometriosis.Serum level of CA-125 was monitored up to 48 hours after injection of 125 mg P-in-oil into patients with or without endometriosis in the follicular phase of their menstrual cycle. Circulating CA-125 levels remained unchanged at around 5 U/ml during the observation period in patients without endometriosis; however, a significant elevation was observed at 30 hours after injection in those patients with endometriosis (from 19.6 U/ml before injection to 30.0 U/ml at 30 hours after injection, P less than 0.05).Serum levels of VEGF and TNF-alpha and their association with C-reactive protein in patients with endometriosis.To compare serum levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), and C-reactive protein (CRP) throughout the menstrual cycle in women with and without endometriosis and to quantify the association between these serum markers.Twenty five endometriosis patients (ASRM stage III-IV) and 13 controls were followed through one menstrual cycle. VEGF, TNF-alpha and CRP concentrations were measured with enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in each of the four cycle phases (early and late proliferative and early and late secretory). Non-parametric methods and Pearson's correlation coefficients were used for statistical analysis.Increased serum levels of VEGF in secretory phases and of TNF-alpha in all cycle phases were observed. A positive correlation between CRP and VEGF was found in endometriosis patients but not in controls.Our results suggest that excessive systemic angiogenic activity is a feature of patients with endometriosis.Elevated soluble Fas ligand levels may suggest a role for apoptosis in women with endometriosis.To evaluate soluble Fas ligand concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis and from fertile controls without endometriosis, and to study levels of soluble Fas ligand in conditioned media of cultured endometrial stromal cells.Prospective, experimental trial.Two academic IVF centers.Twenty-nine fertile women without endometriosis and 57 infertile women with endometriosis (32 with stage I or II disease and 25 with stage III or IV disease).Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was used to measure soluble Fas ligand concentrations in paired samples of serum and peritoneal fluid from women with and without endometriosis. Concentrations were also measured in conditioned media of cultured endometrial stromal cells at basal conditions and after stimulation with interleukin-8 (0.001-10 ng/mL) and tumor necrosis factor-alpha (1-10 ng/mL).Compared with fertile controls and women with early-stage of endometriosis, women with moderate to severe endometriosis had elevated serum (87.2 +/- 6.4, 88.2 +/- 6.9, and 162.3 +/- 7.8 pg/mL, respectively) and peritoneal fluid (81.0 +/- 6.0, 80.5 +/- 6.8, and 166.2 +/- 10.3 pg/mL, respectively) concentrations of soluble Fas ligand. Serum levels of soluble Fas ligand positively correlated with levels in peritoneal fluid. Comparison of patients in the same menstrual cycle in each group revealed that increased levels of soluble Fas ligand in patients with advanced endometriosis were not attributable to the difference in cycle phases. Soluble Fas ligand was not detected in conditioned media of endometrial stromal cells under baseline conditions or after stimulation.Serum and peritoneal fluid of women with moderate to severe endometriosis contain elevated concentrations of soluble Fas ligand compared to women with minimal or mild endometriosis and women without endometriosis. These findings suggest a role for apoptotic dysregulation in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.An endometrial antibody assay in the clinical diagnosis and management of endometriosis.Coded serum samples from 11 normal fertile men and 17 fertile women without endometriosis (control groups) and 41 women with endometriosis were tested blindly for the presence of endometrial antibodies by use of a passive hemagglutination assay. Endometrial antibodies were either absent or present in low baseline titers in the serum samples from the control group. In contrast, 17 of the 23 (74%) patients with untreated endometriosis had elevated titers of endometrial antibodies in their serum. Of the 18 patients treated with danazol, endometrial antibodies were absent in 7 women who showed a good response at repeat laparoscopy, whereas 4 of 5 women with a poor response had significantly positive titers of antibodies. Six patients treated with danazol did not have repeat laparoscopy, but were found to have endometrial antibody titers in the baseline control range. Endometrial antibody titers in women with a good response to danazol were significantly lower than those in women with untreated endometriosis or with a poor response to danazol (P = 0.003). No correlation was observed between the antibody titers and the stage of endometriosis. The results suggest that the assay for serum endometrial antibodies may prove to be a clinically useful, noninvasive aid in the diagnosis of endometriosis. Sequential determination of endometrial antibody titers may be helpful in assessing the efficacy of pharmacologic therapy for endometriosis and evaluating the cases of patients with possible recurrence of the disease.Antizona and antisperm antibodies in women with endometriosis and/or infertility.To measure the levels of antigamete antibodies in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis and/or infertility.Antibody activity against human sperm and porcine oocytes was analyzed in selected subgroups of women.Clinic of reproduction.Women with endometriosis and/or infertility.No treatment was implemented before peritoneal fluid and blood sample collection.Quantitative ELISA.Four groups of women (n = 98) were analyzed for the presence of antizona and antisperm antibodies: infertile with endometriosis (n = 30), idiopathic infertility (n = 28), fertile with endometriosis (n = 20), and healthy fertile controls (n = 20). Antibodies were analyzed simultaneously in serum and peritoneal fluid. No statistically significant differences in antibody levels were detected in serum samples among the analyzed groups. The median values for antizona and antisperm antibodies in peritoneal fluid were significantly higher in women with idiopathic infertility than in the control group. In women with unexplained infertility, a high degree of correlation (Spearman) was found between the presence of antizona antibodies in peritoneal fluid and serum (r = 0.579). A positive predictive value of 80% was calculated for the presence of antizona antibodies (>5 ng/oocyte) in the peritoneal fluid of patients with infertility.Antizona antibodies locally produced in the peritoneal fluid have diagnostic value for infertility status; however, they cannot be treated as a marker or prognostic factor for minimal endometriosis and/or its treatment.[FSH, LH, estradiol and testosterone studies of the blood serum in endometriosis externa].Fibroblast growth factor (FGF), intracellular adhesion molecule (sICAM-1) level in serum and follicular fluid of infertile women with polycystic ovarian syndrome, endometriosis and tubal damage, and their effect on ICSI outcome.The objective of this study was to determine the concentration of fibroblast growth factor (FGF) and soluble intracellular adhesions molecule (sICAM-1) in serum and follicular fluid (FF) of polycystic ovary (PCO), endometriosis and tubal factor infertility and male factor infertility patients, and to investigate the relationship between these parameters and the outcome of intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI).The concentration of FGF and sICAM-1 in serum and FF were determined in patients undergoing controlled ovarian hyperstimulation (COH) for ICSI therapy for various etiology of infertility and the results of cytokines concentration and ICSI outcome were compared between the groups. Twenty patients with PCO (G.I), 17 with endometriosis (G.II), 19 with tubal damage (G.III) and 19 with male factor infertility (G.IV) were enrolled in this study. Quantitative determination of levels of FGF and sICAM-1 was performed using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISAs).The FGF level in serum of PCO patients (G.I) were 4.8 +/- 2.3 and in FF were 104.0 +/- 39.0 pg/mL. The corresponding values in the endometriosis patients group (G.II) were 5.9 +/- 3.1 and 125.4 +/- 74.9 pg/mL. The concentration of FGF in tubal factor infertility group (G.III) in serum was significantly higher (P = 0.009) than those observed in the PCO group (G.I) 7.4 +/- 4.5 pg/mL, whereas the concentration in FF was at the same level like the other groups investigated, 128.7 +/- 75.9 pg/mL. Besides, the sICAM-1 (pg/ml) concentration in FF showed a significant difference between the groups investigated (G.I, 175.3 +/- 52.8; G.II 194.4 +/- 32.2; G.III 233.1 +/- 54.3; and G.IV 215.1 +/- 54.4 ng/mL; P = 0.003). The sICAM-1 levels in serum were not significantly different between the groups (217.0 +/- 42.9; 216.3 +/- 73.6; 254.8 +/- 79.6; 237.56 +/- 78.4 ng/ml; P = 0.267). The fertilization rate was significantly higher in G.III (66.0 +/- 23.89%) in comparison to G.II (38.8 +/- 33.9%; P = 0.014) or G.IV (38.7 +/- 22.7%; P = 0.012). The pregnancy rates were similar in all groups (30, 35.3 and 35.0, 38.6%, respectively).Both, FGF and sICAM-1 are present in serum and FF of patients undergoing controlled ovarian hyperstimulation for ICSI therapy. The FGF concentration in serum differs significantly between the groups investigated, whereas, no significant difference could be observed in the FF concentration of FGF. On the other hand, the sICAM in serum showed no significant difference between the groups, whereas, sICAM in FF demonstrated a significant difference between the patient groups investigated. On the whole, the ICSI outcome was not related to serum or FF concentrations of FGF or sICAM-1. Therefore, the mean concentration of FGF and sICAM-1 in serum and in FF could not be used to predict the fertilization rate in an ICSI program.Peritoneal and serum interleukin-18 levels are not increased in women with minimum or mild endometriosis.Interleukin-18 (IL-18) is a cytokine that belongs to the IL-1 family. Endometriosis is strongly associated with sub-fertility, and affects about 15% of women of reproductive age. IL-18 may favor the progression of endometriosis. The objective of the present study was to determine the concentration of IL-18 in the serum and peritoneal fluid of infertile women with endometriosis. Forty infertile and 25 fertile women were screened in a teaching hospital. Thirty-four infertile patients with minimal or mild endometriosis and 22 fertile controls were enrolled in the study. The primary outcome was the estimate of IL-18 levels and the secondary outcome was the correlation between serum and peritoneal levels of IL-18. There were no differences between the two groups regarding age, body mass index and levels of peritoneal fluid IL-18 (mean +/- SD): 290.85 +/- 173.02 pg/mL for infertile women vs 374.21 +/- 330.15 pg/mL for controls; or serum IL-18: 391.07 +/- 119.71 pg/mL for infertile women vs 373.42 +/- 129.11 pg/mL for controls. However, a positive association was found between serum and peritoneal IL-18 levels in patients with endometriosis: r = 0.794, P = 0.0001. All measurements were carried out at the same time by the Human IL-18 Immuno Assay ELISA kit (MBL Co. Ltd., Japan). The present study did not find evidence supporting the hypothesis that IL-18 levels are associated with infertility in women with minimal and mild endometriosis, although a positive correlation was detected in these women between peritoneal and serum levels of IL-18.Low serum and peritoneal fluid concentration of interferon-gamma-induced protein-10 (CXCL10) in women with endometriosis.To evaluate serum and peritoneal fluid concentrations of interferon-gamma-inducible protein-10 (CXCL10), a chemokine involved in local immune function, in women with endometriosis.Prospective study.Division of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Siena.A total of 147 women were divided in two groups: women with (n = 77) and without (n = 70) endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid were collected from all patients undergoing laparoscopy.CXCL10 concentrations were measured by a specific ELISA.Serum CXCL10 concentrations in women with endometriosis were significantly lower than in those without endometriosis. No statistically significant difference between women with early endometriosis and those with advanced endometriosis was found. CXCL10 concentrations in peritoneal fluid of women with advanced endometriosis were significantly lower than in that of women with an early stage of, or without, endometriosis.The decreased concentrations of CXCL10 in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis indicate an impaired immune activity in women with endometriosis.Serum interleukin-8 levels are elevated in patients with ovarian endometrioma.To determine whether serum interleukin (IL)-8 concentration can be measured in patients with ovarian endometrioma and whether this measurement is a useful tool in diagnosing this disease.A controlled clinical study and an in vitro study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Tottori University, Japan.Seventy patients with ovarian endometrioma and 21 patients with benign ovarian cyst.Laparoscopic surgery or laparotomy for ovarian endometriomas or benign ovarian cyst was performed. Preoperative blood samples were obtained. Endometriotic stromal cells obtained from nine patients with endometrioma were cultured.Interleukin-8 concentration in the serum or supernatant of the cell culture was measured with use of ELISA.The serum concentration of IL-8 in patients with endometrioma was significantly higher than in patients with benign ovarian cyst. The serum IL-8 threshold (25 pg/mL) had a higher sensitivity (71.4%) for diagnosing ovarian endometrioma than did serum CA-125 level. The increased rates of IL-8 concentration in the culture supernatants after adding tumor necrosis factor alpha were significantly higher in patients whose serum IL-8 levels were >or=25 pg/mL than in those with levels <25 pg/mL.Measuring of serum IL-8 concentration may be a valuable tool in diagnosing endometriosis.Serum HE4 concentration is not dependent on menstrual cycle or hormonal treatment among endometriosis patients and healthy premenopausal women.Human epididymal secretory protein E4 (HE4) is a new promising tumor marker developed for the diagnostics and follow up of ovarian cancer. It has yet to become widely accepted in clinical practice, and its biological properties have not been inclusively studied. The aim of this study was to investigate whether serum HE4 concentration varies within the normal menstrual cycle and whether common gynecological hormonal treatments have an effect on HE4 values.Our study population consisted of 180 women, including 126 endometriosis patients and 54 healthy women. We measured their serum HE4 and CA125 concentrations and evaluated the effect of the menstrual cycle and the possible hormonal medication on these marker concentrations.We found no significant variation in serum HE4 concentrations in samples taken at different phases of the menstrual cycle. The median HE4 concentrations in proliferative, secretory and menstrual phase were 41.5, 45.1 and 35.3 pM in healthy women, and 43.4, 44.3 and 43.0 pM in endometriosis patients, respectively. The use of combined estrogen and progestin contraceptives did not affect serum HE4 levels significantly.The present study shows that the HE4 measurement in healthy premenopausal women as well as in women with endometriosis can be carried out at any phase of the menstrual cycle, and irrespective of hormonal medication, extending the benefits of HE4 use in clinical practice.CA 125 levels in monitoring therapy for endometriosis and in prediction of recurrence.CA 125 levels were measured in the serum of 18 patients with laparoscopically diagnosed stage 2 to stage 4 endometriosis (American Fertility Society classification) and in eight normally cycling control women. All endometriosis patients were treated medically with either Danazol or Buserelin. CA 125 levels were measured during treatment and during the 18-month follow-up period. The mean CA 125 level in women with endometriosis was significantly higher than that observed in normal women (28.6 +/- 5.1 (+/- SE) units/mL vs. 11.1 +/- 1.1 units/mL). However, there was considerable overlap of values between controls and patients with stage 2 disease. The levels in patients with stage 3 or stage 4 disease were always greater than 20 units/mL. There was a significant positive correlation (r = .51) between the implant score and CA 125 levels, while there was no correlation between the total score (which includes adhesions and implants) and the CA 125 levels. Four of the patients who had recurrence of symptoms approximately 1 year after treatment had CA 125 levels close to pretreatment levels, and recurrence of endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopy. The CA 125 levels in the rest of the patients remained suppressed during the follow-up periods. These results indicate that (1) CA 125 level can predict active endometriosis lesions in patients with stage 3 and stage 4 endometriosis, but is of no value for predicting adhesions; (2) CA 125 levels are useful in monitoring therapy during treatment; (3) during the follow-up period, elevations in CA 125 might predict recurrence of disease in women with stage 3 and stage 4 endometriosis.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Matrix metalloproteinase-3 mRNA: a promising peripheral blood marker for diagnosis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is an invasive disease. Its diagnosis depends on laparoscopy, which is traumatic and associated with potential complications. The aim of this study was to develop a rapid, reliable, and less invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis. We hypothesized that genes related to cell invasion would be transcriptionally upregulated in endometriosis, and tested whether blood levels of their transcripts might be used as biomarkers of endometriosis.We used quantitative real-time reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (qRT-PCR) to quantify the mRNA levels of vascular endothelial growth factor A (VEGFA), matrix metalloproteinase-3 (MMP-3), and MMP-9 in peripheral blood from 20 patients with mild/intermediate endometriosis, 20 patients with severe endometriosis and 20 endometriosis-free subjects.Our results indicate that circulating mRNA for MMP-3 is significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in control patients, regardless of the degree of severity. Conversely, the level of circulating mRNA for VEGFA and MMP-9 did not distinguish patients from controls.MMP-3 mRNA is a promising peripheral blood marker that discriminates between patients with endometriosis and healthy subjects. Our results support the possibility of finding genes suitable for diagnostic qRT-PCR for endometriosis in peripheral blood and should be explored further.Increased asymmetric dimethylarginine and enhanced inflammation are associated with impaired vascular reactivity in women with endometriosis.Enhanced inflammatory responses which may inhibit vascular reactivity, are associated with endometriosis development. Asymmetric dimethylarginine (ADMA), an inhibitor of endogenous nitric oxide synthase, is also implicated in endothelial dysfunction. We aimed to determine whether plasma ADMA and systemic inflammation are associated with endothelial function in women with endometriosis.We evaluated 41 women with and 28 women without endometriosis. Plasma levels of lipids and inflammatory markers such as high sensitive-C reactive protein (hs-CRP), serum amyloid protein A (SAA), and interleukin-6 (IL-6) were measured in the two groups. We also measured levels of ADMA and symmetric dimethylarginine (SDMA). High-resolution ultrasonography measured flow-mediated vasodilation (FMD) to assess vasodilatory responses.FMD was significantly lower in women with endometriosis compared to those without endometriosis (8.39 ± 0.43% vs 10.79 ± 0.54%, P = 0.001). While plasma lipid levels did not differ significantly between groups, levels of AMDA, but not SDMA, were significantly higher in women with endometriosis (409.7 ± 10.1 pmol/L vs 383.0 ± 48.3 pmol/L, P = 0.04). Inflammatory markers were also significantly higher in these women (hs-CRP: 1053.3 ± 252.0 ng/mL vs 272.0 ± 83.3 ng/mL, P = 0.02; SAA: 8.00 ± 1.53 μg/mL vs 3.82 ± 0.42 μg/mL, P = 0.04; IL-6: 2.73 ± 0.75 pg/mL vs 1.05 ± 0.60 pg/mL, P = 0.04). FMD was negatively correlated with plasma levels of ADMA (r = -0.37, P=0.01) and log hs-CRP (r = -0.34, P = 0.01).Increased plasma ADMA levels and enhanced inflammation are associated with inhibited endothelial function in women with endometriosis.The use of serum CA-125 as a marker for endometriosis in patients with dysmenorrhea for monitoring therapy and for recurrence of endometriosis.To estimate the value of CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis in women with dysmenorrhea, as well as its significance in monitoring therapy and follow-up.One hundred and fifty-seven women undergoing laparoscopy for dysmenorrhea were prospectively studied for serum CA-125 concentration. For those with advanced endometriosis receiving danazol treatment after conservative surgery, CA-125 was also determined every month during medication and once every 12 months after treatment.The sensitivity and specificity of serum CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis were 61.1% and 87.5% respectively. Elevated CA-125 (>35 U/ml) was noted in 65/75 cases (86.70%) with advanced endometriosis, but in only 15/56 patients (26.8%) with minimal and mild endometriosis. Although there were significantly higher CA-125 levels in unmarried women, and a negative correlation (r=-0.1970, p=0.0284) between CA-125 and parity, there was no statistical difference in incidence of endometriosis by the status of marriage or parity. Ten women with advanced endometriosis were found with persistent endometriosis by laparoscopy during danazol treatment, even though they tested with normal CA-125 levels (<35 U/ml) at that time. Fifteen patients had elevated CA-125 levels before and one year after therapy, and were confirmed with recurrence of endometriosis by laparoscopy. Nine women with elevated CA-125 levels before treatment, were found without recurrence of endometriosis and had normal CA-125 levels one year after therapy.For endometriosis, CA-125 is a valuable adjuvant in the follow-up of recurrence in patients with advanced endometriosis and initially elevated CA-125 levels. It is not an effective screening tool for patients with dysmenorrhea, or for monitoring therapy. There was no significant correlation between the development of endometriosis and reproductive factors.[Prolactin secretion in patients with endometriosis and its relationship to luteal phase defect and infertility].Serum prolactin (PRL) levels and PRL response to TRH stimulation were studied in 49 patients with endometriosis (EM) during mid-luteal phase. Eight cases with other gyn-diseases and 14 normal fertile women served as controls. Their luteal function were also estimated by three serum progesterone(P) measurements during the luteal phase and endometrial dating in the late luteal phase.The incidence of hyperprolactinemia in EM group (32.7%), and in EM with primary infertility group (61.5%) was significantly higher than that in normal controls (7.1%) (P < 0.05). However, the PRL secretory capacity was not positively correlated to the severity of EM. There was no difference in serum P levels between EM and two control groups. But delayed endometrial maturation was shown in 6 EM infertile cases suggesting luteal phase defect, an incidence of 27.3% (6/22) in EM group or 42.9% (6/14) in EM infertile group. Five out of the six were hyperprolactinemic and had no other identified causes of infertility. These data implied that hyperprolactinemia may impair the luteal function causing infertility in EM patients.Evaluation of the relationship between endometriosis and omega-3 and omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids.Endometriosis is a common chronic inflammation causing major problems including infertility. The role of omega-3 and omega-6 fatty acids as their potential anti-inflammatory effects in endometriosis needs to be further explored. The objective of this study was to compare serum phospholipid fatty acid profile in endometriosis patients with controls, and to explore the correlation of this profile with the severity of the disease.Sixty-four endometriosis patients and 74 control women, in reproductive age, participated in this study. Among the endometriosis patients, 19 cases were in stage I, 27 cases in stage II, 8 cases in stage III, and 10 cases in stage IV. Each patient underwent laparoscopy. Before surgery, 5 ml of blood was obtained. After extraction of the total lipids, serum total phospholipid fraction was isolated by thin layer chromatography. Fatty acid composition of the phospholipid fraction was determined by gas chromatography and the resulted profile was compared in endometriosis patients and controls. The profile was also compared in the endometriosis group based on the severity of disease.Stearic acid was significantly lower in the endometriosis group as compared to controls (P= 0.030). No other fatty acid compositions were significantly different between patients and controls. Serum ratio of eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA) to arachidonic acid (AA) was in reasonable correlation with the severity of endometriosis (r = 0.34, P = 0.006).According to these findings, levels of fatty acids in serum total phospholipids seem not to be a marker for endometriosis, but the EPA to AA ratio was a relevant factor indicating severity of illness.Usefulness of CA19-9 versus CA125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis.To investigate the clinical value of the serum CA19-9 level in comparison with the serum CA125 level for diagnosing and determining the severity of endometriosis.Retrospective study.Department of Comprehensive Reproductive Medicine in a university hospital.One hundred one women with endometriosis and 22 without endometriosis participated in this study.Blood samples were collected before the operation (laparoscopy, oophrectomy, cystectomy, and/or hysterectomy), and tissue samples of ovarian chocolate cysts were collected during the operation.The serum CA19-9 and CA125 levels and the localization of these antigens in ovarian chocolate cysts.The mean serum CA19-9 levels in patients at all stages of endometriosis were significantly higher than those in patients without endometriosis, and serum CA19-9 levels significantly correlated with the Revised American Fertility Society classification scores. Intense staining of CA19-9 was observed in 15 of the 20 samples of ovarian chocolate cysts.CA19-9 is a useful marker for determining the severity of endometriosis.Luteal phase dysfunction in endometriosis: elevated progesterone levels in peripheral and ovarian veins during the follicular phase.Endometriosis has been associated with corpus luteum inadequacy and abnormalities of luteal phase progesterone (P) secretion. In this study, abnormal luteolysis, as a second factor of luteal dysfunction, was assessed in 13 women with endometriosis and 25 control patients by measurement of ovarian vein estradiol (E2) and P during the follicular phase. The results reveal that women with endometriosis have (1) significantly lower ovarian vein E2, (2) significantly higher both peripheral and ovarian vein P, and (3) threefold higher P/E2 ratios than controls during the follicular phase. These data support the concept of continued P production from an active corpus luteum well into the follicular phase of the following cycle in women with endometriosis. Failure of adequate luteolysis is a second aspect of luteal dysfunction in endometriosis and strongly supports the growing body of data confirming ovulatory asynchrony in the minimal; endometriosis infertility syndrome.Haplotype analysis of the matrix metalloproteinase-9 gene associated with advanced-stage endometriosis.To investigate whether the -1562C>T, R279Q, P574R, and R668Q polymorphisms of the matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) gene are related to endometriosis.Case-control study.University-based hospital in Korea.Patients with endometriosis stage III/IV (n = 225) who underwent pelvic surgery and controls (n = 198) with no endometriosis in a Korean population.Peripheral blood samples were collected by venipuncture.Frequencies of genotypes and haplotypes were compared with the risk of endometriosis including -1562C>T, R279Q, P574R, and R668Q polymorphisms of MMP-9.In the two-locus haplotype analyses using the four single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), an increase in the distribution of the R279Q/P574R (2678G>A/4859C>G) (AC haplotype: odds ratio [OR] = 3.180, 95% confidence interval [CI] = 1.956-5.170; GG haplotype: OR = 4.374, 95% CI = 2.376-8.053) and -1562C>T/R668Q (-1562C>T/5546G>A) (CA haplotype: OR = 3.280, 95% CI = 1.406-7.653) haplotypes was significantly associated with endometriosis. By contrast, the risk of endometriosis was not associated with the individual SNPs studied.These findings suggest that haplotype analysis was more informative than SNP analysis. The haplotypes in the MMP-9 gene may correlate with the progression of endometriosis, and further study of these variations might improve our understanding of the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Angiogenic activity and IL-8 concentrations in peritoneal fluid and sera in endometriosis.During menstruation endometrial fragments are transported into the peritoneal cavity where they form endometriotic lesions. Angiogenesis is proposed as one of the mechanisms in endometriosis pathogenesis. The aim of the study was to determine the angiogenic activity and interleukin 8 concentrations in peritoneal fluid and sera in endometriosis.Angiogenesis was determined in cutaneous assay in Balb/c mice; IL-8 concentrations were measured by ELISA test in sera and peritoneal fluid of 32 control and 56 endometriosis patients. Wilcoxon and Mann-Whitney tests and Spearman rank correlations were used in statistical analysis.Peritoneal fluid and sera from the examined group had higher angiogenic activity and interleukin 8 concentrations. There was correlation found between AFS and neovascularization induced by sera and PF of patients with peritoneal lesions.Angiogenesis plays an important role in pathogenesis of endometriosis. Although IL-8 takes part in neovascularization, there are other factors modulating angiogenesis in endometriosis.[Immunological studies of peripheral blood in patients with external genital endometriosis and infertility].Immunoregulatory lymphocytes of SD2-, SD4-, SD8- and SD2-phenotypes have been assayed using monoclonal antibodies in peripheral blood of infertile women with external genital endometriosis and tubal-peritoneal infertility. The tested cells did not markedly differ from those in control fertile patients. Serum concentrations of immunoglobulin M were increased in women with endometriosis. Immunoglobulin concentrations widely varied in the peritoneal fluid, with a statistically significant elevation of IgA and IgM in women with tubal-peritoneal infertility.Serum cytokines as biomarkers for nonsurgical prediction of endometriosis.To test the ability of a group of serum cytokines, either individually or in combination, to serve as biomarkers for the nonsurgical diagnosis of endometriosis.Subjects were allocated to two groups according to their laparoscopic diagnosis. The first group consisted of patients with endometriosis and the second group was made up of infertile women with no pelvic pathology (controls). Blood samples were collected preoperatively and stored. Cytokines were measured in the serum of all participants using the Bio-Plex Protein Array System. Nonparametric statistics and the Mann-Whitney test were used to compare groups. Subjects were seen at the Gynecologic endoscopy unit.Three cytokines were significantly higher in the serum of subjects with endometriosis than in the control group: interleukin-6 (IL-6) [4.41 pg/ml (range: 1.47-15.01) versus 0.97 pg/ml (range: 0.29-2.98), respectively; p<0.001], monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) [37.91 pg/ml (range: 24.54-94.74) versus 22.13 pg/ml (range: 13.85-39.45), respectively; p<0.001], and interferon-gamma (INF-gamma) [19.01 pg/ml (range: 1.19-73.52) versus 0.30 pg/ml (range: 0.00-13.05), respectively; p<0.001]. There was no statistically significant difference between subjects with endometriosis and controls in the serum concentration of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), or granulocyte macrophage colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF). Interleukin-2 (IL-2), interleukin-8 (IL-8), and interleukin-15 (IL-15) were undetectable in the serum of both groups. None of the measured cytokines showed significant correlation with the cycle phase or stage of endometriosis. In a multivariate analysis, serum interleukin-6 provided a sensitivity of 71% and a specificity of 66% to discriminate between endometriosis patients and controls at a cutoff point of 1.9 pg/ml. Adding monocyte chemotactic protein-1 and interferon-gamma to interleukin-6 did not increase the discriminative ability over that achieved by measuring serum interleukin-6 alone.Serum of subjects with endometriosis contains significantly higher levels of interleukin-6, monocyte chemotactic protein-1, and interferon-gamma than control women. Serum interleukin-6 measurements discriminate between women with endometriosis and controls. Interleukin-6 provides a promising serum marker for the nonsurgical prediction of endometriosis.Preoperative serum CA-125 and CA-72 in predicting endometriosis in infertility patients.CA-125, a high-molecular-weight glycoprotein antigen, has been identified as a possible marker for endometriosis, with discrepant results. CA-72, another glycoprotein antigen, is expressed by a variety of adenocarcinomas, including endometrial carcinoma. This controlled, prospective study evaluated serum CA-125 and CA-72 levels in 35 consecutive patients with endometriosis of varying stages and in patients without endometriosis. Serum CA-125 and CA-72 were measured with immunoradiologic methods prior to diagnostic laparoscopy for infertility evaluation. Endometriosis, scored by American Fertility Society guidelines, was identified in 19 patients, and 16 patients had normal pelvic findings. CA-125 and CA-72 levels were not different between patients with no pelvic disease (controls) and women with stage I-IV endometriosis. The positive predictive value of CA-125 was 0%; the negative predictive value was 47%. The positive predictive value of CA-72 was 5%; the negative predictive value was 53%. CA-72 and CA-125 are not helpful in the routine workup of the infertile woman to determine the likelihood that she has pelvic endometriosis.Evaluation of novel serum biomarkers and the proteomic differences of endometriosis and adenomyosis using MALDI-TOF-MS.Both endometriosis and adenomyosis are common benign gynecological diseases. This study aimed to find the novel noninvasive, biochemical diagnostic markers for detection of endometriosis and adenomyosis, and evaluate the correlation of these two diseases at the protein level.Serum samples from patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis were compared with control groups to detect specific serum biomarkers and to explore the different protein fingerprint of endometriosis and adenomyosis using MALDI-TOF-MS.There were 13 protein peaks abnormally expressed in endometriosis as well as twelve in adenomyosis compared with control groups (P < 0.05). And five-peak mass was found downregulated significantly both in the women with endometriosis and adenomyosis. The common diagnostic model of endometriosis and adenomyosis we set up had a lower sensitivity and specificity than the separate diagnostic model of these two diseases.MALDI-TOF-MS technology plays an important role in screening the diagnostic biomarkers of endometriosis and adenomyosis. And our study found the correlation between endometriosis and adenomyosis in protein fingerprint and it is hard to separate the endometriosis from adenomyosis with the serum biomarkers.Elevated serum concentrations of CA-125 in patients with advanced endometriosis.CA-125 is a high-molecular-weight glycoprotein that is expressed on the cell surface of some derivatives of embryonic coelomic epithelium. Based on results of an immunoradiometric assay developed to detect CA-125 in peripheral blood, 82% of patients with ovarian cancer and less than 1% of apparently healthy controls have elevated peripheral blood levels of CA-125. Because endometriotic lesions are likely to be derivatives of embryonic coelomic epithelium, the authors investigated serum CA-125 levels in patients with endometriosis. Preoperative serum CA-125 concentrations were measured in 147 patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy or laparotomy. Serum CA-125 concentrations were elevated in patients with stage III or IV endometriosis, compared with controls with negative diagnostic laparoscopies (66.5 +/- 14.5 versus 8.20 +/- 0.59 U/ml, mean +/- standard error of the mean; P less than 0.001). Fifty-four percent of patients with stage III or IV endometriosis and 0% of the controls had CA-125 levels greater than 35 U/ml. Occasional patients with stage II endometriosis (13%), leiomyomata uteri (14%), and chronic pelvic inflammatory disease (5%) also had serum CA-125 concentrations greater than 35 U/ml. Immunocytochemical techniques demonstrated the presence of CA-125 on the cell surface of endometriotic lesions.Impaired NK-cell-mediated cytotoxic activity and cytokine production in patients with endometriosis: a possible role for PCBs and DDE.Endometriosis is a gynaecological disorder characterized by the presence and growth of endometrial tissue in ectopic sites. In this study we examined the immunological functions of patients with endometriosis and serum level of PCBs and p,p'-DDE to verify the impact of these environmental contaminants on the dysregulation of immune functions. We found that proliferative responses and immunoglobulin production were not dysregulated in patients with endometriosis while NK cell activity was significantly down-regulated in these patients. Moreover, a significant down-regulation of IL-1beta and IL-12 production was found in patients with respect to controls. Serum levels of PCBs and p,p'-DDE were found to be significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in the control group, with respect to the sum of the congeners most prominent in human tissues. In particular, total PCBs concentration in patients with endometriosis and controls was respectively 330 and 160 ng/g fat with respect to the most abundant congeners, while p,p'-DDE concentration was of 770 and 310 ng/g fat. Moreover, we found that normal human PBMC pulsed with PCBs, p,p'-DDE and their combination showed a significant down-regulation of NK cell cytotoxic activity and IL-1beta and IL-12 production. These findings suggest that changes in specific immune parameters correlate with elevated serum PCBs and DDE levels and endometriosis.Multiple endometrial antigens are targeted in autoimmune endometriosis.Endometriosis is defined as the growth of endometrial glands and stroma in ectopic locations. Its aetiology is multifactorial, but autoimmunity has been shown to play a role in its onset and development. The present study aimed to investigate the presence of both IgG and IgM anti-endometrial antibodies in sera of endometriosis patients in comparison with age-matched controls, and to also investigate the cognate endometrial proteins involved. Sera from these groups were screened by western blot and immunohistochemistry. Thirteen out of the 40 sera tested were positive for IgG isotype, and 10/27 IgG negative patients were positive for IgM isotype. These findings indicate that endometrial antibodies of IgG and IgM classes could be detected in almost 60% of endometriosis patients. Of the various identified endometrial antigens, 30 and 45 kDa antigens were immunodominant in both IgG and IgM positive endometriosis patients. With immunohistochemistry, positive sera showed reactivity in luminal epithelium, glandular epithelium and stroma. These anti-endometrial antibodies might be partially responsible for failure of implantation leading to infertility. Identification of specific targets would be a help in understanding the pathophysiology of endometriosis, and would also help in setting up a non-invasive test for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum concentrations of growth factors in women with and without endometriosis: the action of anti-endometriosis medicines.Endometriosis is a common gynecologic syndrome of unknown etiology and pathogenesis. Growth factors and inflammatory mediators produced by peritoneal leukocytes have recently been postulated to participate in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Angiogenic factors released from peritoneal macrophages may also play a role in the development of this disease. In the present study, we investigate the soluble levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), epidermal growth factor-receptor (EGF-R), granulocyte/macrophage-colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF), Insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1) and interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) in the serum of 28 women with and 20 without endometriosis. We also compared these levels before, during and after treatment with danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot, the two therapeutic regiments of choice concerning this disease. We found that only sVEGF levels were higher in women with endometriosis in comparison to controls (P < 0.001) while sEGF-R is not present. GM-CSF, IGF-1 and IFN-gamma soluble levels are not affected in either healthy or endometriotic subjects. The 6-month treatment with danazol decreased sVEGF levels (P < 0.02) and increased sEGF-R levels (P < 0.001). These observations support the view that VEGF may be associated with the disease process and that danazol may bring sVEGF levels to a normal threshold. However, future studies will be focused on the anti-angiogenic control of the action of VEGF in patients with endometriosis.Serum CA-125 in preoperative patients at high risk for endometriosis.To investigate the factors contributing to the elevated level of CA-125 in endometriosis and to study whether CA-125 assay is useful to identify women who require preoperative bowel preparation.A total of 685 women undergoing surgery for endometriosis between July 1988 and June 1999 were studied. Preoperative serum CA-125 levels were compared between various pelvic conditions using F statistics. Multiple regression was employed to determine significant correlates of elevated serum CA-125, and the receiver operating characteristic curve was applied to assess the utility of serum CA-125 in preoperative preparation. Based on the two-sample Student t test, the sample size required to detect a difference in mean serum CA-125 levels of one-half of one standard deviation with a power of 90% when the sample size ratio of the two groups was 1:50 was 675 with a significance level of 5%.The mean serum CA-125 levels (IU/mL) for American Society of Reproductive Medicine stages I, II, III, and IV endometriosis were 18.8 +/- 0.9, 40.3 +/- 2.8, 77.1 +/- 3.5, and 182.4 +/- 14.0, respectively. CA-125 levels were significantly increased with advanced stages (P <.001, F test). Furthermore, serum CA-125 levels were significantly higher in patients with more extensive adhesions to the peritoneum, omentum, ovary, fallopian tube, colon, and cul-de-sac, or with ruptured endometrioma (P <.001, F test). We then classified patients with at least one of the three factors including dense omentum adhesion, ruptured endometrioma, and complete cul-de-sac obliteration as the high-risk group that required preoperative bowel preparation, and the others as the low-risk group. Receiver operating characteristic curve analyses set a cutoff point of 65 IU/mL, which gave a sensitivity of 76%, a specificity of 71%, a positive predictive value of 76%, and a negative predictive value of 93.2%.Our results suggest that preoperative CA-125 assay is useful to decide which women should receive preoperative bowel preparation. Endometriosis patients with preoperative CA-125 levels higher than 65 IU/mL are at high risk for severe pelvic adhesions that warrant thorough preoperative bowel preparation.Matrix metalloproteinase-9 activity in the plasma of patients after surgical resection of endometriomas.Matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs) may have a role in the pathogenesis of endometrioma. The level of MMP was lower compared to the level taken after resection of endometrioma.A study of plasma progesterone, oestradiol-17beta, prolactin and LH levels, and of the luteal phase appearance of the ovaries in patients with endometriosis and infertility.Thirty-four infertile patients with regular cycles and endometriosis were studied and compared to a control group of 28 women. The endometriosis was classified as mild (n = 16), moderate (n = 9) and severe (n = 9) according to Acosta et al (1973). The interval between the LH peak and the onset of subsequent menstruation was shorter (P = 0.024) in patients with endometriosis than in the control group. In mild endometriosis, oestradiol-17beta levels fell on the day after the LH peak, but this was not the case in moderate and severe endometriosis. In mild, moderate and severe endometriosis the plasma progesterone concentration did not rise on the first day following the LH peak, and at laparoscopy significantly (P less than 0.005) less ovulation stigmata were present. We conclude that endometriosis is associated with luteinization in situ and that this may explain the associated infertility.Endometrial osteopontin mRNA expression and plasma osteopontin levels are increased in patients with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate osteopontin (OPN) mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium and plasma OPN levels in patients with endometriosis.A total of 79 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 43 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. OPN mRNA expression in endometrial tissues was measured by real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and plasma concentrations of OPN were quantified using a specific commercial sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA).Osteopontin mRNA expression in endometrial tissue was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in controls (P = 0.010). The mean plasma levels of OPN (mean +/- S.E.M.) in patients with endometriosis and controls were 407.31 +/- 37.80 ng/mL and 165.84 +/- 19.29 ng/mL, respectively (P < 0.001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for plasma OPN revealed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.894, with a sensitivity of 93.0%, specificity of 72.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 3.37, and negative likelihood ratio of 0.1 using a cut-off value of 167.68 ng/mL.Osteopontin may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and plasma OPN may be a useful non-invasive marker for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 concentrations are attenuated in peritoneal fluid and sera of women with endometriosis and restored in sera by gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist therapy.To establish tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1) concentrations in peritoneal fluid (PF) and sera of women with endometriosis and compare them to disease-free controls.Prospective randomized study.Academic medical center.Women with laparoscopically documented endometriosis and disease-free women of reproductive age.Peritoneal fluid and sera were collected, and some women received gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist (GnRH-a) therapy for endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and sera TIMP-1 concentrations were measured with a specific RIA.The TIMP-1 concentrations were significantly lower in PF and sera of women with endometriosis compared with disease-free women. The GnRH-a therapy restored serum TIMP-1 concentrations.Aberrant expression and localization of TIMP-1 may derange the proteolytic milieu of the peritoneal cavity and contribute to the etiology and underlying physiologic sequelae associated with endometriosis. Measurement of TIMP-1 in serum may aid in diagnosing endometriosis and assist with monitoring treatment efficacy in women with this disease.F(ab')2 segment is the active component of immunoglobulin G autoantibody generation in patients with endometriosis.To determine if the low titer antiendometrial antibody detection by indirect immunofluorescence (IIF) in the sera of patients with endometriosis is because of specific antigen-antibody interactions.Sera of selected patients subjected to separation of immunoglobulin fragments by ammonium sulfate precipitation and pepsin digestion and tested by IIF. In a comparative method, a fragment, crystallizable (Fc) flooding technique was used to determine the active component.Sera obtained preoperatively in the outpatient and results matched with surgical findings.Patients 45 years of age or less presenting for gynecological surgery who had signed an informed consent for the drawing of preoperative blood.None.Indirect immunofluorescence was graded according to the intensity of staining and the lowest dilution at which staining occurred.All of the sera of the 11 patients with endometriosis exhibited F(ab')2 specific staining but none exhibited Fc fragment staining. None of the 7 control patients displayed F(ab')2 or Fc fragment staining.F(ab')2 fragment is the active component of an immunologically specific interaction when antiendometrial antibodies are detected in the sera of patients with endometriosis.Cytokine profiles in serum and peritoneal fluid from infertile women with and without endometriosis.To study the serum and peritoneal fluid cytokine profiles in infertile women with minimal/mild active endometriosis.Fifty-seven consecutive infertile women undergoing laparoscopy for unexplained infertility had peritoneal fluid and serum samples obtained at the time of laparoscopy. The levels of interleukin-6 (IL-6), interleukin-8 (IL-8), interleukin-1 beta (IL-1 beta), vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), monocyte chemotatic protein-1 (MCP-1), RANTES, platelet derived growth factor (PDGF), soluble Fas (sFas), and soluble Fas Ligand (sFasL) in peritoneal fluid and serum were measured to compare the concentration in both biological fluids, in women who have minimal/mild red endometriosis using women with no endometriosis as controls.Peritoneal fluid levels of MCP-1, IL-8 and IL-6 were significantly higher in the endometriosis group (P < 0.012, P = 0.003, and P = 0.015, respectively). There was no significant difference in the peritoneal fluid levels of IL-1 beta, TNF-alpha, RANTES, VEGF, PDGF, sFas and sFasL in the two groups. Although serum levels of IL-8 were higher in women with endometriosis, the difference was not significant (P = 0.07). Serum levels of PDGF, IL-6, RANTES, IL-1 beta, TNF-alpha, and sFas, were not significantly different in the two groups.The elevated levels of MCP-1, IL-6, and IL-8 in peritoneal fluid but not serum may indicate the importance of local macrophage activating factors in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal evaluation of vitamin D-binding protein in women with endometriosis.Vitamin D-binding protein (also called DBP or Gc-globulin) is recognized as a multifunctional protein involved in the action scavenger system, the transport of vitamin D sterols, and the modulation of immune and inflammatory responses. This study evaluated total serum and peritoneal concentrations of vitamin D-binding protein in women with endometriosis, known as an inflammation-associated disease.The total concentration of DBP was measured with an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using a polyclonal antibody raised in a goat immunized with human DBP. Serum and peritoneal fluid were collected from women with endometriosis (n=26) and from patients with benign gynecological conditions serving as a control group (n=17).In general, the vitamin D-binding protein concentration was higher in serum than in peritoneal fluid. Women with endometriosis had higher serum but lower peritoneal levels of DBP compared with the control group; however, no significance was noted. When the endometriosis group was divided with regard to severity, an insignificantly higher serum level of DBP was observed in advanced endometriosis compared with the mild form of the disease, whereas the peritoneal concentration was not dependent on disease severity.It is concluded that serum and peritoneal DBP concentrations are not affected in women with endometriosis; however, based on the latest published data, it is possible that both the serum and peritoneal concentrations of vitamin D-binding protein may be dependent on Gc genotype, which results in differential modulation of monocyte/macrophage activity.Detection of endometriosis with the use of plasma protein profiling by surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry.In this prospective case-control study, we determined the role of surface-enhanced laser desorption and ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry in the detection of histologically proven endometriosis. In the plasma of the group with endometriosis, there were 20 different protein peaks, and the classifier showed a sensitivity of 87.5% and a specificity of 80% in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Artificial neural networks combined with surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization mass spectra distinguish endometriosis from healthy population.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry protein chip array technology was used to detect the serum proteomic patterns in patients with endometriosis. Four potential biomarkers (8,141 m/z, 6,096 m/z, 5,894 m/z, and 3,269 m/z) were found. This method showed great potential in screening better biomarkers for endometriosis.Serum CA-125 antigen levels increase during menses.Serum CA-125 antigen levels were measured by radioimmunoassay before and during menses in women with and without endometriosis. Mean CA-125 levels were significantly increased in both groups during menses. Samples obtained during menses represent a potential source of elevated levels and false positive results.Positive correlation between serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels in women with pelvic endometriosis.One of the diagnostic markers of endometriosis is CA-125, and elevated levels of this are caused by high concentrations in the ectopic endometrium. The objective of this study was to correlate CA-125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid from women with and without pelvic endometriosis.This was a prospective, cross-sectional, controlled study of consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopy for infertility, pelvic pain or tubal ligation, during early follicular phase, at the university hospital of Faculdade de Medicina de Ribeirão Preto.Fifty-two patients were divided into two groups: endometriosis group, consisting of 35 patients with biopsy-confirmed pelvic endometriosis, and control group, consisting of 17 patients without endometriosis. CA-125 levels in serum samples and peritoneal fluid were determined by chemiluminescence.CA-125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid were higher in patients with advanced pelvic endometriosis (means of 39.1 +/- 45.8 U/ml versus 10.5 +/- 5.9 U/ml in serum, p < 0.005; 1,469.4 +/- 1,350.4 U/ml versus 888.7 +/- 784.3 U/ml in peritoneal fluid, p < 0.05), and showed a positive correlation between each other (correlation coefficient (r) = 0.4880). Women with more advanced degrees of endometriosis showed higher CA-125 levels in both serum and peritoneal fluid (p = 0.0001).There is a positive correlation between serum and peritoneal fluid values of CA-125 in women with and without endometriosis, and their levels are higher in peritoneal fluid. Advanced endometriosis is related to higher levels in both serum and peritoneal fluid.Serum and peritoneal fluid proteins in women with and without endometriosis.We examined the proteins in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis (and of healthy controls) for evidence of an autoimmune response that might account for their impaired fertility. No antibodies against endometrial glycoproteins or against "progestin dependent endometrial protein" (PEP) were found in any serum or peritoneal fluid sample. Levels of PEP were not different in serum from women with moderate to severe endometriosis (n = 6), with mild endometriosis (n = 21), or from disease-free cycling controls (n = 19). PEP levels in peritoneal fluid from mild endometriosis and from controls did not differ but were elevated ten times in fluid obtained in the secretory phase from women with moderate to severe disease. This suggests that PEP levels in peritoneal fluid reflect the extent of ectopic endometrial growth. The salient finding was a heretofore undescribed protein (mol wt 70,000) in secretory phase peritoneal fluid samples (18/20) and its absence during the proliferative phase (0/35).Discovery of phosphatidylcholines and sphingomyelins as biomarkers for ovarian endometriosis.Current non-invasive diagnostic methods for endometriosis lack sensitivity and specificity. In search for new diagnostic biomarkers for ovarian endometriosis, we used a hypothesis-generating targeted metabolomics approach.In a case-control study, we collected plasma of study participants and analysed their metabolic profiles. We selected a group of 40 patients with ovarian endometriosis who underwent laparoscopic surgery and a control group of 52 healthy women who underwent sterilization at the University Clinical Centre Ljubljana, Slovenia. Over 140 targeted analytes included glycerophospholipids, sphingolipids and acylcarnitines. The analytes were quantified by electrospray ionization tandem mass spectrometry. For assessing the strength of association between the metabolite or metabolite ratios and the disease, we used crude and adjusted odds ratios. A stepwise logistic regression procedure was used for selecting the best combination of biomarkers.Eight lipid metabolites were identified as endometriosis-associated biomarkers due to elevated levels in patients compared with controls. A model containing hydroxysphingomyelin SMOH C16:1 and the ratio between phosphatidylcholine PCaa C36:2 to ether-phospholipid PCae C34:2, adjusted for the effect of age and the BMI, resulted in a sensitivity of 90.0%, a specificity of 84.3% and a ratio of the positive likelihood ratio to the negative likelihood ratio of 48.3.Our results suggest that endometriosis is associated with elevated levels of sphingomyelins and phosphatidylcholines, which might contribute to the suppression of apoptosis and affect lipid-associated signalling pathways. Our findings suggest novel potential routes for therapy by specifically blocking highly up-regulated isoforms of phosphpolipase A2 and lysophosphatidylcholine acyltransferase 4.Increased telomerase activity and human telomerase reverse transcriptase mRNA expression in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered a frequent, benign disease with the ability to undergo neoplastic processes. The aim of this study was to evaluate the limitless replication potential of the endometrium in patients with endometriosis by examining human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) mRNA expression and telomerase activity.Endometrium samples from 30 endometriosis patients and 30 patients without endometriosis were obtained via endometrial biopsy. The expression of hTERT mRNA was determined by real-time RT-PCR assay, and telomerase activity was measured by telomerase repeat amplification protocol (TRAP) assay.The mean normalized hTERT (N hTERT) mRNA level was significantly higher in the endometriosis than in the control group (P = 0.013). The mean hTERT mRNA levels during the proliferative phase and during the secretory phase were higher in the endometriosis group than in the control group, although the difference was only significant for the secretory phase (P = 0.036). We found a prominent difference in endometrial telomerase activity between moderate-to-severe endometriosis and the control group (P = 0.048). The levels of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity increased as the disease became more severe (P = 0.038, P = 0.016).This study showed the overexpression of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity in the endometrium of endometriosis patients. These finding suggest that replication potential of endometrial cells may have an important role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Serum adiponectin concentrations are decreased in women with endometriosis.Adiponectin is a pleiotropic cytokine originally discovered as an adipocyte-specific gene product. Serum adiponectin concentrations have been reported to be low in women with endometrial cancer, breast cancer and uterine leiomyoma, suggesting possible involvement of adiponectin in these estrogen-related diseases. We thus addressed the relevance of adiponectin to endometriosis, an estrogen-dependent disease, in the present study.Women with (n = 48) and without (n = 30) endometriosis undergoing laparoscopy were recruited in this study. Blood samples were collected, and serum adiponectin concentrations were measured using a specific enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The relationship between laparoscopic findings and serum adiponectin concentrations was analysed.The adiponectin concentrations in the serum of the women with endometriosis (median, 13.1 microg/ml; interquartile range, 10.2 - 16.7) were significantly lower than those of the women without endometriosis (15.9 microg/ml, 13.5 - 19.5; P = 0.008). A significant negative correlation was found between serum adiponectin concentrations and both endometriosis scores (R = - 0.307, P = 0.006) and adhesion scores (R = - 0.254, P = 0.026) of the revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine classification of endometriosis.The present findings suggest that adiponectin is implicated in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Serum-soluble CD23 in patients with endometriosis and the effect of treatment with danazol and leuprolide acetate depot injection.Activated B cells have recently been shown to produce soluble CD23 from their membranes. The serum-soluble CD23 concentration in 21 patients with pelvic pain diagnosed as having endometriosis and confirmed by histology, and in 18 patients without pelvic pain, who had a normal pelvis during laparoscopic sterilization, was studied by chemiluminescent enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The endometriosis patients were randomized to 3 months of either danazol or leuprolide acetate injection. Serum was taken before and after 3 months of therapy. The serum-soluble CD23 concentration was significantly elevated in patients with endometriosis when compared with the controls (P < 0.0001). There was no correlation between soluble CD23 concentrations and the severity of endometriosis (r = 0.48, P > 0.05). The serum concentration of soluble CD23 decreased significantly on treatment with danazol but not leuprolide acetate (P < 0.05). We conclude that the elevation of soluble CD23 in patients with endometriosis suggests that there is activation of B cells, which respond to danazol but not leuprolide acetate injection.Use of a new CA 125 assay in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum CA 125 concentrations are elevated in some women with endometriosis; however, the low sensitivity and specificity of the assay have made it impractical to use it as a diagnostic test for endometriosis. Recently a second-generation CA 125 assay has been developed. The purpose of this study was to compare serum CA 125 concentrations in women with and without endometriosis using both the older assay and the new CA 125 assay and to determine if the new assay concentration improves the clinical utility of CA 125 in the diagnosis of endometriosis. A total of 123 patients with endometriosis, pelvic pain or infertility were enrolled. Blood for CA 125 was drawn in the cycle preceding laparoscopy or laparotomy, and concentrations found by the older and newer assays were correlated with the patients' endometriosis stage using the revised American Fertility Society classification of endometriosis. The CA 125 concentrations determined by the new assay were highly correlated with concentrations determined by the older assay in patients with and without endometriosis (r = 0.96). The sensitivity and specificity were slightly improved using the new CA 125 assay; however, this assay did not dramatically improve detection of endometriosis.The influence of extracellular matrix proteins on T-cell proliferation and apoptosis in women with endometriosis or uterine leiomyoma.Interactions between the extracellular matrix (ECM) and peripheral blood T cells in women with endometriosis and leiomyoma are hardly unknown. We have investigated the influence of two major ECM components, collagen IV (C-IV) and fibronectin (Fn), on T-cell proliferation and apoptosis in women with endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma. beta1 integrin expression, responsible for interactions with ECM proteins, was also studied.Peripheral blood lymphocytes were obtained from 53 women (17 with uterine leiomyomas, 18 with endometriosis, and 18 from healthy donors). T cells were exposed to ECM proteins co-immobilized with monoclonal antibody anti-CD3 for 72 hr. Apoptosis and S phase of the cell cycle of the T cells were studied by DNA analysis using flow cytometry. The proliferation of T cells was evaluated by MTT assay. The percentage of CD3+ cells expressing CD29 (beta1 integrin chain) was evaluated by double-color flow cytometry. Results were analyzed statistically using the Mann-Whitney test.(1) A general increase in the percentage of T cells in S phase could be seen in women with endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma in all culture conditions what may suggest general activation of T cells. (2) A significant increase in the percentage of cells in S phase was shown only in the case of T cells exposed to anti-CD3 + C-IV in both women with uterine leiomyoma and endometriosis. (3) However, no apoptotic cells were observed. (4) T cells from patients with uterine leiomyoma exhibited significantly increased level of proliferation after culture with anti-CD3 + C-IV. (5) More T cells expressed beta1 integrin in women with endometriosis or uterine leiomyoma than in healthy donors. Our data may suggest that increased beta1 integrin expression may enhance T-cell-ECM interactions, which may be responsible for the increased proliferation of T cells but not for apoptosis. Therefore, it is possible that interactions of T cells with ECM proteins, especially with C-IV, may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma.Decreased natural killer cell activity in endometriosis patients: relationship to disease pathogenesis.A number of reports have measured NK cell activity in patients with endometriosis with varied results. Therefore we have examined the NK activity of PBL from 44 gynecological patients undergoing laparoscopy. This analysis has demonstrated a significant reduction in NK activity only in more severe stages of endometriosis (stages III and IV) relative to patients with milder disease and controls. These data indicate that decreased NK activity is unlikely to be a primary etiological factor in the development of endometriosis but may indicate that decreased NK activity is related to the development of the more frequent and/or larger lesions characteristic of severe endometriosis. These data could indicate potential for immunotherapy of patients with advanced endometriosis by the upregulation of NK activity in vivo.Antiendometrial autoantibodies are generated in patients with endometriosis.Our aim was to investigate endometrial antigens involved in the autoimmunity of endometriosis.We detected endometrial antigens against which autoantibodies directed with Western blotting.Thirteen (72.2%), 14 (77.8%), and 15 (83.3%) of 18 serum samples from endometriosis patients had antibodies reactive against endometrial antigen wtih MW of 26 kd, 34 kd, and 42 kd, respectively, while 6 (33.3%), 8 (44.4%), and 8 (44.4%) of 18 samples from normal control women reacted against these antigens, respectively. The frequencies of antibodies to the endometrial antigens were significantly (P < 0.05) higher in the endometriosis patients than in the normal control women. Antibodies in peritoneal fluid (PF) reacted against antigens with MW of 26, 34, 38, 42, and 64 kd, while those from the normal control reacted against antigens with MW of 38, 42, and 64 kd. Serum samples from normal fertile males did not show any reactivity against these endometrial antigens.Our results show that autoantibodies reactive against endometrial antigens are present in patients with endometriosis.Mitogen induced production of polyclonal IgG is decreased in women with severe endometriosis.The etiology and/or pathogenesis of endometriosis may involve aspects of both humoral and cellular immunity.In this investigation, we analyzed the ability of B lymphocytes from distinct patient groups for production of IgG1, IgG2, and IgG3 following in vitro stimulation with polyclonal B-cell mitogens (pokeweed mitogen and Staphylococcus aureus Cowan strain I) after in vitro stimulation with polyclonal B-cell activators.We observed that the in vitro production of IgG1, IgG2, and IgG3 was identical among fertile controls (no endometriosis; N = 22), infertile women without endometriosis (N = 22), infertile women without endometriosis (N = 20) and patients with stage 1 or 2 endometriosis (N = 31). In contrast, in vitro IgG2 production was significantly reduced among women with stage 3 or 4 endometriosis (N = 11) compared to controls (P < 0.001).Since the number of circulating B cells was similar in each patient group studied, the reduced production of IgG2 in patients with stage 3 or 4 disease was not merely due to fewer antibody producing cells in those subjects, and we speculate that the observed decrease in polyclonal IgG2 production among these patients is due to a primary defect. In additional studies, we observed that polyclonal IgG2 production was normal among stage 3 or 4 patients treated with danazol (N = 11), but significantly reduced in patients treated with gonadotropin releasing hormone agonists (N = 8). Although not conclusive, these data suggest that danazol may have the capacity to correct the defective production of polyclonal IgG2 in patients with severe endometriosis.Changes of soluble fas and soluble fas ligand in serum and peritoneal fluid of infertile patients with endometriosis.To evaluate the relationship between levels of soluble Fas (sFas) and soluble Fas ligand (sFasL) in serum and peritoneal fluid of endometriosis-associated infertility.The soluble Fas ligand and soluble Fas levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of 20 infertile patients with endometriosis were assessed with enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and were compared with 14 infertile patients due to chronic pelvic infectious disease and 16 fertile controls.The sFasL levels were significantly higher in infertile patients with endometriosis (175.09 +/- 80.55 pg/mL in serum and 284.50 +/- 152.38 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) than those of infertile controls (88.47 +/- 43.55 pg/mL in serum and 17.30 +/- 9.62 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) and fertile controls (16.13 +/- 11.75 pg/mL in serum and 8.84 +/- 2.31 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid). In contrast, as for the sFas levels, infertile patients with endometriosis (828.60 +/- 429.65 pg/mL in serum and 349.61 +/- 288.89 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) did not show any significant difference compared with those in infertile patients resulting from pelvic infectious disease (868.75 +/- 570.48 pg/mL in serum and 181.76 +/- 157.78 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) and fertile control (822.26 +/- 129.12 pg/mL in serum and 318.42 +/- 145.16 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid).Based upon these results, high level of sFasL in serum and peritoneal fluid and thus apoptosis mediated by it may be implicated in the mechanism involved in endometriosis-related infertility.Expression of serum human leukocyte antigen and growth factor levels in a Greek family with familial endometriosis.An increased incidence of endometriosis in the first-degree relatives of patients with endometriosis has been reported, suggesting a familial predisposition and possible genetic influence. In this study, we present a family with four members who have histologically proven endometriosis (mother and three daughters) in two generations and one member with suspected endometriosis in the third generation. The aim of this study was to investigate the presence of serum-soluble class I and class II human leukocyte antigen (sHLA) levels, because they have been shown to be reduced in women with endometriosis. We also studied the levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and epidermal growth factor-receptor (EGF-Rc) whose function in angiogenesis implies an active role in endometriosis.Apart from the family members under study, the control groups consisted of 38 women with endometriosis and 30 without any pelvic disease. All the soluble factors under investigation were measured by an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay technique using a specific immunoassay.All the affected family members and the 38 women with endometriosis had very low levels of serum-soluble class I and class II HLA levels compared with healthy subjects. The circulating levels of VEGF were higher in the endometriosis group than the healthy control group, a pattern in accordance with the family members. On the contrary, EGF-Rc was negative in controls and women with endometriosis, with the exception of certain family members in specific stages of endometriosis.We studied the association of endometriosis with circulating levels of human leukocyte antigens and VEGF in two generations of a single family (mother and three daughters). These markers were expressed distinctly in women with familial endometriosis.Antibodies to carbonic anhydrase in endometriosis: prevalence, specificity, and relationship to clinical and laboratory parameters.To investigate the presence and clinical association of serum autoantibodies to carbonic anhydrase (CA) in women with and without endometriosis.Sera were tested in an ELISA against human and bovine CAI and/or CAII isoenzymes and by Western immunoblotting of trypsin-digested fragments of human CAII as antigens. The ELISA positivity was defined as mean + 2 SD of 100 control sera. Positive sera also were tested for the presence of antiendometrial antibodies and antinuclear antibodies (ANA) by indirect immunofluorescence assays (IFA) on endometrial (ECC) and HEp-2 cells, antibodies to single-stranded (ss) and double-stranded (ds) DNA by the Farr-type RIA and Crithidia IFA, and extractable nuclear antigens (Sm, nRNP, Ro, and La) by an ELISA.Sera from 319 patients with laparoscopic diagnosed pelvic endometriosis (100 stage I, 95 stage II, 67 stage III, and 57 stage IV), 100 with other gynecologic disorders, and 100 control women were used.In the ELISA, 113 of 319 (35.4%) endometriosis sera had elevated immunoglobulin G antibodies against nondenatured CA isoenzymes. The reactivity of sera from the endometriosis group was significantly higher (35%) in all four subgroups of patients than each of the nonendometriosis sera (< 12% and < 6%, respectively). No stage-dependent variation of an autoantibody pattern was evident. However, anti-CA autoantibodies were present in 66.3% of women with endometriosis-associated infertility. The frequency of anti-CA autoantibodies was significantly higher (by 51.7%) in women with antiendometrial antibodies detectable by IFA. In addition, in sera positive for anti-CA antibodies, the frequency of ANA also was increased (20/113 [17.6%]) with titers of 1:40 to 1:1,080. The ANA-positive sera were negative for anti-ssDNA, anti-dsDNA, anti-Sm, anti-nRNP, and anti-La. However, three sera were positive for anti-Ro antibodies. Immunoblotting study of autoantibody reactivity with trypsin-digested subfragments of human CAII revealed consistent immunoreactivity with 14 to 6.2-kd range CAII peptides.[1] A subgroup of patients with endometriosis have autoantibodies directed to native and linear epitopes of the CA protein. [2] Prevalence of anti-CA antibodies was associated with antiendometrial antibodies and ANA. [3] Anti-CA antibodies were associated with a higher predictive value of the disease when all patient subgroups were considered together.Use of CA125 fluctuation during the menstrual cycle as a tool in the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis; a preliminary report.To elucidate whether endometriosis can be diagnosed clinically by assessing the differences between serum CA125 levels during menstruation and during the rest of the menstrual cycle.The study was performed in 28 patients who underwent laparoscopy to check for pelvic causes of infertility. Patients with endometriosis were selected as the study group, and patients with normal laparoscopic findings functioned as the control group. Blood specimens were taken for CA125 determination during menstruation and during the rest of the menstrual cycle. Mean serum CA125 concentrations were compared by the two-sample t-test for between-group comparisons and the paired t-test for within-group comparisons. The receiver operating characteristic curve was applied to assess the usefulness of CA125 level changes during the menstrual cycle in the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis.The mean CA125 concentrations of healthy women during menstruation and during the rest of the menstrual cycle were 12.2 and 10 U ml(-1), respectively. In this group, the mean CA125 concentration was an average of 22% higher during menstruation than during the rest of the menstrual cycle (P < 0.001). The patients with endometriosis showed a similar pattern to that of normal women, but the levels differed by 198.3% in these patients (P < 0.001). Mean CA125 concentrations of these patients during menstruation and in the rest of the cycle were 35.8 and 12 U ml(-1), respectively. The mean CA125 concentration during menstruation was significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in normal women (P < 0.001), but CA125 concentrations at other points in the menstrual cycle were found to be similar in both groups (P > 0.05). ROC curve analyses set a cutoff of 83% (percentage increment of CA125 level during menstruation compared with that on days without menstrual bleeding), which gives a sensitivity of 93% and specificity of 92%, with a corresponding likelihood ratio of 11.3.It may be possible to diagnose endometriosis clinically by assessment of the differences in CA125 level during menstruation as against the remainder of the menstrual cycle.[Establishment of serum peptidome pattern-based diagnostic model of endometriosis].To establish a diagnostic model of endometriosis by analyzing serum peptidome patterns in patients with endometriosis using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization-time of flight mass spectrometry (MALDI-TOF-MS).Serum samples from 21 endometriosis patients and 29 healthy control subjects were analyzed using MALDI-TOF-MS and Clinprotools 2.0 software to establish the diagnostic model of endometriosis, which was validated using the serum samples from 10 endometriosis patients and 15 healthy controls.Eighteen statistically significant peptide peaks were obtained with the m/z value ranging from 1,000 to 10,000 (P<0.01). Among the peaks, 12 were down-regulated and 6 up-regulated. The sensitivity and specificity of the model was 90.9% and 100.0%, respectively, with a diagnostic accuracy of 96.2%.This model shows the feasibility of using MALDI-TOF-MS and Clinprotools software to identify the biomarkers of endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and serum concentration of interleukin-16 in women with endometriosis.Soluble interleukin-1 receptor type II blocks monocyte chemotactic protein-1 secretion by U937 cells in response to peripheral blood serum of women with endometriosis.To assess the ability of peripheral blood serum from women with endometriosis to induce monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) secretion by monocytes and the putative role of the interleukin-1 (IL-1) system in endometriosis-associated monocyte activation.Cultures of U937 monocytic cells exposed to serum from normal women (control group) or women with endometriosis.Gynecology clinic and human reproduction research laboratory.Seventy-nine women with endometriosis and 38 control women with no evidence of endometriosis at laparoscopy.Peripheral blood obtained a few days before laparoscopy.MCP-1 secretion in the culture medium and serum concentrations of soluble IL-1 receptor type II (sIL-1RII), IL-1beta, and IL-1alpha by ELISA or by enzyme immunometric assay.Serum concentrations of sIL-1RII were significantly lower in women with stage I-II endometriosis than in control women, whereas serum concentrations of IL-1beta and IL-1alpha were comparable between the two groups. The serum of women with endometriosis induced higher secretion of MCP-1 by U937 cells than that of control women, particularly in the initial stages of endometriosis (stages I-II), and recombinant IL-1RII (rIL-1RII) significantly blocked that secretion.These findings point toward a deficiency in the mechanisms involved in the down-regulation of IL-1 actions at the systemic level and reveal sIL-1RII as a key factor involved in that process.Is HE4 a useful endometrioma marker?By the comparison between most used tumor marker trend (cancer antigen 125: CA 125 and human epididymal secretory protein E4: HE4) before and after laparoscopic surgery, the aim of the present study was to assess HE4 usefulness in ovarian benign cyst and endometrioma diagnosis.Thirty-eight patients were enrolled in this prospective study: 25 women underwent unilateral endometriosis ovarian cyst excision, 13 underwent benign ovarian cyst incision, and 26 were healthy controls. CA 125 and HE4 serum levels were estimated before surgery (in the early proliferative phase of the cycle) and one month after surgery.A statistically significant decrease of CA 125 serum level was found after an endometrioma surgical excision but no decreases in HE4 serum level.In patients with endometrioma, no alteration was found in HE4 serum levels before and after surgery, while CA125 serum levels decreased after surgery. HE4 may better distinguish a malign cyst from benign one, but it is not useful in the diagnosis of low risk endometrioma.Performance of peripheral (serum and molecular) blood markers for diagnosis of endometriosis.To quantify the mRNA levels of MMP-3, MMP-9, VEGF and Survivin in peripheral blood and the serum levels of CA-125 and Ca19-9 in women with and without endometriosis and to investigate the performance of these markers to differentiate between deep and ovarian endometriosis.A case control study enrolled a series of 60 patients. Twenty controls have been matched with 20 cases of ovarian and 20 cases of deep endometriosis. Univariable and multivariable performance of serum CA125 and CA19-9, mRNA for Survivin, MMP9, MMP3 and VEGF genes have been evaluated by means of ROC curves and logistic regression, respectively.No difference in markers' concentration was detected between ovarian and deep endometriosis. In comparison with controls, serum CA125 and CA19 yielded the better sensitivity followed by mRNA for Survivin gene (81.5, 51.9 and 7.5% at 10% false positive rate, respectively). Multivariable estimated odds of endometriosis yielded a sensitivity of 87% at the same false positive rate.A combination of serum and molecular markers could allow a better diagnosis of endometriosis.The use of biochemical markers in the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate CA 125 II, C-reactive protein (CRP) and serum amyloid A (SAA) and anticardiolipin antibody (aCL) concentrations for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis. The study population consisted of 15 women without endometriosis, as confirmed by laparoscopy (group A), and 35 patients with pelvic endometriosis diagnosed by laparoscopy or laparotomy (group B). Group B patients were divided into those at stages I and II of the disease (BI/II) and those at stages III and IV (BIII/IV). Blood samples were obtained twice during the menstrual cycle: on day 1, 2 or 3 of the cycle and on day 8, 9 or 10 of the cycle. CA 125 II and CRP concentrations were higher in group III/IV patients compared with healthy controls, mainly during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle; SAA concentrations were also higher in this group of patients compared with healthy controls, but only during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle. Immunoglobulin (Ig) M aCL concentrations were higher in all patients with endometriosis compared with healthy controls, mainly during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle. It is concluded that these determinations may contribute to the diagnosis and the indication of treatment for pelvic endometriosis. Determination of CA 125 II concentrations at the beginning of the menstrual cycle may aid the diagnosis of stage III and IV endometriosis. IgM aCL appears to be associated with the presence of all stages of the disease, while SAA values are elevated in severe situations. Measurement of these molecules may therefore provide a valuable tool in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.Serum biomarker for diagnosis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is estimated to affect 10% of women during the reproductive years. The lack of a non-invasive diagnostic test significantly contributes to the long delay between onset of the symptoms and definitive diagnosis of endometriosis. This case-control study was conducted to identify specific endometriosis antigens using 2D gel analysis in women with endometriosis (n = 5) and without endometriosis (n = 5). Differentially expresses spots were analyzed using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization-time-of-flight/mass spectrometry (nanoLC-ESI-MS/MS) with MASCOT analysis, in order to identify the corresponding proteins. ELISAs were performed on a different cohort of endometriosis (n = 120) and healthy patients (n = 20) in order to confirm the differential expression of the identified proteins. ROC analysis of ELISA results confirmed the statistical significance of the differential expression for one of these proteins: Zn-alpha2-glycoprotein (P = 0.019). We propose the analysis of the expression level of this protein in the serum as a new non-invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis.[Evaluation of tumor necrosis factor-alpha and tumor necrosis factor-beta in serum of patients with endometriosis].To evaluate the levels of tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) and tumor necrosis factor-beta (TNF-beta) before and after conservative laparoscopic surgery in patients with endometriosis.The levels of TNF-alpha and TNF-beta in the serum of both 82 patients with EMS and 68 controls were determined by ELISA.The levels of TNF-alpha and TNF-beta in the serum of patients with EMS were significantly higher than those of the controls (P < 0.01), and they increased with the clinical terms ( P < 0.05). After clearance of endometrosis foci with laparoscopic conservative surgery, the TNF-alpha levels decreased significantly in EMS III - IV, and TNF-beta levels decreased significantly in EMS I - IV.Measuring TNF-alpha and TNF-beta levels in the serum of patients with EMS may have important value in postoperative follow-up, surveillance and evaluation of the effectiveness of the surgery.Immune rosettes of T and B lymphocytes in infertile women with endometriosis.We examined the cell-mediated immune response in women with pelvic endometriosis by quantitating their T and B lymphocytes. The study was conducted on heparinized peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid. The results were compared with those in a control group of women without evidence of endometriosis. Each patient underwent laparoscopy as part of her infertility evaluation. The ability of T cells to form rosettes with sheep erythrocytes was used to estimate the percentage of total and active T cells. B lymphocytes were quantitated by erythrocyte antibody complement binding capacity. In addition, T and B lymphocytes were assayed with the Immunobead technique using specific monoclonal antibodies. The helper T cell (T4) and suppressor T cell (T8) subsets of lymphocytes were evaluated with specific monoclonal antibodies coupled to microbeads. The results demonstrated an increased number of T and B cells in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood from patients with endometriosis as compared with controls. Furthermore, the ratio T4:T8 was significantly increased in patients with endometriosis. These results suggest a cell-mediated immune response in the presence of endometriosis.Autoantibodies in endometriosis sera recognize a Thomsen-Friedenreich-like carbohydrate antigen.Autoantibody responses to endometrial antigens are a common feature of endometriosis. Antibody responses to a number of serum and tissue antigens such as alpha(2)-Heremans Schmidt glycoprotein (alpha(2)-HSG), transferrin, and carbonic anhydrase have been identified. The nature of the epitopes recognized on these proteins has not been determined. In this study we show that the serum antibody response to alpha(2)-HSG and carbonic anhydrase is against a common carbohydrate epitope which is also expressed on bovine fetuin. Removal of carbohydrate moieties from these antigens resulted in loss of antibody binding. Antibody reactivity with alpha(2)-HSG, fetuin and other antigens was removed by binding with the lectin jacalin. Jacalin specifically binds the Thomsen-Friedenreich antigen (Galbeta1-3GalNAc). Demonstrating that the autoantibodies also reacted with other Thomsen-Friedenreich antigen-bearing proteins, serum IgA1 and haemopexin confirmed an association with this epitope. These antigens have not been previously described as autoantigens in endometriosis and are of interest since they raise the possibility that this autoimmune response may either play a direct role in the disease process or reflect an abnormality of glycosylation in endometriosis. These results may also prove useful in the development of a serum diagnostic test for endometriosis.Soluble ICAM-1 levels in the serum of endometriotic patients appear to be independent of medical treatment.Adhesion molecules regulate the interaction of cells with the extracellular matrix and/or other cells. The intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1; CD54) is a member of the immunoglobulin superfamily and expressed by several cell types, including leukocytes and endothelial cells. A circulating form of the usually membrane-bound molecule was identified and characterized in normal human serum and in sera from patients with endometriosis. In the present study, we established the serum-soluble ICAM-1 (sICAM-1) levels in patients with endometriosis. We also studied the effect of danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot on the levels of sICAM-1. Thirty-eight women, 18-45 years of age, with regular menses and documented pelvic endometriosis were recruited from a University Hospital setting. Twenty-two women with endometriosis were randomly divided into two groups. Danazol (600 mg) were given every day for 6 months, and 3.75 mg of leuprorelin acetate depot every 28 days for 6 months. Serum sICAM-1 concentrations were measured before, during and after treatment, and its quantitative determination was performed by an ELISA technique using a specific immunoassay. We found that (1) sICAM-1 levels were higher in women with endometriosis in comparison to healthy subjects; (2) the 6 month treatment with danazol or leuprorelin acetate depot increased sICAM-1 levels (P<0.001); (3) 3 months after termination of both treatments, sICAM-1 levels were unchanged. Although the mechanism leading to the increase of sICAM-1 needs to be further clarified, any benefits of medical treatment of endometriosis such as danazol or leuprorelin appear to be independent of changes in ICAM-1 serum levels.The possible anti-inflammatory role of circulating human leukocyte antigen levels in women with endometriosis after treatment with danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot.Endometriosis is defined as an inflammatory condition of the female reproductive tract, a state often associated with infertility and miscarriage. Many exogenously administered factors (treatments) control the disease via as yet unknown pathways. Possible candidate molecules involved in these mechanisms could be the serum-soluble human leukocyte antigens (sHIA) that have been detected in a variety of human body fluids and that are associated with several diseases.We here examine how danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot treatments exert their anti-inflammatory action. It is plausible that subtle alterations mediated by these treatments and in relation to sHLA may explain the pathophysiology of endometriosis and provide insights towards new therapeutic protocols.Indirect enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), using specific monoclonal antibodies, determined serum-soluble class-I and class-II HLA levels. ELISA readings from treated women were compared with normal healthy subjects.Serum-soluble class-I and class-II HLA levels are statistically significantly lower (P < 0.001) in women with endometriosis than in the control groups. However, danazol but not leuprorelin acetate depot administration augments soluble HLA class I and class II (P < 0.01 and P < 0.001, respectively) to normal levels during the treatment period, an increase that may account for the anti-inflammatory effect and the remission observed.It is shown that one of the underlying causes of endometriosis may be the lack of both circulating class-I and class-II antigen levels. Danazol administration acts via an induced release of these antigens, whose presence correlates with the degree of the inflammatory alleviation obtained. We thus provide evidence that the inflammatory state of the disease appears to be associated with soluble HLA levels because, 3 months after ceasing therapy, the circulating antigens in the serum return to the same levels that correspond to the pathological condition.Comparison of the clinical value of CA 19-9 versus CA 125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Preoperative blood samples and intraoperative tissue specimens were obtained from 101 patients with endometriosis and 78 patients without endometriosis referred for benign gynecologic operations to investigate the clinical value of serum and tissue CA 19-9 levels in the diagnostic evaluation of endometriosis as compared to CA 125. Our prospective cohort study showed that serum CA 19-9 is a valuable marker in the diagnosis of endometriosis, and it may be used to predict the patients with severe endometriosis when used with CA 125.Serum CA 125 as a marker for patients with external endometriosis.Serum CA 125 levels were assayed in 75 healthy female controls and 34 patients with external endometriosis prior to treatment, during treatment, and after treatment. The results of the assay showed that the mean pretreatment serum CA 125 level of the patients with external endometriosis (80.7 U/mL) was significantly (P less than .001) higher than that of the controls (17.9 U/mL). This difference was even more pronounced for those patients with progressive (stage III or IV) endometriosis (mean = 114.0 U/mL). Thus, the assay of serum CA 125 may be useful as an auxiliary tool in the diagnosis of progressive endometriosis. Although the high pretreatment level of serum CA 125 decreased after danazol treatment of 400 mg/day to within the normal limits, usually within 4 to 12 weeks, laparoscopic examinations indicated that most of the endometriosis cases were not cured until 12-16 weeks of danazol treatment.Elevation of CA 19-9 and chromogranin A, in addition to CA 125, are detectable in benign tumors in leiomyomas and endometriosis.As the best-known tumor marker for ovarian carcinoma, CA 125 has also been commonly used to monitor patients with common benign gynecologic diseases such as endometriosis and leiomyoma. Both of these benign tumors are known to be at risk of developing into cancer. During the screening of an asymptomatic population with multiple tumor markers, including alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), prostate-specific antigen (PSA), CA 125, CA 19-9, CA 15-3, chromogranin A (CgA), and squamous cell carcinoma antigen (SCC), we have detected elevated tumor markers in 142 individuals; 19 of them were diagnosed with endometriosis or leiomyoma or both. In addition to the detection of elevation of CA 125 in these benign tumors, elevated CA 19-9 or CgA was also found in these patients with endometriosis or leiomyoma. Many patients only had elevated CA 19-9 or CgA; the elevation of CA 125 was not detected. It appears that instead of monitoring only CA 125, as is traditionally done, multiple tumor markers, including CA 19-9, CgA, and CA 125, should be measured simultaneously in women with clinical disorders associated with the ovary or uterus in order to detect gynecologic benign tumors and in order to prevent further development of cancer.Serum concentrations of soluble human leukocyte class I antigens and of the soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in endometriosis: relationship with stage and non-pigmented peritoneal lesions.Serum concentrations of soluble human leukocyte class I antigens (sHLA-I) and of the intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (sICAM-1) are increased in the early inflammatory stages of several immune-related diseases. These soluble molecules also exert immunomodulatory activity, including regulation of natural killer (NK) cell cytotoxicity. The aim of this study was to verify whether sHLA-I and sICAM-1 serum concentrations are related to the various stages of pelvic endometriosis, which is an immune-related disorder associated with impaired in-vitro NK cell activity. Serum sHLA-I and sICAM-1 concentrations were similar in patients and in healthy donors. However, when evaluated according to disease stage, sHLA-I and sICAM-1 concentrations were higher in patients with endometriosis stage I-II (revised American Fertility Society classification), or with non-pigmented peritoneal lesions. In conclusion, studies on sHLA-I and sICAM-1 may help to clarify the pathogenic mechanisms of endometriosis, and their serum concentrations may serve as additional markers for the early detection of recurrence of the disease during the monitoring of treatment outcome.Plasma urocortin levels in the diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis.Urocortin is a neuropeptide, member of the corticotropin-releasing hormone family, that is produced by the human endometrium. Ovarian endometrioma is a prevalent gynecologic disorder still lacking specific serum markers. In the present study we measured systemic levels of urocortin to assess the diagnostic performance of its determination in distinguishing endometriomas from other benign ovarian cysts.Plasma urocortin was measured by radioimmunoassay in women with ovarian endometrioma (n=40) and in women with benign, nonendometriotic ovarian cysts (n=40). The diagnostic accuracy of urocortin measurement was evaluated by receiver operating characteristic curve and compared with the standard marker, CA 125. To support the local origin of the peptide, we also evaluated its localization in endometriomas by immunohistochemistry and its concentrations in cyst fluid and peritoneal fluid of 12 women with endometrioma.Plasma urocortin levels were twice as high in women with endometrioma (median 49 pg/mL, interquartile range 41-63 pg/mL) than in the control group (19 [15-23] pg/mL, P<.001) and significantly higher in the cystic content of endometriomas than in the peritoneal fluid and plasma (P<.05). The peptide was immunolocalized in endometrioma glands and stromal capillary vessels. Elevated plasma urocortin levels detected 88% of the cases of endometrioma with 90% specificity, whereas CA 125 detected only 65% of the cases with the same specificity.Plasma urocortin is increased in women with endometriomas, and its measurement may be useful for the differential diagnosis of endometrioma compared with other benign ovarian cysts.II.High serum follistatin levels in women with ovarian endometriosis.Follistatin is an activin-binding protein produced by several tissues, including endometrium and endometriotic implants. We aimed to quantify follistatin in patients with ovarian endometriosis and investigate its value as a diagnostic marker.Women undergoing laparoscopic excision of ovarian endometrioma (n = 52) or other benign ovarian cysts (n = 52) were studied, plus women with non-ovarian endometriosis (n = 11) and healthy controls (n = 27). Serum was collected from all subjects, and peritoneal and cystic fluid from a subset with endometrioma. Follistatin was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The diagnostic accuracy of follistatin to detect endometrioma was evaluated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve and compared with cancer antigen (CA)-125.Serum follistatin was increased in women with ovarian endometrioma (2080 +/- 94 pg/ml) compared with controls (545 +/- 49 pg/ml, P < 0.001), other benign ovarian cysts (795 +/- 60 pg/ml, P < 0.001) or non-ovarian endometriosis (1271 +/- 115 pg/ml, P < 0.001). Cystic fluid showed a higher concentration of follistatin (9850 +/- 4461 pg/ml) than peritoneal fluid (1885 +/- 261 pg/ml, P < 0.001) and serum (P < 0.001). Follistatin levels detected 48/52 cases of endometrioma (92% sensitivity) at 1433 pg/ml cut-off, corresponding to 92% specificity. CA-125 detected only 44% of endometriomas with 90% specificity. ROC curve comparison showed follistatin was more accurate than CA-125 to discriminate women with endometrioma either from controls or women with other benign ovarian cysts (P < 0.0001).Serum follistatin is increased in women with endometriosis and allows clear distinction between endometrioma and other benign ovarian cysts. Follistatin has the sensitivity and specificity to become a useful clinical marker of ovarian endometrioma.miRNA-199a-5p regulates VEGFA in endometrial mesenchymal stem cells and contributes to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.It is believed that endometrial miRNAs contribute to the aetiology of endometriosis in stem cells; however, the mechanisms remain unclear. Here we collected serum samples from patients with or without endometriosis and characterized the miRNA expression profiles of these two groups. MicroRNA-199a-5p (miR-199a-5p) was dramatically down-regulated in patients with endometriosis compared with control patients. In addition, we found that the tumour suppressor gene, SMAD4, could elevate miR-199a-5p expression in ectopic endometrial mesenchymal stem cells. Up-regulation of miR-199a-5p suppressed cell proliferation, motility and angiogenesis of these ectopic stem cells by targeting the 3' untranslated region of VEGFA. Furthermore, we established an animal model of endometriosis and found that miR-199a-5p could decrease the size of endometriotic lesions in vivo. Taken together, this newly identified miR-199a-5p module provides a new avenue to the understanding of the processes of endometriosis development, especially proliferation, motility and angiogenesis, and may facilitate the development of potential therapeutics against endometriosis.[Leptin levels and infertile patients with endometriosis].[Measurements of interleukin-18 in peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with endometriosis].Aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and its relationship to clinical and analytical findings.To study the relationship between aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and clinical and laboratory findings.Prospective basic and clinical research.University hospital.Sixty-two women with endometriosis, and 12 without endometriosis.Conservative surgery, or hysterectomy and adnexectomy, along with an immunohistochemical study of aromatase in endometriotic and nonendometriotic tissues.Symptoms of the disease, ultrasound and surgical findings, values of tumor markers, steroids and immunoglobulins, and recurrences after surgery.We observed positive immunohistochemical expression for aromatase in endometriotic tissues from 38 patients (61.3%). Aromatase expression was negative in the rest of the tissues studied and in the 12 cases without endometriosis. Aromatase-positive patients had a higher number of endometriomas, more bilaterality, and more moderate-to-severe chronic pelvic pain. Also, infertility and associated leiomyomas were more frequent in these patients, though without significant differences. There were no differences in recurrence of the disease 1 year later. Estradiol and PRL levels were significantly higher, and IgG values lower, than in aromatase-negative patients. High values of blood sedimentation rate were more frequent in aromatase-negative patients.Molecular alterations such as the presence of aromatase in endometriotic tissues could be involved in the development or maintenance of endometriosis. Our findings suggest major severity, activity, and chronic pelvic pain in patients with aromatase in endometriotic tissue.Diagnostic value of the neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio and the combination of serum CA-125 for stages III and IV endometriosis.Currently, all the diagnostic indicators for endometriosis lack perfect sensitivity and specificity. According to the characteristic of endometriosis, we analyzed the new biomarker neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio (NLR) and the combination of NLR and serum CA-125 to investigate their diagnostic value for identifying stages III and IV endometriosis.The values of serum CA-125 and routine blood tests were collected from 197 patients with endometriosis, 102 with benign tumors and 112 healthy individuals. We investigated the sensitivity and specificity of NLR and its combination with serum-CA-125 for diagnosing stages III and IV endometriosis by using receiver operating characteristic (ROC).The mean values of NLR, the combination of serum CA-125 and NLR (combination) of the groups with stages III and IV endometriosis were significantly higher than the other two groups. Serum CA-125, NLR, and the combined biomarkers could significantly discriminate the stages III and IV endometriosis group from the other two groups (P < 0.05). NLR shows a lower sensitivity of 57.9% and specificity of 65.2% with a cutoff value at 1.82. And the combination of biomarkers has the highest AUC of 0.949 with a sensitivity of 86.8% and specificity of 92.0% at the cutoff value of 44.40. In addition, for patients with negative CA-125, 55.36% and 53.57% of the patients were able to be diagnosed with endometriosis by using NLR alone and the combination of biomarkers.For diagnosing stages III and IV endometriosis, the neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio is a better adjuvant to serum CA-125, and the neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio is valuable in diagnosing stages III and IV endometriosis for patients with negative serum CA-125.Concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, insulin-like growth factor binding protein-3, c-erbB-2, and epidermal growth factor in serum of patients with endometriosis.Endometriosis, although it is a benign disorder, shares many similarities with cancer. There is increasing levels of evidence suggesting that some circulating factors involved in gynecologic cancers, such as alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), insulin-like growth factor binding protein-3 (IGFBP-3), c-erbB-2 (HER-2/neu), and epidermal growth factor (EGF), could also play a role in endometriosis. Hence, the present study was aimed at evaluating whether the levels of these molecules are modulated in the serum of patients with endometriosis.Levels of AFP, IGFBP-3, c-erbB-2, and EGF were determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in serum from 36 subjects with surgically confirmed endometriosis and 36 controls with no surgical evidence of the disease. In addition, information such as demographic characteristics, personal habits, menstrual characteristics, and clinical profile was collected from each participating subject.No significant difference was found between serum levels of AFP, IGFBP-3, c-erbB-2, and EGF in patients with endometriosis and controls, even when we adjusted for potential confounders and took into account the menstrual cycle. Moreover, no correlation was observed between the serum concentrations of these molecules and the stage of the disease. However, a correlation was detected between soluble levels of IGFBP-3 and presence of uterine leiomyoma.Although AFP, IGFBP-3, c-erbB-2, and EGF are not altered in the circulation of patients with endometriosis, their involvement in the development of endometriotic lesions cannot be excluded.Anti-endometrial IgM autoantibodies in endometriotic patients: a preliminary study.Japanese herbal medicines (Kampo medicines) are usually the third most popular choice among medicines for treatment of endometriosis in Japan. This traditional therapy is used to improve various signs and symptoms of endometriosis without decreasing serum estradiol levels or causing menstrual disorders. We used flow cytometry to examine and compare the effects of the Kampo therapy and danazol on anti-endometrial humoral immunity. Autoantibodies against endometrial epithelial cell lines and endometrial stromal cells were detectable in all the examined sera of men and women irrespective of the presence of endometriosis. Moreover, no significant increase in anti-endometrial antibodies was found in endometriotic patients. Anti-endometrial antibodies included Ig-gamma chain, Ig-mu chain, Ig-kappa chain, and Ig-lambda chain indicating polyclonal B cell activation in the endometriotic patients. Absorption tests of nonspecific antibodies with cervical cancer cells or ovarian cancer cells revealed that endometriotic patients had higher levels of endometrium-specific autoantibodies than did non-endometriotic healthy women. IgM fractions from endometriotic patients and healthy women differed in their effect on growth of endometrial adenocarcinoma cells. Therapy with the herbal compounds Keishi-bukuryo-gan but not danazol therapy, gradually decreased the tissue-specific anti-endometrial IgM antibody levels. These results indicate that tissue-specific anti-endometrial IgM may be a useful therapeutic marker for endometriotic patients treated with Keishi-bukuryo-gan and that endometrial tissue-specific immune disorders play specific roles in the pathogenesis or development of endometriosis.Serum paraoxonase-1 activity in women with endometriosis and its relationship with the stage of the disease.There is increasing evidence that oxidative stress may play a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. Serum paraoxonase-1 (PON-1) is a high-density lipoprotein (HDL) associated enzyme that prevents oxidative modification of low-density lipoprotein (LDL). The aims of the study were to (i) compare the serum PON-1 activity in women with endometriosis versus controls and (ii) assess whether PON-1 activity can be used as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.A total of 87 women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy were divided into groups by visual diagnosis at surgery: control patients (n = 40) with no pathologic findings; endometriosis sufferers with minimal to mild (n = 24) and moderate to severe (n = 23) stage. Serum PON-1 activity was measured spectrophotometrically. Lipid hydroperoxide (LOOH) levels were measured by iodometric assay. Serum triglyceride (TG), total cholesterol (TC), HDL and LDL levels were also determined.PON-1 activity was significantly lower whereas LOOH levels were significantly higher in women with moderate to severe endometriosis than in women with minimal to mild endometriosis and controls, and in women with minimal to mild endometriosis compared with control groups (P < 0.0001, for all). A significant negative correlation was found between PON-1 activity and stage of the disease (r=-0.74, P < 0.0001). PON-1 activity and HDL levels were decreased whereas LOOH, TG, TC and LDL levels increased in all women with endometriosis versus controls (all P < 0.0001).Reduced serum PON-1 activity and increased LOOH might contribute to the increased susceptibility for the development of atherosclerosis. PON-1 activity can be used as a diagnostic test to detect endometriosis.Evaluation of CA-125 and soluble CD-23 in patients with pelvic endometriosis: a case-control study.To evaluate serum concentrations of CA-125 and soluble CD-23 and to correlate them with clinical symptoms, localization and stage of pelvic endometriosis and histological classification of the disease.Blood samples were collected from 44 women with endometriosis and 58 without endometriosis, during the first three days (1st sample) and during the 7th, 8th and 9th day (2nd sample) of the menstrual cycle. Measurements of CA-125 and soluble CD-23 were performed by ELISA. Mann-Whitney U test was used for age, pain evaluations (visual analog scale) and biomarkers concentrations.Serum levels of CA125 were higher in endometriosis patients when compared to the control group during both periods of the menstrual cycle evaluated in the study. This marker was also elevated in women with chronic pelvic pain, deep dyspareunia (2nd sample), dysmenorrhea (both samples) and painful defecation during the menstrual flow (2nd sample). CA-125 concentration was higher in advanced stages of the disease in both samples and also in women with ovarian endometrioma. Concerning CD-23, no statistically significant differences were observed between groups.The concentrations of CA-125 were higher in patients with endometriosis than in patients without the disease. No significantly differences were observed for soluble CD-23 levels between groups.[Selected immunologic markers for evaluation of peripheral blood in patients with internal endometriosis].In group of 16 patients with internal endometriosis verified by histopathological investigations following immunological indices in peripheral blood were estimated: 1) number of leucocytes and neutrophils, 2) neutrophil adherence to fibres, 3) phagocytic activity of neutrophil using the latex granules, 4) concentration of immunological complexes in serum. The results were compared with those in control group (20 healthy women). In patients with internal endometriosis compared to control group the increase of the number of leucocytes and neutrophils and decrease of phagocytic activity of neutrophils were observed.Hyperprolactinemia and luteal insufficiency in infertile patients with mild and minimal endometriosis.The objective of the present paper was to assess the presence of hormonal alterations in infertile women with stage I or II endometriosis (Group III, n = 20) compared to fertile women without endometriosis (Group I, n = 14) and to fertile women with endometriosis (Group II, n = 7). Serum levels of FSH, LH, estradiol, TSH, and PRL were measured between days 1 and 5 of the early follicular phase; in the luteal phase, three serum samples were collected for progesterone measurement, and endometrial biopsies were performed. Serum estradiol levels were lower (p = 0.035) in infertile patients with endometriosis than in fertile patients without endometriosis. Six infertile patients with endometriosis presented prolactin levels above 20 ng/ml. This was not observed in the other groups. Luteal insufficiency was more frequent in infertile patients with endometriosis (78.9%) than in fertile patients with (42.9%) or without endometriosis (0%). In a multiple logistic regression analysis, only the presence of endometriosis and infertility was significantly associated with luteal insufficiency. The serum levels of LH, FSH, and TSH were not significantly different among the groups. Luteal insufficiency and altered prolactin secretion were associated with endometriosis, and could be important mechanisms causing infertility in this group of patients.Clinical usefulness of determination of CA 125 levels in the serum and menstrual blood.We measured CA 125 levels in sera and menstrual blood of subjects with a normal ovulatory cycle and in those with endometriosis. Serum CA 125 levels were higher in the latter, in each phase of the menstrual cycle. The CA 125 levels in patients with endometriosis, particularly those with adenomyosis, tend to be higher than in those with a normal ovulatory cycle. We propose that measurement of CA 125 in the menstrual blood may be able to help distinguishing adenomyosis from myoma uteri and may also help in assessing clinical endometriosis.Non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis based on a combined analysis of six plasma biomarkers.Lack of a non-invasive diagnostic test contributes to the long delay between onset of symptoms and diagnosis of endometriosis. The aim of this study was to evaluate the combined performance of six potential plasma biomarkers in the diagnosis of endometriosis.This case-control study was conducted in 294 infertile women, consisting of 93 women with a normal pelvis and 201 women with endometriosis. We measured plasma concentrations of interleukin (IL)-6, IL-8, tumour necrosis factor-alpha, high-sensitivity C-reactive protein (hsCRP), and cancer antigens CA-125 and CA-19-9. Analyses were done using the Kruskal-Wallis test, Mann-Whitney test, receiver operator characteristic, stepwise logistic regression and least squares support vector machines (LSSVM).Plasma levels of IL-6, IL-8 and CA-125 were increased in all women with endometriosis and in those with minimal-mild endometriosis, compared with controls. In women with moderate-severe endometriosis, plasma levels of IL-6, IL-8 and CA-125, but also of hsCRP, were significantly higher than in controls. Using stepwise logistic regression, moderate-severe endometriosis was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 100% (specificity 84%) and minimal-mild endometriosis was detected with a sensitivity of 87% (specificity 71%) during the secretory phase. Using LSSVM analysis, minimal-mild endometriosis was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 94% (specificity 61%) during the secretory phase and with a sensitivity of 92% (specificity 63%) during the menstrual phase.Advanced statistical analysis of a panel of six selected plasma biomarkers on samples obtained during the secretory phase or during menstruation allows the diagnosis of both minimal-mild and moderate-severe endometriosis with high sensitivity and clinically acceptable specificity.Serum antiendometrial antibodies and diagnosis of endometriosis.The purpose of the present prospective multi-center study is to investigate the relationship between laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis and results of a serum antiendometrial antibody (AEA) assay.Indirect immunofluorescence detection of AEA was performed on serum specimens from patients presenting with dysmenorrhea or chronic pelvic pain and infertility (n = 2609) utilizing frozen sections of endometrium acquired on cycle days 18-21 from normally cycling women without endometriosis. Diagnostic laparoscopy was performed within 1 year of AEA assay on 527 tested women.The relationship between the serum AEA and laparoscopic verification was characterized by a positive predictive value = 88%, negative predictive value = 86%, sensitivity = 87% and specificity = 87%.The AEA assay is a very good screening test for patients suspected of having endometriosis and should be utilized prior to laparoscopy in diagnostic categories of dysmenorrhea or chronic pelvic pain and infertility.Serum prolactin and CA-125 levels as biomarkers of peritoneal endometriosis.To evaluate serum prolactin and CA-125 levels as biomarkers for the diagnosis of peritoneal endometriosis.A prospective study was performed. Blood samples were drawn from a peripheral vein during the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle (day 19-21 prior to the surgery) to analyze through relative operating characteristic curve the serum prolactin and CA-125 levels for diagnosis of peritoneal endometriosis. The study was performed with 97 participants, 63 women with peritoneal endometriosis and 34 healthy women.The sensitivity and specificity of peritoneal endometriosis diagnosis were equivalent for prolactin (21 and 99%) and for CA-125 (27 and 97%; p = 0.58). These two markers were used in a parallel test utilizing the usual cutoff (prolactin 20.0 ng/ml and CA-125 35 U/I). The sensitivity and specificity were 44 and 99%. However, by utilizing the best cutoff (prolactin 14.8 ng/ml and for CA-125 19.8 U/I), sensitivity, specificity and negative predictive value were 77, 88 and 97%, respectively.Serum CA-125 and prolactin levels assessed together, and considering the cutoff for CA-125 (19.9 U/I) and prolactin (14.8 ng/ml), allow the diagnosis of peritoneal endometriosis with acceptable sensitivity and specificity (77 and 88%) and a high negative predictive value (97%).Circulating microRNAs identified in a genome-wide serum microRNA expression analysis as noninvasive biomarkers for endometriosis.There is currently no reliable noninvasive biomarker for the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis. Previous analyses have reported that circulating microRNAs (miRNAs) can serve as biomarkers for a number of diseases.The study aims to detect the serum miRNAs that are differentially expressed between endometriosis patients and negative controls to evaluate the potential of these miRNAs as diagnostic markers for endometriosis.A total of 765 serum miRNAs were profiled using a TaqMan microRNA array in a pool of 10 endometriosis patients and a pool of 10 negative controls, and a set of selected miRNAs were further analyzed in a validation cohort consisting of sera from 60 patients and 25 controls including 10 samples used in array profiling.The relative expression levels of miR-199a and miR-122 were found to be up-regulated in endometriosis patient samples compared with control samples, whereas miR-145*, miR-141*, miR-542-3p, and miR-9* were down-regulated in endometriosis patients. Importantly, the relative expression of miR-199a (P < 0.05) and miR-122 can be used to discriminate between severe and mild endometriosis. We also found that miR-199a is well correlated with pelvic adhesion and lesion distribution (P < 0.05) and associated with hormone-mediated signaling pathways. Furthermore, we investigated the diagnostic value of these molecules and confirmed the optimal combination of miR-199a, miR-122, miR-145*, and miR-542-3p with area under the curve of 0.994 (95% confidence interval = 0.984-1.000, P < 0.001) and a cutoff point (0.4950) of 93.22% sensitivity and 96.00% specificity.Our study demonstrated that the circulating miRNAs miR-199a, miR-122, miR-145*, and miR-542-3p could potentially serve as noninvasive biomarkers for endometriosis. miR-199a may also play an important role in the progression of the disease. This is the first report that circulating miRNAs serve as biomarkers of endometriosis.Neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio as an adjunct to CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis.To investigate the clinical value of differential white blood cell counts and neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio (NLR), by themselves or as adjunct to CA-125, in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Retrospective study.University Medical Center.Two hundred thirty-one patients with endometriosis, 145 patients with benign ovarian tumors, and 384 healthy controls participated in this study.None.Sensitivities and specificities of differential white blood cell (WBC) counts, NLR, serum CA-125, and the combined marker (NLR and serum CA-125) were evaluated by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis.The mean NLR and the combined marker in patients with endometriosis were significantly higher than those in patients without endometriosis. The NLR was able to discriminate patients with endometriosis from those with benign ovarian tumors and from healthy controls, and 25 of the 38 endometriosis patients (65.8%) with minimal-to-mild disease exceeded the cutoff value. The combined marker had a sensitivity of 69.3% and specificity of 83.9% with a cutoff value of 55.7, showing 13.5% increase in sensitivity but 8.9% decrease in specificity when compared with serum CA-125 at a cutoff level of 35 IU/mL. The elevated combined marker detected 16 patients with endometriosis (42.1%) with minimal-to-mild disease, whereas only 10 patients (26.3%) had their serum CA-125 levels at more than 35 IU/mL.Measurement of NLR and the combined marker may be used as simple and easily obtained diagnostic markers for endometriosis.CA 125 levels measured in different phases of the menstrual cycle in screening for endometriosis.To examine variations in CA 125 levels during the three phases of the menstrual cycle in women with and without endometriosis.One hundred infertile women were studied prospectively. CA 125 levels were measured during menses and during the follicular and luteal phases before diagnostic laparoscopy. Subjects were divided into four groups: no evidence of endometriosis (35 women), stage I endometriosis (30 women), stage II endometriosis (21 women), and stages III and IV endometriosis (14 women).In the endometriosis groups, there was a significant difference in the mean CA 125 levels drawn at menses and those drawn in the follicular phase. In patients with severe endometriosis, there was also a difference in the mean CA 125 levels drawn at menses and in the luteal phase. This finding led to the development of a screening test based on the ratio of CA 125 levels at menses to levels in the follicular phase. The test based on this ratio (with a cutoff of 1.5) had a sensitivity of 62.5% and specificity of 75%, compared with a sensitivity of 26.8% and specificity of 100% for the test based on a single CA 125 level drawn at menses (with a cutoff of 35 U/mL).CA 125 levels during menses are elevated compared with those during the follicular phase in patients with endometriosis. Screening tests based on the relationship of multiple CA 125 levels taken throughout the menstrual cycle were more sensitive for detection of endometriosis than tests based on a single CA 125 level.Effect of surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry on identifing biomarkers of endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecological disease. This study aimed to screen proteins that were expressed differently in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls using proteomic techniques, surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS).Protein chip SELDI-TOF-MS combines the advantages of microarray and mass spectrometry, and can screen latent markers in sera of patients with endometriosis. Serum samples from patients and normal volunteers were analyzed by SELDI-TOF-MS.After comparing the serum protein spectra of 36 patients with 24 normal controls, 24 differently expressed potential biomarkers (P < 0.01) were identified. Using Biomarker Pattern software, we established a tree model of the 60 serum protein spectra. When using the three biomarkers to classify the samples, the sensitivity for diagnosing endometriosis was 91.7%, specificity was 95.8%, and coincidence rate was 93.3%. Then we used serum samples from 12 patients and 8 normal controls to validate the tree model and report the sensitivity for diagnosing endometriosis was 91.7%, specificity was 75%, and coincidence rate was 85%.SELDI-TOF-MS may be a useful tool in high-risk population screening for endometriosis. The identification and application of the biomarkers need to further study.[Establishment of endometriosis diagnostic model using plasma protein profiling].To establish the diagnostic model for endometriosis by screening the plasma biomarkers of endometriosis using surface enhanced laser desorption/ionization time of flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS)coupled with bioinformatics.Plasma samples from 36 patients with endometriosis (endometriosis group) matched with 35 patients with infertility or benign ovarian tumors (control group) before laparoscopy were collected at Peking Union Medical College Hospital from January to October 2007. Plasma protein profiling were detected using SELDI-TOF-MS and protein chip and peak intensities were compared between the two groups. Biomarker Discovery Software was used for data analysis and model was build by classification and regression tree software (CART), sensitivity and specificity of the diagnostic model were verified.There were 14 protein peaks abnormally expressed in endometriosis group compared with those of control group (P < 0.01). The diagnostic model composed of three protein peaks with the molecular weight of 3,956,000, 11,710,000 and 6,986,000 showed a sensitivity of 92% and specificity of 83%. In the blind test the model showed a sensitivity of 88% and specificity of 80%.SELDI-TOF-MS is a new approach for screening markers of endometriosis. Its clinical value deserves further investigation.Prediction of endometriosis with serum and peritoneal fluid markers: a prospective controlled trial.The objective of this prospective controlled trial was to investigate the ability of a group of serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) markers to predict, non-surgically, endometriosis.Serum and PF samples were obtained from 130 women while undergoing laparoscopy for pain, infertility, tubal ligation or sterilization reversal. Concentrations of six cytokines [interleukin (IL)-1beta, IL-6, IL-8, IL-12, IL-13 and tumour necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha] were measured in serum and PF, and reactive oxygen species (ROS) in PF, and levels were compared among women who were allocated to groups according to their post-surgical diagnosis. Fifty-six patients were diagnosed with endometriosis, eight with idiopathic infertility, 27 underwent tubal ligation or reanastomosis (control group) and 39 were excluded due to bloody PF. Only serum IL-6 and PF TNF-alpha could be used to discriminate between patients with and without endometriosis with a high degree of sensitivity and specificity (P < 0.001). A threshold of 15 pg/ml PF TNF-alpha provided 100% sensitivity and 89% specificity (positive likelihood ratio of 9.1 and negative likelihood ratio of 0). A threshold of 2 pg/ml for serum IL-6 provided a sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 67% (positive likelihood ratio of 2.7 and negative likelihood ratio of 0.14).By measuring serum IL-6 and PF TNF-alpha, it was possible to discriminate between patients with endometriosis and those without. Before these markers can be used as a non-surgical diagnostic tool, these data should be verified in a larger study.Selected cytokines and glycodelin A levels in serum and peritoneal fluid in girls with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to determine the role of serum and peritoneal interleukin (IL)-6, tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-α and glycodelin A levels as diagnostic markers of endometriosis in adolescent girls.The study encompassed 50 adolescent girls, aged 13-19 years, after menarche and with chronic pelvic pain who qualified for diagnostic laparoscopy. The patients were allocated into two groups: group I (endometriosis group) consisted of subjects with diagnosed endometriosis (n = 33, 66%) and group II (control group) included those whose laparoscopic examinations revealed no evidence of endometriosis (n = 17, 34%). IL-6, TNF-α and glycodelin A concentrations in serum and peritoneal samples were assessed using commercially available human enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay kits. The value of P < 0.05 was adopted as the level of statistical significance.Compared with the control group, adolescent girls with endometriosis had significantly higher peritoneal fluid levels of: IL-6 (525.10 ± 1168.53 pg/mL vs 62.96 ± 82.35 pg/mL), TNF-α (5.79 ± 5.60 pg/mL vs 1.68 ± 1.24 pg/mL) and glycodelin A (94.24 ± 60.97 ng/mL vs 53.52 ± 41.43 ng/mL). Peritoneal IL-6, TNF-α and glycodelin A provided a good method of discrimination between subjects with endometriosis and controls. Using cut-off points for peritoneal fluid IL-6 (90.00 pg/mL), TNF-α (3.00 pg/mL) and glycodelin A (60.0 ng/mL), exceptionally high odds ratios (10.2; 14.6; 2.2) were obtained in the prediction of endometriosis in adolescents.At the cut-off value of 3.00 pg/mL, peritoneal TNF-α can be a reliable screening marker for the prediction of endometriosis in adolescents, giving a 14.6-fold higher probability of endometriosis detection in girls with chronic pelvic pain.CA 125 levels in endometriosis patients before, during and after treatment with danazol or LHRH agonists.The levels of CA 125 in the serum of 54 patients with endometriosis were measured before, during and after treatment with Danazol or LHRH analogues. Patients with minimal and mild endometriosis had mean pre-treatment values significantly higher than control subjects in the luteal phase of the cycle or postmenopausal women (p less than 0.05), but levels were within the overall control range. In contrast, 78.6% of patients with moderate or severe endometriosis had levels in excess of 30 mu/ml and the mean values for these groups were significantly elevated (p less than 0.005). Levels of CA 125 fell, to those found in normal controls, during treatment, but rose again following cessation of treatment. Six of 12 subjects whose follow-up values of CA 125 exceeded 30 U/ml had a proven recurrence of endometriosis, whilst only 2 of 31 patients with values less than 30 U/ml had laparoscopically proven recurrence.[Determination of interleukine-16 levels in peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis].To investigate the role of interleukine-16 (IL-16) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was used to determine the levels of IL-16 in peritoneal fluid and serum specimens of 22 women with different stage endometriosis and 22 controls.The median levels of IL-16 in peritoneal fluid and serum were 290.5 pg/ml and 539.4 pg/ml in women with endometriosis, and 296.6 pg/ml and 778.1 pg/ml in controls, respectively; there was no significant difference between two groups (P>0.05). However, the IL-16 levels in peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with minimal/mild stage endometriosis and controls were all significantly higher than those of patients with moderate/severe endometriosis (P<0.01, <0.05). In addition, there was no statistical correlation of peritoneal IL-16 levels with those in serum (P>0.05).Reduced levels of IL-16 in peritoneal fluid and serum of women with advanced stage endometriosis may imply a role of IL-16 in the development and progression of endometriosis.Cognate chemokine receptor 1 messenger ribonucleic acid expression in peripheral blood as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.We investigated the expression of the cognate chemokine receptor 1 (CCR1) messenger ribonucleic acid, a G-protein-coupled cognate chemokine receptor with high affinity for RANTES (Regulated upon Activation, Normal T cells Expressed and Secreted), in peripheral blood leukocytes of women with and without endometriosis, and its potential use as a diagnostic test for endometriosis. Because patients with an earlier diagnosis of this disease have a better treatment outcome and a reduced recurrence rate, CCR1 mRNA measurement in the peripheral blood of patients with suspected endometriosis might give us a new perspective in diagnosing and treating this disease earlier and better.Endometriosis: identification by carbonic anhydrase autoantibodies and clinical features.Reliably diagnosing endometriosis traditionally requires surgery. To evaluate a possible non-surgical method, a case-control series of unexplained infertility patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy were scored by clinical criteria and reactivity to human carbonic anhydrase II by Western blotting. The CA II autoantibodies were found in none of the fertile controls, 38 percent of infertile controls, 55 percent of stage 1, 50 percent of stage 2, 73 percent of stage 3, and 85 percent of stage 4 endometriosis patients. Advanced endometriosis was associated with more intense reactivity. Combining clinical and antibody scores for infertile groups showed a positive association with disease stage with positive predictive values of 76 to 95 percent, negative predictive values of 90 to 60 percent, and a likelihood ratio of 18.3. It is concluded by us that CA II immunoreactivity, clinical, and combined scores all identified stages 2 to 4 endometriosis patients. However, based on predictive values and likelihood ratios, the combined score is best at identifying endometriosis non-surgically.Plasma and peritoneal fluid levels of CA 125 in women with endometriosis.Determined by a sandwich, solid-phase radioimmunoassay with mouse monoclonal antibody, OC 125, plasma CA 125 levels were significantly elevated in stage III (mean +/- SEM = 32.7 +/- 5.2 U/ml, n = 17, p = less than 0.01) and stage IV endometriosis (37.2 +/- 10.5 U/ml, n = 6, p = less than 0.005) compared with levels during the follicular (15.9 +/- 1.5 U/ml, n = 12) and secretory phases (15.8 +/- 1.3 U/ml, n = 15) of control women and users of oral contraceptives (15.5 +/- 1.2 U/ml n = 10). However, CA 125 levels were not significantly elevated in women with stage I (16.6 +/- 2.0 U/ml, n = 28) or stage II endometriosis (17.9 +/- 2.1 U/ml, n = 13). Peritoneal fluid levels of CA 125 (n = 14) were significantly higher (2 to 9.3 times) than the corresponding paired plasma levels in participants with stage I, II, or III endometriosis. In patients treated with danazol (n = 10) or buserelin (n = 17), plasma CA 125 levels decreased significantly by midtherapy, remained suppressed at the end of therapy, but rebounded to near pretreatment levels 6 months after treatment was completed. With gestrinone therapy a similar decline was observed but became significant only at the end of therapy. Our findings indicate that elevated plasma CA 125 levels may prove useful in the management of endometriosis.Behaviour of cytokine levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a disorder characterised by presence and growth of endometrial tissue outside the uterus, primarily into the peritoneum. The peritoneal fluid (PF) of women with endometriosis undergoes a number of biological changes, including local inflammatory-reparative phenomena and peripheral blood mononuclear cells (PBMC) involvement. These activated cells as well as the endometriotic cells secrete various cytokines with pleiotropic biological activities. Dynamic interplay among cytokines may contribute to realise a favourable microenvironment for the implantation of endometrial cells and the progression of the disease. In the present study, we evaluated the levels of cytokines, such as the tumour necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), transforming growth factor-beta (TGF-beta), interleukin-8 (IL-8) and monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) in PF and in serum (S) of women with endometriosis to compare their behaviour in both biological fluids. The patients (n = 26) were women of reproductive age attending our observation centre for infertility, diagnosed endometriosis at laparoscopy. Control group (n = 5) consisted of women affected by non-immunologic infertility, diagnosed by explorative laparoscopy. S samples were obtained from peripheral blood before anaesthesia and laparoscopy. PF samples were collected at the time of laparoscopy. Both biological fluids were examined for cytokine by ELISA assays. Our results showed that S and PF levels of TNF-alpha, not dosable in controls, were very high at the early stage and decreased significantly with the severity of the disease (p < 0.001). TGF-beta levels were significantly (p < 0.001) higher than in controls and increased with the severity of the disease (p < 0.001), particularly in the PF. S and PF IL-8 as well as MCP-1 concentrations at all stages were higher than in controls (p < 0.001), yet showed an opposite behaviour in both biological fluids. In fact, S levels of IL-8 and MCP-1 were significantly (p < 0.001) higher at early stages and decreased with the severity of the disease, whereas we observed a significant (p < 0.001) enhancement of these chemokine levels in PF from stage I to stage II and stage III. These observations showed that TNF-alpha and TGF-beta levels were overlapping in S and PF of women with endometriosis. On the contrary, MCP-1 and IL-8 S concentrations decreased with the severity of the disease, whereas PF levels showed markedly increased at severe stages. Taken together the observed changes may be due both to the increased peritoneal macrophage activity and to the larger recruitment of PBMC and autocrine release by endometriotic cells.T helper (Th)1, Th2, and Th17 interleukin pathways in infertile patients with minimal/mild endometriosis.In the present study, interleukin (IL)-10, IL-12, IL-17, and IL-23 levels were measured in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with minimal or mild endometriosis and compared with levels in controls without endometriosis. Higher IL-23 levels were encountered in the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis, suggesting a possible role of this cytokine in these women's infertility.Identification and validation of novel serum markers for early diagnosis of endometriosis.Non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis is urgently required to prevent the long delay between the onset of symptoms and diagnosis. A biomarker that possesses both high sensitivity and specificity is greatly required. Here, we describe the use of a proteomic approach to identify potential novel endometrial antigens using sera from endometriosis patients and healthy controls, with evaluation of biomarkers for non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.A cross-sectional study was conducted to identify specific endometrial antigens using 1D and 2D western blots in women with early endometriosis (n = 17), advanced endometriosis (n = 23) and without endometriosis (n = 30). Five immunoreactive spots were analyzed using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization-time-of-flight/mass spectrometry with MASCOT analysis. ELISAs were established for specific epitopes and autoantibody titres were estimated in an independent cohort comprising women with early endometriosis (n = 18), advanced endometriosis (n = 32) and without endometriosis (n = 27) for validation.The 2D western blot analysis resulted in the identification of three endometrial antigens, tropomyosin 3 (TPM3), stomatin-like protein 2 (SLP2) and tropomodulin 3 (TMOD3). Serum levels of antibodies against the epitopes from the immunodominant region of proteins TPM3, SLP2 and TMOD3 were significantly elevated in endometriosis patients when compared with controls. Sensitivity and specificity of serum anti-TPM3a-autoAb (61%, 93%), anti-TPM3c-autoAb (44%, 93%), anti-TPM3d-autoAb (78%, 89%), anti-SLP2a-autoAb (50%, 96%), anti-SLP2c-autoAb (61%, 93%), anti-TMOD3b-autoAb (61%, 96%), serum anti-TMOD3c-autoAb (78%, 93%) and anti-TMOD3d-autoAb (78%, 96%) were better than those of serum CA125 levels (21%, 89%) in the detection of early stages of endometriosis.Serum anti-TPM3a-autoAb, anti-TPM3c-autoAb, anti-TPM3d-autoAb, anti-SLP2a-autoAb, anti-SLP2c-autoAb, anti-TMOD3b-autoAb, anti-TMOD3c-autoAb and anti-TMOD3d-autoAb could be new markers for the early diagnosis of endometriosis.Additive effects of inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Is there any combined effect between inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4 (TLR4)-mediated growth of endometriotic cells?A combined effect of local inflammation and stress reaction in the pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.In endometriosis, higher endotoxin levels in the menstrual fluid (MF) and peritoneal fluid (PF) and higher tissue concentrations of human heat shock protein 70 (HSP70) in the eutopic and ectopic endometria promote TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells.This is a case-controlled research study with prospective collection and retrospective evaluation of sera, MF, PF and endometrial tissues from 43 women with and 20 women without endometriosis.PF was collected from 43 women with endometriosis and 20 control women during laparoscopy. Sera and endometrial biopsy specimens were collected from a proportion of these women. MF was collected from a separate population of 20 women with endometriosis and 15 control women. HSP70 concentrations in sera, MF, PF and in culture media were measured by ELISA. Gene expression of HSP70 by endometrial cells in response to lipopolysaccharide (LPS) was examined by qRT-PCR. The individual and combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on the secretion of interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumor necrosis factor α (TNFα) by PF-derived macrophages (M[Symbol: see text]) were examined by ELISA, while their effects on endometrial cell proliferation were examined by bromodeoxyuridine and [(3)H]-thymidine incorporation assay.Concentrations of HSP70 were maximal in MF, intermediate in PF and the lowest in sera. In MF and PF, HSP70 levels were higher in women with endometriosis than in controls. LPS stimulated gene expression and secretion of HSP70 by eutopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) and this effect was abrogated after pretreatment of cells with an anti-TLR4 antibody. This effect was significantly higher for ESCs derived from women with endometriosis than for ESCs from control women. Exogenous treatment with either HSP70 or LPS significantly stimulated the production of IL-6 and TNFα by M[Symbol: see text] and promoted the proliferation of ESCs, and a significant additive effect between LPS and HSP70 was observed. While individual treatment with either polymyxin B, an LPS antagonist, or anti-HSP70 antibody was unable to suppress the combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on cytokine secretion or ESC proliferation, pretreatment of cells with the anti-TLR4 antibody was able to significantly suppress their combined effects.Further studies are needed to examine the mutual role between other secondary inflammatory mediators and endogenous stress proteins in promoting pelvic inflammation and growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Our findings suggest that endotoxin and HSP70 are mutually involved in a stress reaction and in inflammation. A combined effect between local inflammation and a stress reaction in pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells. Since endometriosis is a multi-factorial disease, it is difficult to explain uniformly its growth regulation by a single factor. Our findings may provide some new insights in understanding the physiopathology or pathogenesis of endometriosis and may hold new therapeutic potential.This work was supported by Grants-in-Aid for Scientific Research (grant no. 16591671 and 18591837) from the Ministry of Education, Sports, Culture, Science and Technology of Japan (to K.N.K.). There is no conflict of interest related to this study.Not applicable.Interleukin-8 serum levels do not correlate with pelvic pain in patients with ovarian endometriomas.To determine whether interleukin-8 (IL-8) serum levels are correlated with pelvic pain in patients with ovarian endometriomas.Prospective study.Tertiary-care university hospital.Interleukin-8 serum levels were prospectively analyzed in 51 patients (group A, asymptomatic patients or patients with mild dysmenorrhea; group B, severe dysmenorrhea and/or chronic pelvic pain and/or dyspareunia) who underwent surgery for cystic ovarian endometriosis to asses whether a correlation exists between IL-8 serum levels and pelvic pain.Interleukin-8 serum levels determination.Interleukin-8 serum levels and pelvic pain.From 56 patients, five cases were ultimately excluded because the histologic diagnosis was not cystic ovarian endometriosis (2 teratomas and 3 haemorragic cysts). The mean (+/-SD) IL-8 serum levels in group A were 6.41 +/- 12.17 pg/mL and in group B were 6.52 +/- 8.73 pg/mL.Pain symptoms in ovarian endometriosis is not correlated with IL-8 serum levels.Endometrial antibodies versus CA-125 for the detection of endometriosis.Detection of endometrial antibodies using an indirect immunofluorescence method along with a well-established human endometrial carcinoma cell line was evaluated and compared with CA-125 for detecting endometriosis. Two hundred two patient sera from the infertility, gynecological, and gynecological oncology services were evaluated. The sensitivity for antibody testing was 83.1% with a specificity of 78.8%, in contrast to a sensitivity of 27.3% and a specificity of 82.6% for CA-125. These preliminary findings offer promise that antibody detection methods may be a useful adjunct in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor-1 in endometriosis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor (sFlt-1) in peritoneal fluid (PF), peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial tissues of patients with endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid, peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial samples from patients with endometriosis, and peritoneal fluid, peritoneal tissue and endometrial samples from patients without endometriosis were obtained during an operative laparoscopy. The mean PF concentrations of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in the controls. In the peritoneal tissue, the expressions of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher, where the expression of sFlt-1 in endometrium was significantly lower in patients with endometriosis. These findings indicate that not only abnormal expressions of angiogenic factors, but also aberrant expressions of antiangiogenic factors in the peritoneal and endometrial environment seem to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Oxidative stress and endometriosis.Little is known about the aetiology of endometriosis; however, in the presence of oxidative stress, reactive oxygen species might increase growth and adhesion of endometrial cells in the peritoneal cavity, leading to endometriosis and infertility. Within a study investigating persistent organic compounds and endometriosis, the authors evaluated the association between oxidative stress and endometriosis.Women aged 18-40 years who were undergoing laparoscopy were contacted to participate in the study (n = 100); 84 were eligible and agreed to be interviewed; 78 provided blood specimens. Four markers of oxidative stress and antioxidant status were measured in serum for 61 women. Multiple imputation of missing data was used to generate values for the missing oxidative stress data.Thirty-two women had visually confirmed endometriosis at laparoscopy while 52 did not, including 22 undergoing tubal ligation and 30 with idiopathic infertility. There was a weak association between thiobarbituric acid-reactive substances (nmol/ml) and endometriosis, after adjusting for age, body mass index, current smoking, hormone use in the past 12 months, gravidity, serum vitamin E, serum estradiol, and total serum lipids (beta = 1.18; 95% CI-0.04, 2.39).These results suggest that oxidative stress might play a role in the development and progression of endometriosis, which should be evaluated in larger studies.Differences in the blood serum levels of soluble HLA-G concentrations between the menstrual cycle phases and menopause in patients with ovarian endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma.HLA-G is an antigen whose participation in the regulation of the immune system is well documented. The aim of the present study has therefore been to evaluate the sHLA-G blood serum concentrations levels in both women with ovarian endometriosis and women with uterine leiomyomas.In our study, the soluble HLA-G concentration level was evaluated in the blood serum samples obtained from 98 women who underwent laparotomies or laparoscopies due to either ovarian endometriosis or leiomyomatous uterus. The control group consisted of 42 women, including women on whom a diagnostic laparoscopy identified no lesions, and volunteers-healthy women who returned their blood serum samples during menstrual bleeding.Patients who underwent surgical treatment because of ovarian endometriosis or uterine leiomyoma, as well as patients from the control group, exhibited no sHLA-G blood serum concentration level fluctuations between the proliferative and secretory menstrual cycle phases. The sHLA-G levels were significantly lower in the patients with ovarian endometriosis and in the patients from the control group during the menstrual cycle phase than in those patients with leiomyoma. A similar relation between the sHLA-G levels of the postmenopausal patients suffering from leiomyoma and the control patients was found. In contrast, the postmenopausal women suffering from endometriosis were typified by levels of sHLA-G blood serum concentration comparable to those of the patients with leiomyoma, and the levels were significantly higher than those observed in the blood sera of the postmenopausal patients from the control group.The soluble HLA-G blood serum level would seem to be a useful marker for evaluating the status of the microenvironment, where the tumor-immune cell and ectopic and eutopic endometrial interactions take place.Peritoneal fluid concentrations of interleukin-8 in women with endometriosis: relationship to stage of disease.There is increasing evidence that immunological mechanisms play a role in the pathogenesis and pathophysiology of endometriosis. It was therefore of interest to study interleukin-8 (IL-8), a chemokine, in the peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood of women undergoing laparoscopic procedures. The presence and concentrations of IL-8 in relation to endometriosis, infertility and abdominal pain were evaluated. Samples of peritoneal fluid (n = 49) and peripheral blood (n = 50) were obtained from 50 consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery for various gynaecological indications (abdominal pain, infertility, sterilization). IL-8 was present in the peritoneal fluid of most women (87%). The concentration of IL-8 in the peritoneal fluid was higher in women with endometriosis compared to women without (P = 0.02). This difference was more pronounced in early (stage 1) endometriosis (P = 0.001). IL-8 concentrations in the peritoneal fluid were also higher in women with early endometriosis compared to women with later stages of the disease (P = 0.003). Peripheral blood concentrations did not correlate with peritoneal fluid concentrations of IL-8 and/or the presence of endometriosis. We conclude that IL-8 is an important factor that may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis possibly by promoting neovascularization. This information can be a guide in the development of new therapeutic approaches for the treatment of endometriosis.Interleukin-12 but not interleukin-18 is associated with severe endometriosis.To evaluate interleukin (IL)-12 and IL-18 levels in the serum and peritoneal fluid of women with and without endometriosis.Cross-sectional survey.University hospital.Interleukin-12 and IL-18 levels were compared in 105 patients submitted to laparoscopy because of symptoms suggestive of endometriosis (pain and/or infertility). The disease was confirmed in 72 patients (study group), while in 33 patients findings were not compatible with endometriosis (control group). INTEVENTION(S): Blood sample and peritoneal fluid were obtained from patients during videolaparoscopy.The levels of IL-12 and IL-18 in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid were determined and compared with the stage and site of the disease and histologic classification.IL-12 levels measured in peritoneal fluid were higher in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. A significant increase in IL-12 levels was found when the more advanced stages of the disease were compared with the initial stages. No statistically significant differences were found in IL-18 levels, either in serum or in peritoneal fluid samples.Patients with severe endometriosis have higher IL-12 levels irrespective of IL-18 levels, suggesting that in this disease an alternative pathway is involved in induction of the Th1 immune response.Identification of anti-syntaxin 5 autoantibody as a novel serum marker of endometriosis.The sensitivity and specificity of CA125, as a sole serum marker of endometriosis, are not high enough for routine clinical assessment. To explore new markers for the diagnosis of endometriosis, serum autoantibodies in endometriotic patients were investigated employing a fibroblast cell line, two-dimensional (2D) gel electrophoresis and Western blotting. Proteins reacting with serum autoantibodies by Western blotting were identified using MASCOT analysis. ELISAs were then prepared using recombinant proteins and titers of serum autoantibodies were determined in the endometriotic patients, disease controls, and healthy subjects. Among the autoantibodies identified, anti-syntaxin 5 (STX5) autoantibody levels were significantly elevated in endometriotic patients. Sensitivity (53.6%) and accuracy (72.2%) of the serum anti-STX5 autoantibody assay were better than those of serum CA125 levels (36.2% and 62.9%, respectively) for diagnosis. The sensitivity of anti-STX5 autoantibody was remarkably high in Stage II (80.0%) compared with that of CA125 (40.0%). A combination assay of anti-STX5 autoantibody with CA125 improved the overall sensitivity to 69.6%. We conclude that serum anti-STX5 autoantibody, which was discovered by a proteomic approach, is a potential new serum marker for the diagnosis of endometriosis. This initial study now requires validation by further clinical evaluation.Association of the leukemia inhibitory factor gene mutation and the antiphospholipid antibodies in the peripheral blood of infertile women.To characterize the impact of the potentially functional mutation--the G to A transition at the position 3400 of the leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF; a pluripotent cytokine that plays a central role in the control of the embryo implantation) gene that leads to the exchange of valine with methionine at codon 64 we evaluated the association of the LIF gene mutation and the levels of antiphospolipid antibodies (aPLs) in the peripheral blood of infertile women (the aPLs examination was part of our routine immunological test during the infertility check-up). Eight infertile mutation-positive women were diagnosed with idiopathic infertility (n=5) and endometriosis (n=3) and their levels of aPLs in serum were compared with 115 infertile women without any LIF gene mutation. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was used for the detection of seven antiphospholipid antibodies; the results were statistically assessed by the Fisher's 2 by 2 exact test to evaluate the association of the LIF gene mutations and aPLs in serum of infertile patients. The presence of aPLs was significantly higher in our study group (100%) than in 30% of aPLs-positives in control infertile patients (p = 0.0035) which indicates that the aPLs are elevated in women with LIF gene mutations.Serum interleukin-6 levels are elevated in women with minimal-mild endometriosis.There is a need for a reliable marker of endometriosis, especially in early stages of peritoneal disease during which imaging is not effective. The use of serum interleukin (IL)-6 as a marker is controversial. To readdress the matter, patients undergoing laparoscopy were prospectively evaluated for serum IL-6 levels.A total of 119 women 31 years old who underwent laparoscopy were divided into groups: control patients (n = 38) with no pathologic findings; endometriosis sufferers (n = 47) with minimal-mild (MM, n = 11) or moderate-severe (MS, n = 36) endometriosis; uterine myomas (n = 13) and benign ovarian pathologies (n = 21). Blood was drawn on cycles days 5-12 and stored for subsequent analysis of IL-6 and carbohydrate antigen (CA)-125 levels.Serum IL-6 levels were significantly (P = 0.002) higher in women with MM endometriosis (29.4 9.0 pg/ml) than in controls (15.7 9.3 pg/ml). When all the non-endometriosis patients were grouped together (n = 72) and serum IL-6 (17.8 12.1 pg/ml) compared with MS (n = 36; 17.6 10.3 pg/ml) and MM (n = 11; 29.4 9.0 pg/ml) endometriosis significantly (P < 0.01) higher levels in MM endometriosis were observed as compared to the other two groups. Serum Ca-125 levels were significantly (P < 0.01) elevated in MS endometriosis. A serum IL-6 threshold of 25.75 pg/ml afforded a sensitivity of 75% and specificity of 83% in the diagnosis of MM endometriosis. Sensitivity and specificity for CA-125 in the diagnosis of MS endometriosis, using 35 IU/ml as the cut-off value, were 47% and 97%, respectively.IL-6 is a reliable non-invasive marker of MM endometriosis, whereas Ca-125 is of use as a marker of severe cases.[E-cadherin in the serum and the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis].Endometriosis, a disease of unclear etiopathogenesis, is a quite common problem in gynecology. It is thought that the retrograde flow of the menstrual debris to the peritoneal cavity plays an important role in the origin of endometriosis but the mechanism of endometrial cells implantation remains unknown. Recently many centers have reported the importance of adhesion molecules in this process. We studied the concentrations of E-cadherin in the serum and the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis. Our results show a significant decrease of E-cadherin concentrations in sera and peritoneal fluids in women with endometriosis. We suggest that screening the level of E-caherin may be useful in the monitoring the therapy of endometriosis.[The evaluation of IL-12 levels in peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis].We studied levels of IL-12 in peritoneal fluid and serum in patients with minimal, advanced and recurrent endometriosis compared to women without endometriotic lesions in pelvis minor. The aim of the study was to determine whether level of IL-12 detected in peritoneal fluid or serum changes with grading of severity of endometriosis. To assess IL-12 levels immunosorbent ELISA was used. There were no statistically significant differences in IL-12 levels in peritoneal fluid nor in serum in any of studied groups. There was higher concentration (without statistical significance) of IL-12 in peritoneal fluid of healthy women compared to women with endometriosis.Leukocyte subpopulations and natural killer activity in endometriosis.To evaluate cell-mediated immunity in endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood samples from 19 women with macroscopic evidence of endometriosis and 26 controls were submitted to 2-color flow cytometric analysis to assess lymphocyte subsets, using various combinations of monoclonal antibodies. K562 cells were used in a routine assay by 51Cr release to measure the cytotoxicity of NK cells in the subjects' peripheral blood.Suppressor T-cells were significantly increased and cytotoxic T-cells significantly decreased in both peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood of the women with endometriosis. NK activity in peripheral blood was decreased in endometriosis patients as compared with controls.An alteration in cell-mediated immunity may be among the pathogenetic, or developing, factors in endometriosis.Enhanced interleukin-4 expression in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of cytokines by T-helper cells type 1 (interleukin [IL]-2 and interferon-gamma [IFN-gamma]) and type 2 (IL-4 and IL-10) in peripheral blood monocytes and peritoneal fluid (PF) cells from patients with endometriosis.Peripheral blood (PB) monocytes and PF cells from patients with endometriosis were isolated and the expression of cytokines investigated.Institute for the treatment of endometriosis and research institute in university-based medical center.The study included 7 women with normal pelvic structure, 36 patients with endometriosis, and 7 women with pelvic adhesion but without apparent endometriotic lesion. The existence and severity of endometriosis was determined by laparoscopic examination.All patients received laparoscopic operation to identify the existence and stages of endometriosis. Danazol (200 mg, twice daily) was prescribed for those with endometriosis.Transcription of cytokines were directly analyzed using the reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction method. The concentrations of cytokines in peritoneal fluids and sera were analyzed by the ELISA.Levels of IL-4 messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein in the PB and peritoneal cells of patients with endometriosis were higher than those of normal patients, whereas levels of IFN-gamma mRNA and protein were suppressed. There were no significant changes in the mRNA or protein levels of IL-2 or IL-10 in both peritoneal fluids and sera. The level of IL-4 was reduced to normal after combined treatment with laparoscopic surgery and danazol. The secretion of IFN-gamma was elevated after treatment.Cytokine secretion by T-helper cells type 1 and type 2 is altered in women with endometriosis, suggesting that these T-helper subsets play a role in the immunologic responses to endometriosis.Serum levels of CA-125 in patients with endometriosis: a preliminary report.Seven out of 8 patients with endometriosis demonstrated levels of CA-125 antigen above 35 U/ml. None of 15 patients with other benign gynecologic diagnoses demonstrated elevated levels. This antigen has been proposed as a tumor marker for epithelial carcinoma and other gynecologic neoplasms. However, it cannot be used to differentiate clinically between cancer and endometriosis.An association of IgG anti-laminin-1 autoantibodies with endometriosis in infertile patients.Laminin-1, a multifunctional glycoprotein of the basement membrane, is thought to be important in embryogenesis, embryonic implantation, and placentation. We recently showed that serum IgG anti-laminin-1 autoantibodies (auto-Abs) are associated with recurrent first-trimester miscarriages. The present study assessed the clinical significance of anti-laminin-1 Abs with infertility, accompanied with or without endometriosis.Sixty-eight infertile patients who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy and 39 healthy non-pregnant women were tested for IgG anti-laminin-1 Abs. The association between the Abs and endometriosis was analysed. The presence of laminin-1 mRNA was detected in endometriotic lesions.Twenty infertile patients were positive for anti-laminin-1 Abs. The Ab levels in those patients were significantly higher than those in healthy non-pregnant women (P = 0.0005). The presence of the Abs was significantly associated with endometriosis in those patients (P = 0.0096). The Abs recognized a particular domain, i.e., the laminin-alpha1 chain G domain. mRNA encoding laminin-alpha1, -beta1, and -gamma1 chains was expressed in 90% of endometriotic lesions.IgG anti-laminin-1 Abs were significantly associated with endometriosis in infertile patients. The Abs might be clinically important in the development of autoimmune-mediated reproductive failures and the assessment of the Abs may provide a novel non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.Combination of non-invasive and semi-invasive tests for diagnosis of minimal to mild endometriosis.Non-surgical diagnostic approach for endometriosis would be of great gain to both physicians and patients. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of serum measurement of IL-6 combined with the presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium for diagnosis of minimal-mild endometriosis.In this prospective study 114 women who underwent laparoscopy for infertility and/or pelvic pain were divided into two groups: control cases (40 cases) with no pathologic findings; and endometriosis patients (74 cases) [subdivided into stages 1-2 or minimal-mild (MM) and stages 3-4 or moderate-severe cases]. Blood was drawn one day before laparoscopy and stored for subsequent analysis of IL-6. Endometrial biopsy was obtained prior to laparoscopy and Immunohistochemistry was performed using the pan-neuronal marker protein gene product 9.5(PGP9.5). Then laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis confirmed by histopathology was done.Serum IL-6 with a threshold of 15.4 pg/ml was found to be able to diagnose MM endometriosis with 89.5 % sensitivity and 82.5 % specificity, but sensitivity and specificity of presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium were 92 % and 80 % respectively. When two diagnostic modalities were combined the sensitivity and specificity were raised to 100 and 92.5 % respectively.Combination of both serum IL-6 and presence of nerve fibres in the endometrium is more reliable method for diagnosis of MM endometriosis than in single test.Genetic polymorphism in the fibrinolytic system and endometriosis.Although most women experience retrograde menses during their reproductive life, endometriosis develops only in a small percentage. We hypothesized that persistence of a fibrin matrix in peritoneal pockets, as a result of hypofibrinolysis, could allow menstrually deposited endometrial fragments to initiate endometriosis. Fibrinolysis is modulated by several factors, and polymorphisms in the plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI-1) gene are considered to be one of the important determinants. The objective of this study was to evaluate PAI-1 genotypes in a group of women with or without endometriosis.In 118 women (75 with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis and 43 controls), genomic DNA was extracted from blood and the PAI-1 promoter genotype was determined by polymerase chain reaction amplification of DNA using specific primers for the 4G or 5G allele followed by gel electrophoresis. A portion of the polymerase chain reaction product was purified and sequenced to confirm the gel electrophoresis results.Endometriosis was more likely in patients with 4G/5G (odds ratio 38; 95% confidence interval [CI] 6-229) or 4G/4G (odds ratio 441; 95% CI 53-3,694) compared with 5G/5G PAI-1 genotype. Fifty-two of 75 women with endometriosis (69 %, 95% CI 58-79%) had the 4G/4G genotype compared with only 5 of 43 (12%; 95% CI 4-25%) controls. In contrast, the 5G/5G genotype associated with normal fibrinolysis was found in 2 of 75 (3%; 95% CI 0-9%) women with endometriosis compared with 24 of 43 (56%; 95% CI 40-71%) controls.Hypofibrinolysis, associated with the 4G allele of the PAI-1 gene, was found significantly more often in women with endometriosis compared with controls. Persistence of fibrin matrix could support the initiation of endometriotic lesions in the peritoneal cavity, explaining why some women with retrograde menstruation develop endometriosis while others do not.II-2.Diagnostic value of serum activin A and follistatin levels in women with peritoneal, ovarian and deep infiltrating endometriosis.Activin A is a growth factor, produced by the endometrium, whose actions are modulated by the binding protein follistatin. Both proteins are detectable in the peripheral serum and their concentrations may be increased in women with endometriosis. The present study was designed to evaluate whether serum levels of activin A and follistatin are altered, and therefore have a potential diagnostic value, in women with peritoneal, ovarian and deep infiltrating endometriosis.We performed a multicenter controlled study evaluating simultaneously serum activin A and follistatin concentrations in women with and without endometriosis. Women with endometriosis (n = 139) were subdivided into three groups: peritoneal endometriosis (n = 28); ovarian endometrioma (n = 61) and deep infiltrating endometriosis (n = 50). The control group (n = 75) consisted of healthy women with regular menstrual cycles. Blood samples were collected from a peripheral vein and assayed for activin A and follistatin using commercially available enzyme immunoassay kits.The ovarian endometrioma group had serum activin A levels significantly higher than healthy controls (0.22 ± 0.01 ng/ml versus 0.17 ± 0.01 ng/ml, P < 0.01). None of the endometriosis groups had serum follistatin levels which were significantly altered compared with healthy controls; however, levels found in the endometrioma group (2.34 ± 0.32 ng/ml) were higher than that in the deep endometriosis group (1.50 ± 0.17 ng/ml, P < 0.05). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of activin A was 0.700 (95% confidence interval: 0.605-0.794), while that of follistatin was 0.620 (95% confidence interval: 0.510-0.730) for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The combination of both markers into a duo marker index did not improve significantly their diagnostic accuracy.The present study demonstrated that serum activin A and follistatin are not significantly altered in peritoneal or deep infiltrating endometriosis and have limited diagnostic accuracy in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Matrix metalloproteinase 2 is associated with changes in steroid hormones in the sera and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis.To determine matrix metalloproteinase 2 (MMP-2) levels in sera and peritoneal fluids of women with or without endometriosis-associated infertility and to determine whether MMP-2 had correlation with 17beta-E(2) and P in the sera and peritoneal fluids of the patients with endometriosis.A case-control study.A women's hospital in China.Forty patients with endometriosis-associated infertility undergoing laparoscopy and 18 women undergoing tubal ligation.Sera and peritoneal fluids were collected from women with or without endometriosis.Matrix metalloproteinase 2, 17beta-E(2), and P concentration.Compared with the control women, the patients with endometriosis had higher MMP-2 levels in their sera and peritoneal fluids. Serum and peritoneal fluid MMP-2 levels were higher in the proliferative phase than in the secretory phase. The level of MMP-2 in the patients was correlated positively with 17beta-E(2) in serum and peritoneal fluid and negatively with P.The results demonstrated a correlation between MMP-2 concentrations and steroid hormones in sera and peritoneal fluids of the patients with endometriosis-associated infertility. Estradiol might up-regulate MMP-2, resulting in the formation of endometriosis. Progesterone might down-regulate MMP-2 to inhibit the formation and development of endometriosis.Serum CA-125 in the diagnosis of endometriosis.A high sensitivity assay is more accurate than a classical assay for the measurement of plasma CRP levels in endometriosis.Endometriosis is associated with chronic subclinical inflammation. C-reactive protein (CRP), a marker of inflammation, could serve as a biomarker of endometriosis. We tested the hypothesis that a high sensitivity CRP assay (hsCRP) is more accurate than a classical CRP assay in the detection of subclinical inflammation in plasma of women with endometriosis.CRP levels were measured by hsCRP and classical CRP assays in plasma of 204 women with endometriosis and 91 women without endometriosis. Both assays were compared with respect to their value for the diagnosis of endometriosis.The number of plasma samples with detectable CRP was significantly higher (100%) using the hsCRP assay when compared to the classical CRP assay (42.7%) (p < 0.0001). Significantly increased CRP plasma levels were found in women with endometriosis when compared with controls when the hsCRP assay was used in samples obtained during the luteal phase (p = 0.008). The highest discriminative ability for the diagnosis of endometriosis was also obtained using the hsCRP assay during the luteal phase, especially for moderate -severe endometriosis. At a cut-off level of hsCRP > 0.71 mg/L, moderate-severe stages were diagnosed with 80.7% sensitivity and 63.9% specificity during the luteal phase. Using a similar cut-off value for CRP analyzed by the classical method, moderate-severe endometriosis was diagnosed with lower sensitivity (67.7%, p = 0.06) and comparable specificity (63.9%).The hsCRP assay was superior to the classical CRP assay for the detection of low CRP levels and for revealing subclinical inflammation in plasma of women with endometriosis.Detection of antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis: methodological issues.To determine if methodological reasons explain previous inability of a single investigator to detect antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis by indirect immunofluorescence (IIF).Sera of selected patients were tested by standard IIF and recently reported methodology. Alternate diluent experiments were conducted to explain discordant results.Sera were obtained preoperatively, and testing was completed in an institutional research laboratory. Results are compared with surgical findings.Patients, seven with endometriosis and six without endometriosis, 40 years of age or less who are presenting for gynecological surgery.None.Indirect immunofluorescence was graded according to the presence or absence of cytoplasmic staining, intensity of the staining, and the lowest dilution at which staining was observed.The standard IIF method repeatedly demonstrated the presence of cytoplasmic staining for the presence of antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis, whereas modified methods did not produce similar positive staining results. During the alternate dilution experiments, when fluorescein isothiocyanate conjugate (FITC) was diluted in animal sera, negative results were obtained.The variations used in alternate methodology and failure to titrate FITC reported by other investigators are possible reasons for false-negative results reported.[Correlation between CA-125 marker with the presence and severity of pelvic endometriosis].Endometriosis affects at least 15% of infertile women. The diagnosis is made by direct visualization of implants either at laparoscopy or laparotomy. Elevation of plasma CA-125 levels has been associated with the presence of endometriosis.To search for a correlation between CA-125 and the presence of endometriosis and its severity, among infertile patients requesting a diagnostic laparoscopy.A total of 117 women were prospectively enrolled in the study between May 2000 and March 2002. A serum sample for CA-125 was taken immediately before surgery and the value obtained was correlated with the presence or absence of endometriosis and the severity of the disease.Sixty nine patients had endometriosis (59%). Patients with severe endometriosis, or grade IV, showed statistically significant higher levels of CA-125 compared to women without endometriosis or with grades I, II or III of the disease.The overall sensibility of CA-125 in detecting patients with endometriosis was low, however, it worked better for patients with advanced disease. Considering the rather low cost and simplicity of the test, we believe that it should be included in the evaluation of infertile couples.Elevated levels of fibroblast growth factor-2 in serum from women with endometriosis.The purpose of this study was to determine whether serum and peritoneal fluid levels of fibroblast growth factor-2 (FGF-2) differ between women with and without endometriosis and to examine the relationship between proliferative activity in the endometriotic lesions and the levels of FGF-2 in serum and peritoneal fluid.Biopsy specimens of peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 25) were analyzed immunohistochemically regarding proliferative activity in stroma, glands, and blood vessels. The FGF-2 concentration was measured in peritoneal fluid and serum from 25 women with endometriosis and 14 healthy controls.Patients with endometriosis had higher serum concentrations of FGF-2 during both the proliferative and secretory menstrual phases than healthy women. Peritoneal fluid levels of FGF-2 differed significantly between women with high and low proliferative activity in their endometriotic lesions.Women with endometriosis have a higher serum level of FGF-2 than healthy controls.CA 125 in peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid collected from 48 patients at laparoscopy was assayed for CA 125. Geometric mean serum CA 125 was similar in 21 patients with predominantly early stage endometriosis (13.4 U/ml; confidence intervals (C.I.) 10.8-16.7) and 27 patients without endometriosis (12.9 U/ml; C.I. 9.7-17.2). Mean peritoneal fluid CA 125 was higher in the endometriosis patients (mean 44.4 U/ml; C.I. 34.5-57.2) than controls (35.7 U/ml; C.I. 30.0-42.2), but the difference was not significant. Peritoneal fluid volume was increased in endometriosis patients (p = 0.013), and only after correction for peritoneal fluid volume did total antigenic concentration in aspirated peritoneal fluid show significant elevation (p = 0.0015) in endometriosis patients (mean 340 U/ml; C.I. 212-547) compared with controls (125 U/ml; C.I. 85-184). These results suggest that although CA 125 may be expressed in peritoneal fluid in endometriosis, it is unlikely to be of use as a marker of disease activity in peritoneal fluid obtained by culdocentesis.Serum YKL-40 levels are altered in endometriosis.Endometriosis is traditionally defined as the presence of endometrial glands and stroma in ectopic locations, especially the pelvic peritoneum, ovaries and rectovaginal septum. YKL-40, a new biomarker of inflammation, is secreted by activated macrophages and neutrophils in different tissues with inflammation. Serum concentrations of YKL-40 are elevated in patients with diseases characterized by inflammation. We aimed to investigate the possible association between serum YKL-40 levels and endometriosis. A total number of 88 women were recruited for this case-control study. About 53 patients with surgically proven endometriosis were included, while 35 patients without endometriosis comprised the control group. Patients were classified as having minimal, mild, moderate and severe disease in accordance with the severity. Two new groups were formed by combining patients with minimal and mild disease (Stage 1-2) and with moderate and severe disease (Stage 3-4). Serum YKL-40 levels were statistically higher in the endometriotic group compared to control group (p:0.001). YKL-40 levels were significantly higher in Stage 3-4 group compared to Stage 1-2 group (p values 0.001) as well. Correlation analysis revealed a positive correlation between serum YKL-40 levels and the stage of the disease. YKL-40 may be utilized as a marker for determining the severity of endometriosis.Serum leptin concentrations in endometriosis.It has been recently reported that serum concentrations of the adipocyte-derived hormone leptin are increased in patients affected by endometriosis. On the basis of these findings, the present study was undertaken to evaluate whether the protein may be used as a new serum marker of the disease. A consecutive series of 67 reproductive-age women who underwent laparoscopy for benign gynecological pathologies were enrolled prospectively for the study. Serum leptin concentrations, as evaluated by a conventional RIA kit, were related to baseline clinical characteristics and surgical and histologic diagnosis. Endometriosis was documented in 42 women (stage I-II in 19 patients and stage III-IV in 23 patients). Twenty-five women of similar age and body mass index, who had no laparoscopic evidence of the disease, served as control group. Serum levels of leptin resulted similar between women without and with endometriosis at any stage (mean +/- SEM, 12.5 +/- 9.4 ng/ml and 12.1 +/- 8.0 ng/ml, respectively). No significant association with leptin concentrations was observed in regard to stage of the disease, number of endometriotic implants, presence/absence of an endometriotic cyst or peritoneal deep endometriosis, and presence/absence of specific symptoms. Therefore, our results do not support the possibility to employ leptin measurement as a diagnostic tool for endometriosis. Further studies are needed to elucidate the relationship between leptin and endometrial system and determine the potential contribution of the molecule in implantation and early pregnancy development.[Serum markers of oxidative stress in infertile women with endometriosis].to compare serum markers of oxidative stress between infertile patients with and without endometriosis and to assess the association of these markers with disease staging.this was a prospective study conducted on 112 consecutive infertile, non-obese patients younger than 39 years, divided into two groups: Endometriosis (n=48, 26 with minimal and mild endometriosis - Stage I/II, and 22 with moderate and severe endometriosis - Stage III/IV) and Control (n=64, with tubal and/or male factor infertility). Blood samples were collected during the early follicular phase of the menstrual cycle for the analysis of serum malondialdehyde, glutathione and total hydroxyperoxide levels by spectrophotometry and of vitamin E by high performance liquid chromatography. The results were compared between the endometriosis and control groups, stage I/II endometriosis and control, stage III/IV endometriosis and control, and between the two endometriosis subgroups. The level of significance was set at 5% (p < 0.05) in all analyses.vitamin E and glutathione levels were lower in the serum of infertile women with moderate/severe endometriosis (21.7 ± 6.0 mMol/L and 159.6 ± 77.2 nMol/g protein, respectively) compared to women with minimal and mild endometriosis (28.3 ± 14.4 mMol/L and 199.6 ± 56.1 nMol/g protein, respectively). Total hydroxyperoxide levels were significantly higher in the endometriosis group (8.9 ± 1.8 µMol/g protein) than in the Control Group (8.0 ± 2 µMol/g protein) and among patients with stage III/IV disease (9.7 ± 2.3 µMol/g protein) compared to patients with stage I/II disease (8.2 ± 1.0 µMol/g protein). No significant differences in serum malondialdehyde levels were observed between groups.we demonstrated a positive association between infertility related to endometriosis, advanced disease stage and increased serum hydroxyperoxide levels, suggesting an increased production of reactive species in women with endometriosis. These data, taken together with the reduction of serum vitamin E and glutathione levels, suggest the occurrence of systemic oxidative stress in women with infertility associated with endometriosis. The reproductive and metabolic implications of oxidative stress should be assessed in future studies.Increased leptin levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with pelvic endometriosis.Pelvic endometriosis is an immune-related chronic inflammatory disease, characterized by ectopic implants of endometrium in the peritoneal cavity and associated with increased secretion of proinflammatory cytokines and neoangiogenesis. Leptin, the adipocyte-derived hormone, has been shown to have a role in food intake, basal metabolism, and reproductive function. Leptin levels are dynamically regulated, being elevated by inflammatory mediators and reduced by starvation. Leptin itself can influence the proinflammatory immune responses of CD4+ T lymphocytes, and reports have also shown this hormone to be an angiogenic factor in vitro and in vivo. We investigated whether leptin concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) differed between 13 patients with different stages of endometriosis and 15 age- and body mass index-matched controls. We found a statistically significant (P < 0.05) increase in leptin levels in serum (30.3 +/- 14.8 ng/mL) and PF (35.9 +/- 17.4 ng/mL) of patients with endometriosis, compared with our control population (serum, 15.6 +/- 8.4; PF, 17.5 +/- 7.2 ng/mL). Regression equations, relating leptin to body mass index, were also significantly different in endometriosis patients, compared with controls. Higher levels of leptin were observed in the earlier stages of endometriosis than advanced-stage disease. These data suggest that the proinflammatory and neoangiogenic actions of leptin may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.CA-125 and placental protein 14 concentrations in plasma and peritoneal fluid of women with deeply infiltrating pelvic endometriosis.To investigate the plasma and peritoneal fluid (PF) concentrations of CA-125 and placental protein (PP14) in women with deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Plasma and PF were collected during 384 consecutive laparoscopies for pelvic pain or infertility.The presence and extent of endometriosis were carefully assessed, including the area, depth of infiltration, and volume of subtle lesions, typical lesions, and endometriomas. The day of the menstrual cycle was ascertained by endometrial biopsy and/or basal body temperature charts.Peritoneal fluid concentrations were some 100 and 10 times higher than plasma concentrations for CA-125 and PP14, respectively. Cyclic variations of CA-125 concentrations were only found in women with endometriosis showing increased plasma concentrations at the end of the cycle and increased PF concentrations in the early follicular phase. Cyclic variations of PP14 concentrations were found in women with and without endometriosis both in plasma and PF showing increased concentrations in the late luteal and early follicular phases. In women with endometriosis the increased plasma concentrations of PP14 and CA-125 correlated with the presence and volume of endometriomas and of deeply infiltrating endometriosis. The increased concentrations in PF correlated only with the pelvic area of subtle endometriotic lesions. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of CA-125 for endometriosis were 25% and 87%, respectively, and for endometriomas and/or deeply infiltrating endometriosis 36% and 87%, respectively, for a cutoff concentration of 25 U/mL.Superficial pelvic endometriosis secretes PP14 and CA-125 mainly toward the PF, whereas endometriomas and deeply infiltrating endometriosis secrete mainly toward the plasma. The increased plasma concentrations of CA-125 are most pronounced during the late luteal phase, and endometriomas and/or deeply infiltrating endometriosis can be detected with a sensitivity of 36% and a specificity of 87%.Transvaginal ultrasound and computed tomography combined with clinical parameters and CA-125 determinations in the differential diagnosis of persistent ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The purpose of this prospective study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography (CT) and transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of persistent cystic ovarian lesions. The candidates for this study were 161 premenopausal non-pregnant women with an adnexal mass. After a 3-month follow-up, 83 masses persisted and were examined by both techniques before surgery. We also evaluated the CA-125 plasma levels. The CT and ultrasonographic diagnoses were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test results and the actual outcome was calculated by means of the kappa statistic. Transvaginal ultrasonography has a closer accuracy in the diagnosis of serous cysts and serous cystadenoma, ovarian carcinoma and endometrioma (value of kappa: 0.78, 0.73 and 0.80, respectively) than CT, even if the latter is associated with clinical and biochemical parameters such as patient's age and CA-125 plasma levels. Only in the diagnosis of cystic teratoma, is transvaginal ultrasonography less accurate than CT. In conclusion, in premenopausal women, transvaginal ultrasonography remains a cost-effective method in the diagnosis of most cystic ovarian lesions.Levels of circulating angiogenic cells are not altered in women with endometriosis.Are levels of circulating angiogenic cells (CACs) affected by the presence of endometriosis?Levels of CACs are equivalent in women with and without endometriosis.Murine models have suggested a role for CACs in the development of endometriosis, but their levels in humans have not yet been studied.Eighty-seven women participated in this study. Recruitment took place from July 2010 to May 2012.All women underwent laparoscopy for investigation of symptoms suggestive of endometriosis. Thirty women had no evidence of endometriosis, and 47 women were found to have endometriosis at laparoscopy. CAC levels were determined in peripheral blood by flow cytometry in 64 women. Colony forming unit (CFU) analysis was conducted in 30 women. A separate group of 10 healthy, asymptomatic women donated blood at four time points to assess the effect of the menstrual cycle on CAC levels.For the whole sample, CAC levels (0.0797 ± 0.0052%) and CFU number (10.68 ± 1.98) were equivalent in women with and without endometriosis. CAC levels and CFU number were also unaffected by the stage of disease. No changes in CACs were detected during the menstrual cycle.A difference of at least one standard deviation between the groups would be required to detect a difference with this sample size. Therefore, while CAC levels are not a useful biomarker of disease it is still possible that they are modestly altered by the presence of endometriosis. We did not describe specific types of lesion and it is possible that CAC elevation only occurs when vessel development is at its most prolific. Furthermore, although signals from endometriotic lesions may recruit CACs from blood, this may be insufficient to alter peripheral levels.These data show that CACs are not a useful biomarker of endometriosis and indicate that they may be unaffected by the presence of this disease.This work was supported by grants from the MRC (New Investigator Award, G0601458 to C.M.B.), the Oxford Partnership Comprehensive Biomedical Research Centre with funding from the Department of Health's NIHR Biomedical Research Centres Scheme and the Oxfordshire Health Services Research Committee (OHSRC). There are no conflicts of interest to be declared.Frequency of endometriotic lesions in peritoneum samples from asymptomatic fertile women and correlation with CA125 values.Serological testing for CA125 has been widely used to detect endometriosis and to monitor its progression. However, controversy still exists regarding the usefulness of the plasma CA125 assay for diagnosing endometriosis. Furthermore, some authors have described superficial endometriosis as a cyclical and normal phenomenon in women's lives, and have indicated that development and progression of this disease would only occur in some women as a result of immunological changes. This study aimed to determine the frequency of endometriosis and the correlation between serum CA125 levels and the presence of endometriotic lesions in the peritoneum of asymptomatic fertile patients.Cross-sectional study at the Family Planning outpatient clinic of Faculdade de Medicina do ABC.Eighty asymptomatic fertile patients who underwent tubal sterilization surgery were studied. Blood and peritoneum samples were collected. CA125 levels were measured from blood samples, and peritoneum biopsies were studied using histopathological tests.Histopathological evaluation of the peritoneum revealed that 16.25% of the patients had minimal or mild endometriosis. There was no statistically significant difference in CA125 levels between patients with and without endometriosis.The presence of endometriotic lesions in the peritoneum of fertile patients supports the hypothesis that incidental findings of minimal or mild endometriosis may not be of clinical significance, and that the progression of the disease probably occurs as a result of immunological and genetic abnormalities. Serum CA125 levels did not show any diagnostic significance with regard to detecting the disease.Evaluation of erythrocyte band 3 phosphotyrosine level, glutathione content, CA-125, and human epididymal secretory protein E4 as combined parameters in endometriosis.To investigate the biochemical parameters of the erythrocyte response to diamide-induced oxidative stress, alone or as adjuncts to serum values of CA-125 and human epididymal secretory protein E4 (HE4), in the diagnosis and study of endometriosis.University of Padova.Prospective study.Forty-five patients of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy.All women were studied for endometriotic foci during laparoscopic surgery. Forty-one had laparoscopically and histologically confirmed endometriosis, and four did not. Twenty women with confirmed endometriosis were reassessed 1-4 months later.CA-125 and HE4 and two new parameters evaluated in erythrocytes after diamide-induced stress, that is, band 3 tyrosine phosphorylation (Tyr-P) level and decrease in total glutathione content (ΔGSH), were assessed in all patients.In association with serum CA-125 levels but not with HE4, diamide-related erythrocyte band 3 Tyr-P and ΔGSH were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis and were able to discriminate with high sensitivity and specificity between patients before and after surgery.Endometriosis is associated with an increase in systemic oxidative stress, affecting the antioxidative defenses of circulating erythrocytes. All related implications, including evaluation of other oxidative stress-related changes, warrant further study.Killer immunoglobulin-like receptor and human leukocyte antigen expression as immunodiagnostic parameters for pelvic endometriosis.We investigated host immunologic responses to endometriosis by comparing immune cell surface antigens in peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) from women with endometriosis with those in PB and PF from other patients.Japanese women with endometriosis (n = 56) were compared with controls with other laparoscopic diagnoses (n = 68). PB and PF were collected at the time of laparoscopy for flow cytometry.No significant difference in phenotypic parameters of T cells (CD3, CD4, and CD8), B cells (CD19), natural killer (NK) cells (CD56), or monocytes/macrophages (CD14) was seen between women with and without endometriosis. However, increased killer immunoglobulin-like receptor (CD158a) expression by NK cells and decreased human leukocyte antigen (HLA)-ABC and -DR expression by macrophages, all suggesting decreased functional activation were found in endometriosis. These markers showed significant association with endometriosis by odds ratio, logistic regression, and decision tree analyses.Increased CD158a(+) NK cells in PB and PF indicated decreased NK cell cytotoxicity in endometriosis, while decreased HLA expression on PF macrophages suggested impaired antigen presentation. Thus, aberrant immune responses by NK cells and macrophages may represent risk factors for endometriosis.[Diagnostic value of the detection of aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis].To evaluate the diagnostic value of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P450 in endometrium was detected by immunohistochemical analysis for 36 endometriosis women and 22 non-endometriosis but subfertility or pelvic pain women served as controls; the serum CA125 levels were measured by chemical radiation method.By measuring serum CA125, the sensitivity of the serum CA125 assay was 44%, the specificity was 82%, the positive predictive value was 80%, and the negative predictive value was 47%; the sensitivity of aromatase cytochrome P450 in biopsy endometrium of endometriosis was 82%, the specificity was 59%, the positive predictive value was 76%, and the negative predictive value was 67%.The combination assay of aromatase cytochrome P450 in eutopic endometrium and CA125 can be used as a diagnostic test for endometriosis, especially for the early stage of endometriosis, which is superior to the assay of CA125.Autoimmunity to endometrium and ovary in endometriosis.Antibody titres to whole ovary, theca cells, granulosa cells and endometrium were determined by passive haemagglutination and immunofluorescence assays in sera and in cervical and vaginal secretions from 13 patients with endometriosis. Antibody titres to endometrium (mean log2 +/- s.e.m., 7.08 +/- 0.80; P less than 0.0001), ovary (3.58 +/- 0.87; P = 0.0092), theca cells (4.42 +/- 0.73; P less than 0.0001) and granulosa cells (3.33 +/- 0.63; P = 0.0024) were significantly higher in the patients' sera than in sera from 15 normal non-pregnant females. Antibody titres to granulosa cells were elevated (7.97 +/- 1.46; P = 0.0424) in their cervical secretions. Antibody titres to all tissues tested were similar in vaginal secretions of patients and controls. Immunofluorescent antibody assay of biopsied endometrial tissue and sera from the patients revealed the antibodies to be primarily IgG and IgA. The results suggest that autoantibodies to endometrium and ovary are present in patients with endometriosis.Evaluation of serum and urinary angiogenic factors in patients with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate serum and urinary levels of vascular endothelial growth factors, tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), and soluble fms-like tyrosine kinase (sFlt-1) in patients with endometriosis.During surgery for pelvic pain, pelvic mass or infertility, serum and urine were collected. Of 70 patients, 46 had histology-proven endometriosis and 24 patients without endometriosis participated as controls.Serum TNF-alpha levels and urinary sFlt-1 levels corrected for creatinine excretion were significantly increased in the endometriosis group (P=0.001 and P=0.011 respectively). Serum sFlt-1 levels and urinary sFlt-1 levels corrected for creatinine were significantly higher in patients with minimal-to-mild disease (P=0.014 and P=0.015 respectively), where serum TNF-alpha levels were increased in moderate-to-severe endometriosis (P<0.001).The pathogenesis of minimal-to-mild endometriosis and moderate-to-severe endometriosis seems to be different. Increased sFlt-1 levels in serum and urine of minimal-to-mild disease indicate that sFlt-1 may have an important role in inhibiting angiogenic process of the disease.[Serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 concentration in women with endometriosis].To evaluate the clinical utility of CA-125 measurements in peritoneal fluid (PF) as an indicator of endometriosis.CA-125 levels in paired serum and peritoneal fluid were assessed by IMx CA-125 Assay (ABBOTT).107 women with and without endometriosis, undergoing laparoscopy during the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle were selected for the study.CA-125 levels in peritoneal fluid were higher than those found in serum and were significantly elevated (P < 0.05) in comparison to the control group. In women with endometriosis stage I-II and stage III-IV. CA-125 levels in serum were increased only in stage III-IV.The sensitivity of the peritoneal fluid CA-125 test for endometriosis is higher than the respective serum test. The measurement of CA-125 levels in PF could be useful in the detection of the early stage endometriosis, which seems to be missed by the CA-125 serum test.Mononuclear cell beta-endorphin concentration in women with and without endometriosis.Seventy-five consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopy for chronic pelvic pain and/or infertility were studied to test whether beta-endorphin concentrations in peripheral mononuclear cells differed according to the presence or absence of endometriosis. Endometriosis was diagnosed in 45 subjects (minimal in 24, mild in 11, moderate in four, and severe in six). Twenty-eight women (62%) with endometriosis and ten (33%) without the disease reported moderate or severe pelvic pain. beta-Endorphin levels were lower in the endometriosis group than in the controls (16.6 +/- 11.2 versus 21.9 +/- 10.5 pg/10(6) cells; P less than .01). This decrease was attributable to reduced beta-endorphin concentrations in the endometriosis patients with moderate or severe pain compared with symptomatic controls (15.5 +/- 10.0 versus 26.3 +/- 7.0 pg/10(6) cells; P less than .01). A significant difference was also found in relation to the cycle phase: The opioid concentration was reduced in the luteal phase in the endometriosis group compared with controls (14.4 +/- 8.4 versus 23.8 +/- 7.5 pg/10(6) cells; P less than .01), but no differences were demonstrated in the follicular and periovulatory phases. beta-Endorphin is capable of modulating the immune response and can be considered as a classical cytokine. Low beta-endorphin production during the luteal phase may have implications in the development and/or maintenance of endometriosis.Autoimmune phenomena in infertile patients with endometriosis.To assess the presence of autoimmune factors in patients with endometriosis, endometrial homogenates, peritoneal fluid, and serum were evaluated in 23 patients with endometriosis and 22 control subjects. The methods used were Ouchterlony immunodiffusion, immunoelectrophoresis, polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis, and radial immunodiffusion. The study demonstrated precipitation lines between endometrial homogenates and serum from some endometriosis patients but not from the control subjects. Immunoelectrophoresis demonstrated precipitation lines at beta-globulin position when endometrial homogenates were used against serum of patients with endometriosis and with goat antihuman serum. It is suggested that an antigen, possibly a glycoprotein, is present in the endometrial homogenates. Radial immunodiffusion studies for immunoglobulins (Ig) G, A, and M and complement components C3c and C4 showed significantly higher concentrations of C3c and C4 in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis than the control subjects (P less than .05). There was no significant difference in concentration of IgG, A, M, factor B, and properdin.Role of IL-18 in pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is a complex disease associated with a wide range of immune responses, including pain, adhesion, exudation of peritoneal fluid, elevation of cytokine levels and generation of autoantibodies. Interleukin (IL)-18 is a strong pleiotropic cytokine known to be involved in various immune diseases. The aim of this study is to elucidate the role of IL-18 in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.IL-18 and IL-1beta concentrations were measured in the peritoneal fluid and sera of 39 endometriosis patients and 15 control women. Expression of IL-18 and IL-18 receptor alpha-chain (IL-18Ralpha) was analysed in endometriotic tissues immunohistochemically. The effects of IL-18 on cyclooxygenase (COX)-II gene expression were analysed in peritoneal fluid monocytes and endometriotic cells of endometriosis patients.IL-18 concentrations in the peritoneal fluid of endometriosis patients averaged 592.57 +/- 108.27 pg/ml, significantly higher than 260.50 +/- 55.88 pg/ml in non-endometriotic samples. IL-18 concentrations in the serum did not differ significantly between endometriosis and control patients. Similarly, no significant differences were observed in IL-1beta concentrations in either the peritoneal fluid or the serum. IL-18 and IL-18Ralpha were expressed in endometriotic tissues. IL-18Ralpha expression was also observed in cells infiltrating into the inflammatory area of the endometriosis patients. COX-II was induced in peritoneal fluid monocytes and in endometriotic cells in response to IL-18 stimulation.The elevation of IL-18 in the peritoneal fluid of endometriosis patients and the induction of COX-II in peritoneal monocytes by IL-18 suggest that IL-18 plays a pathogenic role in endometriosis.A metabonomics approach as a means for identification of potential biomarkers for early diagnosis of endometriosis.Our present study focuses on the identification of predictive biomarkers in serum for the early diagnosis of endometriosis in a minimally invasive manner using (1)H-NMR based metabonomics. PLS-DA modeling of bins obtained from CPMG spectra of serum samples discriminated endometriosis patients from controls with sensitivity and specificity levels of about 80% and 90%, respectively. Compared with those from controls, serum samples from endometriosis patients showed increased levels of lactate, 3-hydroxybutyrate, alanine, leucine, valine, threonine, lysine, glycerophosphatidylcholine, succinic acid and 2-hydroxybutyrate as well as decreased levels of lipids, glucose, isoleucine and arginine. Our work offers valuable information for non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis and may be of potential benefit to understand pathogenesis of the disease.Quantitative and qualitative peritoneal immune profiles, T-cell apoptosis and oxidative stress-associated characteristics in women with minimal and mild endometriosis.To assess immunological variables, T-cell apoptosis and oxidative stress markers in the peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid of women with (WEN) and without (WWE) endometriosis.Observational and transverse case-control study.National Institute of Perinatology, Mexico City, Mexico.Peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid obtained from 30 WWE and 32 WEN.Blood was drawn before surgery and peritoneal fluid was collected during surgery but before any surgical procedure had been carried out. Flow cytometry, spectrophotometry, high-performance liquid chromatography and multiplex immunoassay analyses were performed. MAIN OUTCOME MEASURES Peripheral and peritoneal lymphocyte subpopulations (CD3(+), CD4(+) CD3(+), CD8(+) CD3(+), CD16(+) CD56(+), human leucocyte antigen-DR(+) CD3(+) and CD19(+)), intracellular CD4(+) CD3(+) and CD8(+) CD3(+) cytokine synthesis (interleukin-2 [IL-2] and interferon-γ [IFN-γ]), CD3(+) apoptosis, malondialdehyde and ascorbate concentrations and peritoneal cytokine concentrations.No differences were found in peripheral and peritoneal lymphocyte subsets between the groups. Peritoneal T lymphocytes from WEN produced less IL-2 and IFN-γ than those from WWE. Peritoneal malondialdehyde concentrations were higher and ascorbate concentrations were lower in WEN than in WWE. Higher peritoneal concentrations of pro-inflammatory cytokines (IL-1β, tumour necrosis factor-α and IL-6) and chemokines (IL-10, IL-8, eotaxin, vascular endothelial growth factor, monocyte chemotactic protein-1 and regulated upon activation, normal T-cell expressed, and secreted) and lower concentrations of IFN-γ, IL-1 receptor antagonist and IL-15 were found in WEN. No statistical differences were found in IL-2, IL-4, IL-12 and IL-13 concentrations.The alterations observed in WEN were associated with a diminished peritoneal T helper type 1 immune response. Pro-inflammatory, chemotactic, angiogenic and oxidative stress markers were altered in the peritoneal milieu of WEN. These changes appeared to contribute to the peritoneal immune alterations found.Patients with endometriosis of the rectosigmoid have a higher percentage of natural killer cells in peripheral blood.To estimate the concentration of natural killer (NK) cells in the peripheral blood in patients with and without endometriosis.Case-control study (Canadian Task Force classification II-2).Tertiary referral hospital.One hundred fifty-five patients who had undergone videolaparoscopy were divided into 2 groups: those with endometriosis (n = 100) and those without endometriosis (n = 55).The percentage of NK cells relative to peripheral lymphocytes was quantified at flow cytometry in 155 patients who had undergone laparoscopy. In addition to verifying the presence of endometriosis, stage of disease and the sites affected were also evaluated.The mean (SD) percentage of NK cells was higher (15.3% [9.8%]) in patients with endometriosis than in the group without the disease (10.6% [5.8%]) (p < .001). The percentage of NK cells was highest (19.8 [10.3%]) in patients with advanced stages of endometriosis and in those in whom the rectosigmoid colon was affected. In a statistical model of probability, the association of this marker (NK cells ≥11%) with the presence of symptoms such as pain and intestinal bleeding during menstruation and the absence of previous pregnancy yielded a 78% likelihood of the rectosigmoid colon being affected.Compared with patients without endometriosis, those with endometriosis demonstrate a higher concentration of peripheral NK cells. The percentage of NK cells is greater, primarily in patients with advanced stages of endometriosis involving the rectosigmoid colon. Therefore, it may serve as a diagnostic marker for this type of severe endometriosis, in particular if considered in conjunction with the symptoms.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of the diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari, Italy.One hundred one consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women submitted to laparoscopy or laparotomy, from November 1993 to October 1994, because of the presence of an adnexal mass.Within 2 days before surgery all patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and evaluation of CA-125 plasma levels. The ultrasonographic impression and the CA-125 value were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis.The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa index for the transvaginal ultrasonography used alone and for the combination of transvaginal ultrasonography and CA-125 values, for each chosen cutoff and range.Transvaginal ultrasonography has a strong agreement between test and surgery (kappa value 0.76) whereas the combined use of the two methods is associated with a lower kappa index, ranging from 0.40 to 0.69.Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone has a better predictive capacity in differentiating endometrioma from other adnexal masses than combined methods.[Serum levels of soluble intercellular molecule 1 (sICAM-1) in endometriosis].To investigate the serum levels of ICAM-1 and its relationship to the extent of the disease.Serum sICAM-1 levels of 21 women with endometriosis were measured with a specific enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and 21 women without endometriosis were selected as control. Serum sICAM-1 levels were compared between endometriotic and non-endometriotic women, and among patients at different stages of endometriosis.Significantly higher serum sICAM-1 levels were observed in women with endometriosis [(0.30 +/- 0.07) microgram/ml] than in those without endometriosis [(0.18 +/- 0.05) microgram/ml] (P < 0.01); in women with stage I approximately II of endometriosis, the serum sICAM-1 levels were (0.24 +/- 0.06) microgram/ml, while in those with stage III approximately IV of endometriosis, the serum sICAM-1 level was (0.32 +/- 0.06) microgram/ml, the difference is of statistically significant.No differences of serum sICAM-1 level was found between proliferative and secretary phase in women with and without endometriosis.Significantly elevated serum sICAM-1 levels in women with endometriosis, especially in those with advanced stages of the disease suggests the molecule might be of value in pathogenesis of endometriosis.The use of CA-125 in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.CA-125, a cell-surface antigen, was measured by a radioimmunoassay in the serum of 414 women to determine its potential usefulness in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis. In women with minimal, mild, moderate, and severe endometriosis, the mean levels (+/- standard deviation) were 13.6 +/- 6.8, 22.8 +/- 15.5, 27 +/- 17, and 50 +/- 28 U/ml, respectively, and were significantly higher than mean levels (7.8 +/- 4.1) in 46 women with a normal laparoscopic examination. Higher mean CA-125 values also were observed in acute pelvic inflammatory disease, unexplained fertility, and pregnancy and during menstruation. The mean CA-125 value in women with treated endometriosis and a negative second-look laparoscopy was significantly lower than in women with untreated endometriosis. With the use of the 95% upper limit of 16 U/ml, the test had a sensitivity of 53% and specificity of 93%. The frequencies of elevated levels in minimal, mild, moderate, and severe endometriosis were 27%, 68%, 73%, and 100%, respectively. Changes in the CA-125 levels correlated with the clinical course of endometriosis in 37 of 44 (84%) women (P less than 0.001). The determination of CA-125 levels may assist in the evaluation and treatment of women with endometriosis.Concentrations of interleukin (IL)-1alpha, IL-1 soluble receptor type II (IL-1 sRII) and IL-1 receptor antagonist (IL-1 Ra) in the peritoneal fluid and serum of infertile women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is an immune system-related gynaecological disease, characterised by an increase in number and activation of peritoneal macrophages. One of macrophage-derived factors is interleukin (IL)-1. The effects of IL-1 are inhibited by IL-1 receptor type II (IL-1 RII), soluble forms of IL-1 RII (IL-1 sRII) and IL-1 receptor antagonist (IL-1 Ra). The aim of our work was to study the IL-1alpha, IL-1 sRII and IL-1 Ra levels in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum of women with endometriosis in relation to stage of disease.Concentrations of IL-1alpha, IL-1 sRII and IL-1 Ra were measured by ELISA assay in the PF and serum of 58 women; 43 with and 15 without endometriosis (control group).Elevated PF and serum IL-1alpha and IL-1 Ra levels in the women with endometriosis in comparison with the control group were observed. IL-1 sRII levels in PF and serum were higher in the controls than in the women with endometriosis. Concentrations of IL-1alpha and IL-1 sRII were higher in advanced endometriosis, but higher IL-1 Ra was observed in the early stage of the disease.Impairment of regulation IL-1 activity in the peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis may play an important role in the pathogenesis and development of the disease.Panel of markers can accurately predict endometriosis in a subset of patients.To evaluate whether a combination of putative markers of inflammation and CA-125 could serve as a multiple-marker screening test for endometriosis in a heterogeneous population of patients.Case-control evaluation of a diagnostic test.University medical center.Consenting women of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy for indications of pain, infertility, elective tubal ligation, tubal reanastomosis, or other benign indications.Diagnostic laparoscopy and peripheral venipuncture.Serum concentrations of interleukin-6, tumor necrosis factor-alpha, macrophage migration inhibitory factor, macrophage chemotactic protein-1, interferon-gamma, leptin, and CA-125 measured by using ELISA assays; surgical staging of endometriosis.Concentrations of the seven markers were compared between the 63 women with surgically confirmed stage II-IV endometriosis and 78 women who were surgically confirmed to be free of endometriosis. The individual diagnostic performance of each of the markers, based on receiver operating characteristic curves, was poor. When combinations of markers were evaluated by using classification tree analysis, a three-marker panel of CA-125, macrophage chemotactic protein-1, and leptin could diagnose 51% of subjects as to the presence of endometriosis with 89% accuracy. A four-marker panel of CA-125, macrophage chemotactic protein-1, leptin, and macrophage migration inhibitory factor could diagnose 48% of subjects with 93% accuracy. The remaining subjects would have no definitive diagnosis on the basis of the algorithm and would need to undergo standard evaluation.This large study evaluates the combined use of putative serum markers for the diagnosis of endometriosis, rather than the use of each singly. Using the serum concentration of four markers in a two-tiered decision rule, nearly half of the subjects in this population would have been diagnosed (and could have avoided surgery) with 93% accuracy.Endometriosis: an inflammatory disease with a Th2 immune response component.Efforts have been made to correctly characterize the role of the immune response in endometriosis. The objective of this study was to analyse the interaction between Th1 and Th2 immune response patterns and endometriosis by evaluating a panel of cytokines.Between January 2004 and November 2005, 98 patients, classified into two groups according to the histologically confirmed presence (Group A) or absence of endometriosis (Group B), were evaluated. Interleukins (IL) 2, 4 and 10, tumour necrosis factor-alpha and interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) were measured by flow cytometry in the peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid of all patients.IFN-gamma and IL-10 levels were significantly higher in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis compared to those without endometriosis (P < 0.05). There was a significant alteration in the IL-4/IFN-gamma (P < 0.001), IL-4/IL-2 (P = 0.006), IL-10/IFN-gamma (P < 0.001) and the IL-10/IL-2 ratios (P < 0.001) in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis, with a predominance of IL-4 and IL-10, reflecting a shift towards Th2 immune response despite the increase in IFN-gamma concentrations.Endometriosis is an inflammatory disease involving a possible shift towards Th2 immune response component, as demonstrated by the relative increase in cytokines characteristic of this pattern of immune response.Changes in immunologic variables (TNF-a, sCD8 and sCD4) during danazol treatment in patients with endometriosis.The levels of TNF-a, sCD8, and sCD4 were measured in serum samples taken from 20 women. Blood samples for TNF-a, sCD8 and sCD4 levels were taken from 10 endometriotic women before treatment, during the last 15 days of a 6-month administration of danazol and 3 months after treatment. Blood samples were taken only once from 10 women without endometriosis (control group).TNF-a levels were higher in women with endometriosis before treatment compared to controls (P < .05). Administration of the drug significantly reduced the levels of TNF-a (P < .01) and sCD8 (P < .001).This study indicates that danazol significantly reduces endometriosis-associated autoimmune abnormalities.Menstrual cyclicity of CA-125 in patients with endometriosis.To examine the serum levels of CA-125 in the menstrual, follicular, and luteal phases of the menstrual cycle in women with endometriosis and to determine if serum CA-125 levels drawn during menses improve the clinical utility of the test in diagnosing endometriosis.Serum CA-125 was measured in the menstrual, follicular, and luteal phases of the cycle preceding surgery. CA-125 levels for each phase were categorized by postoperative diagnosis and endometriosis stage.The reproductive endocrine unit of a tertiary care university-affiliated hospital.A total of 65 patients were recruited from the Fertility and Endocrine Unit and the Gynecology Service of Brigham and Women's Hospital.Serum CA-125 levels were measured by an immunoradiometric assay and were stratified by menstrual cycle phase, diagnosis, and stage of endometriosis. The menstrual cycle phase was confirmed by serum estradiol and progesterone measurements.Serum CA-125 levels in patients with stages II to IV endometriosis were significantly elevated in the menstrual phase compared with levels drawn in the nonmenstrual follicular and luteal phases. The sensitivity and specificity of CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis were not significantly better in the menstrual than in the follicular or luteal phases.Despite menstrual cyclicity of CA-125, measurement of serum CA-125 during menses does not improve the clinical utility of the test in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum CA 125 antigen levels and disease severity in patients with endometriosis.We wished to test whether there was a relationship between CA 125 levels and the severity of endometriosis that would allow CA 125 to be used to monitor disease progression. CA 125 levels were measured in 52 women with laparoscopically staged endometriosis and in eight women with normal pelvic findings at laparoscopy. There was a positive correlation (r = 0.63; P less than .0001) between disease severity and CA 125 levels. CA 125 was also elevated, compared with women with a normal pelvis, in patients with mild and moderate disease. There was no relationship between CA 125 levels and the day of the menstrual cycle. These results suggest that after malignancy has been excluded, CA 125 levels may offer a useful method of monitoring disease progress.Detection of antiendometrial antibodies in sera of patients with endometriosis by dual-colored, double-labeling immunohistochemical method and western blot.This study was undertaken to determine whether specific binding activities against endometrial proteins in sera of patients with endometriosis are detectable and, if so, to identify endometrial antigens involved in autoimmunity in endometriosis.Sera from 33 patients with endometriosis and 20 cord sera (controls) were tested against endometria of patients and their protein extracts by dual-colored, double-labeling immunohistochemical method, and Western blotting.Antiendometrial binding activities were detected in sera of 2 (10.0%) control patients and 13 (48.2%) patients with endometriosis by the immunohistochemical method. Endogenous immunoglobulin G (IgG) binding to endometrial proteins had molecular weights (MW) of 26, 28, 54, 85, 107 and 116 kDa. Most sera of both control and patients showed reactivity against endometrial proteins with MW of 34, 36, 56 and 77 kDa. However, there were specific IgG autoantibodies reactive against the endometrial proteins of 71, 92, and 103 kDa in sera of 55.2% (16/29) of patients but not in the control sera. Over 80% (10/12) of patients' sera with binding activities detectable by the immunohistochemical method also tested positive by Western blot analysis.These data show that specific IgG antibodies reactive against endometrial antigens are detectable in sera from some patients with endometriosis.Cytokine and immune cell levels in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood of women with early- and late-staged endometriosis.To investigate the level of cytokines and immune cells in the peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) of different stages of endometriosis.A prospective study was conducted to include 97 women with (n 60) and without (n 37) histopathologically confirmed endometriosis. Based on rASRM classification, stage I/II and stage III/IV were categorized as early-and late-staged endometriosis. Prior to surgery, 10 ml of blood was withdrawn from antecubital vein and serum was obtained. Aliquots were made and stored at -70 degrees C until assayed for cytokines. PF was aspirated from the pouch of Douglas. Peripheral and PF samples were analyzed by ELISA in terms of IL-2, IL-4, IL-10 and IFN-gamma. Determinations of T helper, T suppressor, NK, and B cells were assessed by using cluster determinant-3 (CD-3), CD4, CD8, CD25, CD28, CD45, CD16, CD23 and antibodies against early T cell activation antigens such as CD45RA/CD45RO, CD-69 and late activation antigens such as HLA-DR. A multiparameter flow cytometry was applied to detect the cell activation antigen expression.In terms of cytokine levels in PB and PF's of control group and early- and late-staged endometriosis cases, no significant difference was depicted in the cytokine levels (p > 0.05). Levels of immune cells did not differ between three groups (p > 0.05).The result of this study did not show any significant difference in PB and PF cytokine and lymphocyte subgroups between normal and early- and late-staged endometriosis.Evaluation of serum CA 125 levels in patients with pelvic pain related to endometriosis.The aim of the study was to investigate the clinical value of the serum CA 125 level for diagnosing and determining the severity of endometriosis and pelvic pain associated with endometriosis. Eighty-six women who underwent operative laparoscopy were enrolled. Sixty-nine women with endometriosis and 17 without endometriosis participated in this study. In all of the patients, endometriosis was diagnosed and classified into stages according to the Revised American Fertility Society (R-AFS) classification. The mean serum CA 125 levels were determined in each patient. We also investigated the relationship between serum CA 125 concentration and the intensity of dysmenorrhea and dyspareunia in the study group. The mean serum CA 125 levels of women with endometriosis were higher than those of the control group (p<0.050). However, the mean serum CA 125 levels were higher in stage IV than in other stages of endometriosis according to the R-AFS classification. On the other hand, the percentage of patients with serum CA 125 levels >35 U/mL was elevated in the subgroups with severe dyspareunia and severe dysmenorrhea versus the asymptomatic subgroup but the differences had no statistical significance. In conclusion, CA 125 serum levels were related to endometriosis and R-AFS score in the evaluated patient series. No correlation was found between serum levels of CA 125 and pelvic pain in patients with endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid immunological markers in adolescent girls with chronic pelvic pain.The aim of this study was to determine serum and peritoneal interleukin (IL)-2, IL-4, and monocyte chemotactic protein-1 levels as diagnostic markers of endometriosis in adolescent girls. The design of the study encompassed 50 adolescent girls, aged 13 to 19 years after menarche, with chronic pelvic pain who qualified for diagnostic laparoscopy. The patients were allocated into 2 groups: group I (endometriosis) consisted of subjects with diagnosed endometriosis (n = 33, 66%) and group II (control) whose laparoscopic examinations revealed no evidence of endometriosis (n = 17, 34%). IL-2, IL-4, and Monocyte chemotactic protein 1 concentrations in serum and peritoneal samples were assessed using commercially available human enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay kits. The results were analyzed statistically with the Statistica 8.0 computer software. The value of P < 0.05 was the level of statistical significance. The results in adolescents with endometriosis had significantly higher concentrations of serum IL-4 (3.90 ± 1.58 pg/mL vs. 3.04 ± 1.72 pg/mL; P = 0.04) and peritoneal fluid IL-4 (5.03 ± 8.92 pg/mL vs. 2.74 ± 1.11 pg/mL; P = 0.03), and lower peritoneal fluid IL-2 (92.44 ± 292.75 pg/mL vs. 174.23 ± 389.77 pg/mL; P = 0.01) compared with the control. In a receiver-operating characteristic analysis, serum IL-4 as well as peritoneal fluid IL-2 and IL-4 provided the best discriminative ability between subjects with endometriosis and controls. Using cutoff points for serum IL-4 (3.00 pg/mL), peritoneal fluid IL-2 (21.00 pg/mL) and IL-4 (2.7 pg/mL), relatively high odd ratios were obtained in the prediction of endometriosis in adolescents (3.2; 6.4; 3.3). The Serum IL-4, peritoneal IL-2 and IL-4 provided a good method of discrimination between subjects with endometriosis and controls.Killer inhibitory receptor CD158a overexpression among natural killer cells in women with endometriosis is undiminished by laparoscopic surgery and gonadotropin releasing hormone agonist treatment.Natural killer (NK) dysfunction is considered to contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. In this study, we investigated the host immune response to endometriosis in terms of killer inhibitory receptor (KIR) expression by NK cells.We compared cells from Japanese women laparoscopically diagnosed with endometriosis and treated with laparoscopic surgery (n = 98), 1 month after laparoscopic surgery (n = 36), and 12 weeks after gonadotropin releasing hormone agonist (GnRHa) treatment (n = 18) to cells from 104 women with other laparoscopic diagnoses. KIR expression by NK cells was assessed in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid samples by flow cytometry.In women with endometriosis, the percentage of CD158a-expressing cells among CD16-expressing NK (CD158a(+)NK) cells in both peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood was significantly higher than in control subjects. No significant differences in proportion of CD158a(+)NK cells were identified between peripheral blood NK cells sampled before and 1 month after laparoscopic surgery, or 12 weeks after initiating GnRHa treatment.Increased percentage of CD158a(+)NK cells in peripheral blood from women with endometriosis was undiminished by laparoscopic surgery and GnRHa treatment; the persistence of CD158a(+)NK cell excess is probably related to NK cell suppression in endometriosis. This overexpression may represent a risk factor for development of endometriosis and its recurrence after treatments.Serum Ca-125 concentrations in endometriosis.Serum Ca-125 levels were measured in 154 patients undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy for infertility and/or pelvic pain. Pelvic endometriosis at various stages was observed in 102 of the patients, and 52 had a visually normal pelvis and served as a control group. We found a significantly higher mean serum Ca-125 concentration in the patients with stages III and IV endometriosis compared with the controls (P less than 0.001) whereas in the patients with stages I and II disease the mean antigen level was comparable to that of the control group. Considering its low sensitivity (14.7%) the usefulness of serum Ca-125 measurements as an initial diagnostic test for endometriosis is scanty. On the contrary, because of its elevated specificity (100%), this test may be useful in indicating early surgical exploration of the pelvis in cases of infertility and/or dysmenorrhea which are associated with high values of Ca-125.Spontaneous and induced synthesis of cytokines by peripheral blood monocytes in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the capacity of peripheral blood monocytes (PBM) from women with endometriosis to secrete tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), interleukin (IL) IL-6, IL-8, and IL-10.Peripheral blood monocytes were cultured in the presence and absence of lipopolysaccharide for 24 hours before assessment of cytokines in supernatants by enzyme immunoassay.Institute for the Study and Treatment of Endometriosis and university-based research laboratories.Fertile controls, n - 10; women with endometriosis, n = 20.None.Basal synthesis of TNF-alpha, IL-6, and IL-8 and the lipopolysaccharide-stimulated synthesis of TNF-alpha by PBM from women with endometriosis was significantly greater in comparison to that of fertile controls. Endometriosis had no effect on the basal or stimulated synthesis of IL-10.These data show that endometriosis is associated with increased basal and stimulated synthesis and secretion of several different cytokines by PBM. Each of the cytokines found to be affected has the capacity to play a role in the symptomatology or pathogenesis of the disease.Use of CA-125 in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis: influence of treatment with danazol.To compare CA-125 levels in endometriotic women with normal controls.The level of the oncofetal antigen CA-125 was measured in serum samples taken from 40 women, aged 21 to 33 years. Blood samples for CA-125 from 15 endometriotic women were measured before treatment, during the last 15 days of a 6-month administration of Danazol, and 3 months after treatment, and were compared to findings in 15 women without endometriosis (from whom blood samples were taken only once).The CA-125 levels were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis before treatment as compared with the controls (P < .01). The administration of Danazol significantly reduced the levels of CA-125 (P < .01), and 3 months after treatment the levels of CA-125 remained significantly lower (P < .05) as compared to the respective pretreatment values.The results support the view that the determination of CA-125 levels may assist in (a) evaluating women with endometriosis and (b) treatment with Danazol.Levels of complement components iC3b, C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 in peritoneal fluid and serum of infertile women with endometriosis.To assess whether complement components iC3b, C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Prospective, experimental trial.Medical university.112 women infertile women undergoing laparoscopy.Venipuncture and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid collection.Peritoneal fluid and serum iC3b, C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 levels were measured by the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) method.Higher levels of C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 complement components were found in the serum compared with the peritoneal fluid, but the levels of iC3b were higher in the peritoneal fluid. We observed higher concentrations of C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 in the peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis compared with healthy women. However, the levels of iC3b in both peritoneal fluid and serum were statistically significantly lower than in the control group.The impairment of the mechanisms involved in the regulation of activation of complement system may be an important factor in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and endometriosis-associated infertility.Carbonic anhydrase antibody in sera from patients with endometriosis.Sera from 16 of 23 (69.6%) patients with endometriosis, a potential autoimmune disease, and 2 of 17 (11.8%) control individuals had autoantibodies against the bovine carbonic anhydrase (CA) molecular weight marker, as determined by the Western blot technique. The reactivity of these antibodies to purified human CA I, human CA II, and two preparations of bovine CA II were investigated. Of the 16 endometriosis patients who were reactive to the bovine CA molecular weight marker, 14 were reactive to at least one purified human CA isoenzyme tested, 8 were reactive to at least one purified bovine CA II, and 2 did not react with any of the CA isoenzymes tested. Variation in cross-reactivity between species and in the biochemical characteristics of various CA isoenzyme preparations may partially explain these findings. Autoantibodies to CA isoenzymes have recently been reported in other autoimmune diseases. Further investigation is required to determine the significance of CA autoantibody production in patients with endometriosis.Serum level of IL-10 is increased in patients with endometriosis, and IL-10 promotes the growth of lesions in a murine model.Immune dysregulation may be involved in the development of endometriosis. The anti-inflammatory cytokine IL-10 plays an important role in eliminating unwanted cells and cellular debris in a silent way. We investigated the modulatory role of IL-10 in the development of endometriosis. We observed that the serum level of IL-10 in patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than that in healthy subjects or in control subjects with other gynecological disease. Monocyte-derived dendritic cells acquired from male donors and subsequently conditioned with serum from women with endometriosis exhibited a tolerogenic phenotype, including increased IL-10 production, lower IL-12 secretion, and down-regulation of CD86 and HLA-DR molecules. Depletion of IL-10 activity in a C57BL/6 mouse model of surgically induced endometriosis significantly decreased the size of endometrial lesions. In contrast, IL-10 administration promoted the growth of endometrial lesions in this model. In addition, infiltrated plasmacytoid dendritic cells were the primary IL-10-secreting immune cells in endometrial lesions. Our findings suggest that IL-10 may suppress immunity against endometrial implants, contributing to development of endometriosis. Use of proteomic analysis of endometriosis to identify different protein expression in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.To use proteomic techniques, including two-dimensional electrophoresis (2-DE), Western blot, and mass spectrometry, to screen and identify proteins that were expressed differently in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.First, we aimed to find a difference in the way serum and eutopic endometrial proteins were expressed in women with and without endometriosis. Second, we were interested in searching for endometriotic proteins, which were specifically recognized by sera from patients with endometriosis.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Consenting women of reproductive age taking no medications and with laparoscopically proven endometriosis.Surgical excision of eutopic and ectopic endometrial biopsy and phlebotomization of patients with endometriosis and controls.Protein expression.Thirteen protein spots from serum correlated with 11 known proteins and 11 protein spots from endometrium correlated with 11 known proteins were found differently expressed between women with and without endometriosis. Some proteins may be cytoskeletons, and some may be involved in the regulation of cell cycle, signal transduction, or immunological function. Three proteins, which were identified as vimentin, beta-actin, and ATP synthase beta subunit, hybridized significantly differently between endometriosis sera and normal sera.The data help to establish a human endometriosis proteome database and broaden our understanding of the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Further study of the proteins identified herein will assist in the eventual development of new diagnoses and treatments for endometriosis.CA-125 levels in endometriosis.CA-125 is a cellular antigen detected in many patients with ovarian cancer, but it has also been detected in patients with endometriosis. Preoperative CA-125 levels were drawn from 113 patients before they underwent laparoscopy. Patients were categorized into diagnostic groups on the basis of pathologic findings. CA-125 levels in patients with evidence of intraabdominal adhesions were not statistically different from those in patients with normal pelvic anatomy. However, patients with advanced endometriosis had significantly elevated levels of CA-125 when compared with patients with normal pelvic anatomy (P less than 0.05). The clinical and immunologic implications of elevated CA-125 levels in patients with advanced endometriosis are discussed.Levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in women with and without endometriosis.To establish an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for determining the levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in the serum of women with and without endometriosis.Serum samples were obtained from 105 normal women, who were randomly selected for a population-based epidemiologic study, and 123 patients with active endometriosis. An ELISA using transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein as antigens was established.The levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in the serum of patients with endometriosis were approximately 21 times higher than those in the serum of control subjects without endometriosis. Only 2% of control subjects had false positive levels of these antibodies, and 5% of patients with endometriosis had false negative levels of these antibodies (specificity, 98.1 and 98.1, respectively, for anti-transferrin and anti-alpha 2-HS glycoprotein; sensitivity, 95 and 96.7, respectively, for anti-transferrin and anti-alpha 2-HS glycoprotein).Patients with endometriosis have significantly higher levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein than control subjects. Testing women for antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein will provide a specific noninvasive diagnosis of endometriosis.[Study on interferon gamma and interleukin-4 contents of plasma and cultured monoclear cell supernatants in patients with endometriosis].To investigate the cytokin production of T helper cell (Th) 1, Th2 subsets in patients with endometriosis(EM).The cytokine production of Th1, Th2 cells expressed by interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) and interleukin-4 (IL-4) contents respectively in supernatants of cultured PHA induced peripheral blood mononuclear cell (PBMC) and plasma, obtained from 30 EM patients and 15 normal controls were determined by enzyme linked immunoabsorbent assay (ELISA).IL-4 contents of EM patients were elevated both in plasma and PBMC supernatants[(32.0 +/- 22.6) ng/L and (32.8 +/- 12.5) ng/L, respectively], while IFN-gamma levels was suppressed in PBMC supernatant as compared with normal controls [(1,095.6 +/- 375.6) ng/L and (1,549.3 +/- 361.9) ng/L, respectively] (P < 0.01, P < 0.05). As a results, the ratio of IFN-gamma/IL-4 decreased in EM patients.Changes of IFN-gamma and IL-4 contents in EM patients may reflect functional inbalance between Th1 and Th2 cells, which may play a role in the pathogenesis of EM.[Study on the changes of T-lymphocyte subsets in the patients with endometriosis].To investigate the function of T-lymphocyte subsets in patients with endometriosis.The levels of interleukin-2 (IL-2) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) in the serum, and peritoneal fluid of 30 cases with endometriosis were detected using enzyme linked immunoabsorbent assay and compared with those of 20 non-endometriosis cases. The expression of IL-2 and IL-6 in ectopic endometrial tissue from the patients with endometriosis and the endometrial tissues of 10 normal women was investigated by immunohistochemistry method.Significantly elevated levels of IL-6 (cytokines of T help cell 2) were found in the serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis (Median: 5.3 ng/L, 2.1 ng/L, P < 0.05) compared with that of non-endometriosis patients median: 2.5 ng/L, 0.9 ng/L). The level of IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid of endometriosis patients in early stages (stages I, II) was 3.7 ng/L, 1.6 ng/L, significantly lower than those in advanced stages (stages III, IV) (13.6 ng/L, 4.1 ng/L) (P < 0.05). The ratio of IL-2/IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid in patients with endometriosis (0.7, 1.1) was significantly lower than those in the control non-endometriosis group (0.8, 6.2, P < 0.05). The levels of IL-6 detected in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis had a positive correlation with those in the serum (r = 0.745, P < 0.01). The levels of IL-6 in serum and peritoneal fluid in the patients with endometriosis had a negative correlation with the IL-2/IL-6 ratios in the serum and peritoneal fluid respectively (r = -0.406, r = -0.480, P < 0.05). IL-2 and IL-6 were expressed in the interstitial cells of ectopic endometrial tissue, with an expression rate of 56.7%, and 60.0% respectively. There was significant difference in the expression of IL-2 and IL-6 between the ectopic endometrial tissue and normal endometrial tissue.The levels of IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis are increased, implying that IL-6 might play a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The ratio of IL-2/IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid was decreased in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group, suggesting shift of Th1 cell toward Th2 cell in patients with endometriosis. Stronger expression of IL-2 and IL-6 in the ectopic endometrial tissues may contribute to the disturbed immune regulation in patients with endometriosis.Elevated levels of macrophage migration inhibitory factor in the peripheral blood of women with endometriosis.To evaluate the concentrations of macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in the peripheral blood of normal women and patients with endometriosis.Retrospective study using ELISA to measure peripheral blood MIF.Gynecology clinic and human reproduction research laboratory.Thirty-eight normal women and 55 women with endometriosis.Peripheral blood samples were obtained a few days before laparoscopy.The MIF concentrations in blood serum.This current study showed a 364% increase in MIF concentrations in women with endometriosis as compared to normal women. A significant increase was seen in endometriosis stages I-II, but a more marked increase was observed in the more advanced stages of the disease (III-IV). Both fertile and infertile women with endometriosis had higher levels of MIF than normal controls, but the difference was more significant in infertile women with endometriosis. Women with endometriosis with no pelvic pain had higher levels of MIF than normal controls, but a more significant increase in MIF levels was observed in women with endometriosis reporting pelvic pain.This study showed a marked increase in MIF concentrations in the peripheral blood of women with endometriosis and a relationship with disease progress, and suggests that MIF may be involved in endometriosis-related pain and infertility.Measurement of hs-CRP is irrelevant to diagnose and stage endometriosis: prospective study of 834 patients.The pathogenesis of endometriosis is associated with an inflammatory process. Here, we assessed if the levels of high-sensitivity C-reactive protein (hs-CRP) in serum could constitute an effective method for detecting systemic inflammation during endometriosis.This was a prospective, laboratory-based study, which was carried out in a tertiary care university hospital. Patients with histologically proven endometriosis (n = 370) and unaffected women (n = 464) were enrolled from January 2005 through December 2009. We performed complete surgical excision of endometriotic lesions with pathological analysis. In addition, hs-CRP levels were determined through a particle-enhanced immunoturbidimetric method. The hs-CRP levels were measured in both controls and women with endometriosis according to the established surgical classifications of endometriosis: superficial peritoneal endometriosis, endometrioma, and deep infiltration endometriosis. Also, hs-CRP levels were evaluated according to hormonal treatment and menstrual cycle.The hs-CRP serum levels did not statistically differ between women with endometriosis and controls (median in ng/mL [range]: 0.82 [0.04-42.89] vs 0.9 [0.03-43.73], respectively; P = .599). Moreover, subgroup analysis revealed no difference among superficial peritoneal endometriosis, endometrioma, deep infiltration endometriosis, and controls: 0.8 (0.15-13.35), 0.81 (0.04-38.82), 0.83 (0.09-42.89), and 0.9 (0.03-43.73), respectively; P = .872. Furthermore, no effect was observed regarding hormonal treatment or menstrual cycle.Although endometriosis is an inflammatory disease, we failed to identify any systemic changes in hs-CRP serum levels. Therefore, hs-CRP analysis appears to be irrelevant to the diagnosis and staging of endometriosis.Changes of peripheral blood lymphocyte subsets before and after operation of patients with endometriosis.This study was performed to elucidate whether endometriotic lesions can affect peripheral blood lymphocyte-subsets. Changes of lymphocyte-subsets of normal healthy women and patients with uterine myoma or endometriosis before and after operation were also examined by using two-color assay methods. The percentage and absolute number of CD57+CD16+ cells [moderately differentiated natural killer (NK) cells] of NK cell subsets in peripheral blood from patients with endometriosis were significantly lower than values from normal healthy women and patients with uterine myoma, while there was no difference in CD4+ and CD8+ lymphocyte-subsets between normal healthy women and patients with uterine myoma or endometriosis. In patients with endometriosis the percentage and absolute number of CD8+CD11+ cells (suppressor T-cells) was significantly increased after operation, while those in patients with urine myoma did not change. On the other hand, resection of endometriotic lesions resulted in a significant decrease of the percentage of CD57+CD16- cells (immature NK cells) and a significant increase of not only the percentage but also the absolute number of CD57+CD16+ cells (moderately differentiated NK cells), suggesting that existence of endometriotic lesions disturbs differentiation of the NK cells. Furthermore, suppressor inducer T-cells as shown by measuring CD4+2H4+ and CD4+4B4- cells were significantly increased after operation of endometriosis.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Serum CA-125 in women with endometriosis and chronic pelvic pain.Since serum CA-125 concentrations are increased in women with endometriosis, the authors evaluated CA-125 levels to determine whether this serum test would be useful in differentiating between pelvic pain due to endometriosis and other causes. During a 30-month period, 163 women who had had pelvic pain for at least 3 months had a CA-125 level obtained prior to surgery. Serum CA-125 was measured by an immunoradiometric assay. Of the 82 women with endometriosis, 66 (80%) had CA-125 concentrations greater than or equal to 16 U/ml (95% upper limit). The frequencies of elevated levels in minimal, mild, moderate, and severe endometriosis were 52, 86, 100, and 100%, respectively. Of the 81 women without endometriosis, 5 (6%) had elevated concentrations. With the use of serum CA-125 determinations for the detection of endometriosis, the sensitivity was 80%, the specificity was 94%, and the accuracy was 93% when the prevalence of endometriosis was 50%. The authors conclude that determination of CA-125 levels may assist in the evaluation and treatment of women with chronic pelvic pain.Serum concentrations of insulin-like growth factor-1, soluble tumor necrosis factor receptor-1 and angiogenin in endometriosis patients.Many soluble factors contributing to the pathophysiology of endometriosis are found at abnormal levels in patients suffering from the disease. We postulated that levels of these factors could also be altered in the serum of patients. We compared levels of insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1), soluble form of tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) receptor-1 (sTNFR-1) and angiogenin in the serum of patients with endometriosis and controls.Levels of IGF-1, sTNFR-1 and angiogenin were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in samples from 148 patients (77 cases and 71 controls) with diagnostic confirmed by laparoscopy. Correlations with demographic data and stage of the disease were evaluated and potential confounders in the study population were controlled.A significant increase in sTNFR-1 and angiogenin serum levels was observed in cases in comparison with controls, but only for patients in the follicular phase of the cycle. No significant difference was found in serum levels of IGF-1, sTNFR-1 and angiogenin between cases and controls in the luteal phase of the cycle. Correlations between levels of angiogenin and stage of the disease could also be observed.sTNFR-1 and angiogenin represent potential blood markers for endometriosis.Serum CA-125 in the evaluation of benign adnexal cysts.Because serum CA-125 concentrations are increased in women with endometriosis, our objective was to determine whether CA-125 levels could be used to differentiate endometriotic from nonendometriotic benign cysts. During a 2-year period, all women who had an endometrioma (n = 33) or a nonendometriotic cyst (n = 27) that was greater than or equal to 4 cm were included. Serum CA-125 levels were measured by an immunoradiometric assay, and the mean concentrations in women with an endometriotic cyst increased as the diameter of the cyst increased. The mean CA-125 concentrations in women with cysts greater than or equal to 4 cm were 53 +/- 2 U/ml in 19 women with an endometriotic cyst, 11 +/- 1 U/ml in 20 women with a nonendometriotic cyst, and 15 +/- 1 U/ml in 7 women with a nonendometriotic cyst and endometriosis. In the fluid of 10 endometriomas, the mean CA-125 concentration was 290 +/- 94 X 10(3) U/ml (range 10 to 900 X 10(3) U/ml). With cysts diameters greater than or equal to 4 cm, 19 of 19 women with endometriotic cysts, zero of seven women with nonendometriotic cysts and endometriosis, and zero of 20 women with nonendometriotic cysts had CA-125 concentrations greater than or equal to 20 U/ml (99% upper normal limit). We conclude that serum CA-125 determinations offer an excellent method to differentiate endometriotic from nonendometriotic benign cysts.Antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis.Sera from 42 patients complaining of infertility were evaluated by indirect immunofluorescence for the presence of antibodies to the endometrium. The presence or absence of antibodies was matched with the findings at laparoscopy. Of the 42 patients examined for infertility, 28 (66.7%) had laparoscopic findings that corresponded to the presence or absence of endometriosis. Of 28 patients with positive antibody tests, 24 (85.7%) were found to have endometriosis. No correlation between the degree of immunofluorescence and the clinical severity of endometriosis could be determined. These findings suggest the possibility of developing a noninvasive immunological test for the presence of endometriosis.Concentrations of receptor for advanced glycation end products, VEGF and CML in plasma, follicular fluid, and peritoneal fluid in women with and without endometriosis.The etiology and pathogenesis of endometriosis is largely unknown. It has been reported that advanced glycation end products-receptor for advanced glycation end products regulation relates to oxidative stress, inflammatory reaction, apoptosis, and angiogenesis through vascular endothelial growth factor activation. The purpose of this study was to examine whether advanced glycation end products-receptor for advanced glycation end products regulation contributes to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Plasma, follicular, and peritoneal fluid samples were collected from women with or without endometriosis, and soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products, vascular endothelial growth factor and carboxymethyl lysine levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Vascular endothelial growth factor and soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products concentrations were similar in plasma; however, their concentrations in follicular fluid were significantly increased in endometriosis patients (soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products was 132 + 31 pg/mg of protein vs. 105 + 27 pg/mg; vascular endothelial growth factor was 70 + 3 pg/mg vs. 49 + 18 pg/mg, expressed as the mean + standard deviation). Increased soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products and vascular endothelial growth factor levels in a local environment suggest that the advanced glycation end products-receptor for advanced glycation end products may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Survivin promoter polymorphisms and autoantibodies in endometriosis.Expression of survivin, an inhibitor of apoptosis, is increased in endometriotic lesions and probably favors the survival of endometrial fragments in the peritoneal cavity. The aim of this study was to evaluate associations between survivin promoter polymorphisms and the risk of endometriosis, as well as to compare the immunoreactivity to survivin in sera of patients with and without endometriosis. We studied 149 women with endometriosis, 196 fertile women from the general population (control group A) and 47 women who had undergone diagnostic laparoscopy and had no evidence of endometriosis (control group B). There were no significant differences in the genotypic distribution of the survivin gene promoter region -241C/T, -235G/A and -31G/C single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNP) between endometriosis patients and the two control groups. In addition, also median anti-survivin autoantibody levels were similar among patients and controls (group B). However, anti-survivin antibody concentrations seemed to be influenced by cigarette smoking, being significantly lower in sera of actively smoking women compared to non-smokers (median OD: 0.019 vs. 0.155, respectively, P<0.001), and by the -235G/A SNP, as A allele carriers were significantly more frequent among women with a high antibody level (OD≥2.0) compared to those with lower concentrations (OD<2.0) (23.1% vs. 4.1%, respectively, P=0.008). Based on these results, we conclude that survivin promoter polymorphisms are not associated with susceptibility to endometriosis in the Estonian population, and though the expression of survivin is increased in endometriotic lesions, autoimmune reactivity against it is similar in women with and without the disease.The value of urocortin and Ca-125 in the diagnosis of endometrioma.In this study, we sought to establish the value of a new molecule, urocortin (Ucn), in the diagnosis of endometrioma and compare with Ca-125 to identify superiority of urocortin.Of the patients operated on at our hospital with the initial diagnosis of adnexal mass, 88 patients whose pathology results were endometrioma and benign ovarian cyst were included in the study. As a result of the pathological examination, the patients were assessed in two groups. Group 1 consisted of 42 cases of endometrioma and Group 2 included 46 cases of benign ovarian cyst (control group). The serum Ucn and CA 125 levels of patients were measured from the blood samples drawn prior to the operation.While the serum Ucn level was 4.8 ± 1.00 ng/ml in the endometrioma group, it was 4.5 ± 1.03 ng/ml in the control group (P = 0.21). The difference was statistically not meaningful. On the other hand, mean serum Ca-125 level was 43.8 U/l (11.7-251) in the endometrioma group, it was 16.5 U/l (4.3-121.1) in the control group. The difference was statistically meaningful (P = 0.001). When the cut-off point for Serum Ca-125 level was taken as 21.38, sensitivity and specificity levels were found to be 88.1 and 63%. When the cut-off point for Ucn was taken as 4.16, sensitivity was 76.2%, and specificity 45.7%.Ucn was not found to be efficient in distinguishing endometrioma from other benign ovarian cysts or to be superior to CA125 in the diagnosis of endometrioma.Use of the concomitant serum dosage of CA 125, CA 19-9 and interleukin-6 to detect the presence of endometriosis. Results from a series of reproductive age women undergoing laparoscopic surgery for benign gynaecological conditions.Recent studies have proposed the measurement of CA 19-9 and IL-6 as an alternative to CA 125 as markers for endometriosis. This study was performed in order to verify the clinical value of serum CA 125, CA 19-9 and IL-6 levels, either by themselves or combined, in the detection of the disease.In a prospective cohort study, serum concentrations of CA 125, CA 19-9 and IL-6 were measured in a consecutive series of 80 women of reproductive age who underwent laparoscopy for benign gynaecological pathologies.Endometriosis was documented in 45 women (stage I-II in 14 cases and stage III-IV in 31 cases). Patients with endometriosis had significantly higher levels of CA 125 than controls [23.4 IU/ml (13.3-37.6) versus 11.4 IU/ml (9.1-18.5), P < 0.001)]. Conversely, women with and without the disease were shown to have similar levels of both IL-6 pg/ml [0.6 (undetectable-1.4) versus 1.0 pg/ml (0.4-1.9), P = 0.09] and CA 19-9 [9.8 IU/ml (4.5-20.8) versus 7.4 IU/ml (2.8-11.5), P = 0.11]. The area under the receiver operating characteristics curve resulted in a statistically significant difference from the null hypothesis only for CA 125 (P < 0.001). Sensitivity and specificity of CA 125 were 27 and 97% respectively and were higher than those related to CA 19-9 and IL-6. Concomitant use of the three dosages led to a sensitivity and a specificity of 42 and 71% respectively.The concomitant dosage of CA 125, CA 19-9 and IL-6 does not add significant information in respect to the CA 125 test alone in diagnosing either early or advanced stages of endometriosis.Comparison of the effects of leuprorelin acetate and danazol treatments on serum CA-125 levels in women with endometriosis.To investigate the effects of danazol and leuprorelin acetate on CA-125 levels during treatment for endometriosis.Fifty women with laparoscopically diagnosed and treated endometriosis, and 50 women without pelvic disease as a control group. Following surgical treatment, 35 women with endometriosis were divided into two groups. The first group (20 women) received 200 mg danazol three times daily for 6 months; the second group (15 women) received 3.75 mg leuprorelin acetate depot every 28 days for 6 months. Serum CA-125 levels were measured before medical treatment, during the last 15 days of the 6-month treatment course, and 3 months after treatment.Serum CA-125 levels were significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in women in the control group. Before treatment, CA-125 levels in patients with stage III/IV endometriosis were significantly higher than those in stage I/II endometriosis. Six months of danazol or leuprorelin acetate depot treatment decreased serum CA-125 levels. Three months after stopping danazol, CA-125 levels remained significantly lower than pretreatment levels. On the other hand, 3 months after stopping leuprorelin acetate, CA-125 levels returned to pretreatment levels.(a) Danazol and leuprorelin acetate are equally effective in the treatment of endometriosis. (b) Moreover, the results support the view that the determination of CA-125 levels may assist in evaluating progress of endometriosis treatment.Serum CA-125 concentrations during midfollicular phase, a clinically useful and reproducible marker in diagnosis of advanced endometriosis.Tumor necrosis factor in plasma and peritoneal fluid of women with and without endometriosis.To determine whether in vivo levels of tumor necrosis factor a in plasma and peritoneal fluid differ in infertile subjects with and without endometriosis, peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid samples were collected in 94 women undergoing laparoscopy for infertility. Quantitative determinations of tumor necrosis factor a were performed by an enzyme immunoassay test. Tumor necrosis factor a levels were below the detection limit (10 pg/ml) in plasma and peritoneal fluid of 42 (91%) and 30 (90%) patients with endometriosis and 40 (83%) and 31 (91%) subjects without the disease, respectively. In our series, plasma and tumor necrosis factor a levels were not different in infertile women with and without endometriosis.Multiple serum marker assay in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum levels of CA-125, CA-15-3 and TAG-72 were measured in 81 patients with endometriosis, diagnosed by laparoscopy, and staged according to the Revised American Fertility Society, and in 31 control subjects. The values of CA-125 and CA-15-3 were also determined in peritoneal fluid. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the clinical usefulness of these various markers in the diagnosis of endometriosis by using them either by themselves or combined. High serum levels of CA-125 were found in 43 of 81 patients with endometriosis (53%) and in five of 38 control subjects (13%). The values of serum CA-125 progressively increased in relation to the severity of the disease. High serum values of CA-15-3 and TAG-72 were also found in patients with endometriosis, but with a similar incidence also in control patients. High CA-125 and CA-15-3 values in peritoneal fluid were found in all patients investigated. These results suggest that measurement of serum CA-15-3 and TAG-72 in addition to CA-125, does not provide any advantage for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Cytokeratin-19 as a biomarker in urine and in serum for the diagnosis of endometriosis--a prospective study.Endometriosis compromises the quality of life of countless women worldwide and is a leading cause of disability. Clinical symptoms of endometriosis can be very heterogeneous leading to a long interval between onset of symptoms and surgical diagnosis. A noninvasive, rapid diagnostic test is urgently needed. In this prospective study, we evaluated the usefulness of Cytokeratin-19 (CK19) as a biomarker for the diagnosis of endometriosis through urine and serum ELISA. 76 reproductive-aged women undergoing laparoscopy for benign conditions were included to this study and divided into two groups by the presence (n = 44) or absence (n = 32) of endometriosis. There was no statistically significant correlation between the concentration of CK19 in urine (p = 0.51) or in serum (p = 0.77) and the diagnosis of endometriosis. Assigning the samples to the proliferative or secretory cycle stage did not sufficiently lower the p values. In this study, the promising data reported in the recent literature about CK19 serving as a sufficient biomarker for endometriosis could not be verified when tested in a larger sample size. Further studies are warranted to explore the usefulness of CK19 in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum CA 125 levels in patients with endometriosis: changes in CA 125 levels during menstruation.We investigated serum CA 125 levels in 120 patients with benign gynecologic disease, and examined variations in CA 125 levels during the menstrual cycle in six normally cycling women. CA 125 levels were elevated transiently during menstruation, suggesting that blood samples taken during menstruation can give a false-positive result. Whereas the CA 125 values during the nonmenstrual part of the cycle were significantly higher in the patients with adenomyosis and advanced endometriosis (stages III and IV) than in those with a normal pelvis, there was no difference between the patients with mild endometriosis (stages I and II) and the normal-pelvis group. CA 125 levels during menstruation were significantly elevated, not only in women with adenomyosis and advanced endometriosis, but also in those with mild endometriosis, compared with those with a normal pelvis. These data suggest that the measurement of serum CA 125 during menstruation may increase the rate of detection of endometriosis over that in studies done during other phases of the cycle.Evaluation of high-sensitivity C-reactive protein in comparison with C-reactive protein as biochemical serum markers in women with endometriosis.To compare high-sensitivity C-reactive protein (hs-CRP) with CRP as a soluble serum marker for the diagnosis of women with endometriosis.Prospective nonrandomized controlled trial (Canadian Task Force classification II-1).University hospital.Eighty-two women were laparoscopically evaluated. No endometriosis was diagnosed in 34 women (the non-E group). Endometriosis was confirmed by histology in 48 women (the E group). Eighty-two women did not undergo laparoscopic evaluation (the unknown-E group). Afterward, the women were staged according to the revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine criteria (r-ASRM).CRP and hs-CRP were measured initially before laparoscopy.The hs-CRP and CRP levels and the correlation of those parameters with the stage of the disease.There was a trend toward higher CRP levels and higher hs-CRP levels in the E group, while the lowest levels of both markers were found in the non-E group. There was a significantly lower hs-CRP level in the non-E group in comparison with the CRP level in this group. No differences between the different stages of the disease were found with either marker.Measurement of the two markers did not appear to be advantageous for the diagnosis of endometriosis independent of the stage of the disease. Nevertheless, a very low hs-CRP level might serve as a marker for an absence of endometriosis.CA 125 antigen is an effective diagnostic for external endometriosis.We measured serum levels of CA 125 in 26 patients with external endometriosis, using CA 125 RIA Kits. The normal range was instituted below 39 U/ml. The mean CA 125 level (+/- SD) was 55.1 +/- 24.9 U/ml in patients with external endometriosis, the positive rate being 71.4%. Considering the clinical stage of external endometriosis, the mean CA 125 level and positive rate increased to 64.5 +/- 23.2 U/ml and 93.3%, respectively. The CA 125 levels in these patients gradually decreased after surgery and/or Danazol treatment and the levels were below 39 U/ml within four weeks. Thus, progressive external endometriosis can be accurately diagnosed by determining the serum levels of CA 125, and appropriate clinical treatment designed.Identification of biomarkers for endometriosis in plasma from patients with endometriosis using a proteomics approach.The present study aimed to examine potential biomarkers for the diagnosis of endometriosis. A plasma-based proteomic approach, including 2-dimentional electrophoresis and mass spectrometry, was used. Samples were obtained from patients with (n=15) and without (n=15) endometriosis, or from mice with surgically induced endometriosis. Seven spots corresponding to six differentially expressed proteins were identified in the human plasma samples. However, only haptoglobin (Hp) was identified to be significantly decreased in the plasma levels of patients with endometriosis (P<0.05) and in mice with surgically induced endometriosis (P<0.05). The results demonstrated that Hp was downregulated in females with endometriosis, and it therefore, may be a useful diagnostic tool as a biomarker of endometriosis. [Evaluation of tumor necrosis factor-alpha and interleukin-6 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis].To evaluate the levels of tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) before and after conservative laparoscopic surgery in patients with endometriosis.The TNF-alpha and IL-6 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of 20 endometriotic patients and 10 control patients were determined by radioimmunoassay.Significant parallel relationship existed between the stage of endometriosis and the TNF-alpha and IL-6 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid in endometriosis patients (r values: serum: 0.80, 0.52; peritoneal fluid: 0.79, 0.49, P < 0.05). After clearance of endometriosis foci with laparoscopic conservative surgery, the TNF-alpha and IL-6 levels decreased significantly.Measuring TNF-alpha and IL-6 level may have important value in postoperative follow-up, surveillance and evaluation of the effectiveness of surgery.CA 125 in serum, peritoneal fluid, active lesions, and endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Ca 125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid were measured in 39 patients with endometriosis and 18 patients with normal pelvic anatomy at laparoscopy, and the presence of this antigen in endometriotic tissue and endometrial mucosa was also investigated. Serum CA 125 concentrations were elevated in patients with Stage III or IV endometriosis compared with control subjects (32.9 +/- 11.2 versus 16.4 +/- 8.9 U/ml, means +/- SD; p less than 0.001). CA 125 values were greater than 35 U/ml in 36.8% of women with Stage III or IV endometriosis and in none of the control subjects. No significant differences in CA 125 levels in peritoneal fluid were found between patients with endometriosis and control subjects. The immunohistochemical studies found CA 125 in 10% of the endometriotic lesions and 37.5% of the endometrial samples of patients with endometriosis and in 33.3% of the endometrial samples of control subjects.Tumor markers in endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to determine the concentrations of CA 125, CA 15-3, CA 19-9, carcioembryogenic antigen (CEA), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and beta-2 microglobulin (B2MG) in patients with pelvic endometriosis.Fifty women were divided into two groups: group A (control) had no endometriosis or other diseases, and group B consisted of 35 women with pelvic endometriosis. All women were submitted to serum determination of CA 125, CA 15-3, CA 19-9, CEA, AFP and B2MG. Samples were collected during the menstrual cycle and 1 week later.Mean CA 125 concentrations were altered in patients with endometriosis, but all 50 patients studied presented normal CEA, AFP and B2MG concentrations. Small variations detected in CA 19-9 and CA 15-3 had no statistical significance.CA 125 is the only important marker in the diagnosis of stages III/IV of endometriosis, especially when blood samples for its determination are obtained during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle.Hormonal and immunologic methods in the diagnosis and treatment of patients with benign ovarian tumors and endometriotic cysts.To compare efficacy of various methods for characterizing endometriosis and benign ovarian tumors.Two parallel groups of patients, 54 with endometriotic ovarian cysts and 48 with benign tumors.Central clinic.Patients referred from all regions over a 5-year period.Estrogen Estrogen and progesterone receptor levels of endometrium and endometriotic foci, CA-125 concentration, and estradiol, progesterone, LH, and testosterone blood levels.LH levels elevated during follicular phase in patients; estradiol levels reduced; receptor levels abnormal in endometriosis, but not in benign ovarian cysts.Hormone therapy is adequate treatment for endometriotic cysts. CA-125 is not a reliable indicator for differential diagnosis.[Changes of serum epithelial neutrophil-activating peptide-78 in patients with endometriosis].To investigate the role of serum epithelial neutrophil-activating peptide-78 (ENA-78) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Serum concentrations of ENA-78 were measured by means of enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in 42 patients with endometriosis (20 in stages I and II and 22 in stages III and IV) in comparison with 25 women without endometriosis (control group).Serum concentrations of ENA-78 were significantly higher in endometriosis group than in the control group (2.97+/-1.91 ng/ml vs 0.72+/-0.24 ng/ml, P>0.001), and ENA-78 levels in stages III and IV were significantly higher than those in stages I and II (4.48+/-1.25 ng/ml vs 1.30+/-0.74 ng/ml, P>0.001). Significant difference in ENA-78 levels between follicular phase and luteal phase was found in neither of the groups.Patients with endometriosis have elevated serum ENA-78 levels, which might be a pathogenic factor of endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and serum autoantibody levels in patients with endometriosis.Patients with endometriosis demonstrate autoantibody abnormalities in their peripheral blood. Whether such abnormalities can also be detected in the peritoneal cavity, has not been established. We therefore investigated autoantibodies to 6 phospholipid antigens, 5 histones and histone subfractions and 4 polynucleotides in 14 laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis and 9 control patients, undergoing laparoscopic tubal occlusion, in both serum and peritoneal fluid. Endometriosis patients demonstrated significantly lower total immunoglobulin G (IgG) levels in peritoneal fluid than controls. In contrast, specific IgG autoantibody levels were higher in peritoneal fluids of endometriosis patients. Mean antiphospholipids and antihistones autoantibodies reached significance when serum/peritoneal fluid ratios were compared with controls. Significant differences between endometriosis and control patients were restricted to IgG isotypes and were not observed for either IgM or IgA isotypes. These data suggest an abnormal concentration of IgG antiphospholipids and antihistones antibodies within the peritoneal cavity of endometriosis patients, which may play a contributing role in the peritoneal pathology of this condition.CA-125 and endometriosis.[Value of CA125 (carbon hydrate tumor-associated antigen) and endometrial antibodies for the detections of endometriosis].Levels of CA125 and endometrial antibodies (EMAb) in serum and peritoneal fluid were determined in 42 cases, including 28 cases of endometriosis as trial group and 14 infertile patients without endometriosis as controls. Results showed that the levels of CA125 and EMAb in peritoneal fluid were higher significantly than in serum, but no difference were found between two groups. Serum EMAb levels were significantly higher in the trial group than in the controls. There was no significant difference in the levels of serum CA125 between two groups. The positive rate of serum CA125 and EMAb were 71.43% and 82.14% respectively. The sensitivity of CA125 and EMAb measurements in the diagnosis of endometriosis were 71.43% and 82.14%, and the specificity were 57.21% and 57.14% respectively.Concentration of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in serum samples from patients with endometriosis collected during the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle.Soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (sICAM-1), released by endometriotic lesions, is involved in the regulation of cytotoxic processes. Altered levels of sICAM-1 in the circulation could parallel its deregulation in the peritoneal cavity. We therefore investigated whether sICAM-1 could represent a serum marker for endometriosis.sICAM-1 levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in serum samples from 176 subjects with surgically confirmed endometriosis (134 patients with stage I-II and 42 patients with stage III-IV) and 198 controls with no surgical evidence of the disease. All serum samples were collected during the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle. Detailed information about demographics, symptoms and clinical profile were collected.Mean levels of sICAM-1 appeared significantly reduced in patients with stage III-IV endometriosis in a crude comparison of means. However, when means were adjusted for potential confounders such as the pre-operative indication or fertility status, no significant difference between cases with stage III-IV disease and controls was observed.Serum levels of sICAM-1 during the luteal phase of the cycle are not able to discriminate women suffering from endometriosis from controls when confounders are taken into account. These results underline the importance of careful identification of confounders, based on patients' demographic and clinical data in studies aiming at discovering diagnostic markers for endometriosis.New serum biomarkers for detection of endometriosis using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry.This study used proteomic fingerprint technology, combining nano-sized magnetic beads with matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (MALDI-TOF-MS), to screen for potential protein biomarkers for the diagnosis of endometriosis. Serum proteins from 126 patients with endometriosis and 120 healthy controls were profiled and compared. Biomarker pattern software identified 46 discriminating mass-to-charge m/z ratio peaks that were related to endometriosis. The model constructed by the software, based on three of these peaks (m/z 5988.7, 7185.3 and 8929.8), generated excellent separation between the endometriosis and control groups. The sensitivity was 91.4% and the specificity 95.0%. Blind testing on a second series of serum samples from patients with endometriosis and healthy controls indicated a sensitivity of 89.3% and a specificity of 90.0%. Biomarkers for endometriosis can be discovered in serum by MALDI-TOF-MS in combination with nano-sized magnetic beads. The pattern of combined markers provides a powerful and reliable diagnostic method for endometriosis, with high sensitivity and specificity.Endometriosis is associated with aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase and increased telomere length.In order to test our hypothesis that endometriosis is associated with abnormal expression of telomerase and telomere lengthening in endometrium, we assessed endometrial expression of the human telomerase enzyme and telomere length (TL).This prospective pilot study, included 29 women with symptomatic, surgically diagnosed endometriosis (Group 1) and 27 healthy, fertile, symptom-free women without endometriosis (Group 2, confirmed by laparoscopy). Seventeen women in Group 1 and 15 women in Group 2 had endometrial biopsies taken on Day 21 +/- 2 of the cycle. A further 12 women in each group were biopsied on Day 26 +/- 2. Telomerase and estrogen receptor beta (ERbeta) expression was evaluated by immunohistochemistry. Mean TL was determined by quantitative PCR.The endometria of fertile healthy women showed either weak or no telomerase immunoreactivity throughout the luteal phase. Immunostaining for telomerase was significantly increased during the implantation window and the premenstrual endometria of women with endometriosis (P < 0.0001). This was associated with a loss of stromal and vascular ERbeta immunostaining (P < 0.05). The mean TL were significantly longer in endometria of women with endometriosis during the implantation window (P = 0.005), indicating the biological relevance of our novel finding of telomerase in benign endometrium. There was positive correlation of the circulating estradiol with peripheral blood TL in women.We speculate that aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase mediates alterations in cell fate that enhance proliferation, contributing to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Autoimmunity in endometriosis: relevance to infertility.Endometriosis is a complicated multi-factorial disease. Genetic and immunologic factors play a key role in its pathophysiology. We were the first to describe endometrial and ovarian autoimmunity in women with endometriosis in 1981.ELISA and Western blot analysis. It is accepted that women with endometriosis have autoimmunity to endometrial, ovarian and nuclear antigens. We have now established that: 1. The endometrial autoantigens to which the endometriosis patients have autoimmune reactions are endometrial transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein. 2. Levels of antibodies to both these proteins are specifically elevated in women with endometriosis, thus making them important candidates for developing an endometrial antibody assay for a non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis. 3. Levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein are significantly elevated in the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis. 4. Antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein also inhibit in vitro sperm motility.These data strongly suggest the possibility of endometrial autoantibodies playing an important role in the infertility often associated with endometriosis.Müllerian-inhibiting substance in follicular fluid and serum: a comparison of patients with tubal factor infertility, polycystic ovary syndrome, and endometriosis.To determine Müllerian inhibiting substance (MIS) levels in follicular fluid (FF) and sera of IVF patients.Prospective study.Fertility center.Sixty-six patients: 20 with tubal factor infertility, 17 with polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), and 29 with endometriosis.All patients underwent ovarian stimulation with hMG and/or FSH, as well as oocyte retrieval for IVF.Follicular fluid and serum MIS levels and oocyte fertilization rates.Levels of MIS in FF and sera of PCOS patients were significantly higher than those in tubal factor patients: 7.01 +/- 1.52 versus 1.65 +/- 0.23 ng/mL (mean +/- SE) and 2.97 +/- 0.52 versus 0.92 +/- 0.19 ng/mL, respectively. In endometriosis patients, follicular fluid and serum MIS levels were not significantly different from those in tubal factor patients. In PCOS patients, the percentage of immature oocytes retrieved (17.9% +/- 5.0%) was significantly higher compared with tubal factor (1.5% +/- 1.0%) and endometriosis (9.2% +/- 2.3%) patients. The percentage of oocytes fertilize was significantly lower in PCOS patients (30.2% +/- 5.3%) compared with tubal factor (62.2% +/- 5.5%) and endometriosis (37.5% +/- 5.7%) patients.Women with PCOS had higher serum and follicular fluid MIS levels, a higher percentage of immature oocytes, and lower fertilization rates than women with endometriosis or pelvic adhesions.Adding cancer antigen 125 screening to gray scale sonography for predicting specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women: is it worthwhile?The purpose of this study was to assess whether a single determination of the serum cancer antigen 125 (CA-125) level provides additional information to sonography for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women.We conducted a retrospective study comprising 1058 premenopausal women (mean age, 34.8 years) with histologically proven benign adnexal masses. All women had undergone transvaginal sonography and serum CA-125 determination within 1 week before surgery and tumor removal. According to "pattern recognition" analysis, a presumptive diagnosis was provided on gray scale transvaginal sonography for all masses. Positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for gray scale sonography and gray scale sonography plus CA-125.Eighty-five women had bilateral masses (1143 masses analyzed). In 7 women with bilateral masses, the histologic diagnoses of the masses were discordant and were excluded. Histologic diagnoses were as follows: endometrioma, n = 452; dermoid cyst, n = 180; serous cyst, n = 158; hemorrhagic cyst, n = 119; mucinous cyst, n = 54; hydrosalpinx, n = 37; and other, n = 109. The median CA-125 level was significantly higher in endometrioma (71.9 IU/mL; range: 5-2620 IU/mL) and hydrosalpinx (59.2 IU/mL; range, 5-601 IU/mL) compared to all other tumor types (P < .001). The CA-125 level was 35 IU/mL or higher in 74% of endometriomas, 58% of hydrosalpinges, 34% of hemorrhagic cysts, 18% of mucinous cysts, 14% of dermoid cysts, and 8% of serous cysts. The positive and negative likelihood ratios for sonography and sonography plus CA-125 (335 IU/mL) for each kind of tumor were not statistically different except for endometrioma, for which the positive likelihood ratio for sonography plus CA-125 (55.0; 95% confidence interval, 27.5-109.9) was significantly higher than for sonography alone (19.2; 95% confidence interval, 13.6-27.1).Cancer antigen 125 screening does not add useful information for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal tumors, except for endometrioma. An elevated CA-125 level significantly increases the probability of such a lesion.Soluble serum interleukin-2 receptor, interleukin-6 and interleukin-1a in patients with endometriosis and in controls.The aim of this study was to verify to what extent danazol alters cell-mediated immunity. To this end, cell-mediated immunity was studied in 10 infertile patients with endometriosis and in 10 normal controls. Nonspecific parameters studied included serum SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a levels. We also investigated the effect of treatment with Danazol on the levels of SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a in women with endometriosis. Blood SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a levels were measured in endometriotic women before treatment, during the last fifteen days of a 6-months course of Danazol and three months after treatment. Only one blood sample was taken from 10 women without endometriosis. SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a levels were higher in women with endometriosis before treatment compared with controls. Administration of the drug significantly reduced the levels of SIL-2R (P < 0.001), IL-6 (P < 0.05) and IL-1a (P < 0.01). Our findings suggest that endometriosis is a condition which induces a rise in interleukin levels. Danazol also appears significantly to reduce endometriosis-associated autoimmune abnormalities.Elevated serum levels of endometrial secretory protein PP14 in patients with advanced endometriosis. Suppression by treatment with danazol and high-dose medroxyprogesterone acetate.The circulating concentration of endometrial protein PP14 varied during the menstrual cycle in patients with endometriosis. The highest levels were found on days 1 to 4 of the cycle (176 +/- 123 micrograms/L; mean +/- SD), and the lowest on days 5 to 20 (44.1 +/- 29.7 micrograms/L). Rising levels were observed on days 21 to 30 (58.3 +/- 62.6 micrograms/L). On days 5 to 20 (i.e., during period of the lowest levels) patients with advanced endometriosis had higher PP14 levels (63.9 +/- 39.0 micrograms/L) than those with mild endometriosis (29.3 +/- 18.2 micrograms/L; p less than 0.01). Patients with mild endometriosis had slightly higher serum PP14 levels than apparently healthy control subjects (p less than 0.05), but overlapping of values between the two groups is remarkable. Conservative surgical elimination of endometriosis significantly decreased the serum PP14 levels. Treatment with danazol (600 mg/day), or with medroxyprogesterone acetate (100 mg/day) after laparoscopy also resulted in significant decreases in the serum PP14 concentration. After 6 months of treatment, conservative surgery in combination with danazol or with medroxyprogesterone acetate, yielded more pronounced declines in serum PP14 level than conservative surgery plus placebo. No significant difference was observed between the effects of danazol and medroxyprogesterone acetate. We conclude that endometriosis tissue contributes to the circulating PP14 level, and the decline in PP14 level during danazol and medroxyprogesterone acetate treatments reflects regression of intrauterine and ectopic endometrial tissues.Use of serum-soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 as a new marker of endometriosis.To investigate the hypothesis that soluble intercellular adhesions molecule-1 (sICAM-1) may be used as a new serum marker of endometriosis.Prospective cohort study.An academic department specializing in gynecologic laparoscopy.Consecutive series of 120 women of reproductive age who underwent laparoscopy for benign gynecologic conditions.Data were collected on baseline clinical characteristics, and surgical and histologic diagnosis.Serum concentration of both CA125 and sICAM-1.Endometriosis was documented in 71 women (stage I to II in 24 cases and stage III to IV in 47 cases). Serum levels of sICAM-1 were only slightly but not significantly increased in women with endometriosis compared with women without the disease. However, serum concentration of sICAM-1 in the 21 women who were found to have deep peritoneal endometriosis was significantly enhanced when compared with both women without the disease and those with other forms of endometriosis. The sensitivity and specificity of sICAM-1 in detecting deep peritoneal endometriosis were 0.19 and 0.97, respectively; whereas those of CA125 were 0.14 and 0.92, respectively. When both parameters were used concomitantly, the sensitivity and specificity were 0.28 and 0.92, respectively.Although the present study tends to support a role of sICAM-1 in the development of endometriosis, serum concentrations of this molecule do not seem to be an effective indicator for the diagnosis of either the early or advanced stage of endometriosis. However, an integrated clinical and laboratory approach using both CA125 and sICAM-1 may be helpful in specifically identifying women with deep peritoneal endometriosis.Local immune response in infertile patients with minimal endometriosis.To evaluate the role of local immunity in women with minimal endometriosis.Uterine endometrium and endometrial implants were obtained simultaneously from 30 infertile women with minimal endometriosis and examined immunohistochemically using antibodies of T cell, B cell, macrophage, Langerhans cell, immunoglobulin (Ig)G, and complement (C) 3d. Serum IgG, IgA, IgM, C3, C4, antinuclear antibody and anti-DNA antibody were also examined in 24 of the women. Data from uterine endometrium and serum were compared with 10 fertile women without endometriosis as a control.Microscopic examination revealed that the endometrial implants were divided into two groups: group 1 (n = 13) showed lymphocytic infiltration in the endometrial implants and group 2 (n = 17) showed no or slight lymphocytic infiltration. The endometrial implants of group 1 showed significantly more dense T-cell infiltration than those of group 2. Other types of infiltrating cells and deposits of IgG and C3d revealed no significant differences between groups 1 and 2. The immunohistochemical examination of the uterine endometrium and the serum data revealed no significant differences among all three groups. Cumulative pregnancy rates showed no significant difference between groups 1 and 2.The difference of local immune response in endometrial implants did not affect systemic immunity.Serum soluble CD163 and interleukin-6 levels in women with ovarian endometriomas.CD163 is a hemoglobin scavenger receptor exclusively expressed in the monocyte-macrophage system and its soluble form (sCD163) has not yet been studied as a serum marker in women with endometriosis. The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether serum levels of sCD163 and interleukin-6 (IL-6) could be possible markers for ovarian endometriomas discriminating adnexal benign cystic tumors.The concentrations of sCD163 and IL-6 were determined using commercial ELISA kits in frozen sera collected from 95 women prior to surgery for adnexal benign cystic tumors: 44 with ovarian endometriomas, 24 with mature cystic teratomas, 10 with mucinous cystadenomas, 8 with serous cystadenomas and 9 with parovarian cysts. Serum levels of CA-125 were also recorded preoperatively. The volume of cysts was evaluated in women with ovarian endometriomas.The serum levels of sCD163 and IL-6 were not significantly different among the women with various adnexal benign cystic tumors. In patients with endometriomas (n = 44), the levels were similar to those with nonendometriotic benign cystic tumors (n = 51): 3,431.7 +/- 343.9 vs. 3,231.0 +/- 391.7 ng/ml for sCD163 and 5.3 +/- 0.9 vs. 12.9 +/- 4.0 pg/ml for IL-6 (mean +/- SEM). No correlation was noted between serum levels of two markers with volume of endometriomas.Our findings suggest that serum levels of sCD163 as well as IL-6 are not useful markers for ovarian endometriomas.Aberrant expression of intercellular adhesion molecule-1 and killer inhibitory receptors induces immune tolerance in women with pelvic endometriosis.To investigate host immunologic response to endometriosis in terms of intercellular adhesion molecule (ICAM)-1 expression by macrophages and killer cell inhibitory receptor (KIR) expression by natural killer (NK) cells.Case-control study of immunologic markers.University hospital.Twenty-eight Japanese women with endometriosis. Control subjects were 26 women without endometriosis. Diagnoses were made at laparoscopy.Venipuncture and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid collection.ICAM-1 expression by macrophages and KIR expression by NK cells, measured by flow cytometry.In women with endometriosis, expression of ICAM-1 by peritoneal macrophages was significantly lower and expression of KIR by NK cells in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood was significantly higher than in control subjects.Properties of macrophages and NK cells in women with endometriosis promote immunotolerance to implanted tissue in the peritoneal environment. Increased KIR(+)NK cells in peripheral blood may represent a risk factor for endometriosis.Enhanced T cells interactions with extracellular matrix proteins in infertile women with endometriosis.Essential features of endometriosis involve interactions with extracellular matrix (ECM). Recent data emphasize the important role of ECM proteins in the regulation of T cell function. The aim of this study was to determine activated T cell adhesion to ECM proteins in infertile women with endometriosis. Nine women with endometriosis diagnosed by laparoscopy according to the Revised American Fertility Society classification and ten normal healthy women with a previous successful pregnancy outcome were studied. We investigated phorbol acetate myristate (PMA) or phytohemaglutinin (PHA) activated peripheral blood T cell adhesion to the following proteins of ECM: collagen IV (C-IV), elastin (E) and fibronectin (Fn). In addition, CD4, CD8, CD29, CD45RO expression on peripheral CD3(+) T cells were studied using flow cytometry. We determine that PHA-activated T cell adhesion to C-IV and Fn are significantly higher in infertile women with endometriosis when compared to normal healthy women (P<0.05). No significant differences were noted in T cell's surface antigens expression between study groups. Our data suggest the existence of disturbed T cell-ECM interactions in infertile women with endometriosis. Further studies are needed to determine the role of these abnormalities in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Increased killer inhibitory receptor KIR2DL1 expression among natural killer cells in women with pelvic endometriosis.To investigate the host immunologic response to endometriosis in terms of killer inhibitory receptor (KIR) expression by natural killer (NK) cells.Case-control study of immunologic markers.University hospital.We compared cells from Japanese women with laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis to cells from 40 women with other laparoscopic diagnoses.Peripheral venous blood sampling and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid collection.Flow cytometry was used to assess expression of KIR by NK cells in the cell samples.The percentage of cells that expressed KIR2DL1 among NK (KIR2DL1(+)NK) cells in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in controls. The proportion of KIR2DL1(+)NK cells in peripheral blood NK cells before and 1 month after laparoscopic surgery did not differ significantly.The proportion of KIR2DL1(+)NK cells was increased in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood in women with endometriosis; this difference is probably related to NK cell suppression in endometriosis. This increase in KIR2DL1 expression by NK cells may represent a risk factor in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Comparative study between VEGF-A and CA-125 in diagnosis and follow-up of advanced endometriosis after conservative laparoscopic surgery.To evaluate the role of serum level of VEGF-A in comparison to CA-125 in diagnosis and follow-up of patients with advanced endometriosis after conservative laparoscopic surgery.A prospective randomized case-control study was performed on patients referred for laparoscopy complaining of unexplained primary infertility with or without chronic pelvic pain. Thirty patients with advanced endometriosis; stage III-IV were included (study group), another 30 women without endometriosis or any other medical conditions were settled as a control group. Pre-operative blood samples were collected from study and control cases. Post-operative blood samples were collected from 25 treated patients in the follicular phase of the third menstrual cycle; 5 cases were drop-outs. Serum level of cancer antigen-125 (CA-125) and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF-A) were assayed by using enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) kit.There was a statistically significant difference in serum CA-125 and VEGF-A level in patients with advanced endometriosis before conservative laparoscopic surgery and those without endometriosis (p < 0.001) and after conservative laparoscopic surgery (p < 0.001). High sensitivity (93.3 %), specificity (96.7 %) and accuracy (95.0 %) of VEGF-A assay than in CA-125 distinguishing between patients with endometriosis from those without endometriosis; CA-125 has 70.0 %sensitivity, 90.0 % specificity and 85.0 % accuracy. Percentage of decrease of VEGF-A level after operation was higher than that of CA-125 (45.9 vs. 25.8 %) p < 0.001, respectively.The use of VEGF-A for diagnosis of advanced endometriosis at cut-off 680 pg/ml and for follow-up is better than CA-125.Haptoglobin beta chain isoforms in the plasma and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.To estimate the expression of haptoglobin (Hp) beta chain isoforms in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and plasma (PL) of women with and without endometriosis.Cross-sectional study.University hospital.Seventy-two patients with endometriosis and 35 controls.Peritoneal fluid and PL samples were subjected to two-dimensional gel electrophoresis, silver stained, digitally captured, and compared by semiquantitative computerized analysis.Expression of Hp beta chain isoforms.No significant difference was observed in the frequency of expression of the Hp beta chain isoforms between the two groups. One beta chain isoform (HpbetaE; molecular weight, 38.40 +/- 0.94 kD; and isoelectric point, 5.63 +/- 0.17) had significantly higher expression in both the PF and PL of women with endometriosis than in the PF and PL of controls. No significant difference was observed in HpbetaE expression between women with mild (revised American Fertility Society [rAFS], stage I-II) and severe (rAFS, stage III-IV) endometriosis. In the control group, HpbetaE expression was correlated with the phase of the menstrual cycle.Women with endometriosis have higher PF and PL levels of HpbetaE. Further investigation should be aimed at producing antibodies against the HpbetaE-specific epitopes to determine whether its measurement may improve the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis.The utility of human epididymal protein 4, cancer antigen 125, and risk for malignancy algorithm in ovarian cancer and endometriosis.In women with pelvic mass, cancer antigen 125 (CA125) had not achieved satisfactory sensitivity and specificity in the detection of ovarian cancer, particularly in patients with underlying endometriosis. The aim of this study was to determine the diagnostic potential of human epididymal protein 4 (HE4), the combination of HE4+CA125, and the Risk of Ovarian Malignancy Algorithm (ROMA) for patients with pelvic mass, particularly in differentiating endometriosis from carcinoma.A prospective cross-sectional study was conducted at the Clinic for Gynecology and Obstetrics, Clinical Center of Serbia. Serum samples were obtained preoperatively from 108 women undergoing surgery for pelvic mass; 29 of them had ovarian carcinoma, and 79 had a nonmalignant ovarian disease (39 with benign tumor, 20 with endometriosis, 20 healthy controls). Sera were analyzed for the levels of HE4 and CA125 and were then compared with the final pathologic results. The diagnostic performance of HE4 and CA125 was estimated using receiver operating characteristic curve and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve.The level of HE4 and CA125 was significantly higher among the patients with malignant tumors, compared with patients with nonmalignant disease. At the predefined specificity of 95%, HE4 and CA125 showed sensitivity of 65.5% and 58.6%, respectively, whereas the combination of HE4+CA125 reached 68.9% at the same specificity. Importantly, the level of HE4 did not differ significantly between the patients with endometriosis and with other nonmalignant diseases (which was not the case with CA125). Risk of Ovarian Malignancy Algorithm classified 96% of benign premenopausal cases as at low risk for ovarian cancer.HE4 showed satisfactory capability of distinguishing endometriosis from ovarian cancer, which CA125 lacked. The Risk of Ovarian Malignancy Algorithm score proved to be useful in excluding malignant diagnosis in premenopausal women.Levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in serum of patients with endometriosis.Elevated concentrations of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) have been detected in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis. Furthermore, it was postulated that VEGF is involved in the development of endometriotic lesions. The present study is aimed at determining whether high levels of VEGF could also be found in the serum of patients with endometriosis.VEGF levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in serum from 131 subjects with surgically confirmed endometriosis and 146 controls with no clinical evidence of the disease or detectable endometriotic lesions at the time of surgical examination. Parameters such as demographics, personal habits, menstrual characteristics and clinical profile were collected from each subject included in this study.The mean VEGF levels were not significantly modulated in serum samples of cases compared with controls in a crude general linear model and in a model adjusted for possible confounders. VEGF serum levels did not correlate with the score, stage of endometriosis or the presence of benign gynaecological disorders. However, a correlation was found between circulating concentrations of VEGF and body mass index.Although VEGF seems to play a pivotal role locally in the implantation and development of endometriotic lesions, the disease is not associated with a significant modulation in the levels of circulating VEGF.Serum and cyst fluid levels of interleukin (IL) -6, IL-8 and tumour necrosis factor-alpha in women with endometriomas and benign and malignant cystic ovarian tumours.Altered expression of cytokines has been suggested as a specific event for the maintenance and progression of endometriomas. Few data exist on cytokine expression in endometriomas compared with benign and malignant ovarian tumours. Hence, serum and cyst fluid levels of interleukin (IL)-6, IL-8 and tumour necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) were evaluated in women with endometriomas and compared with those in women with benign or malignant ovarian tumours.Investigations included immunoradiometric determination of serum and cyst fluid concentrations of IL-6, IL-8 and TNF-alpha in 34 women with endometriomas, 30 women with benign and 13 women with malignant cystic ovarian tumours.Serum IL-6 levels were higher in ovarian cancer than in endometriomas (P<0.01) or benign tumours (P<0.01). Serum TNF-alpha levels differed between benign tumours and endometriomas (P<0.01), but not between endometriomas and malignant tumours. Cyst fluid levels of IL-8 were higher in endometriomas than in benign tumours (P<0.001) and lower than in malignant tumours (P=0.03). Cyst fluid levels of TNF-alpha differed between malignant tumours and endometriomas (P<0.01) and benign tumours (P<0.01), but not between endometriomas and benign tumours. In the endometriomas group, a positive correlation was found between serum and cyst fluid levels of IL-6 (P=0.003, rho=0.633), and between serum levels of IL-6 and IL-8 (P=0.03, rho=0.415).Endometriomas were associated with serum TNF-alpha levels similar to those found in women with ovarian cancer, while serum IL-6 levels and cyst fluid IL-8 levels were intermediate between those observed in benign and malignant ovarian tumours.Serum CA-125 levels in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.The value of CA-125 for the diagnosis and management of endometriosis (EN) was investigated by assaying the marker in the serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) from patients with the disease in comparison with control subjects. Of women who underwent 270 consecutive laparoscopies, 81 with various stages of EN (18 stage I, 13 stage II, 35 stage III and 15 stage IV) and 38 with normal pelvic findings were studied. CA-125 serum values increased progressively in relation to the severity of the disease. The levels in stages III and IV EN were significantly higher (P less than .01) than in stages I and II or control patients. The latter two groups did not differ from each other. High CA-125 PF values were found in all the patients investigated. Twenty-two patients with EN were treated with a gonadotropin releasing hormone agonist for six months before second-look laparoscopy or laparotomy. CA-125 values decreased significantly after one month of medical treatment and remained unchanged during the course of therapy. No significant relationship was found in the outcome after therapy.Soluble c-Met expression in the peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with different stages of endometriosis.Hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), also known as scatter factor, and its receptor c-Met have been shown to be implicated in endometriosis. HGF acts as a mitogen, motogen, and morphogen on endometrial epithelial cells. The expression of c-Met on human endometrial cells has been reported. Many proteins are proteolytically released from the surface by a process known as ectodomain shedding. The aim of this study was to determine the levels of soluble c-Met (s-cMet) in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum samples of patients with different stages of endometriosis.39 PF and serum samples from normal healthy and 130 samples from different stages of patients with endometriosis (33 cases of stage I, 38 stage II, 30 stage III and 29 stage IV) were included in this study. Total protein concentration (TPC) and the level of s-cMet in the PF and serum were determined by Bio-Rad protein assay based on the Bradford dye procedure and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, respectively.No significant change in the TPC was seen in the serum and PF of patients with endometriosis when compared with normal controls. Results obtained demonstrated that all PF and serum samples presented s-cMet expression, whereas, starting from stages I to IV endometriosis, a significant increase of s-cMet expression was observed as compared to controls.The results of this study show that a high expression of s-cMet is correlated with advanced stages of endometriosis. It is also concluded that the detection of serum and PF s-cMet may be useful in classifying endometriosis.Anti-endometrial antibodies in women measured by an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was developed to measure anti-endometrial antibody concentrations in the serum of women with endometriosis. Pooled cytosolic protein extracts from the endometrial gland cells of 10 women were used as an antigen source. Serum samples were obtained from women with endometriosis before (n = 51) and after 6 months treatment with danazol or nafarelin (n = 30). Control sera came from women with a normal pelvis at laparoscopy, performed for sterilization (n = 23) or the investigation of pain and/or infertility (n = 22), 13 women with Rokitansky syndrome, and 10 umbilical cord bloods and adult males. There were no significant differences in serum anti-endometrial antibody concentrations before and after treatment, or between women with endometriosis and without endometriosis. Concentrations were lower in male and cord blood serum than in female's serum (P < 0.0001). We conclude that the ELISA is not a useful diagnostic tool for endometriosis unless more specific antigens can be isolated.Levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in women with and without endometriosis.The study objective was to test the hypothesis that elevated levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein occur in the peritoneal environment of patients with endometriosis that may lead to the observed autoimmunity to these proteins. We set up a double sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for measuring levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in the serum and peritoneal fluid samples from women with (n = 24-60) and without endometriosis (n = 35-49). Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of alpha 2-HS glycoprotein and peritoneal fluid levels of transferrin were significantly elevated in patients with endometriosis, in contrast to the controls. Serum levels of transferrin in patients, however, were significantly less in the patients than in controls. We conclude that transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein are present at high concentrations in the peritoneal fluids of patients with endometriosis. This may play a significant role in the autoimmune pathophysiology of endometriosis.Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and ovarian endometriosis: correlation between VEGF serum levels, VEGF cellular expression, and pelvic pain.Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) serum levels and VEGF and cellular expression were prospectively analyzed in 60 patients (group A consisted of asymptomatic patients or patients presenting mild dysmenorrhea; 30 women comprised group B severe dysmenorrhea and/or chronic pelvic pain and/or dyspareunia) who underwent surgery for cystic ovarian endometriosis to asses whether a correlation exists among VEGF serum levels, VEGF cellular expression, and pelvic pain. No differences were found in VEGF serum levels and VEGF cellular expression between both groups. Therefore, we conclude that pain symptoms in ovarian endometriosis are not correlated with VEGF serum levels and VEGF cellular expression.Serum CA-125 concentration in endometriosis patients: role of pelvic and peritoneal irritation.Serum CA-125 concentrations were investigated preoperatively in 91 consecutive women undergoing laparoscopy for infertility, pelvic pain and/or annexial cysts. The presence and extent of endometriosis were carefully assessed, including the American Fertility Society stage of disease, and implant and adhesion scores. Postoperative CA-125 measurements were obtained in 32 of 53 endometriosis patients and evaluated with respect to clinical evolution of the disease. Serum levels of CA-125 were significantly increased in patients with endometriosis (46.5 +/- 39.5 vs. 13.5 +/- 7.3 U/ml in controls, p < 0.001) and correlated with the severity of disease. A positive correlation (r = 0.7, p < 0.001) was observed between adhesion score and CA-125 levels, while the relationship with implant score was not significant (r = 0.3, p = 0.07). CA-125 level was also significantly increased in women with peritoneal endometriosis (70.7 +/- 47.3 vs. 33.5 +/- 25.6 U/ml for those with ovarian endometriosis), and in these patients the post-operative CA-125 level was significantly related to the clinical evolution of the disease, being higher in patients whose disease recurred compared to those with negative follow-up, irrespective of the adhesion score. We conclude that in endometriosis patients, serum CA-125 level is directly related to the adhesion score and peritoneal involvement, suggesting a central role of pelvic and peritoneal irritation in the increased level of this serum marker.The G(-2518)A polymorphism of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) and its serum and peritoneal fluid levels in Korean women with endometriosis.To investigate the associations between endometriosis and the G(-2518)A polymorphism of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1), and serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels in Korean women.The G(-2518)A polymorphism of MCP-1 was analyzed by restriction fragment length polymorphism in 105 women with and in 101 women without endometriosis. Serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).The genotype frequencies of the MCP-1 G (-2518)A polymorphism were GG 36.9%, AG 52.9%, and AA 10.2%. MCP-1 genotype frequencies and serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels were similar in those with or without endometriosis and were not dependent on disease stage. A significant correlation was found between serum and peritoneal fluid levels of MCP-1. However, no differences were found between MCP-1 genotypes in terms of serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels.Serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels and the G (-2518)A MCP-1 polymorphism were found not to be associated with endometriosis in Korean women.The relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and expression of vascular endothelial growth factor-A and its receptors in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic lesions.Studies were performed to elucidate the possible relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis and peritoneal endometriotic lesions. The question whether changes in these parameters in endometriotic lesions were reflected by the level of vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) in serum and peritoneal fluid was also studied. Biopsy specimens of both eutopic endometrium and peritoneal endometriotic lesions from women with endometriosis (n = 25) as well as eutopic endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 14) were analysed immunohistochemically regarding microvessel density, proliferative activity, and expression of VEGF-A and its receptors vascular endothelial growth factor receptors 1 and 2 (VEGFR-1 and VEGFR-2) in stroma, glands and blood vessels. The VEGF-A concentration was measured in peritoneal fluid and serum. Secretory phase eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis had significantly higher microvessel density, expression of VEGF-A in glandular epithelium and VEGFR-2 in endometrial blood vessels than those from women without endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity had a higher microvessel density and showed higher vascular expression of VEGFR-2 as well as being accompanied by higher levels of VEGF-A in peritoneal fluid and serum, compared with lesions with low proliferative activity. In conclusion, there seems to be a dysregulation of angiogenic activity in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity were accompanied by higher local angiogenic activity and higher levels of VEGF in serum and peritoneal fluid.Retrospective evaluation of tumor markers in ovarian mature cystic teratoma and ovarian endometrioma.The aim of this study was to evaluate the correlation between clinicopathological characteristics and serum levels of tumor markers in patients with ovarian endometrioma (OE) and ovarian mature cystic teratoma (MCT).Values of CA125, CA19-9, and sialyl Tn antigen (STN) were retrospectively investigated in 321 patients with OE. CA125, CA19-9, STN, and squamous cell carcinoma antigen (SCC) were examined in 435 patients with MCT.Mean values of CA125, CA19-9, and STN were 105.3 U/mL, 58.0 U/mL, and 31.1 U/mL in OE, while the values were 26.8 U/mL, 246.8 U/mL, and 24.7 U/mL in MCT. Abnormal elevation of CA125, CA19-9, and STN was observed in 53.3%, 38.9, and 13.5 of OE, and in 12.9, 50.6, and 4.6% of MCT, respectively. CA125 level was significantly higher in bilaterally occurring OE and premenopausal patients with MCT, while the value of CA19-9 was significantly higher in cases of bilaterally occurring MCT. Furthermore, the levels of CA125 and CA19-9 showed significant correlations with tumor diameter, while the levels of STN and SCC showed no significant correlations with tumor diameter. The highest CA125 level (9513 U/mL) was observed in OE and the highest CA19-9 level (25 590 U/mL) was observed in MCT.Although abnormal increases in the levels of CA125 and CA19-9 were often observed, the levels of STN were not influenced by clinicopathologic factors in OE and MCT. Further studies of the clinical usefulness of STN for detecting malignant tumors in OE and MCT are needed.Expression of inhibitory-motif killer immunoglobulin-like receptor, KIR2DL1, is increased in natural killer cells from women with pelvic endometriosis.We investigated inhibitory and activation motif expression of killer immunoglobulin-like receptor (KIR) by natural killer (NK) cells, which may be pathogenetically involved in endometriosis.We compared cells from 24 Japanese women laparoscopically diagnosed with endometriosis, to cells from 25 women with other laparoscopic diagnoses. KIR expression by NK cells was assessed in peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) by flow cytometry. Intracellular immunoreceptor tyrosine-based (IT) inhibitory and activation motifs (ITIM and ITAM) of KIR in PB was assessed by Western blotting.ITIM-KIR expression by PB NK cells was significantly and similarly greater than ITAM-KIR expression in women with and without endometriosis. Percentages of CD56(+) NK cells in PB and PF did not differ significantly between women with and without endometriosis; however, the percentage of CD158a(+) cells among CD56(+) NK cells in PB and PF was significantly higher in women with than without endometriosis.ITIM-KIR expressing NK cells might confer tolerance to peritoneal endometriotic implants.Increased levels of biglycan in endometriomas and peritoneal fluid samples from ovarian endometriosis patients.In our previous low-density-array gene-expression analysis we found an increased expression of biglycan gene in ovarian endometriosis patients. In the present study we evaluated biglycan expression at the protein level in tissue, serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) from ovarian endometriosis patients, patients with benign ovarian cysts and healthy women. Twenty samples of endometriomas and 27 of control tissues (benign ovarian cysts and eutopic endometrium of healthy women) were obtained laparoscopically or by curettage. Serum and PF samples were collected from 56 ovarian endometriosis patients and 40 controls (patients with benign cysts and healthy women). Tissue biglycan levels and serum and PF biglycan concentrations were determined by Western blotting and ELISA, respectively. Biglycan was detected in endometriomas and in benign cysts tissues but differed in glycosylation levels. The PF biglycan concentrations were significantly increased in ovarian endometriosis patients (mean ± SD=220.3 ± 190.5 pg/mg protein) compared to the whole control group (101.9 ± 94.7 pg/mg protein, p<0.001), while serum concentrations did not differ significantly. Biglycan appears to be involved in ovarian pathologies and probably has different roles in benign cysts as compared to ovarian endometriomas.Dysregulated sphingolipid metabolism in endometriosis.In endometriosis, the establishment and subsistence of ectopic lesions outside the endometrium suggest an altered cellular state for pathological hyperplasia. Sphingolipids are bioactive compounds, and their biosynthesis and metabolism modulate a range of cellular processes including proliferation, migration and apoptosis. We demonstrate that aberrations in sphingolipid metabolism occur in women with endometriosis.Targeted mass spectrometry on >120 sphingolipids were measured in the sera (n = 62), peritoneal fluid (n = 63), and endometrial tissue (n = 14) of women with and without endometriosis. Quantitative RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry were performed on endometrial tissues determine the expression levels of sphingolipid enzymes.Sphingolipidomics identified the in vivo accumulation of numerous sphingolipids, including the functionally antagonistic glucosylceramides and ceramides in the serum and PF of women with endometriosis. We found upregulation of specific sphingolipid enzymes, namely sphingomyelin synthase 1 (SMS1), sphingomyelinase 3 (SMPD3), and glucosylceramide synthase (GCS) in the endometrium of endometriotic women with corresponding increased GlcCer, decreased sphingomyelin levels, and decreased apoptosis in the endometrium.Our sphingolipidomics approach provided evidence of altered sphingolipid metabolism flux in serum, peritoneal fluid, and endometrial tissue in women with endometriosis. The results provide new information on how sphingolipids and eutopic endometrium may contribute to the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The results also have implications for the use of sphingolipids as potential biomarkers.Expression and localisation of osteopontin and prominin-1 (CD133) in patients with endometriosis.In this study, we investigated the expression and localisation of the proteins, osteopontin (OPN) and prominin-1 (CD133), as well as the plasma OPN levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis. Samples of ectopic endometriotic lesions and normal endometrium were obtained from 31 women with endometriosis and 28 healthy control subjects. The mRNA and protein expression of OPN and CD133 was analysed by real‑time RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry. The plasma levels of OPN were determined by ELISA. Our results revealed that OPN mRNA and protein expression, as well as its release in the blood, was significantly increased in the endometriotic lesions in comparison to normal tissue. Although the presence of CD133+ cells was detected in the normal endometrium, as well as in the endometriosis specimens, a significant quantitative variation of this protein was not demonstrated in the patients with endometriosis. In conclusion, our data indicate that OPN is involved in the development of endometriosis by enhancing the invasiveness, proliferation and survival of endometrial cells in ectopic lesions. CD133 cannot be used as a disease marker for endometriosis, although an involvement of this protein in the pathogenesis of endometriosis cannot be excluded.Elevated glycodelin-A concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with ovarian endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) glycodelin-A concentrations in women with ovarian endometriosis. Ninety-nine matched pairs of serum and PF samples were included in our study. The case group comprised 57 women with ovarian endometriosis and the control group 42 healthy women undergoing sterilization or patients with benign ovarian cysts. Glycodelin-A concentrations were measured using ELISA. Endometriosis patients had significantly higher serum and PF glycodelin-A concentrations compared to controls, and this increase was observed in both proliferative and secretory cycle phases. Glycodelin-A concentrations were more than 10-fold higher in PF than in serum and correlated with each other. Intensity and frequency of menstrual pain positively correlated with glycodelin-A concentrations. Sensitivity and specificity of glycodelin-A as a biomarker for ovarian endometriosis were 82.1% and 78.4% in serum, and 79.7% and 77.5% in PF, respectively. These results indicate that Glycodelin-A has a potential role as a biomarker to be used in combination with other, independent marker molecules.Association between PTPN22 and endometriosis.PTPN22 is currently one of the few known shared-autoimmunity genes and is therefore a candidate marker for endometriosis. Our data show that female carriers of the PTPN22( *)T variant are significantly more susceptible to endometriosis than controls.Endometriosis markers: immunologic alterations as diagnostic indicators for endometriosis.Because endometriosis, a chronic disease affecting 7% to 10% of women, is associated with immunologic aberrations, the authors hypothesize that the presence of specific immune alterations may be diagnostic. Autoantibodies were assayed by Western immunoblotting using antigens derived from the plasma membrane, cytosol, and nucleus from endometrial and ovarian cells. Natural killer (NK) activity was defined by levels of signaling protein zeta and induction of interferon (IFN)-gamma following exposure to patients' sera. Patients with endometriosis exhibited autoantibodies reactive with cellular proteins; endometrial membrane proteins exhibited the greatest reactivity, followed by nuclear antigens. In all subcellular fractions, patients with stage 3 endometriosis exhibited significantly more immunoreactivity than did stage 2 patients, which was greater than that observed in stage 1 patients. The stage-associated increased reactivity resulted from both recognition of additional proteins and enhanced reactivity with shared proteins. Patient sera suppressed NK zeta expression, which resulted in suppression of NK IFN induction. Alterations in autoreactivity and NK activity are observed in endometriosis and may be useful as diagnostic markers, even in early stage disease.Serum levels of the tumour-associated trypsin inhibitor in patients with endometriosis.To show that in patients with endometriosis a 6 kD polypeptide, the tumour-associated trypsin inhibitor (TATI), can occur at elevated concentrations in serum.In a prospective study TATI serum levels were assessed prior to surgery in 368 consecutive patients suffering from benign gynaecological diseases (e.g. pelvic pain, infertility, elective sterilisation, uterine fibroids and pelvic masses) with (n = 71) and without (n = 297) endometriosis, who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy for diagnosis and/or treatment.The TATI serum levels of patients suffering from endometriosis were significantly different from those in the control group and showed a positive correlation with the stage of endometriosis. The sensitivity of TATI was 0.34 with a specificity of 0.85 for all cases of endometriosis, with an increase of sensitivity (0.67) and slight decrease of specificity (0.82), considering only a group of Stage III/IV patients. Excluding patients with benign ovarian cysts, the specificity of TATI was 0.91 and 0.85, respectively. The combination of TATI and CA125 showed an increase of sensitivity to 0.59 for all cases of endometriosis and 0.89 for patients with Stage III/IV endometriosis.The sensitivity of TATI as a screening method for endometriosis is too low, but considering its high specificity, TATI in combination with CA125 could provide an additional diagnostic tool in diagnosis and follow up of patients with endometriosis.Changes in the T-helper cytokine profile and in lymphocyte activation at the systemic and local levels in women with endometriosis.To estimate regulatory cytokine synthesis and lymphocyte activation in the peripheral blood and endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis.Controlled clinical study.Medical center.Fifteen women with laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis; 20 gynecologically healthy women with previously documented fertility (control group).Peripheral venous blood sampling; laparoscopic collection of ectopic and matched eutopic endometrium.Messenger RNA (mRNA) for interleukin (IL)-2, IL-4, and IL-10 expression in peripheral and endometrium lymphocytes was assessed by real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction; intracellular synthesis of these cytokines and lymphocyte phenotype profile were established by flow cytometry.Both mRNA expression and intracellular synthesis of IL-4 and IL-10 were sharply increased in peripheral lymphocytes. The same changes were observed for IL-4 in ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Simultaneously, elevation of the amount of pan-B cells, CD20+CD5+ B-1 cells, and activated HLA-DR+CD20+ B lymphocytes was observed in endometriosis lesions. Only an enhanced amount of B lymphocytes was seen in eutopic endometrium.Endometriosis development is accompanied by the activation of a T-helper type 2 immune response at the systemic and local levels. Our results support the hypothesis regarding the autoimmune nature of endometriosis and can explain the high level of autoantibody production in patients with endometriosis.Determination of HGF concentration in serum and peritoneal fluid in women with endometriosis.Scatter factor (hepatocyte growth factor, SF/HGF) is a multifunctional polypeptide growth factor that plays an important role in tumor proliferation, angiogenesis and invasiveness. The aim of this study was to investigate the role of HGF in endometriosis and their relationship. Peritoneal fluid and serum samples of 126 women of reproductive age receiving laparoscopy (72 with endometriosis and 54 without endometriosis) were obtained and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was employed to measure HGF concentrations. The results revealed that the concentrations of HGF were significantly elevated in women with endometriosis stages I/II and III/IV as compared with HGF level in the control group (peritoneal fluid levels of 0.337+/-0.065, 0.458+/-0.160, 0.915+/-0.113, P<0.001; serum level of 0.335+/-0.663, 0.456+/-0.151, 0.907+/-0.170, P<0.001 respectively). A positive correlation was found between peritoneal fluid and serum levels of HGF, which varied little with phases of the menstrual cycle. Comparisons of the women in the same menstrual cycle between the three groups revealed that increased levels of HGF in patients with advanced endometriosis were not attributed to the cycle phase. Our results indicated that the degree of endometriosis was positively correlated with HGF concentration in peritoneal fluid and serum. Therefore, the detection of serum HGF concentration may be useful in classifying endometriosis, and may also help in selecting the optimal treatment methods.Evaluation of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 levels in peripheral blood of infertile women with endometriosis.To test whether serum monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) chemokine levels correlate with endometriosis in infertile women.A group of women with endometriosis (n = 18, infertile) was compared with patients with uterine leiomyoma (n = 16, fertile), unexplained infertility (n = 5, infertile), and healthy women (n = 16, fertile). MCP-1 expression levels were evaluated by ELISA assay. The data obtained were statistically analyzed using the Mann-Whitney test. P-Values <0.05 were considered as significant.MCP-1 concentrations (median; range of values) in serum were as follows: women with endometriosis (221; 101-635 pg/ml), women with unexplained infertility (167, 114-234 pg/ml), women with uterine leiomyoma (137; 88-200 pg/ml), and healthy donors (123; 98-194 pg/ml). Significant differences were observed in the women with endometriosis compared with those with uterine leiomyoma (p = 0.02) and healthy donors (p = 0.002). Among the women with endometriosis, the level of significance in MCP-1 level at rAFS stages III-IV was higher than that at rAFS stages I-II compared with healthy donors and women with leiomyoma (p = 0.002 and p = 0.02, respectively).These data show that an increased level of MCP-1 can characterize infertile women with endometriosis. However, further studies are needed to be able to determine whether increased MCP-1 chemokine expression can be related to infertility or is a result of endometriosis progress.Serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels in early stage endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) CA-125 levels were assayed using the immunoradiometric assay in 17 women with minimal endometriosis and 21 control women at the time of laparoscopy. Serum levels of CA-125 were not significantly higher in women with minimal endometriosis. Minimal endometriosis was diagnosed with a 70.6% rate of sensitivity and a 71.4% rate of specificity with 16 U/ml as the upper limit of normal. PF CA-125 levels were significantly higher than serum levels but showed no significant difference between control and endometriosis patients.Plasma miR-17-5p, miR-20a and miR-22 are down-regulated in women with endometriosis.Can plasma microRNAs be used as a non-invasive diagnostic test for the detection of endometriosis?Plasma miR-17-5p, miR-20a and miR-22 are down-regulated in women with endometriosis compared with those without endometriosis in mainland China.There is currently a pressing need to develop a non-invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis. Altered circulating microRNA profiles have already been linked to various disease states.This was a prospective laboratory study in a tertiary-referral university hospital in Beijing, PR China, between January 2012 and May 2012. Twenty-three women with histologically proven endometriosis and 23 endometriosis-free controls were enrolled in this study.Laparoscopic inspection of the abdominopelvic cavity was performed for each patient, and peripheral blood samples were collected before laparoscopy. Microarray-based microRNA expression profiling was used to identify differentially expressed microRNAs in plasma samples between women with and without endometriosis, and quantification of selected microRNAs was performed using quantitative RT-PCR.Twenty-seven microRNAs were differentially expressed between women with and without endometriosis, of which six microRNAs (miR-15b-5p, miR-17-5p, miR-20a, miR-21, miR-22 and miR-26a) were selected for validation. MiR-17-5p, miR-20a and miR-22 were significantly down-regulated in women with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.011, 0.0020 and 0.0002, respectively), yielding an area under the receiver operator characteristics curve of 0.74 [95% confidence interval (CI): 0.58-0.90], 0.79 (95% CI: 0.65-0.93) and 0.85 (95% CI: 0.71-0.98) in discriminating endometriosis from controls, respectively.Our sample size was small and all cases were rAFS stage III-IV, which may limit generalization of plasma microRNAs for early diagnosis of endometriosis. Moreover, only six microRNAs were selected for validation.Plasma microRNAs provide a promising opportunity for detection of endometriosis.Investigation of diagnostic potentials of nine different biomarkers in endometriosis.To investigate the diagnostic potentials of the serum levels of nine different biomarkers in endometriosis.In this case-controlled, prospective clinical study, 80 women underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy with a preliminary diagnosis of chronic pelvic pain, severe secondary dysmenorrhea, infertility, pelvic endometriosis or pelvic mass. The 60 women with confirmed pelvic endometriosis constituted the endometriosis group, and the other 20 women without endometriosis constituted the control group. Preoperative blood samples were obtained for serum biomarker measurements. Serum levels of nine different serum biomarkers including α-enolase, macrophage migration inhibitory factor, leptin, interleukin-8, anti-endometrial antibody, phosphoinositide dependent protein kinase 1, CA125, syntaxin-5, and laminin-1 were measured concurrently and compared between the control and endometriosis groups, and among control group and endometriosis subgroups including stage I, stage II, stage III and stage IV endometriosis.The serum levels of α-enolase, macrophage migration inhibitory factor, leptin, interleukin-8 and antiendometrial antibodies showed a statistically significant difference neither between control and endometriosis groups nor among control group and endometriosis subgroups. The serum levels of CA125, syntaxin-5 and laminin-1 showed a statistically significant difference both between the control and endometriosis groups (p<0.01) and among control group and endometriosis subgroups (p<0.01). Serum levels of laminin-1 in stage II and IV endometriosis; syntaxin-5 in stage I and II endometriosis; and CA125 in stage III and IV endometriosis were found to have the different levels compared to control group.These findings show that the concurrent measurement of CA125, syntaxin-5 and laminin-1 might be a useful non-invasive test in strengthening the diagnosis of endometriosis and in predicting its severity.Two novel serum biomarkers for endometriosis screened by surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry and their change after laparoscopic removal of endometriosis.To explore novel endometriosis serum biomarkers by surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS).First, we aimed to discover the potential biomarkers of endometriosis by SELDI-TOF-MS. Second, blinded test was performed to characterize the effectiveness of the model by examining the sensitivity and specificity. Third, 29 postoperative patients with endometriosis were recruited to monitor the change of potential biomarkers after laparoscopic surgery.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Fifty-nine patients with endometriosis, 31 patients without endometriosis, and 30 healthy volunteers.Blood serum of endometriosis and control group patients.Protein expression.Two endometriosis-specific proteins were found in the preliminary screening study. Furthermore, the blinded test was performed and showed a sensitivity of 86.67% and a specificity of 96.77% of the markers for detecting endometriosis, which are significantly higher than those of CA-125 for distinguishing patients with endometriosis from patients without endometriosis. After surgery, the levels of these biomarker proteins decreased to levels comparable with those of patients without endometriosis.We discovered the potential biomarkers of endometriosis and set up a diagnostic model with a sensitivity of 86.67% and a specificity of 96.77%, which is significantly higher than that of CA-125 for detecting endometriosis, The levels of these proteins decreased to levels comparable with those of patients without endometriosis.Coordinated but depressed expression of human leukocyte antigen-DR, intercellular adhesion molecule-1, and CD14 on peritoneal macrophages in women with pelvic endometriosis.To investigate the macrophage response in endometriosis, we determined the expression of human leukocyte antigen (HLA)-DR, intercellular adhesion molecule (ICAM)-1, and CD14 on peritoneal macrophages.Case-control study of immunologic markers.University hospital.Forty-five Japanese women with endometriosis were compared with 48 control subjects with other laparoscopic diagnoses.Venipuncture and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid (PF) collection.Expression of HLA-DR, ICAM-1, and CD14 on peripheral blood (PB) monocytes and PF macrophages were quantitated as mean fluorescence intensities by flow cytometry. Expression of each marker on PF macrophages was divided by that on PB monocytes, as an index of macrophage activation (macrophage activation ratio).In women with endometriosis, PF macrophages showed significant positive correlations between expression of HLA-DR and ICAM-1, HLA-DR and CD14, and ICAM-1 and CD14. However, expression of individual markers on PF macrophages and their activation ratios were significantly lower than in control.Coordinated but relatively low expression of HLA-DR, ICAM-1, and CD14 on PF macrophages indicates a positive but limited immune response to events in the peritoneal cavity in women with endometriosis, which may induce immune tolerance to implanted or metaplastic endometrial tissue.Copeptin is associated with the severity of endometriosis.Endometriosis is defined as the presence of endometrial glands and stroma in ectopic locations and may be associated with local and systemic inflammatory processes. Copeptin is elevated in acute and chronic inflammation conditions. The aim of the present study was to determine whether serum copeptin levels were altered in women with endometriosis and played a role in the pathophysiology of the disease.A total of 86 women were recruited for this case-control study. 50 patients with surgically proven endometriosis were included, while 36 patients without endometriosis comprised the control group. Patients were classified as having minimal, mild, moderate and severe disease in accordance with American Society of Reproductive Medicine revised classification. Two subgroups were formed by combining patients with minimal and mild disease and with moderate and severe disease (Stage 1-2, stage 3-4; respectively). Levels of copeptin, tumor markers (CA-125, CA-19-9, CA-15-3) and C-reactive protein in serum were measured.Serum copeptin, CA-125, CA-15-3 and CA-19-9 levels were higher in the endometriosis group (p: 0.002; 0.001; 0.017; 0.015; respectively). Copeptin and CA-19-9 levels were significantly higher in stage 3-4 group as compared to stage 1-2 group (p: 0.004; 0.036 respectively). Serum copeptin levels were positively correlated with stage of the disease and size of endometriomas. ROC analysis revealed that CA-125 had the highest AUC for predicting endometriosis (0.938; 95 % confidence interval 0.882-0.993; p: 0.001).Serum copeptin levels were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis as compared to healthy controls. Moreover, severity of the disease was correlated with serum copeptin levels.Elevated levels of gremlin-1 in eutopic endometrium and peripheral serum in patients with endometriosis.To examine the expression of gremlin-1 (GREM1) on the levels of messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein in eutopic endometrium and its serum level in patients with endometriosis.Prospective, experimental study using reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction, Western blot, immunofluorescence, and ELISA.Gynecological oncology laboratory in a department of obstetrics and gynecology in a medical college in China.Thirty-five patients with endometriosis and 23 healthy control women.During surgery, the eutopic endometria and peripheral serum were obtained from the patients with endometriosis and the control women.The cellular compartment location of GREM1 expression was examined by using immunofluorescent double staining. The expression levels of mRNA and protein for GREM1 were determined by reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction and Western blot, respectively. The serum level of GREM1 was measured by indirect ELISA.The expression of GREM1 was defined within endometrial blood vessel endothelium exclusively, with the concomitant expressions of GREM1 and CD146. The expression of GREM1 on the levels of mRNA and protein was significantly higher in eutopic endometria of patients with endometriosis than in those from healthy control women. According to the ELISA established in our laboratory, the concentration of GREM1 in peripheral serum that was collected during the follicular menstrual phase of patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than that in serum from healthy control women.Gremlin-1 plays a role to some extent in the aberrant angiogenesis of eutopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis. It is possible that the peripheral serum level of GREM1 is a prospective serum biomarker of endometriosis.Evaluation of serum autoantibody levels in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.We analyzed autoantibodies against tumor-associated antigens (TAAs) in the serum of patients with endometrioma and healthy controls to determine whether autoantibodies can be accurate biomarkers for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Serum samples were obtained from 56 patients with endometriosis and 66 healthy women who served as normal controls. The titers of antibodies against a panel of eight TAAs were analyzed using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.We found that the serum IGFII mRNA-binding protein 1 (IMP1) autoantibody and cyclin B1 autoantibody could discriminate between healthy controls and endometriosis patients (AUC-ROC 0.777; 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.694-0.860, P<0.0005, and AUC-ROC 0.614; 95%confidence interval [CI] 0.513-0.714, P=0.031, respectively). Using 0.073 and 0.007 as the cutoff values for IMP1 and Cyclin B1 autoantibody, respectively, the sensitivity and specificity of IMP1 were 85.7 and 63.6%, respectively. When cylcin B1 was combined with IMP1, the specificity increased to 72.7% and the sensitivity slightly decreased to 83.9%.Our data suggest that IMP1 alone or combined with cyclin B1 seems to fulfill the requirements of sensitivity and specificity to become a useful clinical biomarker of endometrioma. However, further studies will be required to establish the predictive value and to support the clinical use of IMP1/cyclin B1 in the diagnosis and/or screening of endometriosis.[Correlation between serum Ca-125 levels and surgical findings in women with symptoms evocative of endometriosis].To correlate preoperative serum cancer antigen 125 (Ca-125) levels and laparoscopic findings in women with pelvic pain symptoms suggestive of endometriosis.A retrospective study was conducted including all women with pelvic pain symptoms suspected for endometriosis operated by laparoscopy from January 2010 to March 2013. Patients were divided into 2 groups according to preoperative Ca-125 level (<35 U/mL and ≥ 35 U/mL). Subsequently, patients with ovarian endometriomas were excluded and a further analysis was conducted again according to the preoperative Ca-125 level. The following parameters were compared between groups: presence of ovarian endometrioma, presence and number of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) lesions and American Society for Reproductive Medicine score. The statistical analysis was performed with Statistica version 8.0, using the Fisher exact test, Student's t-test and Mann-Whitney test, when needed. A p value of <0.05 was considered to be statistically significant.During the study period, a total of 350 women were submitted to laparoscopic treatment of endometriosis. One hundred thirty patients (37.1%) had Ca-125 ≥ 35 U/mL and 220 (62.9%) had Ca-12<35 U/mL. The presence of ovarian endometriomas (47.7 versus 15.9%), DIE lesions (99.6 versus 78.6%) and intestinal DIE lesions (60 versus 30.9%) was more frequent, and the AFSr score was higher (34 versus 6) in the former group. In the second analysis, excluding the patients with ovarian endometriomas (≥ 35 U/mL=68 patients and <35 U/mL=185 patients), similar results were obtained. The presence of DIE lesions (91.2 versus 76.2%), intestinal DIE lesions (63.2 versus 25.4%), bladder DIE lesions (20.6 versus 4.8%) and ureteral DIE lesions (7.3 versus 1.6%) was more frequent, and the AFSr score was higher (10 versus 6) in the Ca-125 ≥ 35 U/mL group.Investigation for DIE is mandatory in women with pelvic pain symptoms suggestive of endometriosis with a preoperative Ca-125 level ≥ 35 U/mL, especially when an ovarian endometrioma is not present.Ovarian endometrioma but not deep infiltrating endometriosis is associated with increased serum levels of interleukin-8 and interleukin-6.Cytokines, and specifically interleukin 6 (IL-6) and interleukin 8 (IL-8), have been associated with the pathogenesis of endometriosis. We studied serum concentrations of IL-6 and IL-8 in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) or ovarian endometriomas (OE), but no other forms of associated endometriosis disease type. We carried out a case-control study including 19 patients with OE alone (OE group), 14 patients with DIE alone (DIE group) and 24 healthy patients without endometriosis (C group). Serum concentrations of IL-6 and IL-8 were measured in the three groups of patients. Serum levels of both IL-6 and IL-8 were significantly higher in the OE group. A high positive correlation was found between serum IL-6 and IL-8 levels in the OE group but not in the DIE and C groups. Serum IL-8 alone achieved the highest predictive value of the presence of OE (adjusted OR: 1.44; sensitivity: 78.2%; specificity: 76.2%). The combination of IL-6 and IL-8 levels did not significantly improve the discrimination between subjects with OE and those with DIE over that of IL-8. OE but not DIE are associated with increased serum levels of IL-6 and IL-8, and thus these may become useful tools for discriminating OE alone from DIE.Relevance of CA-125 in the evaluation of endometriosis.To evaluate the clinical utility of CA-125 in the diagnosis of endometriosis and to compare the sensitivity of the serum and the peritoneal test as indicators of disease, the quantitative determination of the antigen in serum and in peritoneal fluid was performed by the IRMA-mat "two-step method", a two-site immunoradiometric assay. A total of 28 women undergoing diagnostic or operative laparoscopy with endometriosis stage I-II (10 patients), endometriosis stage III-IV (8 patients) or other benign gynecological diseases (10 patients) were studied. The results were compared with a sample of 12 women with a normal pelvis (control group). CA-125 levels in the peritoneal fluid were higher than those found in the serum and were significantly elevated (p < 0.001) when compared with the control group, both in women with endometriosis stage I-II and stage III-IV. In the serum CA-125 levels increased only in advanced stages of endometriosis. Levels of CA-125 in peritoneal fluid seemed to be a more sensitive indicator of disease than the serum test (0.88 vs 0.44), especially in early stage endometriosis (0.80 vs 0.20) which tends to be overlooked by the CA-125 serum test.Identification of molecular markers for endometriosis in blood lymphocytes by using deoxyribonucleic acid microarrays.To identify molecular biomarkers for endometriosis in peripheral blood lymphocytes by using DNA microarrays.Case-control.Multicenter academic research programs.Premenopausal women with or without endometriosis, determined by obstetrics and gynecology specialists during surgery. Microarray analysis included six endometriosis patients and five controls; 15 endometriosis patients and 15 controls were analyzed by using real-time reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). Patients with all disease stages were included.Peripheral blood samples were collected by venipuncture.The expression levels of mRNAs in blood lymphocytes from endometriosis patients and controls were compared with those of a standard total RNA. Gene expression data were validated by real-time RT-PCR analysis.A gene selection program identified genes that were differentially expressed in samples from endometriosis patients. To validate the gene expression data, the nine most discriminatory genes were analyzed by real-time RT-PCR. Two of the nine genes identified, IL2RG and LOXL1, were shown to be significantly differentially expressed.This is the first report of genes that are differentially expressed in peripheral blood lymphocytes of patients with endometriosis, which may provide important clues regarding the pathogenesis of this disease. Moreover, they could be considered potential targets for noninvasive diagnostic assays for endometriosis and need to be validated in a larger population.Th1 and Th2 ummune responses related to pelvic endometriosis.This study analyzed the relationship between clinical characteristics of endometriosis and Th1/Th2 immune response patterns.A prospective study was performed with 65 patients with endometriosis (Group A) and 33 without the disease (Group B). Measurement of IL 2, 4 and 10, TNF-alpha and IFN-gamma was carried out in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid.Serum TNF-alpha was higher in patients with endometriosis who had deep dyspareunia compared to controls (mean 4.5 pg/ml and 2.3 pg/ml, p<0.05). Among these patients (n=32), 65.5% had deep endometriosis. Patients with endometriosis and infertility had higher IL-2 concentrations in peritoneal fluid than controls (mean 5.9 pg/ml and 0.2 pg/ml, p<0.05). Among these patients (n=22), 63.5% (n=14) had deep endometriosis. A higher concentration of IL-10 was also observed in patients with ovarian endometriosis when compared to those without this type of disease, as well as when compared to control group patients (mean 50 pg/ml, 18.7 pg/ml and 25.7 pg/ml, p<0.05).These results suggest that when specific clinical data are associated with a higher production of certain cytokines, there is a Th1 response pattern that may be related to deep infiltrating endometriosis.Proteomic analysis of serum yields six candidate proteins that are differentially regulated in a subset of women with endometriosis.To identify potential novel biomarkers that differ between subjects with and without endometriosis and that might aid in developing a noninvasive, serum-based diagnostic test.Case-control evaluation of a diagnostic test.University medical center.Consenting women of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy for indications of pain, infertility, elective tubal ligation, tubal reanastomosis, or other benign indication.Diagnostic laparoscopy and peripheral venipuncture.Concentrations of low-molecular-weight proteins in serum; surgical staging of endometriosis.Six proteins were found that were differentially expressed between those with and without disease and that had good diagnostic properties. Taken together in a two-step diagnostic algorithm, we were able to diagnose 55% of subjects, with 99% accuracy as to the status of disease. Further combining this algorithm with that derived by our previous study of serum putative markers (monocyte chemoattractant protein-1, migration inhibitory factor, leptin, and CA-125) improved our diagnostic capability to 73% of subjects, with 94% overall accuracy.This study is the critical first step in the identification of potential novel biomarkers of endometriosis. Future identification of the proteins and further validation in a second population is needed before applying these findings in clinical practice.[Usefulness of measurement of serum CA125 levels in diagnosing and treating endometriosis].We investigated the usefulness of the measurement of serum CA125 levels for the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis. An additional study concentrated on the production of CA125. 1. Elevated levels of serum CA125 were noted in 52 of 66 patients with endometriosis in which the positive rate was 78.8% and mean was 119.8 U/ml. The mean value and positive rate of serum CA125 levels in patients with adenomyosis were higher than those in pelvic endometriosis. 2. The correlation between preoperative serum CA125 levels and the extracted tissue weight was statistically significant. The tissue concentration of CA125 of adenomyosis was 1,479.3 +/- 1,087.1 U/g and that of pelvic endometriosis was 309.7 +/- 23.1 U/g wet weight. 3. The serum CA125 levels in patients with adenomyosis fell postoperatively, and all were below 35 U/ml within two weeks. The serum CA125 levels were below 35 U/ml in 13 out of 15 patients (86.7%) with pelvic endometriosis treated with danazol and the change in the serum CA125 levels was closely related to the clinical course. 4. Clinicopathological states with a high level of serum CA125 were observed in patients with normal and ectopic pregnancy, puerperium, ovarian hyperstimulation syndrome (OHSS) and peritonitis. It was concluded that the measurement of serum CA125 levels was useful in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis, and CA125 might be produced and/or secreted not only from the endometrium but also from the peritoneum.Vitamin D binding protein in endometriosis.Two-dimensional gel electrophoresis is a powerful method for identifying post-translationally modified molecules in biological fluids. We examined the presence and expression of vitamin D binding protein (DBP) in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and plasma (PL) of women with endometriosis.PL and PF samples were obtained from 36 women with untreated mild endometriosis (revised classification of the American Fertility Society [rAFS] stage I-II), 52 women with untreated severe endometriosis (rAFS stage III-IV), 17 women with endometriosis treated with the oral contraceptive (OC), and 40 controls (infertility, n = 23; tubal sterilization, n = 12; pelvic pain, n = 5). PF and PL samples were analyzed by quantitative, high-resolution 2-dimensional gel electrophoresis.The expression of one DBP isoform (DBPE) in the PF of patients with untreated endometriosis was significantly lower than in the control group (P <.05). The levels of PF DBPE in patients with endometriosis using OC were significantly higher than in women with untreated endometriosis (P <.05). No significant difference was observed in PL DBPE expression between women with and without endometriosis, while it was significantly increased in patients with endometriosis using OC (P <.05). DBP expression was not correlated with the stage of endometriosis (rAFS classification) or the phase of the menstrual cycle.The decreased level of DBPE in the PF but not in PL of women with untreated endometriosis suggests that this molecule may be relevant in the pathogenesis of this disease.Serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels in patients with endometriosis.To evaluate CA-125 in peritoneal fluid (PF) as an indicator of endometriosis.CA-125 levels in paired serum and PF were determined by the one-step immunoradiometric assay. For peritoneal samples, high dilution of the sample (1:100) was used to avoid false low results, caused by the "hook effect" phenomenon.Forty-one women with and without endometriosis, undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy during the follicular phase of the menstrual cycle, were selected.2nd Institute of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Rome "La Sapienza," Rome, Italy.Peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels obtained using diluted samples were significantly higher than those found using undiluted ones.CA-125 levels in PF were approximately 100 times higher than those found in paired serum, ranging from 970 to 10,636 U/mL. In patients with endometriosis, CA-125 levels in PF were significantly elevated when compared with the control group. In serum, CA-125 levels increased only in advanced stages of endometriosis.The sensitivity of the CA-125 test for endometriosis in PF is greater than in serum. Therefore, the measurement of CA-125 levels in PF could be useful in the detection of early stage endometriosis, which tends to be overlooked by the CA-125 serum test.Evaluation of a panel of 28 biomarkers for the non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.At present, the only way to conclusively diagnose endometriosis is laparoscopic inspection, preferably with histological confirmation. This contributes to the delay in the diagnosis of endometriosis which is 6-11 years. So far non-invasive diagnostic approaches such as ultrasound (US), MRI or blood tests do not have sufficient diagnostic power. Our aim was to develop and validate a non-invasive diagnostic test with a high sensitivity (80% or more) for symptomatic endometriosis patients, without US evidence of endometriosis, since this is the group most in need of a non-invasive test.A total of 28 inflammatory and non-inflammatory plasma biomarkers were measured in 353 EDTA plasma samples collected at surgery from 121 controls without endometriosis at laparoscopy and from 232 women with endometriosis (minimal-mild n = 148; moderate-severe n = 84), including 175 women without preoperative US evidence of endometriosis. Surgery was done during menstrual (n = 83), follicular (n = 135) and luteal (n = 135) phases of the menstrual cycle. For analysis, the data were randomly divided into an independent training (n = 235) and a test (n = 118) data set. Statistical analysis was done using univariate and multivariate (logistic regression and least squares support vector machines (LS-SVM) approaches in training- and test data set separately to validate our findings.In the training set, two models of four biomarkers (Model 1: annexin V, VEGF, CA-125 and glycodelin; Model 2: annexin V, VEGF, CA-125 and sICAM-1) analysed in plasma, obtained during the menstrual phase, could predict US-negative endometriosis with a high sensitivity (81-90%) and an acceptable specificity (68-81%). The same two models predicted US-negative endometriosis in the independent validation test set with a high sensitivity (82%) and an acceptable specificity (63-75%).In plasma samples obtained during menstruation, multivariate analysis of four biomarkers (annexin V, VEGF, CA-125 and sICAM-1/or glycodelin) enabled the diagnosis of endometriosis undetectable by US with a sensitivity of 81-90% and a specificity of 63-81% in independent training- and test data set. The next step is to apply these models for preoperative prediction of endometriosis in an independent set of patients with infertility and/or pain without US evidence of endometriosis, scheduled for laparoscopy.Evaluation of selected angiogenic and inflammatory markers in endometriosis before and after danazol treatment.Angiogenesis and inflammation are pivotal processes in developing endometriosis in the peritoneal cavity. The aim of the present study was to evaluate these two processes in women with endometriosis who had been treated with danazol to determine the sensitivity of a non-invasive test in diagnosing endometriosis. The clinical follow-up study was conducted in a group of 103 women diagnosed laparoscopically with endometriosis. Thirty-five patients qualified for danazol treatment. Pain was assessed using a visual analogue scale, whereas endometriosis was assessed using the revised American Society of Reproductive Medicine (rASRM) scale. Cancer antigen (CA)-125 and C-reactive protein (CRP) concentrations in plasma and peritoneal fluid were determined by immunoenzymatic methods, whereas vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and interleukin (IL)-1β concentrations in plasma and peritoneal fluid were determined by ELISA. Endometrial expression of IL-8 and platelet-derived growth factor alpha polypeptide (PDGF-A) was determined using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Women with endometriosis (68.9% of patients) had higher plasma concentrations of CA-125, as well as higher concentrations of both CA-125 and VEGF in the peritoneal fluid. Endometrial expression of IL-8 mRNA was significantly higher, whereas that of PDGF-A was significantly lower, in contrast. After danazol treatment the patients reported lower pain scores; in addition, CA-125 concentrations in the plasma were decreased (P<0.001), whereas VEGF concentration in the plasma increased (P=0.009). For the diagnosis of endometriosis, none of the combinations of given markers had a sensitivity >60%. Danazol treatment is highly effective in relieving pain and decreasing CA-125 concentrations in the plasma. Higher plasma concentrations of VEGF after treatment could imply stimulation of angiogenesis. The diagnostic accuracy of two human epididymis protein 4 (HE4) testing systems in combination with CA125 in the differential diagnosis of ovarian masses.Cancer antigen 125 (CA125) is the best known single tumor marker for ovarian cancer (OC). We investigated whether the additional information of the human epididymis protein 4 (HE4) improves diagnostic accuracy.We retrospectively analyzed preoperative sera of 109 healthy women, 285 patients with benign ovarian masses (cystadenoma: n=78, leimyoma: n=66, endometriosis: n=52, functional ovarian cysts: n=79, other: n=10), 16 low malignant potential (LMP) ovarian tumors and 125 OC (stage I: 22, II: 15, III: 78, IV: 10). CA125 was analyzed using the ARCHITECT system, HE4 using the ARCHITECT(a) system and EIA(e) technology additionally.The lowest concentrations of CA125 and HE4 were observed in healthy individuals, followed by patients with benign adnexal masses and patients with LMP tumors and OC. The area under the curve (AUC) for the differential diagnosis of adnexal masses of CA125 alone was not significantly different to HE4 alone in premenopausal (CA125: 86.7, HE4(a): 82.6, HE4(e): 81.6% p>0.05) but significantly different in postmenopausal [CA125: 93.4 vs. HE4(a): 88.3 p=0.023 and vs. HE4(e): 87.8% p=0.012] patients. For stage I OC, HE4 as a single marker was superior to CA125, which was the best single marker in stage II-IV. The combination of CA125 and HE4 using risk of malignancy algorithm (ROMA) gained the highest sensitivity at 95% specificity for the differential diagnosis of adnexal masses [CA125: 70.9, HE4(a): 67.4, HE4(e): 66.0, ROMA(a): 76.6 and ROMA(e): 74.5%], especially in stage I OC [CA125: 27.3, HE4(a): 40.9, HE4(e): 40.9, ROMA(a): 45.5 and ROMA(e): 45.5%].CA125 is still the best single marker in the diagnosis of OC. HE4 alone and even more the combined analysis of CA125 and HE4 using ROMA improve the diagnostic accuracy of adnexal masses, especially in early OC.T regulatory lymphocytes in patients with endometriosis.The present study aimed to investigate the presence of T regulatory cells (Tregs) in the peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) in females with endometriosis. The present study included 42 patients who underwent laparoscopy between 2010 and 2011. Flow cytometry was used to determine the percentage of Tregs in the PF and PB of the patients. No significant difference was observed in the percentage of Tregs in the patients in the endometriosis group compared with those in the control group in the PF (9.1±5.4 vs. 9.1±3.8%) or the PB (6.5±3.2 vs. 6.5±3.7%). However, the percentage of Tregs was found to be higher in the PF compared with the PB in the patients in the endometriosis and control groups, but significance was found only in those in the control group. Furthermore, no significant difference was observed in the Treg concentration in the patients with early stage (I/II) endometriosis compared with those with late stage (III/IV) endometriosis. Moreover, no significant correlation was found between the percentage of Tregs and the white blood cell count, lymphocyte count or CA125 concentration in the patients. These findings suggest that the local host‑defense mechanism is deficient in patients with endometriosis, thus endometriosis should not be treated as an autoimmune condition. Increased monocyte chemotactic protein-1 level and activity in the peripheral blood of women with endometriosis. Le Groupe d'Investigation en Gynécologie.Our purpose was to evaluate monocyte chemotactic protein-1 in the peripheral blood of women with and without endometriosis.Fifty-seven patients with endometriosis at laparoscopy done for infertility and pelvic pain were compared with 44 fertile women with no evidence of endometriosis at tubal ligation by laparoscopy. Monocyte chemotactic protein-1 concentration in the plasma was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and its biologic activity was evaluated by measuring monocyte chemotaxis with use of a human histiocytic cell line (U937).Monocyte chemotactic protein-1 concentrations (median and range of values) found in the plasma were higher in patients with endometriosis (163, 0 to 788 pg/ml) than in normal controls (0, 0 to 355 pg/ml). This elevation was significant only in the minimal stage of endometriosis (revised American Fertility Society stage I). However, increased chemotactic activity (mean number of migrating cells/mm2 +/- SEM) was found in the stages I (1240 +/- 141), II (519 +/- 30), and III-IV (523 +/- 23) of the disease compared with normal controls (205 +/- 20). A total of 35% to 44% of this activity was inhibited in the presence of an antibody specific to monocyte chemotactic protein-1.Endometriosis is associated with increased level and activity of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 in the peripheral blood. The elevation and activation of this cytokine could play a relevant role in the immunoinflammatory process associated with the disease.[TNF-alpha serum levels in women with endometriosis: prospective clinical study].To determine serum levels of TNF-alpha (tumor necrosis factor alpha) as a prediction of endometriosis.Prospective clinical case control study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology and Department of Pathology, Jessenius Faculty Hospital, Kollarova 2, Martin, Slovakia.The serum TNF-alpha was determined in women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy due to pelvic pain, infertility, dysmenorea or pelvic tumor. Endometriosis was confirmed histologically and classified by rAFS.On the basis of entering criteria 65 women were enrolled in this study. In 61 cases serum level of TNF-alpha was evaluated. The average serum level of TNF-alpha in the endometriotic group was 73.847 pg/ml (n=30) and without endometriosis was 21.089 pg/ml (n=31). We have found a significant statistical difference between the above mentioned groups in the medium levels of TNF-alpha (p<0.0001). We did not find statistical significance between TNF-alpha levels and in the group of women with endometriosis in relation to the stage of the disease (I.-II., III.-IV., adenomyosis). At a cut-off level of TNF-alpha 30 pg/ml there was a 63.33% sensitivity, 77.42% specificity, a positive prediction value 73.07%, and 68.57% of negative predictive value.TNF-alpha serum levels are good diagnostic markers of endometriosis in the spectrum of noninvasive methods.Measurement of serum and peritoneal levels of amyloid protein A and their importance in the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.To evaluate serum and peritoneal concentrations of amyloid protein A in women with endometriosis and to compare them with those of women without endometriosis.A prospective study evaluated 76 women suspected of having pelvic endometriosis. Fifty-seven women (group A) were confirmed by videolaparoscopy and had their serum and peritoneal amyloid A concentrations measured by ELISA. The average levels from group A were compared to those obtained in group B. Group B was composed of 13 women without endometriosis, submitted to elective laparoscopy for tubal ligation.Peritoneal amyloid A concentrations in group A (310.3 +/- 97.8 ng/mL) were higher than those of group B (53.4 +/- 58.2 ng/mL); p = 0.0. However, serum concentrations in groups A (14.01 +/- 32.3 ng/mL) and B (9.5 +/- 15.9 ng/mL) did not differ significantly; p = 0.35.The peritoneal amyloid A protein concentration in pelvic endometriosis was higher when compared to normal controls, corroborating the inflammatory nature of the disease. This finding suggests that the procedure of evaluating the peritoneal amyloid A concentration in endometriosis merits further investigation.[The concentration of exfoliative adhesion molecules (ICAM-1 and E-Selectin) in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis].It is commonly known that retrograde transport of exfoliative fragments of endometrium to peritoneal cavity during the menstruation is an important factor of the ethiopathogenesis of endometriosis. The mechanism of inplantation of endometrial cells to peritoneal sites still remains unclear. Adhesions molecules are suggested to take part in this process. In our study we tried to establish the concentration of the adhesion molecules (ICAM-1 and E-Selectin) in the sera and peritoneal fluids of women with endometriosis in comparison to the control group. These concentrations were significantly higher in the sera of all patients. We did not find any significant differences between two examined groups although further studies should be carried out.Increase in serum leptin concentrations among women with endometriosis during danazol and leuprolide depot treatments.This study was undertaken to evaluate serum leptin concentrations in women with endometriosis during treatment with danazol and with leuprolide depot.Twenty patients aged 18 to 42 years with regular menses and documented pelvic endometriosis were recruited from a university hospital setting. Treatment was 200 mg danazol 3 times daily for 6 months or 3.75 mg leuprolide depot every 28 days for 6 months. Serum leptin concentrations were measured before, during, and after treatment. A single blood sample was taken from each of 10 control women without endometriosis for comparison. Serum leptin level was measured with a radioimmunoassay kit with human leptin, and analysis of variance and paired t tests were used for statistical analysis.Serum leptin levels were almost the same among women with endometriosis as in the control group. Leptin levels were higher among women with endometriosis during treatment with danazol and leuprolide(P <.001). Three months after treatment, leptin values remained moderately higher than before treatment.Danazol and leuprolide increased serum leptin levels. The mechanism of leptin increase is unclear. Further studies are needed to determine whether an adipogonadal axis exists.[Evaluation of the generation of interleukin-10 by peripheral blood lymphocytes in women with endometriosis].The aim of study was the evaluation of generating the IL-10 by peripheral blood lymphocytes in women with endometriosis according to the stage of of the disease. Cytokine was estimated by immunoenzymatic method Elisa. The generation of IL-10 by peripheral blood lymphocytes was lower in patients with all stages of endometriosis than in control group. Decreased IL-10 generating observed in our study was not statistically significant, but it may correlate with disorders of immunological cell response. It may also play a role in a development and progression of endometriosis.Proteomics analysis of plasma for early diagnosis of endometriosis.To test the hypothesis that differential surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry protein or peptide expression in plasma can be used in infertile women with or without pelvic pain to predict the presence of laparoscopically and histologically confirmed endometriosis, especially in the subpopulation with a normal preoperative gynecologic ultrasound examination.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry analysis was performed on 254 plasma samples obtained from 89 women without endometriosis and 165 women with endometriosis (histologically confirmed) undergoing laparoscopies for infertility with or without pelvic pain. Data were analyzed using least squares support vector machines and were divided randomly (100 times) into a training data set (70%) and a test data set (30%).Minimal-to-mild endometriosis was best predicted (sensitivity 75%, 95% confidence interval [CI] 63-89; specificity 86%, 95% CI 71-94; positive predictive value 83.6%, negative predictive value 78.3%) using a model based on five peptide and protein peaks (range 4.898-14.698 m/z) in menstrual phase samples. Moderate-to-severe endometriosis was best predicted (sensitivity 98%, 95% CI 84-100; specificity 81%, 95% CI 67-92; positive predictive value 74.4%, negative predictive value 98.6%) using a model based on five other peptide and protein peaks (range 2.189-7.457 m/z) in luteal phase samples. The peak with the highest intensity (2.189 m/z) was identified as a fibrinogen β-chain peptide. Ultrasonography-negative endometriosis was best predicted (sensitivity 88%, 95% CI 73-100; specificity 84%, 95% CI 71-96) using a model based on five peptide peaks (range 2.058-42.065 m/z) in menstrual phase samples.A noninvasive test using proteomic analysis of plasma samples obtained during the menstrual phase enabled the diagnosis of endometriosis undetectable by ultrasonography with high sensitivity and specificity.II.Diagnosis of deep endometriosis by clinical examination during menstruation and plasma CA-125 concentration.To evaluate a clinical examination during menstruation and plasma CA-125 concentrations to diagnose deep endometriosis.Prospective study in 61 women scheduled for a laparoscopy, a retrospective study in 140 women with deep endometriosis, and a clinical validation study in 16 women with painful pelvic nodularities during menstruation.University Hospital Gasthuisberg, a tertiary referral center.In the retrospective study, deep endometriosis was detected by routine clinical examination in only 36% of women. Lesions infiltrating deeper than 15 mm were detected in 50%. In the prospective study pelvic nodularities were detected by routine clinical examination in 4 women but were detected in 22 by clinical examination during menstruation. The latter was highly reliable to diagnose deep endometriosis, cystic ovarian endometriosis, and cul-de-sac obliteration. CA-125 concentrations were higher during menstruation and correlated with deep endometriosis and with deep and cystic ovarian endometriosis. Nodularities at clinical examination or follicular phase CA-125 concentrations > 35 U/mL are useful to decide that a bowel preparation should be given, achieving a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 83%. In the clinical validation study, deep endometriosis was found in 14 of 16 women.Clinical examination during menstruation can diagnose reliably deep endometriosis, cystic ovarian endometriosis, or cul-de-sac adhesions. This test, preferentially combined with a follicular phase CA-125 assay, should be used to decide whether a preparation for bowel surgery should be given.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor as a potential biomarker of endometriosis.To evaluate the expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 in normal, ectopic, and eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle and to assess MIF level in peripheral blood.The expressions of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 in normal, ectopic, and eutopic endometrium were evaluated with the use of real-time polymerase chain reaction. MIF protein in peripheral blood samples was checked with the use of ELISA.Reproductive biomedicine research center.Sixteen normal women and 20 women with endometriosis.Ectopic biopsies were obtained with the use of laparoscopic procedure, and eutopic and control biopsies were obtained with the use of Pipelle. Peripheral blood samples were collected before laparoscopy.The expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 in normal, ectopic and eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle and the expression level of MIF in peripheral blood samples.Relative mRNA expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 were significantly higher in ectopic endometrium than in eutopic and control endometrium. Also, there were significant differences in expression of these genes in normal, ectopic, and eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle. Moreover, women with endometriosis had significantly higher circulating levels of MIF compared with control subjects.Dynamic expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 during the menstrual cycle could play an essential role in reproduction, inflammation, and endometrium reconstruction. A higher expression of these genes in ectopic endometrium can be considered as a molecular biomarker for endometriosis development and pathophysiology. Also, a high level of MIF in blood serum can act as a biomarker in the diagnosis of endometriosis.[The use of biochemical markers in diagnosis of endometriosis].The aim of this study was to evaluate Ca 125 II, C-reactive protein (CRP) and serum amyloid A (SAA) and anticardiolipin antibody (aCL) concentrations for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis. The study population consisted of 15 women without endometriosis, as confirmed by laparoscopy (group A), and 35 patients with pelvic endometriosis. All of them were diagnosed by laparoscopy or laparotomy. Group B patients were divided into those at stages I and II of the disease (B I/II) and those at stages III and IV (B III/IV). Blood samples were obtained twice during the menstrual cycle: on day 1-3 of the cycle and on day 8-10 of the cycle. Our results claim that the measurement of these molecules may therefore provide a valuable tool in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.The role of placental protein 14 in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Placental protein 14 (PP-14) is the principal secretory phase product of endometrium and has been shown to inhibit cell immune function. But its role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis is controversy. The objective of this study is to determine the concentrations of PP-14 in peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum and PP-14 protein expression in endometriotic lesions in women with ovarian endometriosis (n = 75) when compared to women without endometriosis (n = 49) between day 7 and day 20 of their menstrual cycle. Concentrations of PP-14 in PF and serum as well as PP-14 protein expression in endometriotic lesions in women with and without endometriosis were evaluated by using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and immunohistochemical staining, respectively. Serum PP-14 concentrations were significantly increased in women with endometriosis (7.5 ± 1.4 ng/mL) compared to those in women without endometriosis (5.8 ± 0.9 ng/mL; P < .05) and statistically decreased after surgery and further reduced by using gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist therapy (P < .05). However, the concentrations of PP-14 in PF did not reach a significant difference between women with and without endometriosis (P > .05). In women with endometriosis, scores of PP-14 protein expression in the lesions (n = 50, 2.2 [0~5.8]) were significantly correlated with serum PP-14 concentrations (n = 50, 7.6 ± 1.3 ng/mL; P < .01). Our results suggest that PP-14 may play an important role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Inflammatory markers in endometriosis: reduced peritoneal neutrophil response in minimal endometriosis.Inflammation is considered to play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Inflammatory activation in endometriosis was tested based on the hypothesis that pain and endometriosis stage are related to the degree of local and systemic inflammation.Eighteen patients with endometriosis and 14 controls without endometriosis were studied. Cancer antigen 125 and C-reactive protein were analyzed in blood, and in aspirated peritoneal fluid, lactoferrin, myeloperoxidase (neutrophil granulocyte activation marker), sC5b-9 (terminal complement complex), soluble intercellular adhesion molecule 1 (marker for extent of endometriotic tissue), neopterin, and tumor necrosis factor alpha (monocyte/macrophage activation) were evaluated and related to pain, endometriosis stage, and clinical data.None of the measured markers were different between control and endometriosis patients, or in women with or without menstrual pain, dyspareunia, or other types of pelvic pain. Lactoferrin and myeloperoxidase concentrations were significantly lower in patients with endometriosis stage I compared to control patients and endometriosis patients with stage III/IV disease. As expected, cancer antigen 125 concentrations were increased in endometriosis patients of stage III/IV.Neutrophil granulocytes in endometriosis patients may have a lowered ability to respond to weak activation signals, while in more extensive endometriosis stronger neutrophil activation may be related to a proinflammatory effect of endometriotic tissue.[Clinical significance of CA19-9 for endometriosis].We investigated the usefulness of measuring the serum CA19-9 concentration in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis, and compared it with the serum CA125 concentration. We added an immunohistochemical study on CA19-9 and CA125 to find their localization in the various lesions of endometriosis. 1. The positive rate of serum CA19-9 in patients with endometriosis is 52.0% and that of CA125 is 48.0%. When both markers are examined, their positive rate increases to 71.4%. 2. As the Beecham classification stage advanced, the serum CA19-9 positive rate tended to increase. 3. The patients with endometriosis were followed up after surgery or during Danazol therapy. CA19-9 correlated closely with the clinical course. 4. The immunohistochemistry of CA19-9 shows that it localizes in chocolate cysts, but not in the lesions of adenomyosis. CA125 is seen in both lesions. The localizing of CA19-9 is thus seen to be different from that of CA125. It is concluded that the measurement of the serum CA19-9 concentration combined with that of CA125 is useful in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis.Serum markers of oxidative stress and endometriosis.To assess the changes secondary to chronic inflammation in women with and without pelvic endometriosis by the determination of serum thiols and carbonyls.Sixty-seven women with endometriosis consecutively submitted to laparoscopy and 41 women without endometriosis consecutively submitted to tubal ligation (control group) were selected. Serum levels of total thiols and carbonyls were determined in both groups.Patients with endometriosis had significantly lower thiol levels than controls (342.37 +/- 142.09 microM vs 559.60 +/- 294.05 microM) (p < 0.001), as well as significantly lower carbonyl levels (8.97 +/- 3.76 microM vs 16.40 +/- 9.26 microM) (p < 0.001). Other clinical characteristics were not associated with changes in marker levels. The cutoff point established by the ROC curve was 396.44 microM for the thiols, with 73.1% sensitivity and 80.5% specificity, and 14.9 microM for the carbonyls, with 94% sensitivity and 51.2% specificity.The serum thiol levels revealed an increase in oxidative stress related to the development of pelvic endometriosis.Increased circulating MMP-2 levels in infertile patients with moderate and severe pelvic endometriosis.The current study compares the levels of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2 and MMP-9 in the follicular fluid (FF) of infertile patients with and without endometriosis submitted to ovarian stimulation for in vitro fertilization and the levels of MMP-2 in the serum of the same patients. We also evaluated whether the severity of endometriosis can influence serum and/or FF concentration of these metalloproteinases. A cross-sectional study was conducted on 30 patients: stage I/II endometriosis (n = 10), stage III/IV endometriosis (n = 10), and control (infertility due to tubal and/or male factor; n = 10). Blood samples for the analysis of MMP-2 levels were obtained during the early follicular phase of the menstrual cycle. The FF samples for the analysis of MMP-2 and MMP-9 were obtained on the day of oocyte retrieval. The concentrations of MMP-2 and MMP-9 were determined by zymography. No intragroup or intergroup difference was observed in MMP-2 or MMP-9 levels in FF. Significantly higher MMP-2 levels were detected in the serum of infertile women with stage III/IV endometriosis compared to women with stage I/II endometriosis. In conclusion, no differences were observed in the follicular levels of MMP-2 and MMP-9 between infertile patients with and without endometriosis. However, the levels of MMP-2 were significantly higher in the serum of infertile women with advanced stages of endometriosis. Taken together, the present results demonstrate that advanced pelvic endometriosis severity is related to higher serum MMP-2 levels but does not influence follicular MMP-2 or MMP-9 levels in periovulatory follicles obtained from stimulated cycles.Measurable serum markers of oxidative stress response in women with endometriosis.To evaluate the hypothesis of increased systemic oxidative stress in patients with endometriosis.Tertiary care university hospital.Cross-sectional study.Sixty-six women of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy.All women were investigated for endometriotic foci during laparoscopy. Forty-five women had laparoscopically and histologically confirmed endometriosis, and 21 women did not have endometriosis.Four markers of oxidative stress were assessed in the serum of each patient: heat shock protein 70 (HSP70), HSP70b', thioredoxin (TRX), and ischemia-modified albumin (IMA).Mean serum HSP 70b' level was higher in patients with endometriosis compared with controls (0.178 ng/mL, SD 0.103, and 0.135 ng/mL, SD 0.014, respectively). The disease stage did not affect HSP70b' levels. Heat shock protein 70, IMA, and TRX levels did not differ between patients with endometriosis and controls. Women with a history of arterial hypertension had higher mean IMA levels compared with women with normal blood pressure independently of the presence of endometriosis (106.7 [SD 25.4] U/mL and 85.0 [SD 11.5] U/mL, respectively).Endometriosis is associated with increased systemic oxidative stress. The implication of increased systemic oxidative stress in disease progression or the association with other oxidative stress-related pathologic conditions needs to be addressed in further studies.Anti-endometrial and anti-endothelial auto-antibodies in women with endometriosis.The present study investigates the specificity of anti-endometrial antibodies present in serum of women with endometriosis. A two colour indirect immuno-histochemical method was used, so that the antigenic reactivity of endogenous immunoglobulins was blocked and specific anti-endometrial antibodies were readily distinguishable. Serum was collected from women with endometriosis, before and after 6 months of treatment, and from women without the disease. The reactivity of serum with uterine and ectopic endometrium from women with and without the disease was studied. The frequency of anti-endometrial antibodies in the serum of women with endometriosis was higher (P < 0.001) than in control sera. Most antibodies specifically reacted with glands in ectopic and uterine endometrium. Antibody reactivity was strongest with endometrium from control women, compared with uterine and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis (P < 0.01). A proportion of sera containing anti-endometrial antibodies also reacted with vascular endothelium. Binding was strongest to vessels in uterine and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis compared to endometrium from women without the disease (P < 0.01). The presence of anti-endometrial antibodies was associated with infertility.Mild endometriosis and luteal function.The luteal function of 27 patients with mild endometriosis and infertility was compared with that of 50 infertile patients without endometriosis. The incidence of endometrial luteal phase deficiency was similar in both groups of patients. Luteal phase length and plasma levels of progesterone (P), estradiol (E2) and prolactin (PRL) in infertile patients (both groups) were similar to those in a group of 10 fertile women. We conclude that luteal phase defects should not be considered as a primary cause of infertility in mild endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and serum levels of hepatocyte growth factor may predict the activity of endometriosis.The suitable parameter in PF as well as in serum that may predict the activity of endometriosis is not well described. Therefore, we tried to examine the peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum concentrations of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) in different revised American Society of Reproductive Medicine (r-ASRM) staging and morphologic appearances of endometriosis in an attempt to determine whether HGF can be clinically useful to predict the activity of pelvic endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid was collected from 137 women with endometriosis and 57 women without endometriosis during laparoscopy and blood sampling was collected from 37 women with endometriosis and 21 women without endometriosis before laparoscopy. The concentration of HGF in PF and serum was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The ability of isolated macrophages and stroma to secrete HGF in response to lipopolysaccharide (LPS) was evaluated.A significantly increased concentration of HGF in PF was found in women with endometriosis (1451.75 +/- 90.7 pg/mL) than that in non-endometriosis (1120.5 +/- 77.3 pg/mL, p < 0.01) without any remarkable difference in HGF levels between women with stage I-/II endometriosis and stage III-/IV endometriosis. When we distributed serum and PF levels of HGF according to different color appearances of endometriosis, we found a significantly higher serum and PF levels of HGF in women containing dominant red peritoneal lesions in pelvic cavity (740 +/- 109.3 pg/mL for serum; 1685 +/- 183.4 pg/mL for PF) than those having other pigmented lesions (649 +/- 79.5 pg/mL, p < 0.05 for serum; 1224 +/- 67.8 pg/mL, p < 0.05 for PF) or chocolate cysts (485 +/- 43.1 pg/mL, p < 0.05 for serum; 1118 +/- 83.1 pg/mL, p < 0.01 for PF). Exogenous stimulation with LPS significantly increased the production of HGF in the culture media by macrophages and stroma derived from women with endometriosis than that in women without endometriosis.These results suggest that women with early or advanced endometriosis as measured by r-ASRM scoring system are not associated with an increase in either serum or PF concentrations of HGF. Rather HGF levels in serum and PF were significantly increased in women harboring blood-filled red peritoneal lesions and may be clinically useful to predict the activity of pelvic endometriosis.Serum CA 125 levels before, during and after treatment for endometriosis.The aim of this study was to assess the treatment of endometriosis with a gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist in terms of changes to the extent of disease and to CA 125 levels as well as to recurrence during follow-up.The levels of serum CA 125 were evaluated in 66 patients with endometriosis diagnosed and staged by laparoscopy according to the revised American Fertility. Society classification, who received a 6-month course of a GnRH agonist. Serum CA 125 levels were measured before, during (3 and 6 months after the initiation of therapy) and 6 months after cessation of therapy.Patients with minimal and mild endometriosis had significantly higher mean pretreatment values than control subjects in the luteal phase of the cycle or than postmenopausal women (P < 0.05), but the overall mean value was still below 35 U/ml. Levels of CA 125 fell during treatment to those found in normal controls, but rose again after the end of treatment. The sensitivity and specificity of CA 125 were 75% and 83.3%, respectively, and its positive predictive value as a marker of recurrence was 46.36%.These data suggest that CA 125 may be a reliable indicator for monitoring the efficacy of GnRH agonist treatment of endometriosis, but its value as a predictor of recurrence is low, probably due to the suppression of all CA 125 sources such as endometrium, ovaries and implants.The roles of thioredoxin and thioredoxin-binding protein-2 in endometriosis.Oxidative stress is considered to be involved in the establishment and development of endometriosis. Thioredoxin (TRX) is an endogenous redox regulator that protects cells against oxidative stress, and TRX-binding protein-2 (TBP-2) is a negative regulator of TRX in the biological function and expression. The aim of this study was to investigate the roles of TRX and TBP-2 in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.A total of 35 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 31 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. Real-time polymerase chain reaction was used to quantify TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels, and immunohistochemistry (IHC) was used to assess TRX and TBP-2 protein localization in the endometrium. Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of TRX and TBP-2 were measured using a specific commercial ELISA.There were no significant differences in TRX mRNA levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and the control groups. However, TBP-2 mRNA levels in the endometrium were lower, and the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was higher in patients with endometriosis than in the control group. In particular, the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was significantly higher during late secretory and menstrual phase in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. IHC studies also showed the decreased TBP-2 immunoreactivity in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. There was no correlation between TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels in patients with endometriosis, whereas TRX mRNA levels were positively correlated with TBP-2 mRNA levels in the control group. There were no significant differences between the two groups in TRX and TBP-2 levels in serum or peritoneal fluid.Aberrant expression of TRX and TBP-2 in the endometrium may be associated with the establishment of endometriosis.Expression of soluble adhesion molecules in sera of women with stage III and IV endometriosis.To determine the effect of stage III and IV endometriosis on serum concentration of soluble intracellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1), vascular cellular adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1), and E-selectin.Sera from women with laparoscopically proven stage III and IV endometriosis were analyzed for the presence of soluble ICAM-1, VCAM-1, and E-selectin using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. Concentrations of these molecules were compared with those of laparoscopically proven disease-free controls.When compared with controls, women with stage III and IV endometriosis had higher serum concentrations of soluble VCAM-1, lower serum concentration of soluble ICAM-1, and no difference in serum concentration of soluble E-selectin.Significant aberrations in levels of circulating adhesion molecules were found in women with stage III and IV endometriosis. These findings might shed light on the pathogenesis of endometriosis and be useful in the development of biochemical markers for disease stage.Circulating cell-free DNA as a potential biomarker for minimal and mild endometriosis.It has recently been reported that high concentrations of circulating cell-free (ccf) nucleic acids in plasma and serum could be used as biomarkers for non-invasive monitoring a wide variety of malignant and benign proliferations and inflammatory conditions. Endometriosis is one of the most common benign gynaecological proliferations with inflammatory activation in premenopausal women. Real-time multiplex polymerase chain reaction was used for synchronized quantification of the glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase gene sequence in nuclear DNA (nDNA) and the ATP synthase-8 gene sequence in mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA). DNA was extracted from 500 microl serum and plasma of 19 cases with endometriosis to measure the total amount of ccf nDNA and ccf mtDNA. The concentration of ccf nDNA in plasma was significantly higher in the endometriosis group than in the control group (P = 0.046). The cut-off value selected by a receiver operating characteristic curve could provide a sensitivity of 70% and a specificity of 87% to discriminate between the minimal or mild cases and normal controls. The finding of significantly increased concentrations of ccf nDNA in plasma of patients with endometriosis suggests that ccf nDNA might be a potential biomarker for developing non-invasive diagnostic test in endometriosis.The expression of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in endometriosis.To investigate the association between concentrations of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1) and interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) with regard to the severity of endometriosis.Cross-sectional study.Infertility unit in a university hospital.Seventy-one infertile patients who underwent laparoscopic evaluation were divided into two groups: 36 patients with endometriosis served as cases, and 35 patients without endometriosis served as control subjects.Peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid (PF) were collected from these patients during laparoscopic examination.Quantitative determination of levels of human ICAM-1 and IFN-gamma was performed with the use of an ELISA. The data were evaluated by Student's t-test, analysis of variance, and regression analysis.Significantly elevated levels of soluble ICAM-1 were found in the sera of patients with endometriosis, especially those with advanced stages of the disease. Decreased IFN-gamma levels, which were negatively correlated with serum levels of soluble ICAM-1, also were noted in the PF of patients with endometriosis.The increased serum levels of ICAM-1 found in patients with endometriosis may indicate the presence of an active disease process. Further, the increased levels of soluble ICAM-1 in peripheral blood were inversely correlated with the concentrations of IFN-gamma in PF. The increased levels of soluble ICAM-1 in plasma may be associated with an immunologic feedback response that blocks further infiltration of immune cells. These findings may be of value in the diagnosis and evaluation of endometriosis.Elevated vascular endothelia growth factor-A in the serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis.There has been emergence of evidence suggesting that specific variants of the vascular endothelia growth factor (VEGF) family, based on their ability to regulate angiogenesis, would be pivotal in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. This study was aimed at determining whether high levels of VEGF-A could be found in the serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) of patients with endometriosis. VEGF-A levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in serum and PF from 46 patients with surgically confirmed endometriosis, and 40 controls with no clinical evidence of the disease or detectable endometriotic lesions at the time of surgical examination. The results showed the mean VEGF-A levels were significantly higher in the serum and PF of patients with endometriosis than in the controls. The VEGF-A levels in the serum and PF of patients with severe endometriosis (stages III-IV) were significantly higher than in those with minimal endometriosis (P<0.001). It was concluded that endometriosis was associated with significant modulation in the levels of circulating VEGF-A.Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay of CA-125 in serum of patients with endometriosis: efficacy in diagnosis.We used an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay to quantify CA-125, a cancer antigen, in serum of patients with endometriosis. Concentrations of CA-125 in 103 patients with untreated endometriosis significantly (P less than 0.005) exceeded those for 31 controls with no evidence of disease: 9.1 (SD 12.3) vs 2.2 (SD 3.2) arb. units/mL. Values for patients with treated endometriosis were lower (2.3, SD 2.6, arb. units/mL, n = 9) than those for patients with untreated endometriosis. The mean concentrations of CA-125 in different stages of untreated endometriosis were 4.8 (SD 4.5), 7.1 (SD 9.9), 9.8 (SD 13.2), and 10.8 (SD 13.0) arb. units/mL for Stages I, II, III, and IV, respectively. The differences between controls and each stage were statistically significant (for all stages: P less than 0.05). We also assayed serum sampled from controls and patients with untreated endometriosis during menstruation (Group A) and during nonmenstruation (Group B). The efficacy of the present assay for concentrations of CA-125 in serum of patients with endometriosis was greater for Group B than for Group A. Evidently, determination of CA-125 in serum by the present assay may assist in such diagnosis.Autoantibodies associated with endometriosis: can their detection predict presence of the disease?To evaluate the usefulness of autoantibody detection as a nonoperative method of diagnosing endometriosis, we tested 221 sera from 215 patients from the infertility, gynecology, and gynecologic oncology services by an indirect immunofluorescence assay using monolayer cultures of an endometrial carcinoma cell line. The assay showed positive cytoplasmic staining, demonstrating a sensitivity of 83% in the patients with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis. The specificity of the assay was 65% for the infertility patients and 76% for the infertility and gynecology patients combined. Several gynecologic cancer patients showed either nuclear or nuclear and cytoplasmic staining, but few showed exclusive cytoplasmic staining. These initial results suggest that detection of antibodies might be useful for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Identifying biomarkers of endometriosis using serum protein fingerprinting and artificial neural networks.To use surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS) protein chip array technology to detect proteomic patterns in the serum of women with endometriosis; build diagnostic models; and evaluate their clinical significance.Serum samples from women with endometriosis and healthy women were studied using SELDI-TOF-MS protein chip technology. For every matched pair, two-thirds of the samples were used to look for different patterns and one-third was used for cross-validation.Five potential biomarkers were found and the diagnostic system distinguished endometriosis from validation samples with a sensitivity of 91.7% and a specificity of 90.0%.This method shows great potential in identifying biomarkers to be used for endometriosis screening.Differential expression of VLA beta 1 (CD29) on monocytes from patients with endometriosis.Previous studies have established that in vitro proliferation of endometrial cells is enhanced by peripheral blood monocytes (PBM) and suppressed by peritoneal macrophages (PM) from patients with endometriosis but only suppressed by PBM and PM obtained from normal subjects. The functional activity of PBM and PM is influenced by the engagement of numerous cell surface receptors with their respective physiological ligands.In this study, PBM and PM from fertile women (Group 1), women with unexplained infertility (Group 2), and women with limited (Group 3) or severe (Group 4) endometriosis were isolated in order to analyze these cells for the expression of CD54, CD58 and HLA-DR (immunoglobulin supergene antigens) CD18 and CD29 (integrins) and CD44 (an addresin). These cell surface antigens are involved in monocyte/macrophage trafficking, activation, signal transduction and/or adhesion.No differences were detected in the percentage of PBM expressing CD18, CD44, CD54, CD58, or HLA-DR among the four groups of subjects. Furthermore, the density of these antigens expressed on PBM was identical in patients and control subjects. In contrast, the percentage of PBM expressing CD29 (also known as VLA beta 1) and the density of CD29 expressed per cell were significantly reduced (P < 0.01) in patients with limited endometriosis compared to controls and patients with severe disease. Interestingly, although the percentage of CD29+ PBM from women with severe endometriosis was not statistically different from the percentage of CD29+ PBM from controls, the density of CD29 expressed per cell was significantly elevated among patients with severe disease. Analysis of PM from the four subject groups revealed no differences in CD29 expression or density. However, the percentage of PM expressing CD18 was significantly decreased in patients with limited (but not severe) endometriosis.Since both CD18 and CD29 play a role in cell trafficking and/or adhesion, alterations in their expression among patients with endometriosis suggest that these integrin beta chains may play a role in the pathogenesis of the disease.Vascular endothelial growth factor concentrations in the serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.To investigate whether there is an association between vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) levels in serum and peritoneal fluid, and the presence of pelvic endometriosis and its clinical symptoms.Blood and peritoneal fluid sample levels of VEGF were measured in 46 women undergoing laparoscopy: 32 with suspected endometriosis and 14 with confirmed endometriosis. Data were analyzed according to phase of the menstrual cycle, symptoms, disease stage, and disease site.There were no significant associations between serum and peritoneal fluid levels of VEGF and the presence of endometriosis, even when controlling for the menstrual phase. However, among the women with confirmed endometriosis, there was a significant increase (P=0.002) in the mean peritoneal VEGF level in those in the late secretory phase compared with those in the proliferative and early secretory phases.Measuring VEGF levels in symptomatic patients is not helpful to differentiate those with endometriosis from those with a different condition. However, in the late secretory and menstrual phases, mean VEGF levels were higher in women with confirmed endometriosis than in those suspected of having the disease.Antigenic differences between the endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid from 12 women with endometriosis, 4 women with uterine leiomyomata and 6 fertile women without endometriosis (controls) and serum from 4 women with adenomyosis were tested with a passive hemagglutination assay for antibodies against endometrium from all the controls, 8 patients with endometriosis and all patients with uterine leiomyomata and from implants from 8 patients with endometriosis. Serum antibody titers in patients with endometriosis or leiomyomata were significantly higher against endometrial or implant antigens from patients with endometriosis and 2 patients with leiomyomata than those against the controls' endometrium. Peritoneal fluid endometrial antibody titers failed to reflect these antigenic differences. Controls and patients with adenomyosis had low titers of endometrial antibodies in their serum or peritoneal fluid. Antigenic differences appear to exist between the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and that of controls.Combination of CCR1 mRNA, MCP1, and CA125 measurements in peripheral blood as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.This study investigated the possible use of CCR1 mRNA measurement in peripheral blood leukocytes in combination with measurements of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) and CA125 protein in serum as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.The expression of CCR1 mRNA in peripheral blood leukocytes was measured by quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction. MCP-1 and CA125 levels in serum were determined by ELISA and ECLIA.The ratio of CCR1/HPRT mRNA in peripheral blood of patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis was significantly elevated compared with women without endometriosis. Additionally, serum levels of MCP-1 and CA125 were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis. This method showed a sensitivity of 92.2%, a specificity of 81.6%, a negative predictive value of 83.3%, a positive predictive value of 92.3%, a likelihood ratio of a positive test result of 5.017, and a likelihood ratio of a negative test result of 0.096 to predict the presence or absence of endometriosis.The results imply the potential use of CCR1 mRNA, MCP-1, and CA125 protein measurements for the diagnosis or exclusion of endometriosis.Measurement of serum and peritoneal fluid LH concentrations as a diagnostic tool for human endometriosis.A rapid, sensitive enzymeimmunoassay for the measurement of LH concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid samples of healthy women and women with endometriosis is reported. The ligand (LH) was captured by a readily available, widely used and well-characterized monoclonal antibody (mAb, 518B7) generated against the beta subunit of bovine LH. This mAb, although specific for LH, shows very little species specificity and detects LH by radioimmunoassay in humans. A polyclonal antiserum raised in rabbits against hCG was conjugated to horseradish peroxidase and was used as the second antibody signal. This anti-hCG antiserum crossreacts with LH. The enzymeimmunoassay uses the standard human LH (hLH) preparations (NIADDK-hLH-I-3, AFP-827OB) and results are based on the relative concentrations of LH in serum and peritoneal fluid. Total assay time was < 3 h. The range of the standard curve was 0.002-0.500 ng LH per well and the lowest concentration of hLH that could be distinguished from zero concentration was 0.15 +/- 0.02 ng ml(-1) serum and 0.058 +/- 0.021 ng ml(-1) peritoneal fluid. Clinical diagnostic parameters for the LH enzymeimmunoassay showed a sensitivity of 85.71%, specificity 92.50%, efficiency 88.54%, positive predictive value 94.11% and negative predictive value 82.22%. The study was retrospective. Serum LH concentrations of women with endometriosis were 13.67 +/- 7.21 ng ml(-1), whereas serum LH concentrations of women in the control group were 4.52 +/- 2.03 ng ml(-1). One-way ANOVA showed significant differences (P < 0.001) between women with endometriosis and control groups. Women in the control group had peritoneal fluid LH values of 5.65 +/- 2.43 ng ml(-1), whereas peritoneal fluid LH values of 64.06 +/- 16.44 ng ml(-1) were obtained in women with endometriosis (P < 0.001). A cycle-dependent pattern of serum and peritoneal fluid LH concentration was observed in women in the control group, which was not observed in the peritoneal fluid of the group with endometriosis. The application of this assay to serum or peritoneal fluid samples provides the attractive possibility that it could be included in the panel of markers used for diagnosis of endometriosis.Plasma microRNAs as novel biomarkers for endometriosis and endometriosis-associated ovarian cancer.Endometriosis, a largely benign, chronic inflammatory disease, is an independent risk factor for endometrioid and clear cell epithelial ovarian tumors. We aimed to identify plasma miRNAs that can be used to differentiate patients with endometriosis and ovarian cancer from healthy individuals.We conducted a two-stage exploratory study to investigate the use of plasma miRNA profiling to differentiate between patients with endometriosis, patients with endometriosis-associated ovarian cancer (EAOC), and healthy individuals. In the first stage, using global profiling of more than 1,000 miRNAs via reverse transcriptase quantitative PCR (RT-qPCR) in a 20-patient initial screening cohort, we identified 23 candidate miRNAs, which are differentially expressed between healthy controls (n = 6), patients with endometriosis (n = 7), and patients with EAOC (n = 7) based on the fold changes. In the second stage, the 23 miRNAs were further tested in an expanded cohort (n = 88) of healthy individuals (n = 20), endometriosis (n = 33), EAOC (n = 14), and serous ovarian cancer cases (SOC; n = 21, included as controls).We identified three distinct miRNA signatures with reliable differential expression between healthy individuals, patients with endometriosis, and patients with EAOC. When profiled against the control SOC category, our results revealed different miRNAs, suggesting that the identified signatures are reflective of disease-specific pathogenic mechanisms. This was further supported by the fact that the majority of miRNAs differentially expressed in human EAOCs were mirrored in a double transgenic mouse EAOC model.Our study reports for the first time that distinct plasma miRNA expression patterns may serve as highly specific and sensitive diagnostic biomarkers to discriminate between healthy, endometriosis, and EAOC cases.Serum soluble E-cadherin level in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the serum sE-cadherin level in patients with endometriosis and the alterations of that level in healthy control during the menstrual cycle.Thirty-two patients with endometriosis and 30 healthy women were tested for serum sE-cadherin levels by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.The serum sE-cadherin levels in healthy control did not vary throughout the menstrual cycle, which were lower than those in patients with endometriosis.E-cadherin might be involved in endometrial shedding during menstruation in endometriosis patients. The serum sE-cadherin assay might be helpful as a serum marker for the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.Usefulness and limits of CA-125 in diagnosis of endometriosis without associated ovarian endometriomas.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic significance of CA-125 for endometriosis without ovarian endometriomas.Preoperative serum CA-125 levels were measured in 775 consecutive women diagnosed by laparoscopy or laparotomy with endometriosis, adenomyosis, leiomyomas, or normal pelvis.Receiver operating characteristic curve analysis revealed that the area under the curve for endometriosis without endometriomas was 0.788, significantly smaller than that for endometriosis with endometriomas (0.935, P < 0.05). In diagnosis of endometriosis without endometriomas, both the maximal accuracy of 78.8% and the maximal diagnostic value of 61.2% were obtained at the cutoff value of 20 U/mL. Negative predictive value was 78.0% at the cutoff value of 20 U/mL, whereas positive predictive value was 92.9% at the cutoff value of 30 U/mL. This range is clearly superior to the empirical single cutoff of 35 U/mL.In the diagnosis of endometriosis without endometriomas, combined use of two cutoff values for CA-125, 20 and 30 U/mL, provides improved diagnostic performance. However, the accuracy of using only CA-125 testing for diagnosis is still limited. Serum CA-125 testing can be done during initial screenings of women with possible endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels in endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels were assayed in 20 women with endometriosis and 20 control women at the time of laparoscopy. Serum levels of CA-125 were significantly higher in women with endometriosis. Peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels were significantly higher than serum levels but showed no significant difference between control and endometriosis patients. Peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 did not follow expected dilution curves when attempts were made to validate the assay. Serum CA-125 levels were a more sensitive indicator of endometriosis, than peritoneal lavage fluid CA-125 levels.Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of IGF I and II and insulinlike growth binding protein-3 in endometriosis.To examine whether insulinlike growth factor I (IGF I), IGF II and IGF binding protein 3 (IGFBP 3) in serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) correlate with the presence and severity of endometriosis.Case-control study including 29 patients with endometriosis and 15 controls. The revised American Fertility Society classification stages of I and II were pooled as early-stage (n = 15), and stages III and IV were taken as late stage (n = 14). Simultaneous sampling of blood and PF was performed during laparoscopy, and IGF I, IGF II and IGFBP 3 levels were determined by immunoradiometric assay.The serum levels of all three proteins were higher than PF levels except for a reversed IGF I PF: serum ratio in the early stage. There were no significant differences in IGF II and IGFBP 3 levels among the groups. The mean serum IGF I levels of controls and early-stage patients were significantly lower than those in the late stage. Also, mean PF IGF I levels in controls were significantly lower than in the late stage.IGF I may be an important mediator in the development and/or maintenance of endometriosis or progression to late-stage disease.CD4⁺ CD25⁺ FOXP3⁺ regulatory T cells in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis.Is endometriosis associated with changes in CD4⁺ CD25⁺ FOXP3⁺ regulatory T cells (Treg cells)?Endometriosis is associated with disturbed compartmentalization of CD25(high) FOXP3⁺ Treg cells.Endometriosis is associated with an abrogated immune response and displays some features of an autoimmune disorder. Treg cells play a part in the development of autoimmune reactions; however, their role in pathogenesis of endometriosis is still poorly recognized.Case-control study comparing 17 women with laparoscopically and histopathologically confirmed ovarian endometriosis with 15 control women without visible endometriosis foci, pelvic inflammation or related pathology who were subjected to laparoscopic surgery between 2010 and 2011.Peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid were collected during laparoscopy and T cell subpopulations were analysed by flow cytometry using specific monoclonal antibodies recognizing CD4⁺, CD25⁺ and FOXP3⁺ markers.The percentage of CD25(high) FOXP3⁺ Treg cells was significantly decreased in the peripheral blood of women with ovarian endometriosis compared with control women. On the other hand, the proportion of these cells was significantly increased in the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.The present study is limited to patients with ovarian endometrioma and further investigations are needed, including patients with lower grade of endometriosis.The present results suggest that Treg cells may play a part in immunopathogenesis of endometriosis being responsible for abrogated local cellular immune responses and facilitation and development of autoimmune reactions. Treg cells may be thus a potential target in the treatment of endometriosis.This study was supported by 1M15/N/2011 and NK1W grants from the I Faculty of Medicine, Warsaw Medical University. None of the authors has any competing interests to declare.Autoantibodies to markers of oxidative stress are elevated in women with endometriosis.To measure autoantibodies that recognize oxidatively modified proteins in the sera of women with surgically proven endometriosis.Prospective study.Tertiary care academic medical center.Women undergoing surgery for endometriosis or tubal ligation.None.Serum and peritoneal fluid autoantibody titers to malondialdehyde-modified low-density lipoprotein, oxidized low-density lipoprotein, and lipid peroxide-modified rabbit serum albumin determined by ELISA. Correlation of autoantibody titers with revised American Fertility Society staging classification, symptoms, and morphologic type of endometriosis.Mean (+/-SEM) serum autoantibody titers (in optical density units) to the three antigens were as follows: [1] lipid peroxide-modified rabbit serum albumin, 0.49 +/- 0.12 units in the patients with endometriosis and 0.2 +/- 0.02 units in the controls; [2] oxidized low-density lipoprotein, 0.22 +/- 0.005 units in the patients with endometriosis and 0.18 +/- 0.006 units in the controls; and [3] malondialdehyde-modified low-density lipoprotein, 0.21 +/- 0.005 units in the patients with endometriosis and 0.16 +/- 0.003 units in the controls. There was no correlation between autoantibody titers and revised American Fertility Society stage, symptoms, or morphologic type of endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid did not contain autoantibodies to any of the three antigens.Autoantibodies to markers of oxidative stress were significantly increased in women with endometriosis. These findings strongly support our data demonstrating that women with endometriosis have enhanced oxidative stress.Tumor markers and transvaginal ultrasonography in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To evaluate the accuracy of CA 19.9 plasma levels (with or without CA 125 levels) combined with transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of endometrioma.One hundred eighteen consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women had laparoscopy or laparotomy between November 1994 and November 1995 because of the presence of a persistent adnexal mass. They underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and measurement of CA 19.9 and CA 125 plasma levels within 2 days before surgery. The ultrasonographic impression and the tumor marker values were compared with the histopathologic diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa statistic.Transvaginal ultrasonography had a strong agreement between test result and surgery (kappa value 0.84), whereas the combined methods were associated with a lower kappa value (range 0.24-0.80).Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone is the most cost-effective method in the preoperative differential diagnosis of endometrioma.Progesterone increases serum CA-125 in endometriosis.Serum level of CA-125 was monitored up to 48 hours after injection of 125 mg P-in-oil into patients with or without endometriosis in the follicular phase of their menstrual cycle. Circulating CA-125 levels remained unchanged at around 5 U/ml during the observation period in patients without endometriosis; however, a significant elevation was observed at 30 hours after injection in those patients with endometriosis (from 19.6 U/ml before injection to 30.0 U/ml at 30 hours after injection, P less than 0.05).Serum levels of VEGF and TNF-alpha and their association with C-reactive protein in patients with endometriosis.To compare serum levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), and C-reactive protein (CRP) throughout the menstrual cycle in women with and without endometriosis and to quantify the association between these serum markers.Twenty five endometriosis patients (ASRM stage III-IV) and 13 controls were followed through one menstrual cycle. VEGF, TNF-alpha and CRP concentrations were measured with enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in each of the four cycle phases (early and late proliferative and early and late secretory). Non-parametric methods and Pearson's correlation coefficients were used for statistical analysis.Increased serum levels of VEGF in secretory phases and of TNF-alpha in all cycle phases were observed. A positive correlation between CRP and VEGF was found in endometriosis patients but not in controls.Our results suggest that excessive systemic angiogenic activity is a feature of patients with endometriosis.Elevated soluble Fas ligand levels may suggest a role for apoptosis in women with endometriosis.To evaluate soluble Fas ligand concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid from women with endometriosis and from fertile controls without endometriosis, and to study levels of soluble Fas ligand in conditioned media of cultured endometrial stromal cells.Prospective, experimental trial.Two academic IVF centers.Twenty-nine fertile women without endometriosis and 57 infertile women with endometriosis (32 with stage I or II disease and 25 with stage III or IV disease).Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was used to measure soluble Fas ligand concentrations in paired samples of serum and peritoneal fluid from women with and without endometriosis. Concentrations were also measured in conditioned media of cultured endometrial stromal cells at basal conditions and after stimulation with interleukin-8 (0.001-10 ng/mL) and tumor necrosis factor-alpha (1-10 ng/mL).Compared with fertile controls and women with early-stage of endometriosis, women with moderate to severe endometriosis had elevated serum (87.2 +/- 6.4, 88.2 +/- 6.9, and 162.3 +/- 7.8 pg/mL, respectively) and peritoneal fluid (81.0 +/- 6.0, 80.5 +/- 6.8, and 166.2 +/- 10.3 pg/mL, respectively) concentrations of soluble Fas ligand. Serum levels of soluble Fas ligand positively correlated with levels in peritoneal fluid. Comparison of patients in the same menstrual cycle in each group revealed that increased levels of soluble Fas ligand in patients with advanced endometriosis were not attributable to the difference in cycle phases. Soluble Fas ligand was not detected in conditioned media of endometrial stromal cells under baseline conditions or after stimulation.Serum and peritoneal fluid of women with moderate to severe endometriosis contain elevated concentrations of soluble Fas ligand compared to women with minimal or mild endometriosis and women without endometriosis. These findings suggest a role for apoptotic dysregulation in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.An endometrial antibody assay in the clinical diagnosis and management of endometriosis.Coded serum samples from 11 normal fertile men and 17 fertile women without endometriosis (control groups) and 41 women with endometriosis were tested blindly for the presence of endometrial antibodies by use of a passive hemagglutination assay. Endometrial antibodies were either absent or present in low baseline titers in the serum samples from the control group. In contrast, 17 of the 23 (74%) patients with untreated endometriosis had elevated titers of endometrial antibodies in their serum. Of the 18 patients treated with danazol, endometrial antibodies were absent in 7 women who showed a good response at repeat laparoscopy, whereas 4 of 5 women with a poor response had significantly positive titers of antibodies. Six patients treated with danazol did not have repeat laparoscopy, but were found to have endometrial antibody titers in the baseline control range. Endometrial antibody titers in women with a good response to danazol were significantly lower than those in women with untreated endometriosis or with a poor response to danazol (P = 0.003). No correlation was observed between the antibody titers and the stage of endometriosis. The results suggest that the assay for serum endometrial antibodies may prove to be a clinically useful, noninvasive aid in the diagnosis of endometriosis. Sequential determination of endometrial antibody titers may be helpful in assessing the efficacy of pharmacologic therapy for endometriosis and evaluating the cases of patients with possible recurrence of the disease.Antizona and antisperm antibodies in women with endometriosis and/or infertility.To measure the levels of antigamete antibodies in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis and/or infertility.Antibody activity against human sperm and porcine oocytes was analyzed in selected subgroups of women.Clinic of reproduction.Women with endometriosis and/or infertility.No treatment was implemented before peritoneal fluid and blood sample collection.Quantitative ELISA.Four groups of women (n = 98) were analyzed for the presence of antizona and antisperm antibodies: infertile with endometriosis (n = 30), idiopathic infertility (n = 28), fertile with endometriosis (n = 20), and healthy fertile controls (n = 20). Antibodies were analyzed simultaneously in serum and peritoneal fluid. No statistically significant differences in antibody levels were detected in serum samples among the analyzed groups. The median values for antizona and antisperm antibodies in peritoneal fluid were significantly higher in women with idiopathic infertility than in the control group. In women with unexplained infertility, a high degree of correlation (Spearman) was found between the presence of antizona antibodies in peritoneal fluid and serum (r = 0.579). A positive predictive value of 80% was calculated for the presence of antizona antibodies (>5 ng/oocyte) in the peritoneal fluid of patients with infertility.Antizona antibodies locally produced in the peritoneal fluid have diagnostic value for infertility status; however, they cannot be treated as a marker or prognostic factor for minimal endometriosis and/or its treatment.[FSH, LH, estradiol and testosterone studies of the blood serum in endometriosis externa].Fibroblast growth factor (FGF), intracellular adhesion molecule (sICAM-1) level in serum and follicular fluid of infertile women with polycystic ovarian syndrome, endometriosis and tubal damage, and their effect on ICSI outcome.The objective of this study was to determine the concentration of fibroblast growth factor (FGF) and soluble intracellular adhesions molecule (sICAM-1) in serum and follicular fluid (FF) of polycystic ovary (PCO), endometriosis and tubal factor infertility and male factor infertility patients, and to investigate the relationship between these parameters and the outcome of intracytoplasmic sperm injection (ICSI).The concentration of FGF and sICAM-1 in serum and FF were determined in patients undergoing controlled ovarian hyperstimulation (COH) for ICSI therapy for various etiology of infertility and the results of cytokines concentration and ICSI outcome were compared between the groups. Twenty patients with PCO (G.I), 17 with endometriosis (G.II), 19 with tubal damage (G.III) and 19 with male factor infertility (G.IV) were enrolled in this study. Quantitative determination of levels of FGF and sICAM-1 was performed using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISAs).The FGF level in serum of PCO patients (G.I) were 4.8 +/- 2.3 and in FF were 104.0 +/- 39.0 pg/mL. The corresponding values in the endometriosis patients group (G.II) were 5.9 +/- 3.1 and 125.4 +/- 74.9 pg/mL. The concentration of FGF in tubal factor infertility group (G.III) in serum was significantly higher (P = 0.009) than those observed in the PCO group (G.I) 7.4 +/- 4.5 pg/mL, whereas the concentration in FF was at the same level like the other groups investigated, 128.7 +/- 75.9 pg/mL. Besides, the sICAM-1 (pg/ml) concentration in FF showed a significant difference between the groups investigated (G.I, 175.3 +/- 52.8; G.II 194.4 +/- 32.2; G.III 233.1 +/- 54.3; and G.IV 215.1 +/- 54.4 ng/mL; P = 0.003). The sICAM-1 levels in serum were not significantly different between the groups (217.0 +/- 42.9; 216.3 +/- 73.6; 254.8 +/- 79.6; 237.56 +/- 78.4 ng/ml; P = 0.267). The fertilization rate was significantly higher in G.III (66.0 +/- 23.89%) in comparison to G.II (38.8 +/- 33.9%; P = 0.014) or G.IV (38.7 +/- 22.7%; P = 0.012). The pregnancy rates were similar in all groups (30, 35.3 and 35.0, 38.6%, respectively).Both, FGF and sICAM-1 are present in serum and FF of patients undergoing controlled ovarian hyperstimulation for ICSI therapy. The FGF concentration in serum differs significantly between the groups investigated, whereas, no significant difference could be observed in the FF concentration of FGF. On the other hand, the sICAM in serum showed no significant difference between the groups, whereas, sICAM in FF demonstrated a significant difference between the patient groups investigated. On the whole, the ICSI outcome was not related to serum or FF concentrations of FGF or sICAM-1. Therefore, the mean concentration of FGF and sICAM-1 in serum and in FF could not be used to predict the fertilization rate in an ICSI program.Peritoneal and serum interleukin-18 levels are not increased in women with minimum or mild endometriosis.Interleukin-18 (IL-18) is a cytokine that belongs to the IL-1 family. Endometriosis is strongly associated with sub-fertility, and affects about 15% of women of reproductive age. IL-18 may favor the progression of endometriosis. The objective of the present study was to determine the concentration of IL-18 in the serum and peritoneal fluid of infertile women with endometriosis. Forty infertile and 25 fertile women were screened in a teaching hospital. Thirty-four infertile patients with minimal or mild endometriosis and 22 fertile controls were enrolled in the study. The primary outcome was the estimate of IL-18 levels and the secondary outcome was the correlation between serum and peritoneal levels of IL-18. There were no differences between the two groups regarding age, body mass index and levels of peritoneal fluid IL-18 (mean +/- SD): 290.85 +/- 173.02 pg/mL for infertile women vs 374.21 +/- 330.15 pg/mL for controls; or serum IL-18: 391.07 +/- 119.71 pg/mL for infertile women vs 373.42 +/- 129.11 pg/mL for controls. However, a positive association was found between serum and peritoneal IL-18 levels in patients with endometriosis: r = 0.794, P = 0.0001. All measurements were carried out at the same time by the Human IL-18 Immuno Assay ELISA kit (MBL Co. Ltd., Japan). The present study did not find evidence supporting the hypothesis that IL-18 levels are associated with infertility in women with minimal and mild endometriosis, although a positive correlation was detected in these women between peritoneal and serum levels of IL-18.Low serum and peritoneal fluid concentration of interferon-gamma-induced protein-10 (CXCL10) in women with endometriosis.To evaluate serum and peritoneal fluid concentrations of interferon-gamma-inducible protein-10 (CXCL10), a chemokine involved in local immune function, in women with endometriosis.Prospective study.Division of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Siena.A total of 147 women were divided in two groups: women with (n = 77) and without (n = 70) endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid were collected from all patients undergoing laparoscopy.CXCL10 concentrations were measured by a specific ELISA.Serum CXCL10 concentrations in women with endometriosis were significantly lower than in those without endometriosis. No statistically significant difference between women with early endometriosis and those with advanced endometriosis was found. CXCL10 concentrations in peritoneal fluid of women with advanced endometriosis were significantly lower than in that of women with an early stage of, or without, endometriosis.The decreased concentrations of CXCL10 in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis indicate an impaired immune activity in women with endometriosis.Serum interleukin-8 levels are elevated in patients with ovarian endometrioma.To determine whether serum interleukin (IL)-8 concentration can be measured in patients with ovarian endometrioma and whether this measurement is a useful tool in diagnosing this disease.A controlled clinical study and an in vitro study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Tottori University, Japan.Seventy patients with ovarian endometrioma and 21 patients with benign ovarian cyst.Laparoscopic surgery or laparotomy for ovarian endometriomas or benign ovarian cyst was performed. Preoperative blood samples were obtained. Endometriotic stromal cells obtained from nine patients with endometrioma were cultured.Interleukin-8 concentration in the serum or supernatant of the cell culture was measured with use of ELISA.The serum concentration of IL-8 in patients with endometrioma was significantly higher than in patients with benign ovarian cyst. The serum IL-8 threshold (25 pg/mL) had a higher sensitivity (71.4%) for diagnosing ovarian endometrioma than did serum CA-125 level. The increased rates of IL-8 concentration in the culture supernatants after adding tumor necrosis factor alpha were significantly higher in patients whose serum IL-8 levels were >or=25 pg/mL than in those with levels <25 pg/mL.Measuring of serum IL-8 concentration may be a valuable tool in diagnosing endometriosis.Serum HE4 concentration is not dependent on menstrual cycle or hormonal treatment among endometriosis patients and healthy premenopausal women.Human epididymal secretory protein E4 (HE4) is a new promising tumor marker developed for the diagnostics and follow up of ovarian cancer. It has yet to become widely accepted in clinical practice, and its biological properties have not been inclusively studied. The aim of this study was to investigate whether serum HE4 concentration varies within the normal menstrual cycle and whether common gynecological hormonal treatments have an effect on HE4 values.Our study population consisted of 180 women, including 126 endometriosis patients and 54 healthy women. We measured their serum HE4 and CA125 concentrations and evaluated the effect of the menstrual cycle and the possible hormonal medication on these marker concentrations.We found no significant variation in serum HE4 concentrations in samples taken at different phases of the menstrual cycle. The median HE4 concentrations in proliferative, secretory and menstrual phase were 41.5, 45.1 and 35.3 pM in healthy women, and 43.4, 44.3 and 43.0 pM in endometriosis patients, respectively. The use of combined estrogen and progestin contraceptives did not affect serum HE4 levels significantly.The present study shows that the HE4 measurement in healthy premenopausal women as well as in women with endometriosis can be carried out at any phase of the menstrual cycle, and irrespective of hormonal medication, extending the benefits of HE4 use in clinical practice.CA 125 levels in monitoring therapy for endometriosis and in prediction of recurrence.CA 125 levels were measured in the serum of 18 patients with laparoscopically diagnosed stage 2 to stage 4 endometriosis (American Fertility Society classification) and in eight normally cycling control women. All endometriosis patients were treated medically with either Danazol or Buserelin. CA 125 levels were measured during treatment and during the 18-month follow-up period. The mean CA 125 level in women with endometriosis was significantly higher than that observed in normal women (28.6 +/- 5.1 (+/- SE) units/mL vs. 11.1 +/- 1.1 units/mL). However, there was considerable overlap of values between controls and patients with stage 2 disease. The levels in patients with stage 3 or stage 4 disease were always greater than 20 units/mL. There was a significant positive correlation (r = .51) between the implant score and CA 125 levels, while there was no correlation between the total score (which includes adhesions and implants) and the CA 125 levels. Four of the patients who had recurrence of symptoms approximately 1 year after treatment had CA 125 levels close to pretreatment levels, and recurrence of endometriosis was confirmed by laparoscopy. The CA 125 levels in the rest of the patients remained suppressed during the follow-up periods. These results indicate that (1) CA 125 level can predict active endometriosis lesions in patients with stage 3 and stage 4 endometriosis, but is of no value for predicting adhesions; (2) CA 125 levels are useful in monitoring therapy during treatment; (3) during the follow-up period, elevations in CA 125 might predict recurrence of disease in women with stage 3 and stage 4 endometriosis.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Matrix metalloproteinase-3 mRNA: a promising peripheral blood marker for diagnosis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is an invasive disease. Its diagnosis depends on laparoscopy, which is traumatic and associated with potential complications. The aim of this study was to develop a rapid, reliable, and less invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis. We hypothesized that genes related to cell invasion would be transcriptionally upregulated in endometriosis, and tested whether blood levels of their transcripts might be used as biomarkers of endometriosis.We used quantitative real-time reverse transcription polymerase chain reaction (qRT-PCR) to quantify the mRNA levels of vascular endothelial growth factor A (VEGFA), matrix metalloproteinase-3 (MMP-3), and MMP-9 in peripheral blood from 20 patients with mild/intermediate endometriosis, 20 patients with severe endometriosis and 20 endometriosis-free subjects.Our results indicate that circulating mRNA for MMP-3 is significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in control patients, regardless of the degree of severity. Conversely, the level of circulating mRNA for VEGFA and MMP-9 did not distinguish patients from controls.MMP-3 mRNA is a promising peripheral blood marker that discriminates between patients with endometriosis and healthy subjects. Our results support the possibility of finding genes suitable for diagnostic qRT-PCR for endometriosis in peripheral blood and should be explored further.Increased asymmetric dimethylarginine and enhanced inflammation are associated with impaired vascular reactivity in women with endometriosis.Enhanced inflammatory responses which may inhibit vascular reactivity, are associated with endometriosis development. Asymmetric dimethylarginine (ADMA), an inhibitor of endogenous nitric oxide synthase, is also implicated in endothelial dysfunction. We aimed to determine whether plasma ADMA and systemic inflammation are associated with endothelial function in women with endometriosis.We evaluated 41 women with and 28 women without endometriosis. Plasma levels of lipids and inflammatory markers such as high sensitive-C reactive protein (hs-CRP), serum amyloid protein A (SAA), and interleukin-6 (IL-6) were measured in the two groups. We also measured levels of ADMA and symmetric dimethylarginine (SDMA). High-resolution ultrasonography measured flow-mediated vasodilation (FMD) to assess vasodilatory responses.FMD was significantly lower in women with endometriosis compared to those without endometriosis (8.39 ± 0.43% vs 10.79 ± 0.54%, P = 0.001). While plasma lipid levels did not differ significantly between groups, levels of AMDA, but not SDMA, were significantly higher in women with endometriosis (409.7 ± 10.1 pmol/L vs 383.0 ± 48.3 pmol/L, P = 0.04). Inflammatory markers were also significantly higher in these women (hs-CRP: 1053.3 ± 252.0 ng/mL vs 272.0 ± 83.3 ng/mL, P = 0.02; SAA: 8.00 ± 1.53 μg/mL vs 3.82 ± 0.42 μg/mL, P = 0.04; IL-6: 2.73 ± 0.75 pg/mL vs 1.05 ± 0.60 pg/mL, P = 0.04). FMD was negatively correlated with plasma levels of ADMA (r = -0.37, P=0.01) and log hs-CRP (r = -0.34, P = 0.01).Increased plasma ADMA levels and enhanced inflammation are associated with inhibited endothelial function in women with endometriosis.The use of serum CA-125 as a marker for endometriosis in patients with dysmenorrhea for monitoring therapy and for recurrence of endometriosis.To estimate the value of CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis in women with dysmenorrhea, as well as its significance in monitoring therapy and follow-up.One hundred and fifty-seven women undergoing laparoscopy for dysmenorrhea were prospectively studied for serum CA-125 concentration. For those with advanced endometriosis receiving danazol treatment after conservative surgery, CA-125 was also determined every month during medication and once every 12 months after treatment.The sensitivity and specificity of serum CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis were 61.1% and 87.5% respectively. Elevated CA-125 (>35 U/ml) was noted in 65/75 cases (86.70%) with advanced endometriosis, but in only 15/56 patients (26.8%) with minimal and mild endometriosis. Although there were significantly higher CA-125 levels in unmarried women, and a negative correlation (r=-0.1970, p=0.0284) between CA-125 and parity, there was no statistical difference in incidence of endometriosis by the status of marriage or parity. Ten women with advanced endometriosis were found with persistent endometriosis by laparoscopy during danazol treatment, even though they tested with normal CA-125 levels (<35 U/ml) at that time. Fifteen patients had elevated CA-125 levels before and one year after therapy, and were confirmed with recurrence of endometriosis by laparoscopy. Nine women with elevated CA-125 levels before treatment, were found without recurrence of endometriosis and had normal CA-125 levels one year after therapy.For endometriosis, CA-125 is a valuable adjuvant in the follow-up of recurrence in patients with advanced endometriosis and initially elevated CA-125 levels. It is not an effective screening tool for patients with dysmenorrhea, or for monitoring therapy. There was no significant correlation between the development of endometriosis and reproductive factors.[Prolactin secretion in patients with endometriosis and its relationship to luteal phase defect and infertility].Serum prolactin (PRL) levels and PRL response to TRH stimulation were studied in 49 patients with endometriosis (EM) during mid-luteal phase. Eight cases with other gyn-diseases and 14 normal fertile women served as controls. Their luteal function were also estimated by three serum progesterone(P) measurements during the luteal phase and endometrial dating in the late luteal phase.The incidence of hyperprolactinemia in EM group (32.7%), and in EM with primary infertility group (61.5%) was significantly higher than that in normal controls (7.1%) (P < 0.05). However, the PRL secretory capacity was not positively correlated to the severity of EM. There was no difference in serum P levels between EM and two control groups. But delayed endometrial maturation was shown in 6 EM infertile cases suggesting luteal phase defect, an incidence of 27.3% (6/22) in EM group or 42.9% (6/14) in EM infertile group. Five out of the six were hyperprolactinemic and had no other identified causes of infertility. These data implied that hyperprolactinemia may impair the luteal function causing infertility in EM patients.Evaluation of the relationship between endometriosis and omega-3 and omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids.Endometriosis is a common chronic inflammation causing major problems including infertility. The role of omega-3 and omega-6 fatty acids as their potential anti-inflammatory effects in endometriosis needs to be further explored. The objective of this study was to compare serum phospholipid fatty acid profile in endometriosis patients with controls, and to explore the correlation of this profile with the severity of the disease.Sixty-four endometriosis patients and 74 control women, in reproductive age, participated in this study. Among the endometriosis patients, 19 cases were in stage I, 27 cases in stage II, 8 cases in stage III, and 10 cases in stage IV. Each patient underwent laparoscopy. Before surgery, 5 ml of blood was obtained. After extraction of the total lipids, serum total phospholipid fraction was isolated by thin layer chromatography. Fatty acid composition of the phospholipid fraction was determined by gas chromatography and the resulted profile was compared in endometriosis patients and controls. The profile was also compared in the endometriosis group based on the severity of disease.Stearic acid was significantly lower in the endometriosis group as compared to controls (P= 0.030). No other fatty acid compositions were significantly different between patients and controls. Serum ratio of eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA) to arachidonic acid (AA) was in reasonable correlation with the severity of endometriosis (r = 0.34, P = 0.006).According to these findings, levels of fatty acids in serum total phospholipids seem not to be a marker for endometriosis, but the EPA to AA ratio was a relevant factor indicating severity of illness.Usefulness of CA19-9 versus CA125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis.To investigate the clinical value of the serum CA19-9 level in comparison with the serum CA125 level for diagnosing and determining the severity of endometriosis.Retrospective study.Department of Comprehensive Reproductive Medicine in a university hospital.One hundred one women with endometriosis and 22 without endometriosis participated in this study.Blood samples were collected before the operation (laparoscopy, oophrectomy, cystectomy, and/or hysterectomy), and tissue samples of ovarian chocolate cysts were collected during the operation.The serum CA19-9 and CA125 levels and the localization of these antigens in ovarian chocolate cysts.The mean serum CA19-9 levels in patients at all stages of endometriosis were significantly higher than those in patients without endometriosis, and serum CA19-9 levels significantly correlated with the Revised American Fertility Society classification scores. Intense staining of CA19-9 was observed in 15 of the 20 samples of ovarian chocolate cysts.CA19-9 is a useful marker for determining the severity of endometriosis.Luteal phase dysfunction in endometriosis: elevated progesterone levels in peripheral and ovarian veins during the follicular phase.Endometriosis has been associated with corpus luteum inadequacy and abnormalities of luteal phase progesterone (P) secretion. In this study, abnormal luteolysis, as a second factor of luteal dysfunction, was assessed in 13 women with endometriosis and 25 control patients by measurement of ovarian vein estradiol (E2) and P during the follicular phase. The results reveal that women with endometriosis have (1) significantly lower ovarian vein E2, (2) significantly higher both peripheral and ovarian vein P, and (3) threefold higher P/E2 ratios than controls during the follicular phase. These data support the concept of continued P production from an active corpus luteum well into the follicular phase of the following cycle in women with endometriosis. Failure of adequate luteolysis is a second aspect of luteal dysfunction in endometriosis and strongly supports the growing body of data confirming ovulatory asynchrony in the minimal; endometriosis infertility syndrome.Haplotype analysis of the matrix metalloproteinase-9 gene associated with advanced-stage endometriosis.To investigate whether the -1562C>T, R279Q, P574R, and R668Q polymorphisms of the matrix metalloproteinase-9 (MMP-9) gene are related to endometriosis.Case-control study.University-based hospital in Korea.Patients with endometriosis stage III/IV (n = 225) who underwent pelvic surgery and controls (n = 198) with no endometriosis in a Korean population.Peripheral blood samples were collected by venipuncture.Frequencies of genotypes and haplotypes were compared with the risk of endometriosis including -1562C>T, R279Q, P574R, and R668Q polymorphisms of MMP-9.In the two-locus haplotype analyses using the four single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNPs), an increase in the distribution of the R279Q/P574R (2678G>A/4859C>G) (AC haplotype: odds ratio [OR] = 3.180, 95% confidence interval [CI] = 1.956-5.170; GG haplotype: OR = 4.374, 95% CI = 2.376-8.053) and -1562C>T/R668Q (-1562C>T/5546G>A) (CA haplotype: OR = 3.280, 95% CI = 1.406-7.653) haplotypes was significantly associated with endometriosis. By contrast, the risk of endometriosis was not associated with the individual SNPs studied.These findings suggest that haplotype analysis was more informative than SNP analysis. The haplotypes in the MMP-9 gene may correlate with the progression of endometriosis, and further study of these variations might improve our understanding of the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Angiogenic activity and IL-8 concentrations in peritoneal fluid and sera in endometriosis.During menstruation endometrial fragments are transported into the peritoneal cavity where they form endometriotic lesions. Angiogenesis is proposed as one of the mechanisms in endometriosis pathogenesis. The aim of the study was to determine the angiogenic activity and interleukin 8 concentrations in peritoneal fluid and sera in endometriosis.Angiogenesis was determined in cutaneous assay in Balb/c mice; IL-8 concentrations were measured by ELISA test in sera and peritoneal fluid of 32 control and 56 endometriosis patients. Wilcoxon and Mann-Whitney tests and Spearman rank correlations were used in statistical analysis.Peritoneal fluid and sera from the examined group had higher angiogenic activity and interleukin 8 concentrations. There was correlation found between AFS and neovascularization induced by sera and PF of patients with peritoneal lesions.Angiogenesis plays an important role in pathogenesis of endometriosis. Although IL-8 takes part in neovascularization, there are other factors modulating angiogenesis in endometriosis.[Immunological studies of peripheral blood in patients with external genital endometriosis and infertility].Immunoregulatory lymphocytes of SD2-, SD4-, SD8- and SD2-phenotypes have been assayed using monoclonal antibodies in peripheral blood of infertile women with external genital endometriosis and tubal-peritoneal infertility. The tested cells did not markedly differ from those in control fertile patients. Serum concentrations of immunoglobulin M were increased in women with endometriosis. Immunoglobulin concentrations widely varied in the peritoneal fluid, with a statistically significant elevation of IgA and IgM in women with tubal-peritoneal infertility.Serum cytokines as biomarkers for nonsurgical prediction of endometriosis.To test the ability of a group of serum cytokines, either individually or in combination, to serve as biomarkers for the nonsurgical diagnosis of endometriosis.Subjects were allocated to two groups according to their laparoscopic diagnosis. The first group consisted of patients with endometriosis and the second group was made up of infertile women with no pelvic pathology (controls). Blood samples were collected preoperatively and stored. Cytokines were measured in the serum of all participants using the Bio-Plex Protein Array System. Nonparametric statistics and the Mann-Whitney test were used to compare groups. Subjects were seen at the Gynecologic endoscopy unit.Three cytokines were significantly higher in the serum of subjects with endometriosis than in the control group: interleukin-6 (IL-6) [4.41 pg/ml (range: 1.47-15.01) versus 0.97 pg/ml (range: 0.29-2.98), respectively; p<0.001], monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) [37.91 pg/ml (range: 24.54-94.74) versus 22.13 pg/ml (range: 13.85-39.45), respectively; p<0.001], and interferon-gamma (INF-gamma) [19.01 pg/ml (range: 1.19-73.52) versus 0.30 pg/ml (range: 0.00-13.05), respectively; p<0.001]. There was no statistically significant difference between subjects with endometriosis and controls in the serum concentration of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), or granulocyte macrophage colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF). Interleukin-2 (IL-2), interleukin-8 (IL-8), and interleukin-15 (IL-15) were undetectable in the serum of both groups. None of the measured cytokines showed significant correlation with the cycle phase or stage of endometriosis. In a multivariate analysis, serum interleukin-6 provided a sensitivity of 71% and a specificity of 66% to discriminate between endometriosis patients and controls at a cutoff point of 1.9 pg/ml. Adding monocyte chemotactic protein-1 and interferon-gamma to interleukin-6 did not increase the discriminative ability over that achieved by measuring serum interleukin-6 alone.Serum of subjects with endometriosis contains significantly higher levels of interleukin-6, monocyte chemotactic protein-1, and interferon-gamma than control women. Serum interleukin-6 measurements discriminate between women with endometriosis and controls. Interleukin-6 provides a promising serum marker for the nonsurgical prediction of endometriosis.Preoperative serum CA-125 and CA-72 in predicting endometriosis in infertility patients.CA-125, a high-molecular-weight glycoprotein antigen, has been identified as a possible marker for endometriosis, with discrepant results. CA-72, another glycoprotein antigen, is expressed by a variety of adenocarcinomas, including endometrial carcinoma. This controlled, prospective study evaluated serum CA-125 and CA-72 levels in 35 consecutive patients with endometriosis of varying stages and in patients without endometriosis. Serum CA-125 and CA-72 were measured with immunoradiologic methods prior to diagnostic laparoscopy for infertility evaluation. Endometriosis, scored by American Fertility Society guidelines, was identified in 19 patients, and 16 patients had normal pelvic findings. CA-125 and CA-72 levels were not different between patients with no pelvic disease (controls) and women with stage I-IV endometriosis. The positive predictive value of CA-125 was 0%; the negative predictive value was 47%. The positive predictive value of CA-72 was 5%; the negative predictive value was 53%. CA-72 and CA-125 are not helpful in the routine workup of the infertile woman to determine the likelihood that she has pelvic endometriosis.Evaluation of novel serum biomarkers and the proteomic differences of endometriosis and adenomyosis using MALDI-TOF-MS.Both endometriosis and adenomyosis are common benign gynecological diseases. This study aimed to find the novel noninvasive, biochemical diagnostic markers for detection of endometriosis and adenomyosis, and evaluate the correlation of these two diseases at the protein level.Serum samples from patients with endometriosis or adenomyosis were compared with control groups to detect specific serum biomarkers and to explore the different protein fingerprint of endometriosis and adenomyosis using MALDI-TOF-MS.There were 13 protein peaks abnormally expressed in endometriosis as well as twelve in adenomyosis compared with control groups (P < 0.05). And five-peak mass was found downregulated significantly both in the women with endometriosis and adenomyosis. The common diagnostic model of endometriosis and adenomyosis we set up had a lower sensitivity and specificity than the separate diagnostic model of these two diseases.MALDI-TOF-MS technology plays an important role in screening the diagnostic biomarkers of endometriosis and adenomyosis. And our study found the correlation between endometriosis and adenomyosis in protein fingerprint and it is hard to separate the endometriosis from adenomyosis with the serum biomarkers.Elevated serum concentrations of CA-125 in patients with advanced endometriosis.CA-125 is a high-molecular-weight glycoprotein that is expressed on the cell surface of some derivatives of embryonic coelomic epithelium. Based on results of an immunoradiometric assay developed to detect CA-125 in peripheral blood, 82% of patients with ovarian cancer and less than 1% of apparently healthy controls have elevated peripheral blood levels of CA-125. Because endometriotic lesions are likely to be derivatives of embryonic coelomic epithelium, the authors investigated serum CA-125 levels in patients with endometriosis. Preoperative serum CA-125 concentrations were measured in 147 patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy or laparotomy. Serum CA-125 concentrations were elevated in patients with stage III or IV endometriosis, compared with controls with negative diagnostic laparoscopies (66.5 +/- 14.5 versus 8.20 +/- 0.59 U/ml, mean +/- standard error of the mean; P less than 0.001). Fifty-four percent of patients with stage III or IV endometriosis and 0% of the controls had CA-125 levels greater than 35 U/ml. Occasional patients with stage II endometriosis (13%), leiomyomata uteri (14%), and chronic pelvic inflammatory disease (5%) also had serum CA-125 concentrations greater than 35 U/ml. Immunocytochemical techniques demonstrated the presence of CA-125 on the cell surface of endometriotic lesions.Impaired NK-cell-mediated cytotoxic activity and cytokine production in patients with endometriosis: a possible role for PCBs and DDE.Endometriosis is a gynaecological disorder characterized by the presence and growth of endometrial tissue in ectopic sites. In this study we examined the immunological functions of patients with endometriosis and serum level of PCBs and p,p'-DDE to verify the impact of these environmental contaminants on the dysregulation of immune functions. We found that proliferative responses and immunoglobulin production were not dysregulated in patients with endometriosis while NK cell activity was significantly down-regulated in these patients. Moreover, a significant down-regulation of IL-1beta and IL-12 production was found in patients with respect to controls. Serum levels of PCBs and p,p'-DDE were found to be significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in the control group, with respect to the sum of the congeners most prominent in human tissues. In particular, total PCBs concentration in patients with endometriosis and controls was respectively 330 and 160 ng/g fat with respect to the most abundant congeners, while p,p'-DDE concentration was of 770 and 310 ng/g fat. Moreover, we found that normal human PBMC pulsed with PCBs, p,p'-DDE and their combination showed a significant down-regulation of NK cell cytotoxic activity and IL-1beta and IL-12 production. These findings suggest that changes in specific immune parameters correlate with elevated serum PCBs and DDE levels and endometriosis.Multiple endometrial antigens are targeted in autoimmune endometriosis.Endometriosis is defined as the growth of endometrial glands and stroma in ectopic locations. Its aetiology is multifactorial, but autoimmunity has been shown to play a role in its onset and development. The present study aimed to investigate the presence of both IgG and IgM anti-endometrial antibodies in sera of endometriosis patients in comparison with age-matched controls, and to also investigate the cognate endometrial proteins involved. Sera from these groups were screened by western blot and immunohistochemistry. Thirteen out of the 40 sera tested were positive for IgG isotype, and 10/27 IgG negative patients were positive for IgM isotype. These findings indicate that endometrial antibodies of IgG and IgM classes could be detected in almost 60% of endometriosis patients. Of the various identified endometrial antigens, 30 and 45 kDa antigens were immunodominant in both IgG and IgM positive endometriosis patients. With immunohistochemistry, positive sera showed reactivity in luminal epithelium, glandular epithelium and stroma. These anti-endometrial antibodies might be partially responsible for failure of implantation leading to infertility. Identification of specific targets would be a help in understanding the pathophysiology of endometriosis, and would also help in setting up a non-invasive test for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum concentrations of growth factors in women with and without endometriosis: the action of anti-endometriosis medicines.Endometriosis is a common gynecologic syndrome of unknown etiology and pathogenesis. Growth factors and inflammatory mediators produced by peritoneal leukocytes have recently been postulated to participate in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Angiogenic factors released from peritoneal macrophages may also play a role in the development of this disease. In the present study, we investigate the soluble levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), epidermal growth factor-receptor (EGF-R), granulocyte/macrophage-colony stimulating factor (GM-CSF), Insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1) and interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) in the serum of 28 women with and 20 without endometriosis. We also compared these levels before, during and after treatment with danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot, the two therapeutic regiments of choice concerning this disease. We found that only sVEGF levels were higher in women with endometriosis in comparison to controls (P < 0.001) while sEGF-R is not present. GM-CSF, IGF-1 and IFN-gamma soluble levels are not affected in either healthy or endometriotic subjects. The 6-month treatment with danazol decreased sVEGF levels (P < 0.02) and increased sEGF-R levels (P < 0.001). These observations support the view that VEGF may be associated with the disease process and that danazol may bring sVEGF levels to a normal threshold. However, future studies will be focused on the anti-angiogenic control of the action of VEGF in patients with endometriosis.Serum CA-125 in preoperative patients at high risk for endometriosis.To investigate the factors contributing to the elevated level of CA-125 in endometriosis and to study whether CA-125 assay is useful to identify women who require preoperative bowel preparation.A total of 685 women undergoing surgery for endometriosis between July 1988 and June 1999 were studied. Preoperative serum CA-125 levels were compared between various pelvic conditions using F statistics. Multiple regression was employed to determine significant correlates of elevated serum CA-125, and the receiver operating characteristic curve was applied to assess the utility of serum CA-125 in preoperative preparation. Based on the two-sample Student t test, the sample size required to detect a difference in mean serum CA-125 levels of one-half of one standard deviation with a power of 90% when the sample size ratio of the two groups was 1:50 was 675 with a significance level of 5%.The mean serum CA-125 levels (IU/mL) for American Society of Reproductive Medicine stages I, II, III, and IV endometriosis were 18.8 +/- 0.9, 40.3 +/- 2.8, 77.1 +/- 3.5, and 182.4 +/- 14.0, respectively. CA-125 levels were significantly increased with advanced stages (P <.001, F test). Furthermore, serum CA-125 levels were significantly higher in patients with more extensive adhesions to the peritoneum, omentum, ovary, fallopian tube, colon, and cul-de-sac, or with ruptured endometrioma (P <.001, F test). We then classified patients with at least one of the three factors including dense omentum adhesion, ruptured endometrioma, and complete cul-de-sac obliteration as the high-risk group that required preoperative bowel preparation, and the others as the low-risk group. Receiver operating characteristic curve analyses set a cutoff point of 65 IU/mL, which gave a sensitivity of 76%, a specificity of 71%, a positive predictive value of 76%, and a negative predictive value of 93.2%.Our results suggest that preoperative CA-125 assay is useful to decide which women should receive preoperative bowel preparation. Endometriosis patients with preoperative CA-125 levels higher than 65 IU/mL are at high risk for severe pelvic adhesions that warrant thorough preoperative bowel preparation.Matrix metalloproteinase-9 activity in the plasma of patients after surgical resection of endometriomas.Matrix metalloproteinases (MMPs) may have a role in the pathogenesis of endometrioma. The level of MMP was lower compared to the level taken after resection of endometrioma.A study of plasma progesterone, oestradiol-17beta, prolactin and LH levels, and of the luteal phase appearance of the ovaries in patients with endometriosis and infertility.Thirty-four infertile patients with regular cycles and endometriosis were studied and compared to a control group of 28 women. The endometriosis was classified as mild (n = 16), moderate (n = 9) and severe (n = 9) according to Acosta et al (1973). The interval between the LH peak and the onset of subsequent menstruation was shorter (P = 0.024) in patients with endometriosis than in the control group. In mild endometriosis, oestradiol-17beta levels fell on the day after the LH peak, but this was not the case in moderate and severe endometriosis. In mild, moderate and severe endometriosis the plasma progesterone concentration did not rise on the first day following the LH peak, and at laparoscopy significantly (P less than 0.005) less ovulation stigmata were present. We conclude that endometriosis is associated with luteinization in situ and that this may explain the associated infertility.Endometrial osteopontin mRNA expression and plasma osteopontin levels are increased in patients with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate osteopontin (OPN) mRNA expression in eutopic endometrium and plasma OPN levels in patients with endometriosis.A total of 79 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 43 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. OPN mRNA expression in endometrial tissues was measured by real-time quantitative polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and plasma concentrations of OPN were quantified using a specific commercial sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays (ELISA).Osteopontin mRNA expression in endometrial tissue was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in controls (P = 0.010). The mean plasma levels of OPN (mean +/- S.E.M.) in patients with endometriosis and controls were 407.31 +/- 37.80 ng/mL and 165.84 +/- 19.29 ng/mL, respectively (P < 0.001). Receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis for plasma OPN revealed an area under the curve (AUC) of 0.894, with a sensitivity of 93.0%, specificity of 72.4%, positive likelihood ratio of 3.37, and negative likelihood ratio of 0.1 using a cut-off value of 167.68 ng/mL.Osteopontin may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and plasma OPN may be a useful non-invasive marker for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 concentrations are attenuated in peritoneal fluid and sera of women with endometriosis and restored in sera by gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist therapy.To establish tissue inhibitor of metalloproteinase-1 (TIMP-1) concentrations in peritoneal fluid (PF) and sera of women with endometriosis and compare them to disease-free controls.Prospective randomized study.Academic medical center.Women with laparoscopically documented endometriosis and disease-free women of reproductive age.Peritoneal fluid and sera were collected, and some women received gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist (GnRH-a) therapy for endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and sera TIMP-1 concentrations were measured with a specific RIA.The TIMP-1 concentrations were significantly lower in PF and sera of women with endometriosis compared with disease-free women. The GnRH-a therapy restored serum TIMP-1 concentrations.Aberrant expression and localization of TIMP-1 may derange the proteolytic milieu of the peritoneal cavity and contribute to the etiology and underlying physiologic sequelae associated with endometriosis. Measurement of TIMP-1 in serum may aid in diagnosing endometriosis and assist with monitoring treatment efficacy in women with this disease.F(ab')2 segment is the active component of immunoglobulin G autoantibody generation in patients with endometriosis.To determine if the low titer antiendometrial antibody detection by indirect immunofluorescence (IIF) in the sera of patients with endometriosis is because of specific antigen-antibody interactions.Sera of selected patients subjected to separation of immunoglobulin fragments by ammonium sulfate precipitation and pepsin digestion and tested by IIF. In a comparative method, a fragment, crystallizable (Fc) flooding technique was used to determine the active component.Sera obtained preoperatively in the outpatient and results matched with surgical findings.Patients 45 years of age or less presenting for gynecological surgery who had signed an informed consent for the drawing of preoperative blood.None.Indirect immunofluorescence was graded according to the intensity of staining and the lowest dilution at which staining occurred.All of the sera of the 11 patients with endometriosis exhibited F(ab')2 specific staining but none exhibited Fc fragment staining. None of the 7 control patients displayed F(ab')2 or Fc fragment staining.F(ab')2 fragment is the active component of an immunologically specific interaction when antiendometrial antibodies are detected in the sera of patients with endometriosis.Cytokine profiles in serum and peritoneal fluid from infertile women with and without endometriosis.To study the serum and peritoneal fluid cytokine profiles in infertile women with minimal/mild active endometriosis.Fifty-seven consecutive infertile women undergoing laparoscopy for unexplained infertility had peritoneal fluid and serum samples obtained at the time of laparoscopy. The levels of interleukin-6 (IL-6), interleukin-8 (IL-8), interleukin-1 beta (IL-1 beta), vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), monocyte chemotatic protein-1 (MCP-1), RANTES, platelet derived growth factor (PDGF), soluble Fas (sFas), and soluble Fas Ligand (sFasL) in peritoneal fluid and serum were measured to compare the concentration in both biological fluids, in women who have minimal/mild red endometriosis using women with no endometriosis as controls.Peritoneal fluid levels of MCP-1, IL-8 and IL-6 were significantly higher in the endometriosis group (P < 0.012, P = 0.003, and P = 0.015, respectively). There was no significant difference in the peritoneal fluid levels of IL-1 beta, TNF-alpha, RANTES, VEGF, PDGF, sFas and sFasL in the two groups. Although serum levels of IL-8 were higher in women with endometriosis, the difference was not significant (P = 0.07). Serum levels of PDGF, IL-6, RANTES, IL-1 beta, TNF-alpha, and sFas, were not significantly different in the two groups.The elevated levels of MCP-1, IL-6, and IL-8 in peritoneal fluid but not serum may indicate the importance of local macrophage activating factors in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal evaluation of vitamin D-binding protein in women with endometriosis.Vitamin D-binding protein (also called DBP or Gc-globulin) is recognized as a multifunctional protein involved in the action scavenger system, the transport of vitamin D sterols, and the modulation of immune and inflammatory responses. This study evaluated total serum and peritoneal concentrations of vitamin D-binding protein in women with endometriosis, known as an inflammation-associated disease.The total concentration of DBP was measured with an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) using a polyclonal antibody raised in a goat immunized with human DBP. Serum and peritoneal fluid were collected from women with endometriosis (n=26) and from patients with benign gynecological conditions serving as a control group (n=17).In general, the vitamin D-binding protein concentration was higher in serum than in peritoneal fluid. Women with endometriosis had higher serum but lower peritoneal levels of DBP compared with the control group; however, no significance was noted. When the endometriosis group was divided with regard to severity, an insignificantly higher serum level of DBP was observed in advanced endometriosis compared with the mild form of the disease, whereas the peritoneal concentration was not dependent on disease severity.It is concluded that serum and peritoneal DBP concentrations are not affected in women with endometriosis; however, based on the latest published data, it is possible that both the serum and peritoneal concentrations of vitamin D-binding protein may be dependent on Gc genotype, which results in differential modulation of monocyte/macrophage activity.Detection of endometriosis with the use of plasma protein profiling by surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry.In this prospective case-control study, we determined the role of surface-enhanced laser desorption and ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry in the detection of histologically proven endometriosis. In the plasma of the group with endometriosis, there were 20 different protein peaks, and the classifier showed a sensitivity of 87.5% and a specificity of 80% in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Artificial neural networks combined with surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization mass spectra distinguish endometriosis from healthy population.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry protein chip array technology was used to detect the serum proteomic patterns in patients with endometriosis. Four potential biomarkers (8,141 m/z, 6,096 m/z, 5,894 m/z, and 3,269 m/z) were found. This method showed great potential in screening better biomarkers for endometriosis.Serum CA-125 antigen levels increase during menses.Serum CA-125 antigen levels were measured by radioimmunoassay before and during menses in women with and without endometriosis. Mean CA-125 levels were significantly increased in both groups during menses. Samples obtained during menses represent a potential source of elevated levels and false positive results.Positive correlation between serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels in women with pelvic endometriosis.One of the diagnostic markers of endometriosis is CA-125, and elevated levels of this are caused by high concentrations in the ectopic endometrium. The objective of this study was to correlate CA-125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid from women with and without pelvic endometriosis.This was a prospective, cross-sectional, controlled study of consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopy for infertility, pelvic pain or tubal ligation, during early follicular phase, at the university hospital of Faculdade de Medicina de Ribeirão Preto.Fifty-two patients were divided into two groups: endometriosis group, consisting of 35 patients with biopsy-confirmed pelvic endometriosis, and control group, consisting of 17 patients without endometriosis. CA-125 levels in serum samples and peritoneal fluid were determined by chemiluminescence.CA-125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid were higher in patients with advanced pelvic endometriosis (means of 39.1 +/- 45.8 U/ml versus 10.5 +/- 5.9 U/ml in serum, p < 0.005; 1,469.4 +/- 1,350.4 U/ml versus 888.7 +/- 784.3 U/ml in peritoneal fluid, p < 0.05), and showed a positive correlation between each other (correlation coefficient (r) = 0.4880). Women with more advanced degrees of endometriosis showed higher CA-125 levels in both serum and peritoneal fluid (p = 0.0001).There is a positive correlation between serum and peritoneal fluid values of CA-125 in women with and without endometriosis, and their levels are higher in peritoneal fluid. Advanced endometriosis is related to higher levels in both serum and peritoneal fluid.Serum and peritoneal fluid proteins in women with and without endometriosis.We examined the proteins in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis (and of healthy controls) for evidence of an autoimmune response that might account for their impaired fertility. No antibodies against endometrial glycoproteins or against "progestin dependent endometrial protein" (PEP) were found in any serum or peritoneal fluid sample. Levels of PEP were not different in serum from women with moderate to severe endometriosis (n = 6), with mild endometriosis (n = 21), or from disease-free cycling controls (n = 19). PEP levels in peritoneal fluid from mild endometriosis and from controls did not differ but were elevated ten times in fluid obtained in the secretory phase from women with moderate to severe disease. This suggests that PEP levels in peritoneal fluid reflect the extent of ectopic endometrial growth. The salient finding was a heretofore undescribed protein (mol wt 70,000) in secretory phase peritoneal fluid samples (18/20) and its absence during the proliferative phase (0/35).Discovery of phosphatidylcholines and sphingomyelins as biomarkers for ovarian endometriosis.Current non-invasive diagnostic methods for endometriosis lack sensitivity and specificity. In search for new diagnostic biomarkers for ovarian endometriosis, we used a hypothesis-generating targeted metabolomics approach.In a case-control study, we collected plasma of study participants and analysed their metabolic profiles. We selected a group of 40 patients with ovarian endometriosis who underwent laparoscopic surgery and a control group of 52 healthy women who underwent sterilization at the University Clinical Centre Ljubljana, Slovenia. Over 140 targeted analytes included glycerophospholipids, sphingolipids and acylcarnitines. The analytes were quantified by electrospray ionization tandem mass spectrometry. For assessing the strength of association between the metabolite or metabolite ratios and the disease, we used crude and adjusted odds ratios. A stepwise logistic regression procedure was used for selecting the best combination of biomarkers.Eight lipid metabolites were identified as endometriosis-associated biomarkers due to elevated levels in patients compared with controls. A model containing hydroxysphingomyelin SMOH C16:1 and the ratio between phosphatidylcholine PCaa C36:2 to ether-phospholipid PCae C34:2, adjusted for the effect of age and the BMI, resulted in a sensitivity of 90.0%, a specificity of 84.3% and a ratio of the positive likelihood ratio to the negative likelihood ratio of 48.3.Our results suggest that endometriosis is associated with elevated levels of sphingomyelins and phosphatidylcholines, which might contribute to the suppression of apoptosis and affect lipid-associated signalling pathways. Our findings suggest novel potential routes for therapy by specifically blocking highly up-regulated isoforms of phosphpolipase A2 and lysophosphatidylcholine acyltransferase 4.Increased telomerase activity and human telomerase reverse transcriptase mRNA expression in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Endometriosis is considered a frequent, benign disease with the ability to undergo neoplastic processes. The aim of this study was to evaluate the limitless replication potential of the endometrium in patients with endometriosis by examining human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) mRNA expression and telomerase activity.Endometrium samples from 30 endometriosis patients and 30 patients without endometriosis were obtained via endometrial biopsy. The expression of hTERT mRNA was determined by real-time RT-PCR assay, and telomerase activity was measured by telomerase repeat amplification protocol (TRAP) assay.The mean normalized hTERT (N hTERT) mRNA level was significantly higher in the endometriosis than in the control group (P = 0.013). The mean hTERT mRNA levels during the proliferative phase and during the secretory phase were higher in the endometriosis group than in the control group, although the difference was only significant for the secretory phase (P = 0.036). We found a prominent difference in endometrial telomerase activity between moderate-to-severe endometriosis and the control group (P = 0.048). The levels of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity increased as the disease became more severe (P = 0.038, P = 0.016).This study showed the overexpression of hTERT mRNA and telomerase activity in the endometrium of endometriosis patients. These finding suggest that replication potential of endometrial cells may have an important role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Serum adiponectin concentrations are decreased in women with endometriosis.Adiponectin is a pleiotropic cytokine originally discovered as an adipocyte-specific gene product. Serum adiponectin concentrations have been reported to be low in women with endometrial cancer, breast cancer and uterine leiomyoma, suggesting possible involvement of adiponectin in these estrogen-related diseases. We thus addressed the relevance of adiponectin to endometriosis, an estrogen-dependent disease, in the present study.Women with (n = 48) and without (n = 30) endometriosis undergoing laparoscopy were recruited in this study. Blood samples were collected, and serum adiponectin concentrations were measured using a specific enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The relationship between laparoscopic findings and serum adiponectin concentrations was analysed.The adiponectin concentrations in the serum of the women with endometriosis (median, 13.1 microg/ml; interquartile range, 10.2 - 16.7) were significantly lower than those of the women without endometriosis (15.9 microg/ml, 13.5 - 19.5; P = 0.008). A significant negative correlation was found between serum adiponectin concentrations and both endometriosis scores (R = - 0.307, P = 0.006) and adhesion scores (R = - 0.254, P = 0.026) of the revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine classification of endometriosis.The present findings suggest that adiponectin is implicated in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.Serum-soluble CD23 in patients with endometriosis and the effect of treatment with danazol and leuprolide acetate depot injection.Activated B cells have recently been shown to produce soluble CD23 from their membranes. The serum-soluble CD23 concentration in 21 patients with pelvic pain diagnosed as having endometriosis and confirmed by histology, and in 18 patients without pelvic pain, who had a normal pelvis during laparoscopic sterilization, was studied by chemiluminescent enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The endometriosis patients were randomized to 3 months of either danazol or leuprolide acetate injection. Serum was taken before and after 3 months of therapy. The serum-soluble CD23 concentration was significantly elevated in patients with endometriosis when compared with the controls (P < 0.0001). There was no correlation between soluble CD23 concentrations and the severity of endometriosis (r = 0.48, P > 0.05). The serum concentration of soluble CD23 decreased significantly on treatment with danazol but not leuprolide acetate (P < 0.05). We conclude that the elevation of soluble CD23 in patients with endometriosis suggests that there is activation of B cells, which respond to danazol but not leuprolide acetate injection.Use of a new CA 125 assay in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum CA 125 concentrations are elevated in some women with endometriosis; however, the low sensitivity and specificity of the assay have made it impractical to use it as a diagnostic test for endometriosis. Recently a second-generation CA 125 assay has been developed. The purpose of this study was to compare serum CA 125 concentrations in women with and without endometriosis using both the older assay and the new CA 125 assay and to determine if the new assay concentration improves the clinical utility of CA 125 in the diagnosis of endometriosis. A total of 123 patients with endometriosis, pelvic pain or infertility were enrolled. Blood for CA 125 was drawn in the cycle preceding laparoscopy or laparotomy, and concentrations found by the older and newer assays were correlated with the patients' endometriosis stage using the revised American Fertility Society classification of endometriosis. The CA 125 concentrations determined by the new assay were highly correlated with concentrations determined by the older assay in patients with and without endometriosis (r = 0.96). The sensitivity and specificity were slightly improved using the new CA 125 assay; however, this assay did not dramatically improve detection of endometriosis.The influence of extracellular matrix proteins on T-cell proliferation and apoptosis in women with endometriosis or uterine leiomyoma.Interactions between the extracellular matrix (ECM) and peripheral blood T cells in women with endometriosis and leiomyoma are hardly unknown. We have investigated the influence of two major ECM components, collagen IV (C-IV) and fibronectin (Fn), on T-cell proliferation and apoptosis in women with endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma. beta1 integrin expression, responsible for interactions with ECM proteins, was also studied.Peripheral blood lymphocytes were obtained from 53 women (17 with uterine leiomyomas, 18 with endometriosis, and 18 from healthy donors). T cells were exposed to ECM proteins co-immobilized with monoclonal antibody anti-CD3 for 72 hr. Apoptosis and S phase of the cell cycle of the T cells were studied by DNA analysis using flow cytometry. The proliferation of T cells was evaluated by MTT assay. The percentage of CD3+ cells expressing CD29 (beta1 integrin chain) was evaluated by double-color flow cytometry. Results were analyzed statistically using the Mann-Whitney test.(1) A general increase in the percentage of T cells in S phase could be seen in women with endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma in all culture conditions what may suggest general activation of T cells. (2) A significant increase in the percentage of cells in S phase was shown only in the case of T cells exposed to anti-CD3 + C-IV in both women with uterine leiomyoma and endometriosis. (3) However, no apoptotic cells were observed. (4) T cells from patients with uterine leiomyoma exhibited significantly increased level of proliferation after culture with anti-CD3 + C-IV. (5) More T cells expressed beta1 integrin in women with endometriosis or uterine leiomyoma than in healthy donors. Our data may suggest that increased beta1 integrin expression may enhance T-cell-ECM interactions, which may be responsible for the increased proliferation of T cells but not for apoptosis. Therefore, it is possible that interactions of T cells with ECM proteins, especially with C-IV, may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma.Decreased natural killer cell activity in endometriosis patients: relationship to disease pathogenesis.A number of reports have measured NK cell activity in patients with endometriosis with varied results. Therefore we have examined the NK activity of PBL from 44 gynecological patients undergoing laparoscopy. This analysis has demonstrated a significant reduction in NK activity only in more severe stages of endometriosis (stages III and IV) relative to patients with milder disease and controls. These data indicate that decreased NK activity is unlikely to be a primary etiological factor in the development of endometriosis but may indicate that decreased NK activity is related to the development of the more frequent and/or larger lesions characteristic of severe endometriosis. These data could indicate potential for immunotherapy of patients with advanced endometriosis by the upregulation of NK activity in vivo.Antiendometrial autoantibodies are generated in patients with endometriosis.Our aim was to investigate endometrial antigens involved in the autoimmunity of endometriosis.We detected endometrial antigens against which autoantibodies directed with Western blotting.Thirteen (72.2%), 14 (77.8%), and 15 (83.3%) of 18 serum samples from endometriosis patients had antibodies reactive against endometrial antigen wtih MW of 26 kd, 34 kd, and 42 kd, respectively, while 6 (33.3%), 8 (44.4%), and 8 (44.4%) of 18 samples from normal control women reacted against these antigens, respectively. The frequencies of antibodies to the endometrial antigens were significantly (P < 0.05) higher in the endometriosis patients than in the normal control women. Antibodies in peritoneal fluid (PF) reacted against antigens with MW of 26, 34, 38, 42, and 64 kd, while those from the normal control reacted against antigens with MW of 38, 42, and 64 kd. Serum samples from normal fertile males did not show any reactivity against these endometrial antigens.Our results show that autoantibodies reactive against endometrial antigens are present in patients with endometriosis.Mitogen induced production of polyclonal IgG is decreased in women with severe endometriosis.The etiology and/or pathogenesis of endometriosis may involve aspects of both humoral and cellular immunity.In this investigation, we analyzed the ability of B lymphocytes from distinct patient groups for production of IgG1, IgG2, and IgG3 following in vitro stimulation with polyclonal B-cell mitogens (pokeweed mitogen and Staphylococcus aureus Cowan strain I) after in vitro stimulation with polyclonal B-cell activators.We observed that the in vitro production of IgG1, IgG2, and IgG3 was identical among fertile controls (no endometriosis; N = 22), infertile women without endometriosis (N = 22), infertile women without endometriosis (N = 20) and patients with stage 1 or 2 endometriosis (N = 31). In contrast, in vitro IgG2 production was significantly reduced among women with stage 3 or 4 endometriosis (N = 11) compared to controls (P < 0.001).Since the number of circulating B cells was similar in each patient group studied, the reduced production of IgG2 in patients with stage 3 or 4 disease was not merely due to fewer antibody producing cells in those subjects, and we speculate that the observed decrease in polyclonal IgG2 production among these patients is due to a primary defect. In additional studies, we observed that polyclonal IgG2 production was normal among stage 3 or 4 patients treated with danazol (N = 11), but significantly reduced in patients treated with gonadotropin releasing hormone agonists (N = 8). Although not conclusive, these data suggest that danazol may have the capacity to correct the defective production of polyclonal IgG2 in patients with severe endometriosis.Changes of soluble fas and soluble fas ligand in serum and peritoneal fluid of infertile patients with endometriosis.To evaluate the relationship between levels of soluble Fas (sFas) and soluble Fas ligand (sFasL) in serum and peritoneal fluid of endometriosis-associated infertility.The soluble Fas ligand and soluble Fas levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of 20 infertile patients with endometriosis were assessed with enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and were compared with 14 infertile patients due to chronic pelvic infectious disease and 16 fertile controls.The sFasL levels were significantly higher in infertile patients with endometriosis (175.09 +/- 80.55 pg/mL in serum and 284.50 +/- 152.38 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) than those of infertile controls (88.47 +/- 43.55 pg/mL in serum and 17.30 +/- 9.62 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) and fertile controls (16.13 +/- 11.75 pg/mL in serum and 8.84 +/- 2.31 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid). In contrast, as for the sFas levels, infertile patients with endometriosis (828.60 +/- 429.65 pg/mL in serum and 349.61 +/- 288.89 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) did not show any significant difference compared with those in infertile patients resulting from pelvic infectious disease (868.75 +/- 570.48 pg/mL in serum and 181.76 +/- 157.78 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid) and fertile control (822.26 +/- 129.12 pg/mL in serum and 318.42 +/- 145.16 pg/mL in peritoneal fluid).Based upon these results, high level of sFasL in serum and peritoneal fluid and thus apoptosis mediated by it may be implicated in the mechanism involved in endometriosis-related infertility.Expression of serum human leukocyte antigen and growth factor levels in a Greek family with familial endometriosis.An increased incidence of endometriosis in the first-degree relatives of patients with endometriosis has been reported, suggesting a familial predisposition and possible genetic influence. In this study, we present a family with four members who have histologically proven endometriosis (mother and three daughters) in two generations and one member with suspected endometriosis in the third generation. The aim of this study was to investigate the presence of serum-soluble class I and class II human leukocyte antigen (sHLA) levels, because they have been shown to be reduced in women with endometriosis. We also studied the levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and epidermal growth factor-receptor (EGF-Rc) whose function in angiogenesis implies an active role in endometriosis.Apart from the family members under study, the control groups consisted of 38 women with endometriosis and 30 without any pelvic disease. All the soluble factors under investigation were measured by an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay technique using a specific immunoassay.All the affected family members and the 38 women with endometriosis had very low levels of serum-soluble class I and class II HLA levels compared with healthy subjects. The circulating levels of VEGF were higher in the endometriosis group than the healthy control group, a pattern in accordance with the family members. On the contrary, EGF-Rc was negative in controls and women with endometriosis, with the exception of certain family members in specific stages of endometriosis.We studied the association of endometriosis with circulating levels of human leukocyte antigens and VEGF in two generations of a single family (mother and three daughters). These markers were expressed distinctly in women with familial endometriosis.Antibodies to carbonic anhydrase in endometriosis: prevalence, specificity, and relationship to clinical and laboratory parameters.To investigate the presence and clinical association of serum autoantibodies to carbonic anhydrase (CA) in women with and without endometriosis.Sera were tested in an ELISA against human and bovine CAI and/or CAII isoenzymes and by Western immunoblotting of trypsin-digested fragments of human CAII as antigens. The ELISA positivity was defined as mean + 2 SD of 100 control sera. Positive sera also were tested for the presence of antiendometrial antibodies and antinuclear antibodies (ANA) by indirect immunofluorescence assays (IFA) on endometrial (ECC) and HEp-2 cells, antibodies to single-stranded (ss) and double-stranded (ds) DNA by the Farr-type RIA and Crithidia IFA, and extractable nuclear antigens (Sm, nRNP, Ro, and La) by an ELISA.Sera from 319 patients with laparoscopic diagnosed pelvic endometriosis (100 stage I, 95 stage II, 67 stage III, and 57 stage IV), 100 with other gynecologic disorders, and 100 control women were used.In the ELISA, 113 of 319 (35.4%) endometriosis sera had elevated immunoglobulin G antibodies against nondenatured CA isoenzymes. The reactivity of sera from the endometriosis group was significantly higher (35%) in all four subgroups of patients than each of the nonendometriosis sera (< 12% and < 6%, respectively). No stage-dependent variation of an autoantibody pattern was evident. However, anti-CA autoantibodies were present in 66.3% of women with endometriosis-associated infertility. The frequency of anti-CA autoantibodies was significantly higher (by 51.7%) in women with antiendometrial antibodies detectable by IFA. In addition, in sera positive for anti-CA antibodies, the frequency of ANA also was increased (20/113 [17.6%]) with titers of 1:40 to 1:1,080. The ANA-positive sera were negative for anti-ssDNA, anti-dsDNA, anti-Sm, anti-nRNP, and anti-La. However, three sera were positive for anti-Ro antibodies. Immunoblotting study of autoantibody reactivity with trypsin-digested subfragments of human CAII revealed consistent immunoreactivity with 14 to 6.2-kd range CAII peptides.[1] A subgroup of patients with endometriosis have autoantibodies directed to native and linear epitopes of the CA protein. [2] Prevalence of anti-CA antibodies was associated with antiendometrial antibodies and ANA. [3] Anti-CA antibodies were associated with a higher predictive value of the disease when all patient subgroups were considered together.Use of CA125 fluctuation during the menstrual cycle as a tool in the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis; a preliminary report.To elucidate whether endometriosis can be diagnosed clinically by assessing the differences between serum CA125 levels during menstruation and during the rest of the menstrual cycle.The study was performed in 28 patients who underwent laparoscopy to check for pelvic causes of infertility. Patients with endometriosis were selected as the study group, and patients with normal laparoscopic findings functioned as the control group. Blood specimens were taken for CA125 determination during menstruation and during the rest of the menstrual cycle. Mean serum CA125 concentrations were compared by the two-sample t-test for between-group comparisons and the paired t-test for within-group comparisons. The receiver operating characteristic curve was applied to assess the usefulness of CA125 level changes during the menstrual cycle in the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis.The mean CA125 concentrations of healthy women during menstruation and during the rest of the menstrual cycle were 12.2 and 10 U ml(-1), respectively. In this group, the mean CA125 concentration was an average of 22% higher during menstruation than during the rest of the menstrual cycle (P < 0.001). The patients with endometriosis showed a similar pattern to that of normal women, but the levels differed by 198.3% in these patients (P < 0.001). Mean CA125 concentrations of these patients during menstruation and in the rest of the cycle were 35.8 and 12 U ml(-1), respectively. The mean CA125 concentration during menstruation was significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in normal women (P < 0.001), but CA125 concentrations at other points in the menstrual cycle were found to be similar in both groups (P > 0.05). ROC curve analyses set a cutoff of 83% (percentage increment of CA125 level during menstruation compared with that on days without menstrual bleeding), which gives a sensitivity of 93% and specificity of 92%, with a corresponding likelihood ratio of 11.3.It may be possible to diagnose endometriosis clinically by assessment of the differences in CA125 level during menstruation as against the remainder of the menstrual cycle.[Establishment of serum peptidome pattern-based diagnostic model of endometriosis].To establish a diagnostic model of endometriosis by analyzing serum peptidome patterns in patients with endometriosis using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization-time of flight mass spectrometry (MALDI-TOF-MS).Serum samples from 21 endometriosis patients and 29 healthy control subjects were analyzed using MALDI-TOF-MS and Clinprotools 2.0 software to establish the diagnostic model of endometriosis, which was validated using the serum samples from 10 endometriosis patients and 15 healthy controls.Eighteen statistically significant peptide peaks were obtained with the m/z value ranging from 1,000 to 10,000 (P<0.01). Among the peaks, 12 were down-regulated and 6 up-regulated. The sensitivity and specificity of the model was 90.9% and 100.0%, respectively, with a diagnostic accuracy of 96.2%.This model shows the feasibility of using MALDI-TOF-MS and Clinprotools software to identify the biomarkers of endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and serum concentration of interleukin-16 in women with endometriosis.Soluble interleukin-1 receptor type II blocks monocyte chemotactic protein-1 secretion by U937 cells in response to peripheral blood serum of women with endometriosis.To assess the ability of peripheral blood serum from women with endometriosis to induce monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) secretion by monocytes and the putative role of the interleukin-1 (IL-1) system in endometriosis-associated monocyte activation.Cultures of U937 monocytic cells exposed to serum from normal women (control group) or women with endometriosis.Gynecology clinic and human reproduction research laboratory.Seventy-nine women with endometriosis and 38 control women with no evidence of endometriosis at laparoscopy.Peripheral blood obtained a few days before laparoscopy.MCP-1 secretion in the culture medium and serum concentrations of soluble IL-1 receptor type II (sIL-1RII), IL-1beta, and IL-1alpha by ELISA or by enzyme immunometric assay.Serum concentrations of sIL-1RII were significantly lower in women with stage I-II endometriosis than in control women, whereas serum concentrations of IL-1beta and IL-1alpha were comparable between the two groups. The serum of women with endometriosis induced higher secretion of MCP-1 by U937 cells than that of control women, particularly in the initial stages of endometriosis (stages I-II), and recombinant IL-1RII (rIL-1RII) significantly blocked that secretion.These findings point toward a deficiency in the mechanisms involved in the down-regulation of IL-1 actions at the systemic level and reveal sIL-1RII as a key factor involved in that process.Is HE4 a useful endometrioma marker?By the comparison between most used tumor marker trend (cancer antigen 125: CA 125 and human epididymal secretory protein E4: HE4) before and after laparoscopic surgery, the aim of the present study was to assess HE4 usefulness in ovarian benign cyst and endometrioma diagnosis.Thirty-eight patients were enrolled in this prospective study: 25 women underwent unilateral endometriosis ovarian cyst excision, 13 underwent benign ovarian cyst incision, and 26 were healthy controls. CA 125 and HE4 serum levels were estimated before surgery (in the early proliferative phase of the cycle) and one month after surgery.A statistically significant decrease of CA 125 serum level was found after an endometrioma surgical excision but no decreases in HE4 serum level.In patients with endometrioma, no alteration was found in HE4 serum levels before and after surgery, while CA125 serum levels decreased after surgery. HE4 may better distinguish a malign cyst from benign one, but it is not useful in the diagnosis of low risk endometrioma.Performance of peripheral (serum and molecular) blood markers for diagnosis of endometriosis.To quantify the mRNA levels of MMP-3, MMP-9, VEGF and Survivin in peripheral blood and the serum levels of CA-125 and Ca19-9 in women with and without endometriosis and to investigate the performance of these markers to differentiate between deep and ovarian endometriosis.A case control study enrolled a series of 60 patients. Twenty controls have been matched with 20 cases of ovarian and 20 cases of deep endometriosis. Univariable and multivariable performance of serum CA125 and CA19-9, mRNA for Survivin, MMP9, MMP3 and VEGF genes have been evaluated by means of ROC curves and logistic regression, respectively.No difference in markers' concentration was detected between ovarian and deep endometriosis. In comparison with controls, serum CA125 and CA19 yielded the better sensitivity followed by mRNA for Survivin gene (81.5, 51.9 and 7.5% at 10% false positive rate, respectively). Multivariable estimated odds of endometriosis yielded a sensitivity of 87% at the same false positive rate.A combination of serum and molecular markers could allow a better diagnosis of endometriosis.The use of biochemical markers in the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate CA 125 II, C-reactive protein (CRP) and serum amyloid A (SAA) and anticardiolipin antibody (aCL) concentrations for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis. The study population consisted of 15 women without endometriosis, as confirmed by laparoscopy (group A), and 35 patients with pelvic endometriosis diagnosed by laparoscopy or laparotomy (group B). Group B patients were divided into those at stages I and II of the disease (BI/II) and those at stages III and IV (BIII/IV). Blood samples were obtained twice during the menstrual cycle: on day 1, 2 or 3 of the cycle and on day 8, 9 or 10 of the cycle. CA 125 II and CRP concentrations were higher in group III/IV patients compared with healthy controls, mainly during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle; SAA concentrations were also higher in this group of patients compared with healthy controls, but only during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle. Immunoglobulin (Ig) M aCL concentrations were higher in all patients with endometriosis compared with healthy controls, mainly during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle. It is concluded that these determinations may contribute to the diagnosis and the indication of treatment for pelvic endometriosis. Determination of CA 125 II concentrations at the beginning of the menstrual cycle may aid the diagnosis of stage III and IV endometriosis. IgM aCL appears to be associated with the presence of all stages of the disease, while SAA values are elevated in severe situations. Measurement of these molecules may therefore provide a valuable tool in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.Serum biomarker for diagnosis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is estimated to affect 10% of women during the reproductive years. The lack of a non-invasive diagnostic test significantly contributes to the long delay between onset of the symptoms and definitive diagnosis of endometriosis. This case-control study was conducted to identify specific endometriosis antigens using 2D gel analysis in women with endometriosis (n = 5) and without endometriosis (n = 5). Differentially expresses spots were analyzed using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization-time-of-flight/mass spectrometry (nanoLC-ESI-MS/MS) with MASCOT analysis, in order to identify the corresponding proteins. ELISAs were performed on a different cohort of endometriosis (n = 120) and healthy patients (n = 20) in order to confirm the differential expression of the identified proteins. ROC analysis of ELISA results confirmed the statistical significance of the differential expression for one of these proteins: Zn-alpha2-glycoprotein (P = 0.019). We propose the analysis of the expression level of this protein in the serum as a new non-invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis.[Evaluation of tumor necrosis factor-alpha and tumor necrosis factor-beta in serum of patients with endometriosis].To evaluate the levels of tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) and tumor necrosis factor-beta (TNF-beta) before and after conservative laparoscopic surgery in patients with endometriosis.The levels of TNF-alpha and TNF-beta in the serum of both 82 patients with EMS and 68 controls were determined by ELISA.The levels of TNF-alpha and TNF-beta in the serum of patients with EMS were significantly higher than those of the controls (P < 0.01), and they increased with the clinical terms ( P < 0.05). After clearance of endometrosis foci with laparoscopic conservative surgery, the TNF-alpha levels decreased significantly in EMS III - IV, and TNF-beta levels decreased significantly in EMS I - IV.Measuring TNF-alpha and TNF-beta levels in the serum of patients with EMS may have important value in postoperative follow-up, surveillance and evaluation of the effectiveness of the surgery.Immune rosettes of T and B lymphocytes in infertile women with endometriosis.We examined the cell-mediated immune response in women with pelvic endometriosis by quantitating their T and B lymphocytes. The study was conducted on heparinized peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid. The results were compared with those in a control group of women without evidence of endometriosis. Each patient underwent laparoscopy as part of her infertility evaluation. The ability of T cells to form rosettes with sheep erythrocytes was used to estimate the percentage of total and active T cells. B lymphocytes were quantitated by erythrocyte antibody complement binding capacity. In addition, T and B lymphocytes were assayed with the Immunobead technique using specific monoclonal antibodies. The helper T cell (T4) and suppressor T cell (T8) subsets of lymphocytes were evaluated with specific monoclonal antibodies coupled to microbeads. The results demonstrated an increased number of T and B cells in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood from patients with endometriosis as compared with controls. Furthermore, the ratio T4:T8 was significantly increased in patients with endometriosis. These results suggest a cell-mediated immune response in the presence of endometriosis.Autoantibodies in endometriosis sera recognize a Thomsen-Friedenreich-like carbohydrate antigen.Autoantibody responses to endometrial antigens are a common feature of endometriosis. Antibody responses to a number of serum and tissue antigens such as alpha(2)-Heremans Schmidt glycoprotein (alpha(2)-HSG), transferrin, and carbonic anhydrase have been identified. The nature of the epitopes recognized on these proteins has not been determined. In this study we show that the serum antibody response to alpha(2)-HSG and carbonic anhydrase is against a common carbohydrate epitope which is also expressed on bovine fetuin. Removal of carbohydrate moieties from these antigens resulted in loss of antibody binding. Antibody reactivity with alpha(2)-HSG, fetuin and other antigens was removed by binding with the lectin jacalin. Jacalin specifically binds the Thomsen-Friedenreich antigen (Galbeta1-3GalNAc). Demonstrating that the autoantibodies also reacted with other Thomsen-Friedenreich antigen-bearing proteins, serum IgA1 and haemopexin confirmed an association with this epitope. These antigens have not been previously described as autoantigens in endometriosis and are of interest since they raise the possibility that this autoimmune response may either play a direct role in the disease process or reflect an abnormality of glycosylation in endometriosis. These results may also prove useful in the development of a serum diagnostic test for endometriosis.Soluble ICAM-1 levels in the serum of endometriotic patients appear to be independent of medical treatment.Adhesion molecules regulate the interaction of cells with the extracellular matrix and/or other cells. The intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1; CD54) is a member of the immunoglobulin superfamily and expressed by several cell types, including leukocytes and endothelial cells. A circulating form of the usually membrane-bound molecule was identified and characterized in normal human serum and in sera from patients with endometriosis. In the present study, we established the serum-soluble ICAM-1 (sICAM-1) levels in patients with endometriosis. We also studied the effect of danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot on the levels of sICAM-1. Thirty-eight women, 18-45 years of age, with regular menses and documented pelvic endometriosis were recruited from a University Hospital setting. Twenty-two women with endometriosis were randomly divided into two groups. Danazol (600 mg) were given every day for 6 months, and 3.75 mg of leuprorelin acetate depot every 28 days for 6 months. Serum sICAM-1 concentrations were measured before, during and after treatment, and its quantitative determination was performed by an ELISA technique using a specific immunoassay. We found that (1) sICAM-1 levels were higher in women with endometriosis in comparison to healthy subjects; (2) the 6 month treatment with danazol or leuprorelin acetate depot increased sICAM-1 levels (P<0.001); (3) 3 months after termination of both treatments, sICAM-1 levels were unchanged. Although the mechanism leading to the increase of sICAM-1 needs to be further clarified, any benefits of medical treatment of endometriosis such as danazol or leuprorelin appear to be independent of changes in ICAM-1 serum levels.The possible anti-inflammatory role of circulating human leukocyte antigen levels in women with endometriosis after treatment with danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot.Endometriosis is defined as an inflammatory condition of the female reproductive tract, a state often associated with infertility and miscarriage. Many exogenously administered factors (treatments) control the disease via as yet unknown pathways. Possible candidate molecules involved in these mechanisms could be the serum-soluble human leukocyte antigens (sHIA) that have been detected in a variety of human body fluids and that are associated with several diseases.We here examine how danazol and leuprorelin acetate depot treatments exert their anti-inflammatory action. It is plausible that subtle alterations mediated by these treatments and in relation to sHLA may explain the pathophysiology of endometriosis and provide insights towards new therapeutic protocols.Indirect enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA), using specific monoclonal antibodies, determined serum-soluble class-I and class-II HLA levels. ELISA readings from treated women were compared with normal healthy subjects.Serum-soluble class-I and class-II HLA levels are statistically significantly lower (P < 0.001) in women with endometriosis than in the control groups. However, danazol but not leuprorelin acetate depot administration augments soluble HLA class I and class II (P < 0.01 and P < 0.001, respectively) to normal levels during the treatment period, an increase that may account for the anti-inflammatory effect and the remission observed.It is shown that one of the underlying causes of endometriosis may be the lack of both circulating class-I and class-II antigen levels. Danazol administration acts via an induced release of these antigens, whose presence correlates with the degree of the inflammatory alleviation obtained. We thus provide evidence that the inflammatory state of the disease appears to be associated with soluble HLA levels because, 3 months after ceasing therapy, the circulating antigens in the serum return to the same levels that correspond to the pathological condition.Comparison of the clinical value of CA 19-9 versus CA 125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Preoperative blood samples and intraoperative tissue specimens were obtained from 101 patients with endometriosis and 78 patients without endometriosis referred for benign gynecologic operations to investigate the clinical value of serum and tissue CA 19-9 levels in the diagnostic evaluation of endometriosis as compared to CA 125. Our prospective cohort study showed that serum CA 19-9 is a valuable marker in the diagnosis of endometriosis, and it may be used to predict the patients with severe endometriosis when used with CA 125.Serum CA 125 as a marker for patients with external endometriosis.Serum CA 125 levels were assayed in 75 healthy female controls and 34 patients with external endometriosis prior to treatment, during treatment, and after treatment. The results of the assay showed that the mean pretreatment serum CA 125 level of the patients with external endometriosis (80.7 U/mL) was significantly (P less than .001) higher than that of the controls (17.9 U/mL). This difference was even more pronounced for those patients with progressive (stage III or IV) endometriosis (mean = 114.0 U/mL). Thus, the assay of serum CA 125 may be useful as an auxiliary tool in the diagnosis of progressive endometriosis. Although the high pretreatment level of serum CA 125 decreased after danazol treatment of 400 mg/day to within the normal limits, usually within 4 to 12 weeks, laparoscopic examinations indicated that most of the endometriosis cases were not cured until 12-16 weeks of danazol treatment.Elevation of CA 19-9 and chromogranin A, in addition to CA 125, are detectable in benign tumors in leiomyomas and endometriosis.As the best-known tumor marker for ovarian carcinoma, CA 125 has also been commonly used to monitor patients with common benign gynecologic diseases such as endometriosis and leiomyoma. Both of these benign tumors are known to be at risk of developing into cancer. During the screening of an asymptomatic population with multiple tumor markers, including alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), prostate-specific antigen (PSA), CA 125, CA 19-9, CA 15-3, chromogranin A (CgA), and squamous cell carcinoma antigen (SCC), we have detected elevated tumor markers in 142 individuals; 19 of them were diagnosed with endometriosis or leiomyoma or both. In addition to the detection of elevation of CA 125 in these benign tumors, elevated CA 19-9 or CgA was also found in these patients with endometriosis or leiomyoma. Many patients only had elevated CA 19-9 or CgA; the elevation of CA 125 was not detected. It appears that instead of monitoring only CA 125, as is traditionally done, multiple tumor markers, including CA 19-9, CgA, and CA 125, should be measured simultaneously in women with clinical disorders associated with the ovary or uterus in order to detect gynecologic benign tumors and in order to prevent further development of cancer.Serum concentrations of soluble human leukocyte class I antigens and of the soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in endometriosis: relationship with stage and non-pigmented peritoneal lesions.Serum concentrations of soluble human leukocyte class I antigens (sHLA-I) and of the intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (sICAM-1) are increased in the early inflammatory stages of several immune-related diseases. These soluble molecules also exert immunomodulatory activity, including regulation of natural killer (NK) cell cytotoxicity. The aim of this study was to verify whether sHLA-I and sICAM-1 serum concentrations are related to the various stages of pelvic endometriosis, which is an immune-related disorder associated with impaired in-vitro NK cell activity. Serum sHLA-I and sICAM-1 concentrations were similar in patients and in healthy donors. However, when evaluated according to disease stage, sHLA-I and sICAM-1 concentrations were higher in patients with endometriosis stage I-II (revised American Fertility Society classification), or with non-pigmented peritoneal lesions. In conclusion, studies on sHLA-I and sICAM-1 may help to clarify the pathogenic mechanisms of endometriosis, and their serum concentrations may serve as additional markers for the early detection of recurrence of the disease during the monitoring of treatment outcome.Plasma urocortin levels in the diagnosis of ovarian endometriosis.Urocortin is a neuropeptide, member of the corticotropin-releasing hormone family, that is produced by the human endometrium. Ovarian endometrioma is a prevalent gynecologic disorder still lacking specific serum markers. In the present study we measured systemic levels of urocortin to assess the diagnostic performance of its determination in distinguishing endometriomas from other benign ovarian cysts.Plasma urocortin was measured by radioimmunoassay in women with ovarian endometrioma (n=40) and in women with benign, nonendometriotic ovarian cysts (n=40). The diagnostic accuracy of urocortin measurement was evaluated by receiver operating characteristic curve and compared with the standard marker, CA 125. To support the local origin of the peptide, we also evaluated its localization in endometriomas by immunohistochemistry and its concentrations in cyst fluid and peritoneal fluid of 12 women with endometrioma.Plasma urocortin levels were twice as high in women with endometrioma (median 49 pg/mL, interquartile range 41-63 pg/mL) than in the control group (19 [15-23] pg/mL, P<.001) and significantly higher in the cystic content of endometriomas than in the peritoneal fluid and plasma (P<.05). The peptide was immunolocalized in endometrioma glands and stromal capillary vessels. Elevated plasma urocortin levels detected 88% of the cases of endometrioma with 90% specificity, whereas CA 125 detected only 65% of the cases with the same specificity.Plasma urocortin is increased in women with endometriomas, and its measurement may be useful for the differential diagnosis of endometrioma compared with other benign ovarian cysts.II.High serum follistatin levels in women with ovarian endometriosis.Follistatin is an activin-binding protein produced by several tissues, including endometrium and endometriotic implants. We aimed to quantify follistatin in patients with ovarian endometriosis and investigate its value as a diagnostic marker.Women undergoing laparoscopic excision of ovarian endometrioma (n = 52) or other benign ovarian cysts (n = 52) were studied, plus women with non-ovarian endometriosis (n = 11) and healthy controls (n = 27). Serum was collected from all subjects, and peritoneal and cystic fluid from a subset with endometrioma. Follistatin was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The diagnostic accuracy of follistatin to detect endometrioma was evaluated by receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve and compared with cancer antigen (CA)-125.Serum follistatin was increased in women with ovarian endometrioma (2080 +/- 94 pg/ml) compared with controls (545 +/- 49 pg/ml, P < 0.001), other benign ovarian cysts (795 +/- 60 pg/ml, P < 0.001) or non-ovarian endometriosis (1271 +/- 115 pg/ml, P < 0.001). Cystic fluid showed a higher concentration of follistatin (9850 +/- 4461 pg/ml) than peritoneal fluid (1885 +/- 261 pg/ml, P < 0.001) and serum (P < 0.001). Follistatin levels detected 48/52 cases of endometrioma (92% sensitivity) at 1433 pg/ml cut-off, corresponding to 92% specificity. CA-125 detected only 44% of endometriomas with 90% specificity. ROC curve comparison showed follistatin was more accurate than CA-125 to discriminate women with endometrioma either from controls or women with other benign ovarian cysts (P < 0.0001).Serum follistatin is increased in women with endometriosis and allows clear distinction between endometrioma and other benign ovarian cysts. Follistatin has the sensitivity and specificity to become a useful clinical marker of ovarian endometrioma.miRNA-199a-5p regulates VEGFA in endometrial mesenchymal stem cells and contributes to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.It is believed that endometrial miRNAs contribute to the aetiology of endometriosis in stem cells; however, the mechanisms remain unclear. Here we collected serum samples from patients with or without endometriosis and characterized the miRNA expression profiles of these two groups. MicroRNA-199a-5p (miR-199a-5p) was dramatically down-regulated in patients with endometriosis compared with control patients. In addition, we found that the tumour suppressor gene, SMAD4, could elevate miR-199a-5p expression in ectopic endometrial mesenchymal stem cells. Up-regulation of miR-199a-5p suppressed cell proliferation, motility and angiogenesis of these ectopic stem cells by targeting the 3' untranslated region of VEGFA. Furthermore, we established an animal model of endometriosis and found that miR-199a-5p could decrease the size of endometriotic lesions in vivo. Taken together, this newly identified miR-199a-5p module provides a new avenue to the understanding of the processes of endometriosis development, especially proliferation, motility and angiogenesis, and may facilitate the development of potential therapeutics against endometriosis.[Leptin levels and infertile patients with endometriosis].[Measurements of interleukin-18 in peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with endometriosis].Aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and its relationship to clinical and analytical findings.To study the relationship between aromatase expression in endometriotic tissues and clinical and laboratory findings.Prospective basic and clinical research.University hospital.Sixty-two women with endometriosis, and 12 without endometriosis.Conservative surgery, or hysterectomy and adnexectomy, along with an immunohistochemical study of aromatase in endometriotic and nonendometriotic tissues.Symptoms of the disease, ultrasound and surgical findings, values of tumor markers, steroids and immunoglobulins, and recurrences after surgery.We observed positive immunohistochemical expression for aromatase in endometriotic tissues from 38 patients (61.3%). Aromatase expression was negative in the rest of the tissues studied and in the 12 cases without endometriosis. Aromatase-positive patients had a higher number of endometriomas, more bilaterality, and more moderate-to-severe chronic pelvic pain. Also, infertility and associated leiomyomas were more frequent in these patients, though without significant differences. There were no differences in recurrence of the disease 1 year later. Estradiol and PRL levels were significantly higher, and IgG values lower, than in aromatase-negative patients. High values of blood sedimentation rate were more frequent in aromatase-negative patients.Molecular alterations such as the presence of aromatase in endometriotic tissues could be involved in the development or maintenance of endometriosis. Our findings suggest major severity, activity, and chronic pelvic pain in patients with aromatase in endometriotic tissue.Diagnostic value of the neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio and the combination of serum CA-125 for stages III and IV endometriosis.Currently, all the diagnostic indicators for endometriosis lack perfect sensitivity and specificity. According to the characteristic of endometriosis, we analyzed the new biomarker neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio (NLR) and the combination of NLR and serum CA-125 to investigate their diagnostic value for identifying stages III and IV endometriosis.The values of serum CA-125 and routine blood tests were collected from 197 patients with endometriosis, 102 with benign tumors and 112 healthy individuals. We investigated the sensitivity and specificity of NLR and its combination with serum-CA-125 for diagnosing stages III and IV endometriosis by using receiver operating characteristic (ROC).The mean values of NLR, the combination of serum CA-125 and NLR (combination) of the groups with stages III and IV endometriosis were significantly higher than the other two groups. Serum CA-125, NLR, and the combined biomarkers could significantly discriminate the stages III and IV endometriosis group from the other two groups (P < 0.05). NLR shows a lower sensitivity of 57.9% and specificity of 65.2% with a cutoff value at 1.82. And the combination of biomarkers has the highest AUC of 0.949 with a sensitivity of 86.8% and specificity of 92.0% at the cutoff value of 44.40. In addition, for patients with negative CA-125, 55.36% and 53.57% of the patients were able to be diagnosed with endometriosis by using NLR alone and the combination of biomarkers.For diagnosing stages III and IV endometriosis, the neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio is a better adjuvant to serum CA-125, and the neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio is valuable in diagnosing stages III and IV endometriosis for patients with negative serum CA-125.Concentrations of alpha-fetoprotein, insulin-like growth factor binding protein-3, c-erbB-2, and epidermal growth factor in serum of patients with endometriosis.Endometriosis, although it is a benign disorder, shares many similarities with cancer. There is increasing levels of evidence suggesting that some circulating factors involved in gynecologic cancers, such as alpha-fetoprotein (AFP), insulin-like growth factor binding protein-3 (IGFBP-3), c-erbB-2 (HER-2/neu), and epidermal growth factor (EGF), could also play a role in endometriosis. Hence, the present study was aimed at evaluating whether the levels of these molecules are modulated in the serum of patients with endometriosis.Levels of AFP, IGFBP-3, c-erbB-2, and EGF were determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in serum from 36 subjects with surgically confirmed endometriosis and 36 controls with no surgical evidence of the disease. In addition, information such as demographic characteristics, personal habits, menstrual characteristics, and clinical profile was collected from each participating subject.No significant difference was found between serum levels of AFP, IGFBP-3, c-erbB-2, and EGF in patients with endometriosis and controls, even when we adjusted for potential confounders and took into account the menstrual cycle. Moreover, no correlation was observed between the serum concentrations of these molecules and the stage of the disease. However, a correlation was detected between soluble levels of IGFBP-3 and presence of uterine leiomyoma.Although AFP, IGFBP-3, c-erbB-2, and EGF are not altered in the circulation of patients with endometriosis, their involvement in the development of endometriotic lesions cannot be excluded.Anti-endometrial IgM autoantibodies in endometriotic patients: a preliminary study.Japanese herbal medicines (Kampo medicines) are usually the third most popular choice among medicines for treatment of endometriosis in Japan. This traditional therapy is used to improve various signs and symptoms of endometriosis without decreasing serum estradiol levels or causing menstrual disorders. We used flow cytometry to examine and compare the effects of the Kampo therapy and danazol on anti-endometrial humoral immunity. Autoantibodies against endometrial epithelial cell lines and endometrial stromal cells were detectable in all the examined sera of men and women irrespective of the presence of endometriosis. Moreover, no significant increase in anti-endometrial antibodies was found in endometriotic patients. Anti-endometrial antibodies included Ig-gamma chain, Ig-mu chain, Ig-kappa chain, and Ig-lambda chain indicating polyclonal B cell activation in the endometriotic patients. Absorption tests of nonspecific antibodies with cervical cancer cells or ovarian cancer cells revealed that endometriotic patients had higher levels of endometrium-specific autoantibodies than did non-endometriotic healthy women. IgM fractions from endometriotic patients and healthy women differed in their effect on growth of endometrial adenocarcinoma cells. Therapy with the herbal compounds Keishi-bukuryo-gan but not danazol therapy, gradually decreased the tissue-specific anti-endometrial IgM antibody levels. These results indicate that tissue-specific anti-endometrial IgM may be a useful therapeutic marker for endometriotic patients treated with Keishi-bukuryo-gan and that endometrial tissue-specific immune disorders play specific roles in the pathogenesis or development of endometriosis.Serum paraoxonase-1 activity in women with endometriosis and its relationship with the stage of the disease.There is increasing evidence that oxidative stress may play a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. Serum paraoxonase-1 (PON-1) is a high-density lipoprotein (HDL) associated enzyme that prevents oxidative modification of low-density lipoprotein (LDL). The aims of the study were to (i) compare the serum PON-1 activity in women with endometriosis versus controls and (ii) assess whether PON-1 activity can be used as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.A total of 87 women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy were divided into groups by visual diagnosis at surgery: control patients (n = 40) with no pathologic findings; endometriosis sufferers with minimal to mild (n = 24) and moderate to severe (n = 23) stage. Serum PON-1 activity was measured spectrophotometrically. Lipid hydroperoxide (LOOH) levels were measured by iodometric assay. Serum triglyceride (TG), total cholesterol (TC), HDL and LDL levels were also determined.PON-1 activity was significantly lower whereas LOOH levels were significantly higher in women with moderate to severe endometriosis than in women with minimal to mild endometriosis and controls, and in women with minimal to mild endometriosis compared with control groups (P < 0.0001, for all). A significant negative correlation was found between PON-1 activity and stage of the disease (r=-0.74, P < 0.0001). PON-1 activity and HDL levels were decreased whereas LOOH, TG, TC and LDL levels increased in all women with endometriosis versus controls (all P < 0.0001).Reduced serum PON-1 activity and increased LOOH might contribute to the increased susceptibility for the development of atherosclerosis. PON-1 activity can be used as a diagnostic test to detect endometriosis.Evaluation of CA-125 and soluble CD-23 in patients with pelvic endometriosis: a case-control study.To evaluate serum concentrations of CA-125 and soluble CD-23 and to correlate them with clinical symptoms, localization and stage of pelvic endometriosis and histological classification of the disease.Blood samples were collected from 44 women with endometriosis and 58 without endometriosis, during the first three days (1st sample) and during the 7th, 8th and 9th day (2nd sample) of the menstrual cycle. Measurements of CA-125 and soluble CD-23 were performed by ELISA. Mann-Whitney U test was used for age, pain evaluations (visual analog scale) and biomarkers concentrations.Serum levels of CA125 were higher in endometriosis patients when compared to the control group during both periods of the menstrual cycle evaluated in the study. This marker was also elevated in women with chronic pelvic pain, deep dyspareunia (2nd sample), dysmenorrhea (both samples) and painful defecation during the menstrual flow (2nd sample). CA-125 concentration was higher in advanced stages of the disease in both samples and also in women with ovarian endometrioma. Concerning CD-23, no statistically significant differences were observed between groups.The concentrations of CA-125 were higher in patients with endometriosis than in patients without the disease. No significantly differences were observed for soluble CD-23 levels between groups.[Selected immunologic markers for evaluation of peripheral blood in patients with internal endometriosis].In group of 16 patients with internal endometriosis verified by histopathological investigations following immunological indices in peripheral blood were estimated: 1) number of leucocytes and neutrophils, 2) neutrophil adherence to fibres, 3) phagocytic activity of neutrophil using the latex granules, 4) concentration of immunological complexes in serum. The results were compared with those in control group (20 healthy women). In patients with internal endometriosis compared to control group the increase of the number of leucocytes and neutrophils and decrease of phagocytic activity of neutrophils were observed.Hyperprolactinemia and luteal insufficiency in infertile patients with mild and minimal endometriosis.The objective of the present paper was to assess the presence of hormonal alterations in infertile women with stage I or II endometriosis (Group III, n = 20) compared to fertile women without endometriosis (Group I, n = 14) and to fertile women with endometriosis (Group II, n = 7). Serum levels of FSH, LH, estradiol, TSH, and PRL were measured between days 1 and 5 of the early follicular phase; in the luteal phase, three serum samples were collected for progesterone measurement, and endometrial biopsies were performed. Serum estradiol levels were lower (p = 0.035) in infertile patients with endometriosis than in fertile patients without endometriosis. Six infertile patients with endometriosis presented prolactin levels above 20 ng/ml. This was not observed in the other groups. Luteal insufficiency was more frequent in infertile patients with endometriosis (78.9%) than in fertile patients with (42.9%) or without endometriosis (0%). In a multiple logistic regression analysis, only the presence of endometriosis and infertility was significantly associated with luteal insufficiency. The serum levels of LH, FSH, and TSH were not significantly different among the groups. Luteal insufficiency and altered prolactin secretion were associated with endometriosis, and could be important mechanisms causing infertility in this group of patients.Clinical usefulness of determination of CA 125 levels in the serum and menstrual blood.We measured CA 125 levels in sera and menstrual blood of subjects with a normal ovulatory cycle and in those with endometriosis. Serum CA 125 levels were higher in the latter, in each phase of the menstrual cycle. The CA 125 levels in patients with endometriosis, particularly those with adenomyosis, tend to be higher than in those with a normal ovulatory cycle. We propose that measurement of CA 125 in the menstrual blood may be able to help distinguishing adenomyosis from myoma uteri and may also help in assessing clinical endometriosis.Non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis based on a combined analysis of six plasma biomarkers.Lack of a non-invasive diagnostic test contributes to the long delay between onset of symptoms and diagnosis of endometriosis. The aim of this study was to evaluate the combined performance of six potential plasma biomarkers in the diagnosis of endometriosis.This case-control study was conducted in 294 infertile women, consisting of 93 women with a normal pelvis and 201 women with endometriosis. We measured plasma concentrations of interleukin (IL)-6, IL-8, tumour necrosis factor-alpha, high-sensitivity C-reactive protein (hsCRP), and cancer antigens CA-125 and CA-19-9. Analyses were done using the Kruskal-Wallis test, Mann-Whitney test, receiver operator characteristic, stepwise logistic regression and least squares support vector machines (LSSVM).Plasma levels of IL-6, IL-8 and CA-125 were increased in all women with endometriosis and in those with minimal-mild endometriosis, compared with controls. In women with moderate-severe endometriosis, plasma levels of IL-6, IL-8 and CA-125, but also of hsCRP, were significantly higher than in controls. Using stepwise logistic regression, moderate-severe endometriosis was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 100% (specificity 84%) and minimal-mild endometriosis was detected with a sensitivity of 87% (specificity 71%) during the secretory phase. Using LSSVM analysis, minimal-mild endometriosis was diagnosed with a sensitivity of 94% (specificity 61%) during the secretory phase and with a sensitivity of 92% (specificity 63%) during the menstrual phase.Advanced statistical analysis of a panel of six selected plasma biomarkers on samples obtained during the secretory phase or during menstruation allows the diagnosis of both minimal-mild and moderate-severe endometriosis with high sensitivity and clinically acceptable specificity.Serum antiendometrial antibodies and diagnosis of endometriosis.The purpose of the present prospective multi-center study is to investigate the relationship between laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis and results of a serum antiendometrial antibody (AEA) assay.Indirect immunofluorescence detection of AEA was performed on serum specimens from patients presenting with dysmenorrhea or chronic pelvic pain and infertility (n = 2609) utilizing frozen sections of endometrium acquired on cycle days 18-21 from normally cycling women without endometriosis. Diagnostic laparoscopy was performed within 1 year of AEA assay on 527 tested women.The relationship between the serum AEA and laparoscopic verification was characterized by a positive predictive value = 88%, negative predictive value = 86%, sensitivity = 87% and specificity = 87%.The AEA assay is a very good screening test for patients suspected of having endometriosis and should be utilized prior to laparoscopy in diagnostic categories of dysmenorrhea or chronic pelvic pain and infertility.Serum prolactin and CA-125 levels as biomarkers of peritoneal endometriosis.To evaluate serum prolactin and CA-125 levels as biomarkers for the diagnosis of peritoneal endometriosis.A prospective study was performed. Blood samples were drawn from a peripheral vein during the secretory phase of the menstrual cycle (day 19-21 prior to the surgery) to analyze through relative operating characteristic curve the serum prolactin and CA-125 levels for diagnosis of peritoneal endometriosis. The study was performed with 97 participants, 63 women with peritoneal endometriosis and 34 healthy women.The sensitivity and specificity of peritoneal endometriosis diagnosis were equivalent for prolactin (21 and 99%) and for CA-125 (27 and 97%; p = 0.58). These two markers were used in a parallel test utilizing the usual cutoff (prolactin 20.0 ng/ml and CA-125 35 U/I). The sensitivity and specificity were 44 and 99%. However, by utilizing the best cutoff (prolactin 14.8 ng/ml and for CA-125 19.8 U/I), sensitivity, specificity and negative predictive value were 77, 88 and 97%, respectively.Serum CA-125 and prolactin levels assessed together, and considering the cutoff for CA-125 (19.9 U/I) and prolactin (14.8 ng/ml), allow the diagnosis of peritoneal endometriosis with acceptable sensitivity and specificity (77 and 88%) and a high negative predictive value (97%).Circulating microRNAs identified in a genome-wide serum microRNA expression analysis as noninvasive biomarkers for endometriosis.There is currently no reliable noninvasive biomarker for the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis. Previous analyses have reported that circulating microRNAs (miRNAs) can serve as biomarkers for a number of diseases.The study aims to detect the serum miRNAs that are differentially expressed between endometriosis patients and negative controls to evaluate the potential of these miRNAs as diagnostic markers for endometriosis.A total of 765 serum miRNAs were profiled using a TaqMan microRNA array in a pool of 10 endometriosis patients and a pool of 10 negative controls, and a set of selected miRNAs were further analyzed in a validation cohort consisting of sera from 60 patients and 25 controls including 10 samples used in array profiling.The relative expression levels of miR-199a and miR-122 were found to be up-regulated in endometriosis patient samples compared with control samples, whereas miR-145*, miR-141*, miR-542-3p, and miR-9* were down-regulated in endometriosis patients. Importantly, the relative expression of miR-199a (P < 0.05) and miR-122 can be used to discriminate between severe and mild endometriosis. We also found that miR-199a is well correlated with pelvic adhesion and lesion distribution (P < 0.05) and associated with hormone-mediated signaling pathways. Furthermore, we investigated the diagnostic value of these molecules and confirmed the optimal combination of miR-199a, miR-122, miR-145*, and miR-542-3p with area under the curve of 0.994 (95% confidence interval = 0.984-1.000, P < 0.001) and a cutoff point (0.4950) of 93.22% sensitivity and 96.00% specificity.Our study demonstrated that the circulating miRNAs miR-199a, miR-122, miR-145*, and miR-542-3p could potentially serve as noninvasive biomarkers for endometriosis. miR-199a may also play an important role in the progression of the disease. This is the first report that circulating miRNAs serve as biomarkers of endometriosis.Neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio as an adjunct to CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis.To investigate the clinical value of differential white blood cell counts and neutrophil-to-lymphocyte ratio (NLR), by themselves or as adjunct to CA-125, in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Retrospective study.University Medical Center.Two hundred thirty-one patients with endometriosis, 145 patients with benign ovarian tumors, and 384 healthy controls participated in this study.None.Sensitivities and specificities of differential white blood cell (WBC) counts, NLR, serum CA-125, and the combined marker (NLR and serum CA-125) were evaluated by receiver-operating characteristic (ROC) analysis.The mean NLR and the combined marker in patients with endometriosis were significantly higher than those in patients without endometriosis. The NLR was able to discriminate patients with endometriosis from those with benign ovarian tumors and from healthy controls, and 25 of the 38 endometriosis patients (65.8%) with minimal-to-mild disease exceeded the cutoff value. The combined marker had a sensitivity of 69.3% and specificity of 83.9% with a cutoff value of 55.7, showing 13.5% increase in sensitivity but 8.9% decrease in specificity when compared with serum CA-125 at a cutoff level of 35 IU/mL. The elevated combined marker detected 16 patients with endometriosis (42.1%) with minimal-to-mild disease, whereas only 10 patients (26.3%) had their serum CA-125 levels at more than 35 IU/mL.Measurement of NLR and the combined marker may be used as simple and easily obtained diagnostic markers for endometriosis.CA 125 levels measured in different phases of the menstrual cycle in screening for endometriosis.To examine variations in CA 125 levels during the three phases of the menstrual cycle in women with and without endometriosis.One hundred infertile women were studied prospectively. CA 125 levels were measured during menses and during the follicular and luteal phases before diagnostic laparoscopy. Subjects were divided into four groups: no evidence of endometriosis (35 women), stage I endometriosis (30 women), stage II endometriosis (21 women), and stages III and IV endometriosis (14 women).In the endometriosis groups, there was a significant difference in the mean CA 125 levels drawn at menses and those drawn in the follicular phase. In patients with severe endometriosis, there was also a difference in the mean CA 125 levels drawn at menses and in the luteal phase. This finding led to the development of a screening test based on the ratio of CA 125 levels at menses to levels in the follicular phase. The test based on this ratio (with a cutoff of 1.5) had a sensitivity of 62.5% and specificity of 75%, compared with a sensitivity of 26.8% and specificity of 100% for the test based on a single CA 125 level drawn at menses (with a cutoff of 35 U/mL).CA 125 levels during menses are elevated compared with those during the follicular phase in patients with endometriosis. Screening tests based on the relationship of multiple CA 125 levels taken throughout the menstrual cycle were more sensitive for detection of endometriosis than tests based on a single CA 125 level.Effect of surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry on identifing biomarkers of endometriosis.Endometriosis is a common gynecological disease. This study aimed to screen proteins that were expressed differently in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls using proteomic techniques, surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS).Protein chip SELDI-TOF-MS combines the advantages of microarray and mass spectrometry, and can screen latent markers in sera of patients with endometriosis. Serum samples from patients and normal volunteers were analyzed by SELDI-TOF-MS.After comparing the serum protein spectra of 36 patients with 24 normal controls, 24 differently expressed potential biomarkers (P < 0.01) were identified. Using Biomarker Pattern software, we established a tree model of the 60 serum protein spectra. When using the three biomarkers to classify the samples, the sensitivity for diagnosing endometriosis was 91.7%, specificity was 95.8%, and coincidence rate was 93.3%. Then we used serum samples from 12 patients and 8 normal controls to validate the tree model and report the sensitivity for diagnosing endometriosis was 91.7%, specificity was 75%, and coincidence rate was 85%.SELDI-TOF-MS may be a useful tool in high-risk population screening for endometriosis. The identification and application of the biomarkers need to further study.[Establishment of endometriosis diagnostic model using plasma protein profiling].To establish the diagnostic model for endometriosis by screening the plasma biomarkers of endometriosis using surface enhanced laser desorption/ionization time of flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS)coupled with bioinformatics.Plasma samples from 36 patients with endometriosis (endometriosis group) matched with 35 patients with infertility or benign ovarian tumors (control group) before laparoscopy were collected at Peking Union Medical College Hospital from January to October 2007. Plasma protein profiling were detected using SELDI-TOF-MS and protein chip and peak intensities were compared between the two groups. Biomarker Discovery Software was used for data analysis and model was build by classification and regression tree software (CART), sensitivity and specificity of the diagnostic model were verified.There were 14 protein peaks abnormally expressed in endometriosis group compared with those of control group (P < 0.01). The diagnostic model composed of three protein peaks with the molecular weight of 3,956,000, 11,710,000 and 6,986,000 showed a sensitivity of 92% and specificity of 83%. In the blind test the model showed a sensitivity of 88% and specificity of 80%.SELDI-TOF-MS is a new approach for screening markers of endometriosis. Its clinical value deserves further investigation.Prediction of endometriosis with serum and peritoneal fluid markers: a prospective controlled trial.The objective of this prospective controlled trial was to investigate the ability of a group of serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) markers to predict, non-surgically, endometriosis.Serum and PF samples were obtained from 130 women while undergoing laparoscopy for pain, infertility, tubal ligation or sterilization reversal. Concentrations of six cytokines [interleukin (IL)-1beta, IL-6, IL-8, IL-12, IL-13 and tumour necrosis factor (TNF)-alpha] were measured in serum and PF, and reactive oxygen species (ROS) in PF, and levels were compared among women who were allocated to groups according to their post-surgical diagnosis. Fifty-six patients were diagnosed with endometriosis, eight with idiopathic infertility, 27 underwent tubal ligation or reanastomosis (control group) and 39 were excluded due to bloody PF. Only serum IL-6 and PF TNF-alpha could be used to discriminate between patients with and without endometriosis with a high degree of sensitivity and specificity (P < 0.001). A threshold of 15 pg/ml PF TNF-alpha provided 100% sensitivity and 89% specificity (positive likelihood ratio of 9.1 and negative likelihood ratio of 0). A threshold of 2 pg/ml for serum IL-6 provided a sensitivity of 90% and specificity of 67% (positive likelihood ratio of 2.7 and negative likelihood ratio of 0.14).By measuring serum IL-6 and PF TNF-alpha, it was possible to discriminate between patients with endometriosis and those without. Before these markers can be used as a non-surgical diagnostic tool, these data should be verified in a larger study.Selected cytokines and glycodelin A levels in serum and peritoneal fluid in girls with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to determine the role of serum and peritoneal interleukin (IL)-6, tumor necrosis factor (TNF)-α and glycodelin A levels as diagnostic markers of endometriosis in adolescent girls.The study encompassed 50 adolescent girls, aged 13-19 years, after menarche and with chronic pelvic pain who qualified for diagnostic laparoscopy. The patients were allocated into two groups: group I (endometriosis group) consisted of subjects with diagnosed endometriosis (n = 33, 66%) and group II (control group) included those whose laparoscopic examinations revealed no evidence of endometriosis (n = 17, 34%). IL-6, TNF-α and glycodelin A concentrations in serum and peritoneal samples were assessed using commercially available human enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay kits. The value of P < 0.05 was adopted as the level of statistical significance.Compared with the control group, adolescent girls with endometriosis had significantly higher peritoneal fluid levels of: IL-6 (525.10 ± 1168.53 pg/mL vs 62.96 ± 82.35 pg/mL), TNF-α (5.79 ± 5.60 pg/mL vs 1.68 ± 1.24 pg/mL) and glycodelin A (94.24 ± 60.97 ng/mL vs 53.52 ± 41.43 ng/mL). Peritoneal IL-6, TNF-α and glycodelin A provided a good method of discrimination between subjects with endometriosis and controls. Using cut-off points for peritoneal fluid IL-6 (90.00 pg/mL), TNF-α (3.00 pg/mL) and glycodelin A (60.0 ng/mL), exceptionally high odds ratios (10.2; 14.6; 2.2) were obtained in the prediction of endometriosis in adolescents.At the cut-off value of 3.00 pg/mL, peritoneal TNF-α can be a reliable screening marker for the prediction of endometriosis in adolescents, giving a 14.6-fold higher probability of endometriosis detection in girls with chronic pelvic pain.CA 125 levels in endometriosis patients before, during and after treatment with danazol or LHRH agonists.The levels of CA 125 in the serum of 54 patients with endometriosis were measured before, during and after treatment with Danazol or LHRH analogues. Patients with minimal and mild endometriosis had mean pre-treatment values significantly higher than control subjects in the luteal phase of the cycle or postmenopausal women (p less than 0.05), but levels were within the overall control range. In contrast, 78.6% of patients with moderate or severe endometriosis had levels in excess of 30 mu/ml and the mean values for these groups were significantly elevated (p less than 0.005). Levels of CA 125 fell, to those found in normal controls, during treatment, but rose again following cessation of treatment. Six of 12 subjects whose follow-up values of CA 125 exceeded 30 U/ml had a proven recurrence of endometriosis, whilst only 2 of 31 patients with values less than 30 U/ml had laparoscopically proven recurrence.[Determination of interleukine-16 levels in peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis].To investigate the role of interleukine-16 (IL-16) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was used to determine the levels of IL-16 in peritoneal fluid and serum specimens of 22 women with different stage endometriosis and 22 controls.The median levels of IL-16 in peritoneal fluid and serum were 290.5 pg/ml and 539.4 pg/ml in women with endometriosis, and 296.6 pg/ml and 778.1 pg/ml in controls, respectively; there was no significant difference between two groups (P>0.05). However, the IL-16 levels in peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with minimal/mild stage endometriosis and controls were all significantly higher than those of patients with moderate/severe endometriosis (P<0.01, <0.05). In addition, there was no statistical correlation of peritoneal IL-16 levels with those in serum (P>0.05).Reduced levels of IL-16 in peritoneal fluid and serum of women with advanced stage endometriosis may imply a role of IL-16 in the development and progression of endometriosis.Cognate chemokine receptor 1 messenger ribonucleic acid expression in peripheral blood as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.We investigated the expression of the cognate chemokine receptor 1 (CCR1) messenger ribonucleic acid, a G-protein-coupled cognate chemokine receptor with high affinity for RANTES (Regulated upon Activation, Normal T cells Expressed and Secreted), in peripheral blood leukocytes of women with and without endometriosis, and its potential use as a diagnostic test for endometriosis. Because patients with an earlier diagnosis of this disease have a better treatment outcome and a reduced recurrence rate, CCR1 mRNA measurement in the peripheral blood of patients with suspected endometriosis might give us a new perspective in diagnosing and treating this disease earlier and better.Endometriosis: identification by carbonic anhydrase autoantibodies and clinical features.Reliably diagnosing endometriosis traditionally requires surgery. To evaluate a possible non-surgical method, a case-control series of unexplained infertility patients undergoing diagnostic laparoscopy were scored by clinical criteria and reactivity to human carbonic anhydrase II by Western blotting. The CA II autoantibodies were found in none of the fertile controls, 38 percent of infertile controls, 55 percent of stage 1, 50 percent of stage 2, 73 percent of stage 3, and 85 percent of stage 4 endometriosis patients. Advanced endometriosis was associated with more intense reactivity. Combining clinical and antibody scores for infertile groups showed a positive association with disease stage with positive predictive values of 76 to 95 percent, negative predictive values of 90 to 60 percent, and a likelihood ratio of 18.3. It is concluded by us that CA II immunoreactivity, clinical, and combined scores all identified stages 2 to 4 endometriosis patients. However, based on predictive values and likelihood ratios, the combined score is best at identifying endometriosis non-surgically.Plasma and peritoneal fluid levels of CA 125 in women with endometriosis.Determined by a sandwich, solid-phase radioimmunoassay with mouse monoclonal antibody, OC 125, plasma CA 125 levels were significantly elevated in stage III (mean +/- SEM = 32.7 +/- 5.2 U/ml, n = 17, p = less than 0.01) and stage IV endometriosis (37.2 +/- 10.5 U/ml, n = 6, p = less than 0.005) compared with levels during the follicular (15.9 +/- 1.5 U/ml, n = 12) and secretory phases (15.8 +/- 1.3 U/ml, n = 15) of control women and users of oral contraceptives (15.5 +/- 1.2 U/ml n = 10). However, CA 125 levels were not significantly elevated in women with stage I (16.6 +/- 2.0 U/ml, n = 28) or stage II endometriosis (17.9 +/- 2.1 U/ml, n = 13). Peritoneal fluid levels of CA 125 (n = 14) were significantly higher (2 to 9.3 times) than the corresponding paired plasma levels in participants with stage I, II, or III endometriosis. In patients treated with danazol (n = 10) or buserelin (n = 17), plasma CA 125 levels decreased significantly by midtherapy, remained suppressed at the end of therapy, but rebounded to near pretreatment levels 6 months after treatment was completed. With gestrinone therapy a similar decline was observed but became significant only at the end of therapy. Our findings indicate that elevated plasma CA 125 levels may prove useful in the management of endometriosis.Behaviour of cytokine levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is a disorder characterised by presence and growth of endometrial tissue outside the uterus, primarily into the peritoneum. The peritoneal fluid (PF) of women with endometriosis undergoes a number of biological changes, including local inflammatory-reparative phenomena and peripheral blood mononuclear cells (PBMC) involvement. These activated cells as well as the endometriotic cells secrete various cytokines with pleiotropic biological activities. Dynamic interplay among cytokines may contribute to realise a favourable microenvironment for the implantation of endometrial cells and the progression of the disease. In the present study, we evaluated the levels of cytokines, such as the tumour necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), transforming growth factor-beta (TGF-beta), interleukin-8 (IL-8) and monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) in PF and in serum (S) of women with endometriosis to compare their behaviour in both biological fluids. The patients (n = 26) were women of reproductive age attending our observation centre for infertility, diagnosed endometriosis at laparoscopy. Control group (n = 5) consisted of women affected by non-immunologic infertility, diagnosed by explorative laparoscopy. S samples were obtained from peripheral blood before anaesthesia and laparoscopy. PF samples were collected at the time of laparoscopy. Both biological fluids were examined for cytokine by ELISA assays. Our results showed that S and PF levels of TNF-alpha, not dosable in controls, were very high at the early stage and decreased significantly with the severity of the disease (p < 0.001). TGF-beta levels were significantly (p < 0.001) higher than in controls and increased with the severity of the disease (p < 0.001), particularly in the PF. S and PF IL-8 as well as MCP-1 concentrations at all stages were higher than in controls (p < 0.001), yet showed an opposite behaviour in both biological fluids. In fact, S levels of IL-8 and MCP-1 were significantly (p < 0.001) higher at early stages and decreased with the severity of the disease, whereas we observed a significant (p < 0.001) enhancement of these chemokine levels in PF from stage I to stage II and stage III. These observations showed that TNF-alpha and TGF-beta levels were overlapping in S and PF of women with endometriosis. On the contrary, MCP-1 and IL-8 S concentrations decreased with the severity of the disease, whereas PF levels showed markedly increased at severe stages. Taken together the observed changes may be due both to the increased peritoneal macrophage activity and to the larger recruitment of PBMC and autocrine release by endometriotic cells.T helper (Th)1, Th2, and Th17 interleukin pathways in infertile patients with minimal/mild endometriosis.In the present study, interleukin (IL)-10, IL-12, IL-17, and IL-23 levels were measured in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with minimal or mild endometriosis and compared with levels in controls without endometriosis. Higher IL-23 levels were encountered in the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis, suggesting a possible role of this cytokine in these women's infertility.Identification and validation of novel serum markers for early diagnosis of endometriosis.Non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis is urgently required to prevent the long delay between the onset of symptoms and diagnosis. A biomarker that possesses both high sensitivity and specificity is greatly required. Here, we describe the use of a proteomic approach to identify potential novel endometrial antigens using sera from endometriosis patients and healthy controls, with evaluation of biomarkers for non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.A cross-sectional study was conducted to identify specific endometrial antigens using 1D and 2D western blots in women with early endometriosis (n = 17), advanced endometriosis (n = 23) and without endometriosis (n = 30). Five immunoreactive spots were analyzed using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization-time-of-flight/mass spectrometry with MASCOT analysis. ELISAs were established for specific epitopes and autoantibody titres were estimated in an independent cohort comprising women with early endometriosis (n = 18), advanced endometriosis (n = 32) and without endometriosis (n = 27) for validation.The 2D western blot analysis resulted in the identification of three endometrial antigens, tropomyosin 3 (TPM3), stomatin-like protein 2 (SLP2) and tropomodulin 3 (TMOD3). Serum levels of antibodies against the epitopes from the immunodominant region of proteins TPM3, SLP2 and TMOD3 were significantly elevated in endometriosis patients when compared with controls. Sensitivity and specificity of serum anti-TPM3a-autoAb (61%, 93%), anti-TPM3c-autoAb (44%, 93%), anti-TPM3d-autoAb (78%, 89%), anti-SLP2a-autoAb (50%, 96%), anti-SLP2c-autoAb (61%, 93%), anti-TMOD3b-autoAb (61%, 96%), serum anti-TMOD3c-autoAb (78%, 93%) and anti-TMOD3d-autoAb (78%, 96%) were better than those of serum CA125 levels (21%, 89%) in the detection of early stages of endometriosis.Serum anti-TPM3a-autoAb, anti-TPM3c-autoAb, anti-TPM3d-autoAb, anti-SLP2a-autoAb, anti-SLP2c-autoAb, anti-TMOD3b-autoAb, anti-TMOD3c-autoAb and anti-TMOD3d-autoAb could be new markers for the early diagnosis of endometriosis.Additive effects of inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Is there any combined effect between inflammation and stress reaction on Toll-like receptor 4 (TLR4)-mediated growth of endometriotic cells?A combined effect of local inflammation and stress reaction in the pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic stromal cells.In endometriosis, higher endotoxin levels in the menstrual fluid (MF) and peritoneal fluid (PF) and higher tissue concentrations of human heat shock protein 70 (HSP70) in the eutopic and ectopic endometria promote TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells.This is a case-controlled research study with prospective collection and retrospective evaluation of sera, MF, PF and endometrial tissues from 43 women with and 20 women without endometriosis.PF was collected from 43 women with endometriosis and 20 control women during laparoscopy. Sera and endometrial biopsy specimens were collected from a proportion of these women. MF was collected from a separate population of 20 women with endometriosis and 15 control women. HSP70 concentrations in sera, MF, PF and in culture media were measured by ELISA. Gene expression of HSP70 by endometrial cells in response to lipopolysaccharide (LPS) was examined by qRT-PCR. The individual and combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on the secretion of interleukin-6 (IL-6) and tumor necrosis factor α (TNFα) by PF-derived macrophages (M[Symbol: see text]) were examined by ELISA, while their effects on endometrial cell proliferation were examined by bromodeoxyuridine and [(3)H]-thymidine incorporation assay.Concentrations of HSP70 were maximal in MF, intermediate in PF and the lowest in sera. In MF and PF, HSP70 levels were higher in women with endometriosis than in controls. LPS stimulated gene expression and secretion of HSP70 by eutopic endometrial stromal cells (ESCs) and this effect was abrogated after pretreatment of cells with an anti-TLR4 antibody. This effect was significantly higher for ESCs derived from women with endometriosis than for ESCs from control women. Exogenous treatment with either HSP70 or LPS significantly stimulated the production of IL-6 and TNFα by M[Symbol: see text] and promoted the proliferation of ESCs, and a significant additive effect between LPS and HSP70 was observed. While individual treatment with either polymyxin B, an LPS antagonist, or anti-HSP70 antibody was unable to suppress the combined effects of LPS and HSP70 on cytokine secretion or ESC proliferation, pretreatment of cells with the anti-TLR4 antibody was able to significantly suppress their combined effects.Further studies are needed to examine the mutual role between other secondary inflammatory mediators and endogenous stress proteins in promoting pelvic inflammation and growth of endometriotic stromal cells.Our findings suggest that endotoxin and HSP70 are mutually involved in a stress reaction and in inflammation. A combined effect between local inflammation and a stress reaction in pelvic environment may be involved in TLR4-mediated growth of endometriotic cells. Since endometriosis is a multi-factorial disease, it is difficult to explain uniformly its growth regulation by a single factor. Our findings may provide some new insights in understanding the physiopathology or pathogenesis of endometriosis and may hold new therapeutic potential.This work was supported by Grants-in-Aid for Scientific Research (grant no. 16591671 and 18591837) from the Ministry of Education, Sports, Culture, Science and Technology of Japan (to K.N.K.). There is no conflict of interest related to this study.Not applicable.Interleukin-8 serum levels do not correlate with pelvic pain in patients with ovarian endometriomas.To determine whether interleukin-8 (IL-8) serum levels are correlated with pelvic pain in patients with ovarian endometriomas.Prospective study.Tertiary-care university hospital.Interleukin-8 serum levels were prospectively analyzed in 51 patients (group A, asymptomatic patients or patients with mild dysmenorrhea; group B, severe dysmenorrhea and/or chronic pelvic pain and/or dyspareunia) who underwent surgery for cystic ovarian endometriosis to asses whether a correlation exists between IL-8 serum levels and pelvic pain.Interleukin-8 serum levels determination.Interleukin-8 serum levels and pelvic pain.From 56 patients, five cases were ultimately excluded because the histologic diagnosis was not cystic ovarian endometriosis (2 teratomas and 3 haemorragic cysts). The mean (+/-SD) IL-8 serum levels in group A were 6.41 +/- 12.17 pg/mL and in group B were 6.52 +/- 8.73 pg/mL.Pain symptoms in ovarian endometriosis is not correlated with IL-8 serum levels.Endometrial antibodies versus CA-125 for the detection of endometriosis.Detection of endometrial antibodies using an indirect immunofluorescence method along with a well-established human endometrial carcinoma cell line was evaluated and compared with CA-125 for detecting endometriosis. Two hundred two patient sera from the infertility, gynecological, and gynecological oncology services were evaluated. The sensitivity for antibody testing was 83.1% with a specificity of 78.8%, in contrast to a sensitivity of 27.3% and a specificity of 82.6% for CA-125. These preliminary findings offer promise that antibody detection methods may be a useful adjunct in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor-1 in endometriosis.The aim of this study is to evaluate the expression of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and its soluble receptor (sFlt-1) in peritoneal fluid (PF), peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial tissues of patients with endometriosis. Peritoneal fluid, peritoneal endometriotic lesions and eutopic endometrial samples from patients with endometriosis, and peritoneal fluid, peritoneal tissue and endometrial samples from patients without endometriosis were obtained during an operative laparoscopy. The mean PF concentrations of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis than in the controls. In the peritoneal tissue, the expressions of VEGF and sFlt-1 were significantly higher, where the expression of sFlt-1 in endometrium was significantly lower in patients with endometriosis. These findings indicate that not only abnormal expressions of angiogenic factors, but also aberrant expressions of antiangiogenic factors in the peritoneal and endometrial environment seem to be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Oxidative stress and endometriosis.Little is known about the aetiology of endometriosis; however, in the presence of oxidative stress, reactive oxygen species might increase growth and adhesion of endometrial cells in the peritoneal cavity, leading to endometriosis and infertility. Within a study investigating persistent organic compounds and endometriosis, the authors evaluated the association between oxidative stress and endometriosis.Women aged 18-40 years who were undergoing laparoscopy were contacted to participate in the study (n = 100); 84 were eligible and agreed to be interviewed; 78 provided blood specimens. Four markers of oxidative stress and antioxidant status were measured in serum for 61 women. Multiple imputation of missing data was used to generate values for the missing oxidative stress data.Thirty-two women had visually confirmed endometriosis at laparoscopy while 52 did not, including 22 undergoing tubal ligation and 30 with idiopathic infertility. There was a weak association between thiobarbituric acid-reactive substances (nmol/ml) and endometriosis, after adjusting for age, body mass index, current smoking, hormone use in the past 12 months, gravidity, serum vitamin E, serum estradiol, and total serum lipids (beta = 1.18; 95% CI-0.04, 2.39).These results suggest that oxidative stress might play a role in the development and progression of endometriosis, which should be evaluated in larger studies.Differences in the blood serum levels of soluble HLA-G concentrations between the menstrual cycle phases and menopause in patients with ovarian endometriosis and uterine leiomyoma.HLA-G is an antigen whose participation in the regulation of the immune system is well documented. The aim of the present study has therefore been to evaluate the sHLA-G blood serum concentrations levels in both women with ovarian endometriosis and women with uterine leiomyomas.In our study, the soluble HLA-G concentration level was evaluated in the blood serum samples obtained from 98 women who underwent laparotomies or laparoscopies due to either ovarian endometriosis or leiomyomatous uterus. The control group consisted of 42 women, including women on whom a diagnostic laparoscopy identified no lesions, and volunteers-healthy women who returned their blood serum samples during menstrual bleeding.Patients who underwent surgical treatment because of ovarian endometriosis or uterine leiomyoma, as well as patients from the control group, exhibited no sHLA-G blood serum concentration level fluctuations between the proliferative and secretory menstrual cycle phases. The sHLA-G levels were significantly lower in the patients with ovarian endometriosis and in the patients from the control group during the menstrual cycle phase than in those patients with leiomyoma. A similar relation between the sHLA-G levels of the postmenopausal patients suffering from leiomyoma and the control patients was found. In contrast, the postmenopausal women suffering from endometriosis were typified by levels of sHLA-G blood serum concentration comparable to those of the patients with leiomyoma, and the levels were significantly higher than those observed in the blood sera of the postmenopausal patients from the control group.The soluble HLA-G blood serum level would seem to be a useful marker for evaluating the status of the microenvironment, where the tumor-immune cell and ectopic and eutopic endometrial interactions take place.Peritoneal fluid concentrations of interleukin-8 in women with endometriosis: relationship to stage of disease.There is increasing evidence that immunological mechanisms play a role in the pathogenesis and pathophysiology of endometriosis. It was therefore of interest to study interleukin-8 (IL-8), a chemokine, in the peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood of women undergoing laparoscopic procedures. The presence and concentrations of IL-8 in relation to endometriosis, infertility and abdominal pain were evaluated. Samples of peritoneal fluid (n = 49) and peripheral blood (n = 50) were obtained from 50 consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopic surgery for various gynaecological indications (abdominal pain, infertility, sterilization). IL-8 was present in the peritoneal fluid of most women (87%). The concentration of IL-8 in the peritoneal fluid was higher in women with endometriosis compared to women without (P = 0.02). This difference was more pronounced in early (stage 1) endometriosis (P = 0.001). IL-8 concentrations in the peritoneal fluid were also higher in women with early endometriosis compared to women with later stages of the disease (P = 0.003). Peripheral blood concentrations did not correlate with peritoneal fluid concentrations of IL-8 and/or the presence of endometriosis. We conclude that IL-8 is an important factor that may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis possibly by promoting neovascularization. This information can be a guide in the development of new therapeutic approaches for the treatment of endometriosis.Interleukin-12 but not interleukin-18 is associated with severe endometriosis.To evaluate interleukin (IL)-12 and IL-18 levels in the serum and peritoneal fluid of women with and without endometriosis.Cross-sectional survey.University hospital.Interleukin-12 and IL-18 levels were compared in 105 patients submitted to laparoscopy because of symptoms suggestive of endometriosis (pain and/or infertility). The disease was confirmed in 72 patients (study group), while in 33 patients findings were not compatible with endometriosis (control group). INTEVENTION(S): Blood sample and peritoneal fluid were obtained from patients during videolaparoscopy.The levels of IL-12 and IL-18 in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid were determined and compared with the stage and site of the disease and histologic classification.IL-12 levels measured in peritoneal fluid were higher in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. A significant increase in IL-12 levels was found when the more advanced stages of the disease were compared with the initial stages. No statistically significant differences were found in IL-18 levels, either in serum or in peritoneal fluid samples.Patients with severe endometriosis have higher IL-12 levels irrespective of IL-18 levels, suggesting that in this disease an alternative pathway is involved in induction of the Th1 immune response.Identification of anti-syntaxin 5 autoantibody as a novel serum marker of endometriosis.The sensitivity and specificity of CA125, as a sole serum marker of endometriosis, are not high enough for routine clinical assessment. To explore new markers for the diagnosis of endometriosis, serum autoantibodies in endometriotic patients were investigated employing a fibroblast cell line, two-dimensional (2D) gel electrophoresis and Western blotting. Proteins reacting with serum autoantibodies by Western blotting were identified using MASCOT analysis. ELISAs were then prepared using recombinant proteins and titers of serum autoantibodies were determined in the endometriotic patients, disease controls, and healthy subjects. Among the autoantibodies identified, anti-syntaxin 5 (STX5) autoantibody levels were significantly elevated in endometriotic patients. Sensitivity (53.6%) and accuracy (72.2%) of the serum anti-STX5 autoantibody assay were better than those of serum CA125 levels (36.2% and 62.9%, respectively) for diagnosis. The sensitivity of anti-STX5 autoantibody was remarkably high in Stage II (80.0%) compared with that of CA125 (40.0%). A combination assay of anti-STX5 autoantibody with CA125 improved the overall sensitivity to 69.6%. We conclude that serum anti-STX5 autoantibody, which was discovered by a proteomic approach, is a potential new serum marker for the diagnosis of endometriosis. This initial study now requires validation by further clinical evaluation.Association of the leukemia inhibitory factor gene mutation and the antiphospholipid antibodies in the peripheral blood of infertile women.To characterize the impact of the potentially functional mutation--the G to A transition at the position 3400 of the leukemia inhibitory factor (LIF; a pluripotent cytokine that plays a central role in the control of the embryo implantation) gene that leads to the exchange of valine with methionine at codon 64 we evaluated the association of the LIF gene mutation and the levels of antiphospolipid antibodies (aPLs) in the peripheral blood of infertile women (the aPLs examination was part of our routine immunological test during the infertility check-up). Eight infertile mutation-positive women were diagnosed with idiopathic infertility (n=5) and endometriosis (n=3) and their levels of aPLs in serum were compared with 115 infertile women without any LIF gene mutation. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay was used for the detection of seven antiphospholipid antibodies; the results were statistically assessed by the Fisher's 2 by 2 exact test to evaluate the association of the LIF gene mutations and aPLs in serum of infertile patients. The presence of aPLs was significantly higher in our study group (100%) than in 30% of aPLs-positives in control infertile patients (p = 0.0035) which indicates that the aPLs are elevated in women with LIF gene mutations.Serum interleukin-6 levels are elevated in women with minimal-mild endometriosis.There is a need for a reliable marker of endometriosis, especially in early stages of peritoneal disease during which imaging is not effective. The use of serum interleukin (IL)-6 as a marker is controversial. To readdress the matter, patients undergoing laparoscopy were prospectively evaluated for serum IL-6 levels.A total of 119 women 31 years old who underwent laparoscopy were divided into groups: control patients (n = 38) with no pathologic findings; endometriosis sufferers (n = 47) with minimal-mild (MM, n = 11) or moderate-severe (MS, n = 36) endometriosis; uterine myomas (n = 13) and benign ovarian pathologies (n = 21). Blood was drawn on cycles days 5-12 and stored for subsequent analysis of IL-6 and carbohydrate antigen (CA)-125 levels.Serum IL-6 levels were significantly (P = 0.002) higher in women with MM endometriosis (29.4 9.0 pg/ml) than in controls (15.7 9.3 pg/ml). When all the non-endometriosis patients were grouped together (n = 72) and serum IL-6 (17.8 12.1 pg/ml) compared with MS (n = 36; 17.6 10.3 pg/ml) and MM (n = 11; 29.4 9.0 pg/ml) endometriosis significantly (P < 0.01) higher levels in MM endometriosis were observed as compared to the other two groups. Serum Ca-125 levels were significantly (P < 0.01) elevated in MS endometriosis. A serum IL-6 threshold of 25.75 pg/ml afforded a sensitivity of 75% and specificity of 83% in the diagnosis of MM endometriosis. Sensitivity and specificity for CA-125 in the diagnosis of MS endometriosis, using 35 IU/ml as the cut-off value, were 47% and 97%, respectively.IL-6 is a reliable non-invasive marker of MM endometriosis, whereas Ca-125 is of use as a marker of severe cases.[E-cadherin in the serum and the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis].Endometriosis, a disease of unclear etiopathogenesis, is a quite common problem in gynecology. It is thought that the retrograde flow of the menstrual debris to the peritoneal cavity plays an important role in the origin of endometriosis but the mechanism of endometrial cells implantation remains unknown. Recently many centers have reported the importance of adhesion molecules in this process. We studied the concentrations of E-cadherin in the serum and the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis. Our results show a significant decrease of E-cadherin concentrations in sera and peritoneal fluids in women with endometriosis. We suggest that screening the level of E-caherin may be useful in the monitoring the therapy of endometriosis.[The evaluation of IL-12 levels in peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis].We studied levels of IL-12 in peritoneal fluid and serum in patients with minimal, advanced and recurrent endometriosis compared to women without endometriotic lesions in pelvis minor. The aim of the study was to determine whether level of IL-12 detected in peritoneal fluid or serum changes with grading of severity of endometriosis. To assess IL-12 levels immunosorbent ELISA was used. There were no statistically significant differences in IL-12 levels in peritoneal fluid nor in serum in any of studied groups. There was higher concentration (without statistical significance) of IL-12 in peritoneal fluid of healthy women compared to women with endometriosis.Leukocyte subpopulations and natural killer activity in endometriosis.To evaluate cell-mediated immunity in endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood samples from 19 women with macroscopic evidence of endometriosis and 26 controls were submitted to 2-color flow cytometric analysis to assess lymphocyte subsets, using various combinations of monoclonal antibodies. K562 cells were used in a routine assay by 51Cr release to measure the cytotoxicity of NK cells in the subjects' peripheral blood.Suppressor T-cells were significantly increased and cytotoxic T-cells significantly decreased in both peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood of the women with endometriosis. NK activity in peripheral blood was decreased in endometriosis patients as compared with controls.An alteration in cell-mediated immunity may be among the pathogenetic, or developing, factors in endometriosis.Enhanced interleukin-4 expression in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the expression of cytokines by T-helper cells type 1 (interleukin [IL]-2 and interferon-gamma [IFN-gamma]) and type 2 (IL-4 and IL-10) in peripheral blood monocytes and peritoneal fluid (PF) cells from patients with endometriosis.Peripheral blood (PB) monocytes and PF cells from patients with endometriosis were isolated and the expression of cytokines investigated.Institute for the treatment of endometriosis and research institute in university-based medical center.The study included 7 women with normal pelvic structure, 36 patients with endometriosis, and 7 women with pelvic adhesion but without apparent endometriotic lesion. The existence and severity of endometriosis was determined by laparoscopic examination.All patients received laparoscopic operation to identify the existence and stages of endometriosis. Danazol (200 mg, twice daily) was prescribed for those with endometriosis.Transcription of cytokines were directly analyzed using the reverse transcriptase-polymerase chain reaction method. The concentrations of cytokines in peritoneal fluids and sera were analyzed by the ELISA.Levels of IL-4 messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein in the PB and peritoneal cells of patients with endometriosis were higher than those of normal patients, whereas levels of IFN-gamma mRNA and protein were suppressed. There were no significant changes in the mRNA or protein levels of IL-2 or IL-10 in both peritoneal fluids and sera. The level of IL-4 was reduced to normal after combined treatment with laparoscopic surgery and danazol. The secretion of IFN-gamma was elevated after treatment.Cytokine secretion by T-helper cells type 1 and type 2 is altered in women with endometriosis, suggesting that these T-helper subsets play a role in the immunologic responses to endometriosis.Serum levels of CA-125 in patients with endometriosis: a preliminary report.Seven out of 8 patients with endometriosis demonstrated levels of CA-125 antigen above 35 U/ml. None of 15 patients with other benign gynecologic diagnoses demonstrated elevated levels. This antigen has been proposed as a tumor marker for epithelial carcinoma and other gynecologic neoplasms. However, it cannot be used to differentiate clinically between cancer and endometriosis.An association of IgG anti-laminin-1 autoantibodies with endometriosis in infertile patients.Laminin-1, a multifunctional glycoprotein of the basement membrane, is thought to be important in embryogenesis, embryonic implantation, and placentation. We recently showed that serum IgG anti-laminin-1 autoantibodies (auto-Abs) are associated with recurrent first-trimester miscarriages. The present study assessed the clinical significance of anti-laminin-1 Abs with infertility, accompanied with or without endometriosis.Sixty-eight infertile patients who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy and 39 healthy non-pregnant women were tested for IgG anti-laminin-1 Abs. The association between the Abs and endometriosis was analysed. The presence of laminin-1 mRNA was detected in endometriotic lesions.Twenty infertile patients were positive for anti-laminin-1 Abs. The Ab levels in those patients were significantly higher than those in healthy non-pregnant women (P = 0.0005). The presence of the Abs was significantly associated with endometriosis in those patients (P = 0.0096). The Abs recognized a particular domain, i.e., the laminin-alpha1 chain G domain. mRNA encoding laminin-alpha1, -beta1, and -gamma1 chains was expressed in 90% of endometriotic lesions.IgG anti-laminin-1 Abs were significantly associated with endometriosis in infertile patients. The Abs might be clinically important in the development of autoimmune-mediated reproductive failures and the assessment of the Abs may provide a novel non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.Combination of non-invasive and semi-invasive tests for diagnosis of minimal to mild endometriosis.Non-surgical diagnostic approach for endometriosis would be of great gain to both physicians and patients. The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of serum measurement of IL-6 combined with the presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium for diagnosis of minimal-mild endometriosis.In this prospective study 114 women who underwent laparoscopy for infertility and/or pelvic pain were divided into two groups: control cases (40 cases) with no pathologic findings; and endometriosis patients (74 cases) [subdivided into stages 1-2 or minimal-mild (MM) and stages 3-4 or moderate-severe cases]. Blood was drawn one day before laparoscopy and stored for subsequent analysis of IL-6. Endometrial biopsy was obtained prior to laparoscopy and Immunohistochemistry was performed using the pan-neuronal marker protein gene product 9.5(PGP9.5). Then laparoscopic diagnosis of endometriosis confirmed by histopathology was done.Serum IL-6 with a threshold of 15.4 pg/ml was found to be able to diagnose MM endometriosis with 89.5 % sensitivity and 82.5 % specificity, but sensitivity and specificity of presence of nerve fibres in the functional layer of endometrium were 92 % and 80 % respectively. When two diagnostic modalities were combined the sensitivity and specificity were raised to 100 and 92.5 % respectively.Combination of both serum IL-6 and presence of nerve fibres in the endometrium is more reliable method for diagnosis of MM endometriosis than in single test.Genetic polymorphism in the fibrinolytic system and endometriosis.Although most women experience retrograde menses during their reproductive life, endometriosis develops only in a small percentage. We hypothesized that persistence of a fibrin matrix in peritoneal pockets, as a result of hypofibrinolysis, could allow menstrually deposited endometrial fragments to initiate endometriosis. Fibrinolysis is modulated by several factors, and polymorphisms in the plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI-1) gene are considered to be one of the important determinants. The objective of this study was to evaluate PAI-1 genotypes in a group of women with or without endometriosis.In 118 women (75 with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis and 43 controls), genomic DNA was extracted from blood and the PAI-1 promoter genotype was determined by polymerase chain reaction amplification of DNA using specific primers for the 4G or 5G allele followed by gel electrophoresis. A portion of the polymerase chain reaction product was purified and sequenced to confirm the gel electrophoresis results.Endometriosis was more likely in patients with 4G/5G (odds ratio 38; 95% confidence interval [CI] 6-229) or 4G/4G (odds ratio 441; 95% CI 53-3,694) compared with 5G/5G PAI-1 genotype. Fifty-two of 75 women with endometriosis (69 %, 95% CI 58-79%) had the 4G/4G genotype compared with only 5 of 43 (12%; 95% CI 4-25%) controls. In contrast, the 5G/5G genotype associated with normal fibrinolysis was found in 2 of 75 (3%; 95% CI 0-9%) women with endometriosis compared with 24 of 43 (56%; 95% CI 40-71%) controls.Hypofibrinolysis, associated with the 4G allele of the PAI-1 gene, was found significantly more often in women with endometriosis compared with controls. Persistence of fibrin matrix could support the initiation of endometriotic lesions in the peritoneal cavity, explaining why some women with retrograde menstruation develop endometriosis while others do not.II-2.Diagnostic value of serum activin A and follistatin levels in women with peritoneal, ovarian and deep infiltrating endometriosis.Activin A is a growth factor, produced by the endometrium, whose actions are modulated by the binding protein follistatin. Both proteins are detectable in the peripheral serum and their concentrations may be increased in women with endometriosis. The present study was designed to evaluate whether serum levels of activin A and follistatin are altered, and therefore have a potential diagnostic value, in women with peritoneal, ovarian and deep infiltrating endometriosis.We performed a multicenter controlled study evaluating simultaneously serum activin A and follistatin concentrations in women with and without endometriosis. Women with endometriosis (n = 139) were subdivided into three groups: peritoneal endometriosis (n = 28); ovarian endometrioma (n = 61) and deep infiltrating endometriosis (n = 50). The control group (n = 75) consisted of healthy women with regular menstrual cycles. Blood samples were collected from a peripheral vein and assayed for activin A and follistatin using commercially available enzyme immunoassay kits.The ovarian endometrioma group had serum activin A levels significantly higher than healthy controls (0.22 ± 0.01 ng/ml versus 0.17 ± 0.01 ng/ml, P < 0.01). None of the endometriosis groups had serum follistatin levels which were significantly altered compared with healthy controls; however, levels found in the endometrioma group (2.34 ± 0.32 ng/ml) were higher than that in the deep endometriosis group (1.50 ± 0.17 ng/ml, P < 0.05). The area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of activin A was 0.700 (95% confidence interval: 0.605-0.794), while that of follistatin was 0.620 (95% confidence interval: 0.510-0.730) for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma. The combination of both markers into a duo marker index did not improve significantly their diagnostic accuracy.The present study demonstrated that serum activin A and follistatin are not significantly altered in peritoneal or deep infiltrating endometriosis and have limited diagnostic accuracy in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Matrix metalloproteinase 2 is associated with changes in steroid hormones in the sera and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis.To determine matrix metalloproteinase 2 (MMP-2) levels in sera and peritoneal fluids of women with or without endometriosis-associated infertility and to determine whether MMP-2 had correlation with 17beta-E(2) and P in the sera and peritoneal fluids of the patients with endometriosis.A case-control study.A women's hospital in China.Forty patients with endometriosis-associated infertility undergoing laparoscopy and 18 women undergoing tubal ligation.Sera and peritoneal fluids were collected from women with or without endometriosis.Matrix metalloproteinase 2, 17beta-E(2), and P concentration.Compared with the control women, the patients with endometriosis had higher MMP-2 levels in their sera and peritoneal fluids. Serum and peritoneal fluid MMP-2 levels were higher in the proliferative phase than in the secretory phase. The level of MMP-2 in the patients was correlated positively with 17beta-E(2) in serum and peritoneal fluid and negatively with P.The results demonstrated a correlation between MMP-2 concentrations and steroid hormones in sera and peritoneal fluids of the patients with endometriosis-associated infertility. Estradiol might up-regulate MMP-2, resulting in the formation of endometriosis. Progesterone might down-regulate MMP-2 to inhibit the formation and development of endometriosis.Serum CA-125 in the diagnosis of endometriosis.A high sensitivity assay is more accurate than a classical assay for the measurement of plasma CRP levels in endometriosis.Endometriosis is associated with chronic subclinical inflammation. C-reactive protein (CRP), a marker of inflammation, could serve as a biomarker of endometriosis. We tested the hypothesis that a high sensitivity CRP assay (hsCRP) is more accurate than a classical CRP assay in the detection of subclinical inflammation in plasma of women with endometriosis.CRP levels were measured by hsCRP and classical CRP assays in plasma of 204 women with endometriosis and 91 women without endometriosis. Both assays were compared with respect to their value for the diagnosis of endometriosis.The number of plasma samples with detectable CRP was significantly higher (100%) using the hsCRP assay when compared to the classical CRP assay (42.7%) (p < 0.0001). Significantly increased CRP plasma levels were found in women with endometriosis when compared with controls when the hsCRP assay was used in samples obtained during the luteal phase (p = 0.008). The highest discriminative ability for the diagnosis of endometriosis was also obtained using the hsCRP assay during the luteal phase, especially for moderate -severe endometriosis. At a cut-off level of hsCRP > 0.71 mg/L, moderate-severe stages were diagnosed with 80.7% sensitivity and 63.9% specificity during the luteal phase. Using a similar cut-off value for CRP analyzed by the classical method, moderate-severe endometriosis was diagnosed with lower sensitivity (67.7%, p = 0.06) and comparable specificity (63.9%).The hsCRP assay was superior to the classical CRP assay for the detection of low CRP levels and for revealing subclinical inflammation in plasma of women with endometriosis.Detection of antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis: methodological issues.To determine if methodological reasons explain previous inability of a single investigator to detect antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis by indirect immunofluorescence (IIF).Sera of selected patients were tested by standard IIF and recently reported methodology. Alternate diluent experiments were conducted to explain discordant results.Sera were obtained preoperatively, and testing was completed in an institutional research laboratory. Results are compared with surgical findings.Patients, seven with endometriosis and six without endometriosis, 40 years of age or less who are presenting for gynecological surgery.None.Indirect immunofluorescence was graded according to the presence or absence of cytoplasmic staining, intensity of the staining, and the lowest dilution at which staining was observed.The standard IIF method repeatedly demonstrated the presence of cytoplasmic staining for the presence of antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis, whereas modified methods did not produce similar positive staining results. During the alternate dilution experiments, when fluorescein isothiocyanate conjugate (FITC) was diluted in animal sera, negative results were obtained.The variations used in alternate methodology and failure to titrate FITC reported by other investigators are possible reasons for false-negative results reported.[Correlation between CA-125 marker with the presence and severity of pelvic endometriosis].Endometriosis affects at least 15% of infertile women. The diagnosis is made by direct visualization of implants either at laparoscopy or laparotomy. Elevation of plasma CA-125 levels has been associated with the presence of endometriosis.To search for a correlation between CA-125 and the presence of endometriosis and its severity, among infertile patients requesting a diagnostic laparoscopy.A total of 117 women were prospectively enrolled in the study between May 2000 and March 2002. A serum sample for CA-125 was taken immediately before surgery and the value obtained was correlated with the presence or absence of endometriosis and the severity of the disease.Sixty nine patients had endometriosis (59%). Patients with severe endometriosis, or grade IV, showed statistically significant higher levels of CA-125 compared to women without endometriosis or with grades I, II or III of the disease.The overall sensibility of CA-125 in detecting patients with endometriosis was low, however, it worked better for patients with advanced disease. Considering the rather low cost and simplicity of the test, we believe that it should be included in the evaluation of infertile couples.Elevated levels of fibroblast growth factor-2 in serum from women with endometriosis.The purpose of this study was to determine whether serum and peritoneal fluid levels of fibroblast growth factor-2 (FGF-2) differ between women with and without endometriosis and to examine the relationship between proliferative activity in the endometriotic lesions and the levels of FGF-2 in serum and peritoneal fluid.Biopsy specimens of peritoneal endometriotic lesions (n = 25) were analyzed immunohistochemically regarding proliferative activity in stroma, glands, and blood vessels. The FGF-2 concentration was measured in peritoneal fluid and serum from 25 women with endometriosis and 14 healthy controls.Patients with endometriosis had higher serum concentrations of FGF-2 during both the proliferative and secretory menstrual phases than healthy women. Peritoneal fluid levels of FGF-2 differed significantly between women with high and low proliferative activity in their endometriotic lesions.Women with endometriosis have a higher serum level of FGF-2 than healthy controls.CA 125 in peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid collected from 48 patients at laparoscopy was assayed for CA 125. Geometric mean serum CA 125 was similar in 21 patients with predominantly early stage endometriosis (13.4 U/ml; confidence intervals (C.I.) 10.8-16.7) and 27 patients without endometriosis (12.9 U/ml; C.I. 9.7-17.2). Mean peritoneal fluid CA 125 was higher in the endometriosis patients (mean 44.4 U/ml; C.I. 34.5-57.2) than controls (35.7 U/ml; C.I. 30.0-42.2), but the difference was not significant. Peritoneal fluid volume was increased in endometriosis patients (p = 0.013), and only after correction for peritoneal fluid volume did total antigenic concentration in aspirated peritoneal fluid show significant elevation (p = 0.0015) in endometriosis patients (mean 340 U/ml; C.I. 212-547) compared with controls (125 U/ml; C.I. 85-184). These results suggest that although CA 125 may be expressed in peritoneal fluid in endometriosis, it is unlikely to be of use as a marker of disease activity in peritoneal fluid obtained by culdocentesis.Serum YKL-40 levels are altered in endometriosis.Endometriosis is traditionally defined as the presence of endometrial glands and stroma in ectopic locations, especially the pelvic peritoneum, ovaries and rectovaginal septum. YKL-40, a new biomarker of inflammation, is secreted by activated macrophages and neutrophils in different tissues with inflammation. Serum concentrations of YKL-40 are elevated in patients with diseases characterized by inflammation. We aimed to investigate the possible association between serum YKL-40 levels and endometriosis. A total number of 88 women were recruited for this case-control study. About 53 patients with surgically proven endometriosis were included, while 35 patients without endometriosis comprised the control group. Patients were classified as having minimal, mild, moderate and severe disease in accordance with the severity. Two new groups were formed by combining patients with minimal and mild disease (Stage 1-2) and with moderate and severe disease (Stage 3-4). Serum YKL-40 levels were statistically higher in the endometriotic group compared to control group (p:0.001). YKL-40 levels were significantly higher in Stage 3-4 group compared to Stage 1-2 group (p values 0.001) as well. Correlation analysis revealed a positive correlation between serum YKL-40 levels and the stage of the disease. YKL-40 may be utilized as a marker for determining the severity of endometriosis.Serum leptin concentrations in endometriosis.It has been recently reported that serum concentrations of the adipocyte-derived hormone leptin are increased in patients affected by endometriosis. On the basis of these findings, the present study was undertaken to evaluate whether the protein may be used as a new serum marker of the disease. A consecutive series of 67 reproductive-age women who underwent laparoscopy for benign gynecological pathologies were enrolled prospectively for the study. Serum leptin concentrations, as evaluated by a conventional RIA kit, were related to baseline clinical characteristics and surgical and histologic diagnosis. Endometriosis was documented in 42 women (stage I-II in 19 patients and stage III-IV in 23 patients). Twenty-five women of similar age and body mass index, who had no laparoscopic evidence of the disease, served as control group. Serum levels of leptin resulted similar between women without and with endometriosis at any stage (mean +/- SEM, 12.5 +/- 9.4 ng/ml and 12.1 +/- 8.0 ng/ml, respectively). No significant association with leptin concentrations was observed in regard to stage of the disease, number of endometriotic implants, presence/absence of an endometriotic cyst or peritoneal deep endometriosis, and presence/absence of specific symptoms. Therefore, our results do not support the possibility to employ leptin measurement as a diagnostic tool for endometriosis. Further studies are needed to elucidate the relationship between leptin and endometrial system and determine the potential contribution of the molecule in implantation and early pregnancy development.[Serum markers of oxidative stress in infertile women with endometriosis].to compare serum markers of oxidative stress between infertile patients with and without endometriosis and to assess the association of these markers with disease staging.this was a prospective study conducted on 112 consecutive infertile, non-obese patients younger than 39 years, divided into two groups: Endometriosis (n=48, 26 with minimal and mild endometriosis - Stage I/II, and 22 with moderate and severe endometriosis - Stage III/IV) and Control (n=64, with tubal and/or male factor infertility). Blood samples were collected during the early follicular phase of the menstrual cycle for the analysis of serum malondialdehyde, glutathione and total hydroxyperoxide levels by spectrophotometry and of vitamin E by high performance liquid chromatography. The results were compared between the endometriosis and control groups, stage I/II endometriosis and control, stage III/IV endometriosis and control, and between the two endometriosis subgroups. The level of significance was set at 5% (p < 0.05) in all analyses.vitamin E and glutathione levels were lower in the serum of infertile women with moderate/severe endometriosis (21.7 ± 6.0 mMol/L and 159.6 ± 77.2 nMol/g protein, respectively) compared to women with minimal and mild endometriosis (28.3 ± 14.4 mMol/L and 199.6 ± 56.1 nMol/g protein, respectively). Total hydroxyperoxide levels were significantly higher in the endometriosis group (8.9 ± 1.8 µMol/g protein) than in the Control Group (8.0 ± 2 µMol/g protein) and among patients with stage III/IV disease (9.7 ± 2.3 µMol/g protein) compared to patients with stage I/II disease (8.2 ± 1.0 µMol/g protein). No significant differences in serum malondialdehyde levels were observed between groups.we demonstrated a positive association between infertility related to endometriosis, advanced disease stage and increased serum hydroxyperoxide levels, suggesting an increased production of reactive species in women with endometriosis. These data, taken together with the reduction of serum vitamin E and glutathione levels, suggest the occurrence of systemic oxidative stress in women with infertility associated with endometriosis. The reproductive and metabolic implications of oxidative stress should be assessed in future studies.Increased leptin levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with pelvic endometriosis.Pelvic endometriosis is an immune-related chronic inflammatory disease, characterized by ectopic implants of endometrium in the peritoneal cavity and associated with increased secretion of proinflammatory cytokines and neoangiogenesis. Leptin, the adipocyte-derived hormone, has been shown to have a role in food intake, basal metabolism, and reproductive function. Leptin levels are dynamically regulated, being elevated by inflammatory mediators and reduced by starvation. Leptin itself can influence the proinflammatory immune responses of CD4+ T lymphocytes, and reports have also shown this hormone to be an angiogenic factor in vitro and in vivo. We investigated whether leptin concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) differed between 13 patients with different stages of endometriosis and 15 age- and body mass index-matched controls. We found a statistically significant (P < 0.05) increase in leptin levels in serum (30.3 +/- 14.8 ng/mL) and PF (35.9 +/- 17.4 ng/mL) of patients with endometriosis, compared with our control population (serum, 15.6 +/- 8.4; PF, 17.5 +/- 7.2 ng/mL). Regression equations, relating leptin to body mass index, were also significantly different in endometriosis patients, compared with controls. Higher levels of leptin were observed in the earlier stages of endometriosis than advanced-stage disease. These data suggest that the proinflammatory and neoangiogenic actions of leptin may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.CA-125 and placental protein 14 concentrations in plasma and peritoneal fluid of women with deeply infiltrating pelvic endometriosis.To investigate the plasma and peritoneal fluid (PF) concentrations of CA-125 and placental protein (PP14) in women with deeply infiltrating endometriosis.Plasma and PF were collected during 384 consecutive laparoscopies for pelvic pain or infertility.The presence and extent of endometriosis were carefully assessed, including the area, depth of infiltration, and volume of subtle lesions, typical lesions, and endometriomas. The day of the menstrual cycle was ascertained by endometrial biopsy and/or basal body temperature charts.Peritoneal fluid concentrations were some 100 and 10 times higher than plasma concentrations for CA-125 and PP14, respectively. Cyclic variations of CA-125 concentrations were only found in women with endometriosis showing increased plasma concentrations at the end of the cycle and increased PF concentrations in the early follicular phase. Cyclic variations of PP14 concentrations were found in women with and without endometriosis both in plasma and PF showing increased concentrations in the late luteal and early follicular phases. In women with endometriosis the increased plasma concentrations of PP14 and CA-125 correlated with the presence and volume of endometriomas and of deeply infiltrating endometriosis. The increased concentrations in PF correlated only with the pelvic area of subtle endometriotic lesions. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of CA-125 for endometriosis were 25% and 87%, respectively, and for endometriomas and/or deeply infiltrating endometriosis 36% and 87%, respectively, for a cutoff concentration of 25 U/mL.Superficial pelvic endometriosis secretes PP14 and CA-125 mainly toward the PF, whereas endometriomas and deeply infiltrating endometriosis secrete mainly toward the plasma. The increased plasma concentrations of CA-125 are most pronounced during the late luteal phase, and endometriomas and/or deeply infiltrating endometriosis can be detected with a sensitivity of 36% and a specificity of 87%.Transvaginal ultrasound and computed tomography combined with clinical parameters and CA-125 determinations in the differential diagnosis of persistent ovarian cysts in premenopausal women.The purpose of this prospective study was to compare the accuracy of computed tomography (CT) and transvaginal ultrasonography in the differential diagnosis of persistent cystic ovarian lesions. The candidates for this study were 161 premenopausal non-pregnant women with an adnexal mass. After a 3-month follow-up, 83 masses persisted and were examined by both techniques before surgery. We also evaluated the CA-125 plasma levels. The CT and ultrasonographic diagnoses were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis. The overall agreement between the test results and the actual outcome was calculated by means of the kappa statistic. Transvaginal ultrasonography has a closer accuracy in the diagnosis of serous cysts and serous cystadenoma, ovarian carcinoma and endometrioma (value of kappa: 0.78, 0.73 and 0.80, respectively) than CT, even if the latter is associated with clinical and biochemical parameters such as patient's age and CA-125 plasma levels. Only in the diagnosis of cystic teratoma, is transvaginal ultrasonography less accurate than CT. In conclusion, in premenopausal women, transvaginal ultrasonography remains a cost-effective method in the diagnosis of most cystic ovarian lesions.Levels of circulating angiogenic cells are not altered in women with endometriosis.Are levels of circulating angiogenic cells (CACs) affected by the presence of endometriosis?Levels of CACs are equivalent in women with and without endometriosis.Murine models have suggested a role for CACs in the development of endometriosis, but their levels in humans have not yet been studied.Eighty-seven women participated in this study. Recruitment took place from July 2010 to May 2012.All women underwent laparoscopy for investigation of symptoms suggestive of endometriosis. Thirty women had no evidence of endometriosis, and 47 women were found to have endometriosis at laparoscopy. CAC levels were determined in peripheral blood by flow cytometry in 64 women. Colony forming unit (CFU) analysis was conducted in 30 women. A separate group of 10 healthy, asymptomatic women donated blood at four time points to assess the effect of the menstrual cycle on CAC levels.For the whole sample, CAC levels (0.0797 ± 0.0052%) and CFU number (10.68 ± 1.98) were equivalent in women with and without endometriosis. CAC levels and CFU number were also unaffected by the stage of disease. No changes in CACs were detected during the menstrual cycle.A difference of at least one standard deviation between the groups would be required to detect a difference with this sample size. Therefore, while CAC levels are not a useful biomarker of disease it is still possible that they are modestly altered by the presence of endometriosis. We did not describe specific types of lesion and it is possible that CAC elevation only occurs when vessel development is at its most prolific. Furthermore, although signals from endometriotic lesions may recruit CACs from blood, this may be insufficient to alter peripheral levels.These data show that CACs are not a useful biomarker of endometriosis and indicate that they may be unaffected by the presence of this disease.This work was supported by grants from the MRC (New Investigator Award, G0601458 to C.M.B.), the Oxford Partnership Comprehensive Biomedical Research Centre with funding from the Department of Health's NIHR Biomedical Research Centres Scheme and the Oxfordshire Health Services Research Committee (OHSRC). There are no conflicts of interest to be declared.Frequency of endometriotic lesions in peritoneum samples from asymptomatic fertile women and correlation with CA125 values.Serological testing for CA125 has been widely used to detect endometriosis and to monitor its progression. However, controversy still exists regarding the usefulness of the plasma CA125 assay for diagnosing endometriosis. Furthermore, some authors have described superficial endometriosis as a cyclical and normal phenomenon in women's lives, and have indicated that development and progression of this disease would only occur in some women as a result of immunological changes. This study aimed to determine the frequency of endometriosis and the correlation between serum CA125 levels and the presence of endometriotic lesions in the peritoneum of asymptomatic fertile patients.Cross-sectional study at the Family Planning outpatient clinic of Faculdade de Medicina do ABC.Eighty asymptomatic fertile patients who underwent tubal sterilization surgery were studied. Blood and peritoneum samples were collected. CA125 levels were measured from blood samples, and peritoneum biopsies were studied using histopathological tests.Histopathological evaluation of the peritoneum revealed that 16.25% of the patients had minimal or mild endometriosis. There was no statistically significant difference in CA125 levels between patients with and without endometriosis.The presence of endometriotic lesions in the peritoneum of fertile patients supports the hypothesis that incidental findings of minimal or mild endometriosis may not be of clinical significance, and that the progression of the disease probably occurs as a result of immunological and genetic abnormalities. Serum CA125 levels did not show any diagnostic significance with regard to detecting the disease.Evaluation of erythrocyte band 3 phosphotyrosine level, glutathione content, CA-125, and human epididymal secretory protein E4 as combined parameters in endometriosis.To investigate the biochemical parameters of the erythrocyte response to diamide-induced oxidative stress, alone or as adjuncts to serum values of CA-125 and human epididymal secretory protein E4 (HE4), in the diagnosis and study of endometriosis.University of Padova.Prospective study.Forty-five patients of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy.All women were studied for endometriotic foci during laparoscopic surgery. Forty-one had laparoscopically and histologically confirmed endometriosis, and four did not. Twenty women with confirmed endometriosis were reassessed 1-4 months later.CA-125 and HE4 and two new parameters evaluated in erythrocytes after diamide-induced stress, that is, band 3 tyrosine phosphorylation (Tyr-P) level and decrease in total glutathione content (ΔGSH), were assessed in all patients.In association with serum CA-125 levels but not with HE4, diamide-related erythrocyte band 3 Tyr-P and ΔGSH were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis and were able to discriminate with high sensitivity and specificity between patients before and after surgery.Endometriosis is associated with an increase in systemic oxidative stress, affecting the antioxidative defenses of circulating erythrocytes. All related implications, including evaluation of other oxidative stress-related changes, warrant further study.Killer immunoglobulin-like receptor and human leukocyte antigen expression as immunodiagnostic parameters for pelvic endometriosis.We investigated host immunologic responses to endometriosis by comparing immune cell surface antigens in peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) from women with endometriosis with those in PB and PF from other patients.Japanese women with endometriosis (n = 56) were compared with controls with other laparoscopic diagnoses (n = 68). PB and PF were collected at the time of laparoscopy for flow cytometry.No significant difference in phenotypic parameters of T cells (CD3, CD4, and CD8), B cells (CD19), natural killer (NK) cells (CD56), or monocytes/macrophages (CD14) was seen between women with and without endometriosis. However, increased killer immunoglobulin-like receptor (CD158a) expression by NK cells and decreased human leukocyte antigen (HLA)-ABC and -DR expression by macrophages, all suggesting decreased functional activation were found in endometriosis. These markers showed significant association with endometriosis by odds ratio, logistic regression, and decision tree analyses.Increased CD158a(+) NK cells in PB and PF indicated decreased NK cell cytotoxicity in endometriosis, while decreased HLA expression on PF macrophages suggested impaired antigen presentation. Thus, aberrant immune responses by NK cells and macrophages may represent risk factors for endometriosis.[Diagnostic value of the detection of aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis].To evaluate the diagnostic value of examining endometrial biopsy specimens for aromatase cytochrome P450 and CA125 for endometriosis.The expression of aromatase cytochrome P450 in endometrium was detected by immunohistochemical analysis for 36 endometriosis women and 22 non-endometriosis but subfertility or pelvic pain women served as controls; the serum CA125 levels were measured by chemical radiation method.By measuring serum CA125, the sensitivity of the serum CA125 assay was 44%, the specificity was 82%, the positive predictive value was 80%, and the negative predictive value was 47%; the sensitivity of aromatase cytochrome P450 in biopsy endometrium of endometriosis was 82%, the specificity was 59%, the positive predictive value was 76%, and the negative predictive value was 67%.The combination assay of aromatase cytochrome P450 in eutopic endometrium and CA125 can be used as a diagnostic test for endometriosis, especially for the early stage of endometriosis, which is superior to the assay of CA125.Autoimmunity to endometrium and ovary in endometriosis.Antibody titres to whole ovary, theca cells, granulosa cells and endometrium were determined by passive haemagglutination and immunofluorescence assays in sera and in cervical and vaginal secretions from 13 patients with endometriosis. Antibody titres to endometrium (mean log2 +/- s.e.m., 7.08 +/- 0.80; P less than 0.0001), ovary (3.58 +/- 0.87; P = 0.0092), theca cells (4.42 +/- 0.73; P less than 0.0001) and granulosa cells (3.33 +/- 0.63; P = 0.0024) were significantly higher in the patients' sera than in sera from 15 normal non-pregnant females. Antibody titres to granulosa cells were elevated (7.97 +/- 1.46; P = 0.0424) in their cervical secretions. Antibody titres to all tissues tested were similar in vaginal secretions of patients and controls. Immunofluorescent antibody assay of biopsied endometrial tissue and sera from the patients revealed the antibodies to be primarily IgG and IgA. The results suggest that autoantibodies to endometrium and ovary are present in patients with endometriosis.Evaluation of serum and urinary angiogenic factors in patients with endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate serum and urinary levels of vascular endothelial growth factors, tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), and soluble fms-like tyrosine kinase (sFlt-1) in patients with endometriosis.During surgery for pelvic pain, pelvic mass or infertility, serum and urine were collected. Of 70 patients, 46 had histology-proven endometriosis and 24 patients without endometriosis participated as controls.Serum TNF-alpha levels and urinary sFlt-1 levels corrected for creatinine excretion were significantly increased in the endometriosis group (P=0.001 and P=0.011 respectively). Serum sFlt-1 levels and urinary sFlt-1 levels corrected for creatinine were significantly higher in patients with minimal-to-mild disease (P=0.014 and P=0.015 respectively), where serum TNF-alpha levels were increased in moderate-to-severe endometriosis (P<0.001).The pathogenesis of minimal-to-mild endometriosis and moderate-to-severe endometriosis seems to be different. Increased sFlt-1 levels in serum and urine of minimal-to-mild disease indicate that sFlt-1 may have an important role in inhibiting angiogenic process of the disease.[Serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 concentration in women with endometriosis].To evaluate the clinical utility of CA-125 measurements in peritoneal fluid (PF) as an indicator of endometriosis.CA-125 levels in paired serum and peritoneal fluid were assessed by IMx CA-125 Assay (ABBOTT).107 women with and without endometriosis, undergoing laparoscopy during the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle were selected for the study.CA-125 levels in peritoneal fluid were higher than those found in serum and were significantly elevated (P < 0.05) in comparison to the control group. In women with endometriosis stage I-II and stage III-IV. CA-125 levels in serum were increased only in stage III-IV.The sensitivity of the peritoneal fluid CA-125 test for endometriosis is higher than the respective serum test. The measurement of CA-125 levels in PF could be useful in the detection of the early stage endometriosis, which seems to be missed by the CA-125 serum test.Mononuclear cell beta-endorphin concentration in women with and without endometriosis.Seventy-five consecutive patients undergoing laparoscopy for chronic pelvic pain and/or infertility were studied to test whether beta-endorphin concentrations in peripheral mononuclear cells differed according to the presence or absence of endometriosis. Endometriosis was diagnosed in 45 subjects (minimal in 24, mild in 11, moderate in four, and severe in six). Twenty-eight women (62%) with endometriosis and ten (33%) without the disease reported moderate or severe pelvic pain. beta-Endorphin levels were lower in the endometriosis group than in the controls (16.6 +/- 11.2 versus 21.9 +/- 10.5 pg/10(6) cells; P less than .01). This decrease was attributable to reduced beta-endorphin concentrations in the endometriosis patients with moderate or severe pain compared with symptomatic controls (15.5 +/- 10.0 versus 26.3 +/- 7.0 pg/10(6) cells; P less than .01). A significant difference was also found in relation to the cycle phase: The opioid concentration was reduced in the luteal phase in the endometriosis group compared with controls (14.4 +/- 8.4 versus 23.8 +/- 7.5 pg/10(6) cells; P less than .01), but no differences were demonstrated in the follicular and periovulatory phases. beta-Endorphin is capable of modulating the immune response and can be considered as a classical cytokine. Low beta-endorphin production during the luteal phase may have implications in the development and/or maintenance of endometriosis.Autoimmune phenomena in infertile patients with endometriosis.To assess the presence of autoimmune factors in patients with endometriosis, endometrial homogenates, peritoneal fluid, and serum were evaluated in 23 patients with endometriosis and 22 control subjects. The methods used were Ouchterlony immunodiffusion, immunoelectrophoresis, polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis, and radial immunodiffusion. The study demonstrated precipitation lines between endometrial homogenates and serum from some endometriosis patients but not from the control subjects. Immunoelectrophoresis demonstrated precipitation lines at beta-globulin position when endometrial homogenates were used against serum of patients with endometriosis and with goat antihuman serum. It is suggested that an antigen, possibly a glycoprotein, is present in the endometrial homogenates. Radial immunodiffusion studies for immunoglobulins (Ig) G, A, and M and complement components C3c and C4 showed significantly higher concentrations of C3c and C4 in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis than the control subjects (P less than .05). There was no significant difference in concentration of IgG, A, M, factor B, and properdin.Role of IL-18 in pathogenesis of endometriosis.Endometriosis is a complex disease associated with a wide range of immune responses, including pain, adhesion, exudation of peritoneal fluid, elevation of cytokine levels and generation of autoantibodies. Interleukin (IL)-18 is a strong pleiotropic cytokine known to be involved in various immune diseases. The aim of this study is to elucidate the role of IL-18 in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.IL-18 and IL-1beta concentrations were measured in the peritoneal fluid and sera of 39 endometriosis patients and 15 control women. Expression of IL-18 and IL-18 receptor alpha-chain (IL-18Ralpha) was analysed in endometriotic tissues immunohistochemically. The effects of IL-18 on cyclooxygenase (COX)-II gene expression were analysed in peritoneal fluid monocytes and endometriotic cells of endometriosis patients.IL-18 concentrations in the peritoneal fluid of endometriosis patients averaged 592.57 +/- 108.27 pg/ml, significantly higher than 260.50 +/- 55.88 pg/ml in non-endometriotic samples. IL-18 concentrations in the serum did not differ significantly between endometriosis and control patients. Similarly, no significant differences were observed in IL-1beta concentrations in either the peritoneal fluid or the serum. IL-18 and IL-18Ralpha were expressed in endometriotic tissues. IL-18Ralpha expression was also observed in cells infiltrating into the inflammatory area of the endometriosis patients. COX-II was induced in peritoneal fluid monocytes and in endometriotic cells in response to IL-18 stimulation.The elevation of IL-18 in the peritoneal fluid of endometriosis patients and the induction of COX-II in peritoneal monocytes by IL-18 suggest that IL-18 plays a pathogenic role in endometriosis.A metabonomics approach as a means for identification of potential biomarkers for early diagnosis of endometriosis.Our present study focuses on the identification of predictive biomarkers in serum for the early diagnosis of endometriosis in a minimally invasive manner using (1)H-NMR based metabonomics. PLS-DA modeling of bins obtained from CPMG spectra of serum samples discriminated endometriosis patients from controls with sensitivity and specificity levels of about 80% and 90%, respectively. Compared with those from controls, serum samples from endometriosis patients showed increased levels of lactate, 3-hydroxybutyrate, alanine, leucine, valine, threonine, lysine, glycerophosphatidylcholine, succinic acid and 2-hydroxybutyrate as well as decreased levels of lipids, glucose, isoleucine and arginine. Our work offers valuable information for non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis and may be of potential benefit to understand pathogenesis of the disease.Quantitative and qualitative peritoneal immune profiles, T-cell apoptosis and oxidative stress-associated characteristics in women with minimal and mild endometriosis.To assess immunological variables, T-cell apoptosis and oxidative stress markers in the peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid of women with (WEN) and without (WWE) endometriosis.Observational and transverse case-control study.National Institute of Perinatology, Mexico City, Mexico.Peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid obtained from 30 WWE and 32 WEN.Blood was drawn before surgery and peritoneal fluid was collected during surgery but before any surgical procedure had been carried out. Flow cytometry, spectrophotometry, high-performance liquid chromatography and multiplex immunoassay analyses were performed. MAIN OUTCOME MEASURES Peripheral and peritoneal lymphocyte subpopulations (CD3(+), CD4(+) CD3(+), CD8(+) CD3(+), CD16(+) CD56(+), human leucocyte antigen-DR(+) CD3(+) and CD19(+)), intracellular CD4(+) CD3(+) and CD8(+) CD3(+) cytokine synthesis (interleukin-2 [IL-2] and interferon-γ [IFN-γ]), CD3(+) apoptosis, malondialdehyde and ascorbate concentrations and peritoneal cytokine concentrations.No differences were found in peripheral and peritoneal lymphocyte subsets between the groups. Peritoneal T lymphocytes from WEN produced less IL-2 and IFN-γ than those from WWE. Peritoneal malondialdehyde concentrations were higher and ascorbate concentrations were lower in WEN than in WWE. Higher peritoneal concentrations of pro-inflammatory cytokines (IL-1β, tumour necrosis factor-α and IL-6) and chemokines (IL-10, IL-8, eotaxin, vascular endothelial growth factor, monocyte chemotactic protein-1 and regulated upon activation, normal T-cell expressed, and secreted) and lower concentrations of IFN-γ, IL-1 receptor antagonist and IL-15 were found in WEN. No statistical differences were found in IL-2, IL-4, IL-12 and IL-13 concentrations.The alterations observed in WEN were associated with a diminished peritoneal T helper type 1 immune response. Pro-inflammatory, chemotactic, angiogenic and oxidative stress markers were altered in the peritoneal milieu of WEN. These changes appeared to contribute to the peritoneal immune alterations found.Patients with endometriosis of the rectosigmoid have a higher percentage of natural killer cells in peripheral blood.To estimate the concentration of natural killer (NK) cells in the peripheral blood in patients with and without endometriosis.Case-control study (Canadian Task Force classification II-2).Tertiary referral hospital.One hundred fifty-five patients who had undergone videolaparoscopy were divided into 2 groups: those with endometriosis (n = 100) and those without endometriosis (n = 55).The percentage of NK cells relative to peripheral lymphocytes was quantified at flow cytometry in 155 patients who had undergone laparoscopy. In addition to verifying the presence of endometriosis, stage of disease and the sites affected were also evaluated.The mean (SD) percentage of NK cells was higher (15.3% [9.8%]) in patients with endometriosis than in the group without the disease (10.6% [5.8%]) (p < .001). The percentage of NK cells was highest (19.8 [10.3%]) in patients with advanced stages of endometriosis and in those in whom the rectosigmoid colon was affected. In a statistical model of probability, the association of this marker (NK cells ≥11%) with the presence of symptoms such as pain and intestinal bleeding during menstruation and the absence of previous pregnancy yielded a 78% likelihood of the rectosigmoid colon being affected.Compared with patients without endometriosis, those with endometriosis demonstrate a higher concentration of peripheral NK cells. The percentage of NK cells is greater, primarily in patients with advanced stages of endometriosis involving the rectosigmoid colon. Therefore, it may serve as a diagnostic marker for this type of severe endometriosis, in particular if considered in conjunction with the symptoms.Transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.To assess the role of transvaginal ultrasonography combined with CA-125 plasma levels in the diagnosis of endometrioma.Prospective study with pathological confirmation of the diagnosis.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology of the University of Cagliari, Italy.One hundred one consecutive premenopausal nonpregnant women submitted to laparoscopy or laparotomy, from November 1993 to October 1994, because of the presence of an adnexal mass.Within 2 days before surgery all patients underwent transvaginal ultrasonography and evaluation of CA-125 plasma levels. The ultrasonographic impression and the CA-125 value were then compared with the histopathological diagnosis.The overall agreement between the test result and the actual outcome was calculated using the kappa index for the transvaginal ultrasonography used alone and for the combination of transvaginal ultrasonography and CA-125 values, for each chosen cutoff and range.Transvaginal ultrasonography has a strong agreement between test and surgery (kappa value 0.76) whereas the combined use of the two methods is associated with a lower kappa index, ranging from 0.40 to 0.69.Transvaginal ultrasonography used alone has a better predictive capacity in differentiating endometrioma from other adnexal masses than combined methods.[Serum levels of soluble intercellular molecule 1 (sICAM-1) in endometriosis].To investigate the serum levels of ICAM-1 and its relationship to the extent of the disease.Serum sICAM-1 levels of 21 women with endometriosis were measured with a specific enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, and 21 women without endometriosis were selected as control. Serum sICAM-1 levels were compared between endometriotic and non-endometriotic women, and among patients at different stages of endometriosis.Significantly higher serum sICAM-1 levels were observed in women with endometriosis [(0.30 +/- 0.07) microgram/ml] than in those without endometriosis [(0.18 +/- 0.05) microgram/ml] (P < 0.01); in women with stage I approximately II of endometriosis, the serum sICAM-1 levels were (0.24 +/- 0.06) microgram/ml, while in those with stage III approximately IV of endometriosis, the serum sICAM-1 level was (0.32 +/- 0.06) microgram/ml, the difference is of statistically significant.No differences of serum sICAM-1 level was found between proliferative and secretary phase in women with and without endometriosis.Significantly elevated serum sICAM-1 levels in women with endometriosis, especially in those with advanced stages of the disease suggests the molecule might be of value in pathogenesis of endometriosis.The use of CA-125 in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.CA-125, a cell-surface antigen, was measured by a radioimmunoassay in the serum of 414 women to determine its potential usefulness in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis. In women with minimal, mild, moderate, and severe endometriosis, the mean levels (+/- standard deviation) were 13.6 +/- 6.8, 22.8 +/- 15.5, 27 +/- 17, and 50 +/- 28 U/ml, respectively, and were significantly higher than mean levels (7.8 +/- 4.1) in 46 women with a normal laparoscopic examination. Higher mean CA-125 values also were observed in acute pelvic inflammatory disease, unexplained fertility, and pregnancy and during menstruation. The mean CA-125 value in women with treated endometriosis and a negative second-look laparoscopy was significantly lower than in women with untreated endometriosis. With the use of the 95% upper limit of 16 U/ml, the test had a sensitivity of 53% and specificity of 93%. The frequencies of elevated levels in minimal, mild, moderate, and severe endometriosis were 27%, 68%, 73%, and 100%, respectively. Changes in the CA-125 levels correlated with the clinical course of endometriosis in 37 of 44 (84%) women (P less than 0.001). The determination of CA-125 levels may assist in the evaluation and treatment of women with endometriosis.Concentrations of interleukin (IL)-1alpha, IL-1 soluble receptor type II (IL-1 sRII) and IL-1 receptor antagonist (IL-1 Ra) in the peritoneal fluid and serum of infertile women with endometriosis.Endometriosis is an immune system-related gynaecological disease, characterised by an increase in number and activation of peritoneal macrophages. One of macrophage-derived factors is interleukin (IL)-1. The effects of IL-1 are inhibited by IL-1 receptor type II (IL-1 RII), soluble forms of IL-1 RII (IL-1 sRII) and IL-1 receptor antagonist (IL-1 Ra). The aim of our work was to study the IL-1alpha, IL-1 sRII and IL-1 Ra levels in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum of women with endometriosis in relation to stage of disease.Concentrations of IL-1alpha, IL-1 sRII and IL-1 Ra were measured by ELISA assay in the PF and serum of 58 women; 43 with and 15 without endometriosis (control group).Elevated PF and serum IL-1alpha and IL-1 Ra levels in the women with endometriosis in comparison with the control group were observed. IL-1 sRII levels in PF and serum were higher in the controls than in the women with endometriosis. Concentrations of IL-1alpha and IL-1 sRII were higher in advanced endometriosis, but higher IL-1 Ra was observed in the early stage of the disease.Impairment of regulation IL-1 activity in the peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis may play an important role in the pathogenesis and development of the disease.Panel of markers can accurately predict endometriosis in a subset of patients.To evaluate whether a combination of putative markers of inflammation and CA-125 could serve as a multiple-marker screening test for endometriosis in a heterogeneous population of patients.Case-control evaluation of a diagnostic test.University medical center.Consenting women of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy for indications of pain, infertility, elective tubal ligation, tubal reanastomosis, or other benign indications.Diagnostic laparoscopy and peripheral venipuncture.Serum concentrations of interleukin-6, tumor necrosis factor-alpha, macrophage migration inhibitory factor, macrophage chemotactic protein-1, interferon-gamma, leptin, and CA-125 measured by using ELISA assays; surgical staging of endometriosis.Concentrations of the seven markers were compared between the 63 women with surgically confirmed stage II-IV endometriosis and 78 women who were surgically confirmed to be free of endometriosis. The individual diagnostic performance of each of the markers, based on receiver operating characteristic curves, was poor. When combinations of markers were evaluated by using classification tree analysis, a three-marker panel of CA-125, macrophage chemotactic protein-1, and leptin could diagnose 51% of subjects as to the presence of endometriosis with 89% accuracy. A four-marker panel of CA-125, macrophage chemotactic protein-1, leptin, and macrophage migration inhibitory factor could diagnose 48% of subjects with 93% accuracy. The remaining subjects would have no definitive diagnosis on the basis of the algorithm and would need to undergo standard evaluation.This large study evaluates the combined use of putative serum markers for the diagnosis of endometriosis, rather than the use of each singly. Using the serum concentration of four markers in a two-tiered decision rule, nearly half of the subjects in this population would have been diagnosed (and could have avoided surgery) with 93% accuracy.Endometriosis: an inflammatory disease with a Th2 immune response component.Efforts have been made to correctly characterize the role of the immune response in endometriosis. The objective of this study was to analyse the interaction between Th1 and Th2 immune response patterns and endometriosis by evaluating a panel of cytokines.Between January 2004 and November 2005, 98 patients, classified into two groups according to the histologically confirmed presence (Group A) or absence of endometriosis (Group B), were evaluated. Interleukins (IL) 2, 4 and 10, tumour necrosis factor-alpha and interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) were measured by flow cytometry in the peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid of all patients.IFN-gamma and IL-10 levels were significantly higher in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis compared to those without endometriosis (P < 0.05). There was a significant alteration in the IL-4/IFN-gamma (P < 0.001), IL-4/IL-2 (P = 0.006), IL-10/IFN-gamma (P < 0.001) and the IL-10/IL-2 ratios (P < 0.001) in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis, with a predominance of IL-4 and IL-10, reflecting a shift towards Th2 immune response despite the increase in IFN-gamma concentrations.Endometriosis is an inflammatory disease involving a possible shift towards Th2 immune response component, as demonstrated by the relative increase in cytokines characteristic of this pattern of immune response.Changes in immunologic variables (TNF-a, sCD8 and sCD4) during danazol treatment in patients with endometriosis.The levels of TNF-a, sCD8, and sCD4 were measured in serum samples taken from 20 women. Blood samples for TNF-a, sCD8 and sCD4 levels were taken from 10 endometriotic women before treatment, during the last 15 days of a 6-month administration of danazol and 3 months after treatment. Blood samples were taken only once from 10 women without endometriosis (control group).TNF-a levels were higher in women with endometriosis before treatment compared to controls (P < .05). Administration of the drug significantly reduced the levels of TNF-a (P < .01) and sCD8 (P < .001).This study indicates that danazol significantly reduces endometriosis-associated autoimmune abnormalities.Menstrual cyclicity of CA-125 in patients with endometriosis.To examine the serum levels of CA-125 in the menstrual, follicular, and luteal phases of the menstrual cycle in women with endometriosis and to determine if serum CA-125 levels drawn during menses improve the clinical utility of the test in diagnosing endometriosis.Serum CA-125 was measured in the menstrual, follicular, and luteal phases of the cycle preceding surgery. CA-125 levels for each phase were categorized by postoperative diagnosis and endometriosis stage.The reproductive endocrine unit of a tertiary care university-affiliated hospital.A total of 65 patients were recruited from the Fertility and Endocrine Unit and the Gynecology Service of Brigham and Women's Hospital.Serum CA-125 levels were measured by an immunoradiometric assay and were stratified by menstrual cycle phase, diagnosis, and stage of endometriosis. The menstrual cycle phase was confirmed by serum estradiol and progesterone measurements.Serum CA-125 levels in patients with stages II to IV endometriosis were significantly elevated in the menstrual phase compared with levels drawn in the nonmenstrual follicular and luteal phases. The sensitivity and specificity of CA-125 for the diagnosis of endometriosis were not significantly better in the menstrual than in the follicular or luteal phases.Despite menstrual cyclicity of CA-125, measurement of serum CA-125 during menses does not improve the clinical utility of the test in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum CA 125 antigen levels and disease severity in patients with endometriosis.We wished to test whether there was a relationship between CA 125 levels and the severity of endometriosis that would allow CA 125 to be used to monitor disease progression. CA 125 levels were measured in 52 women with laparoscopically staged endometriosis and in eight women with normal pelvic findings at laparoscopy. There was a positive correlation (r = 0.63; P less than .0001) between disease severity and CA 125 levels. CA 125 was also elevated, compared with women with a normal pelvis, in patients with mild and moderate disease. There was no relationship between CA 125 levels and the day of the menstrual cycle. These results suggest that after malignancy has been excluded, CA 125 levels may offer a useful method of monitoring disease progress.Detection of antiendometrial antibodies in sera of patients with endometriosis by dual-colored, double-labeling immunohistochemical method and western blot.This study was undertaken to determine whether specific binding activities against endometrial proteins in sera of patients with endometriosis are detectable and, if so, to identify endometrial antigens involved in autoimmunity in endometriosis.Sera from 33 patients with endometriosis and 20 cord sera (controls) were tested against endometria of patients and their protein extracts by dual-colored, double-labeling immunohistochemical method, and Western blotting.Antiendometrial binding activities were detected in sera of 2 (10.0%) control patients and 13 (48.2%) patients with endometriosis by the immunohistochemical method. Endogenous immunoglobulin G (IgG) binding to endometrial proteins had molecular weights (MW) of 26, 28, 54, 85, 107 and 116 kDa. Most sera of both control and patients showed reactivity against endometrial proteins with MW of 34, 36, 56 and 77 kDa. However, there were specific IgG autoantibodies reactive against the endometrial proteins of 71, 92, and 103 kDa in sera of 55.2% (16/29) of patients but not in the control sera. Over 80% (10/12) of patients' sera with binding activities detectable by the immunohistochemical method also tested positive by Western blot analysis.These data show that specific IgG antibodies reactive against endometrial antigens are detectable in sera from some patients with endometriosis.Cytokine and immune cell levels in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood of women with early- and late-staged endometriosis.To investigate the level of cytokines and immune cells in the peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) of different stages of endometriosis.A prospective study was conducted to include 97 women with (n 60) and without (n 37) histopathologically confirmed endometriosis. Based on rASRM classification, stage I/II and stage III/IV were categorized as early-and late-staged endometriosis. Prior to surgery, 10 ml of blood was withdrawn from antecubital vein and serum was obtained. Aliquots were made and stored at -70 degrees C until assayed for cytokines. PF was aspirated from the pouch of Douglas. Peripheral and PF samples were analyzed by ELISA in terms of IL-2, IL-4, IL-10 and IFN-gamma. Determinations of T helper, T suppressor, NK, and B cells were assessed by using cluster determinant-3 (CD-3), CD4, CD8, CD25, CD28, CD45, CD16, CD23 and antibodies against early T cell activation antigens such as CD45RA/CD45RO, CD-69 and late activation antigens such as HLA-DR. A multiparameter flow cytometry was applied to detect the cell activation antigen expression.In terms of cytokine levels in PB and PF's of control group and early- and late-staged endometriosis cases, no significant difference was depicted in the cytokine levels (p > 0.05). Levels of immune cells did not differ between three groups (p > 0.05).The result of this study did not show any significant difference in PB and PF cytokine and lymphocyte subgroups between normal and early- and late-staged endometriosis.Evaluation of serum CA 125 levels in patients with pelvic pain related to endometriosis.The aim of the study was to investigate the clinical value of the serum CA 125 level for diagnosing and determining the severity of endometriosis and pelvic pain associated with endometriosis. Eighty-six women who underwent operative laparoscopy were enrolled. Sixty-nine women with endometriosis and 17 without endometriosis participated in this study. In all of the patients, endometriosis was diagnosed and classified into stages according to the Revised American Fertility Society (R-AFS) classification. The mean serum CA 125 levels were determined in each patient. We also investigated the relationship between serum CA 125 concentration and the intensity of dysmenorrhea and dyspareunia in the study group. The mean serum CA 125 levels of women with endometriosis were higher than those of the control group (p<0.050). However, the mean serum CA 125 levels were higher in stage IV than in other stages of endometriosis according to the R-AFS classification. On the other hand, the percentage of patients with serum CA 125 levels >35 U/mL was elevated in the subgroups with severe dyspareunia and severe dysmenorrhea versus the asymptomatic subgroup but the differences had no statistical significance. In conclusion, CA 125 serum levels were related to endometriosis and R-AFS score in the evaluated patient series. No correlation was found between serum levels of CA 125 and pelvic pain in patients with endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid immunological markers in adolescent girls with chronic pelvic pain.The aim of this study was to determine serum and peritoneal interleukin (IL)-2, IL-4, and monocyte chemotactic protein-1 levels as diagnostic markers of endometriosis in adolescent girls. The design of the study encompassed 50 adolescent girls, aged 13 to 19 years after menarche, with chronic pelvic pain who qualified for diagnostic laparoscopy. The patients were allocated into 2 groups: group I (endometriosis) consisted of subjects with diagnosed endometriosis (n = 33, 66%) and group II (control) whose laparoscopic examinations revealed no evidence of endometriosis (n = 17, 34%). IL-2, IL-4, and Monocyte chemotactic protein 1 concentrations in serum and peritoneal samples were assessed using commercially available human enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay kits. The results were analyzed statistically with the Statistica 8.0 computer software. The value of P < 0.05 was the level of statistical significance. The results in adolescents with endometriosis had significantly higher concentrations of serum IL-4 (3.90 ± 1.58 pg/mL vs. 3.04 ± 1.72 pg/mL; P = 0.04) and peritoneal fluid IL-4 (5.03 ± 8.92 pg/mL vs. 2.74 ± 1.11 pg/mL; P = 0.03), and lower peritoneal fluid IL-2 (92.44 ± 292.75 pg/mL vs. 174.23 ± 389.77 pg/mL; P = 0.01) compared with the control. In a receiver-operating characteristic analysis, serum IL-4 as well as peritoneal fluid IL-2 and IL-4 provided the best discriminative ability between subjects with endometriosis and controls. Using cutoff points for serum IL-4 (3.00 pg/mL), peritoneal fluid IL-2 (21.00 pg/mL) and IL-4 (2.7 pg/mL), relatively high odd ratios were obtained in the prediction of endometriosis in adolescents (3.2; 6.4; 3.3). The Serum IL-4, peritoneal IL-2 and IL-4 provided a good method of discrimination between subjects with endometriosis and controls.Killer inhibitory receptor CD158a overexpression among natural killer cells in women with endometriosis is undiminished by laparoscopic surgery and gonadotropin releasing hormone agonist treatment.Natural killer (NK) dysfunction is considered to contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. In this study, we investigated the host immune response to endometriosis in terms of killer inhibitory receptor (KIR) expression by NK cells.We compared cells from Japanese women laparoscopically diagnosed with endometriosis and treated with laparoscopic surgery (n = 98), 1 month after laparoscopic surgery (n = 36), and 12 weeks after gonadotropin releasing hormone agonist (GnRHa) treatment (n = 18) to cells from 104 women with other laparoscopic diagnoses. KIR expression by NK cells was assessed in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid samples by flow cytometry.In women with endometriosis, the percentage of CD158a-expressing cells among CD16-expressing NK (CD158a(+)NK) cells in both peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood was significantly higher than in control subjects. No significant differences in proportion of CD158a(+)NK cells were identified between peripheral blood NK cells sampled before and 1 month after laparoscopic surgery, or 12 weeks after initiating GnRHa treatment.Increased percentage of CD158a(+)NK cells in peripheral blood from women with endometriosis was undiminished by laparoscopic surgery and GnRHa treatment; the persistence of CD158a(+)NK cell excess is probably related to NK cell suppression in endometriosis. This overexpression may represent a risk factor for development of endometriosis and its recurrence after treatments.Serum Ca-125 concentrations in endometriosis.Serum Ca-125 levels were measured in 154 patients undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy for infertility and/or pelvic pain. Pelvic endometriosis at various stages was observed in 102 of the patients, and 52 had a visually normal pelvis and served as a control group. We found a significantly higher mean serum Ca-125 concentration in the patients with stages III and IV endometriosis compared with the controls (P less than 0.001) whereas in the patients with stages I and II disease the mean antigen level was comparable to that of the control group. Considering its low sensitivity (14.7%) the usefulness of serum Ca-125 measurements as an initial diagnostic test for endometriosis is scanty. On the contrary, because of its elevated specificity (100%), this test may be useful in indicating early surgical exploration of the pelvis in cases of infertility and/or dysmenorrhea which are associated with high values of Ca-125.Spontaneous and induced synthesis of cytokines by peripheral blood monocytes in patients with endometriosis.To investigate the capacity of peripheral blood monocytes (PBM) from women with endometriosis to secrete tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha), interleukin (IL) IL-6, IL-8, and IL-10.Peripheral blood monocytes were cultured in the presence and absence of lipopolysaccharide for 24 hours before assessment of cytokines in supernatants by enzyme immunoassay.Institute for the Study and Treatment of Endometriosis and university-based research laboratories.Fertile controls, n - 10; women with endometriosis, n = 20.None.Basal synthesis of TNF-alpha, IL-6, and IL-8 and the lipopolysaccharide-stimulated synthesis of TNF-alpha by PBM from women with endometriosis was significantly greater in comparison to that of fertile controls. Endometriosis had no effect on the basal or stimulated synthesis of IL-10.These data show that endometriosis is associated with increased basal and stimulated synthesis and secretion of several different cytokines by PBM. Each of the cytokines found to be affected has the capacity to play a role in the symptomatology or pathogenesis of the disease.Use of CA-125 in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis: influence of treatment with danazol.To compare CA-125 levels in endometriotic women with normal controls.The level of the oncofetal antigen CA-125 was measured in serum samples taken from 40 women, aged 21 to 33 years. Blood samples for CA-125 from 15 endometriotic women were measured before treatment, during the last 15 days of a 6-month administration of Danazol, and 3 months after treatment, and were compared to findings in 15 women without endometriosis (from whom blood samples were taken only once).The CA-125 levels were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis before treatment as compared with the controls (P < .01). The administration of Danazol significantly reduced the levels of CA-125 (P < .01), and 3 months after treatment the levels of CA-125 remained significantly lower (P < .05) as compared to the respective pretreatment values.The results support the view that the determination of CA-125 levels may assist in (a) evaluating women with endometriosis and (b) treatment with Danazol.Levels of complement components iC3b, C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 in peritoneal fluid and serum of infertile women with endometriosis.To assess whether complement components iC3b, C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 may be involved in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Prospective, experimental trial.Medical university.112 women infertile women undergoing laparoscopy.Venipuncture and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid collection.Peritoneal fluid and serum iC3b, C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 levels were measured by the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) method.Higher levels of C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 complement components were found in the serum compared with the peritoneal fluid, but the levels of iC3b were higher in the peritoneal fluid. We observed higher concentrations of C3c, C4, and SC5b-9 in the peritoneal fluid and serum of women with endometriosis compared with healthy women. However, the levels of iC3b in both peritoneal fluid and serum were statistically significantly lower than in the control group.The impairment of the mechanisms involved in the regulation of activation of complement system may be an important factor in the pathogenesis of endometriosis and endometriosis-associated infertility.Carbonic anhydrase antibody in sera from patients with endometriosis.Sera from 16 of 23 (69.6%) patients with endometriosis, a potential autoimmune disease, and 2 of 17 (11.8%) control individuals had autoantibodies against the bovine carbonic anhydrase (CA) molecular weight marker, as determined by the Western blot technique. The reactivity of these antibodies to purified human CA I, human CA II, and two preparations of bovine CA II were investigated. Of the 16 endometriosis patients who were reactive to the bovine CA molecular weight marker, 14 were reactive to at least one purified human CA isoenzyme tested, 8 were reactive to at least one purified bovine CA II, and 2 did not react with any of the CA isoenzymes tested. Variation in cross-reactivity between species and in the biochemical characteristics of various CA isoenzyme preparations may partially explain these findings. Autoantibodies to CA isoenzymes have recently been reported in other autoimmune diseases. Further investigation is required to determine the significance of CA autoantibody production in patients with endometriosis.Serum level of IL-10 is increased in patients with endometriosis, and IL-10 promotes the growth of lesions in a murine model.Immune dysregulation may be involved in the development of endometriosis. The anti-inflammatory cytokine IL-10 plays an important role in eliminating unwanted cells and cellular debris in a silent way. We investigated the modulatory role of IL-10 in the development of endometriosis. We observed that the serum level of IL-10 in patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than that in healthy subjects or in control subjects with other gynecological disease. Monocyte-derived dendritic cells acquired from male donors and subsequently conditioned with serum from women with endometriosis exhibited a tolerogenic phenotype, including increased IL-10 production, lower IL-12 secretion, and down-regulation of CD86 and HLA-DR molecules. Depletion of IL-10 activity in a C57BL/6 mouse model of surgically induced endometriosis significantly decreased the size of endometrial lesions. In contrast, IL-10 administration promoted the growth of endometrial lesions in this model. In addition, infiltrated plasmacytoid dendritic cells were the primary IL-10-secreting immune cells in endometrial lesions. Our findings suggest that IL-10 may suppress immunity against endometrial implants, contributing to development of endometriosis. Use of proteomic analysis of endometriosis to identify different protein expression in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.To use proteomic techniques, including two-dimensional electrophoresis (2-DE), Western blot, and mass spectrometry, to screen and identify proteins that were expressed differently in patients with endometriosis versus normal controls.First, we aimed to find a difference in the way serum and eutopic endometrial proteins were expressed in women with and without endometriosis. Second, we were interested in searching for endometriotic proteins, which were specifically recognized by sera from patients with endometriosis.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Consenting women of reproductive age taking no medications and with laparoscopically proven endometriosis.Surgical excision of eutopic and ectopic endometrial biopsy and phlebotomization of patients with endometriosis and controls.Protein expression.Thirteen protein spots from serum correlated with 11 known proteins and 11 protein spots from endometrium correlated with 11 known proteins were found differently expressed between women with and without endometriosis. Some proteins may be cytoskeletons, and some may be involved in the regulation of cell cycle, signal transduction, or immunological function. Three proteins, which were identified as vimentin, beta-actin, and ATP synthase beta subunit, hybridized significantly differently between endometriosis sera and normal sera.The data help to establish a human endometriosis proteome database and broaden our understanding of the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Further study of the proteins identified herein will assist in the eventual development of new diagnoses and treatments for endometriosis.CA-125 levels in endometriosis.CA-125 is a cellular antigen detected in many patients with ovarian cancer, but it has also been detected in patients with endometriosis. Preoperative CA-125 levels were drawn from 113 patients before they underwent laparoscopy. Patients were categorized into diagnostic groups on the basis of pathologic findings. CA-125 levels in patients with evidence of intraabdominal adhesions were not statistically different from those in patients with normal pelvic anatomy. However, patients with advanced endometriosis had significantly elevated levels of CA-125 when compared with patients with normal pelvic anatomy (P less than 0.05). The clinical and immunologic implications of elevated CA-125 levels in patients with advanced endometriosis are discussed.Levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in women with and without endometriosis.To establish an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for determining the levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in the serum of women with and without endometriosis.Serum samples were obtained from 105 normal women, who were randomly selected for a population-based epidemiologic study, and 123 patients with active endometriosis. An ELISA using transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein as antigens was established.The levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in the serum of patients with endometriosis were approximately 21 times higher than those in the serum of control subjects without endometriosis. Only 2% of control subjects had false positive levels of these antibodies, and 5% of patients with endometriosis had false negative levels of these antibodies (specificity, 98.1 and 98.1, respectively, for anti-transferrin and anti-alpha 2-HS glycoprotein; sensitivity, 95 and 96.7, respectively, for anti-transferrin and anti-alpha 2-HS glycoprotein).Patients with endometriosis have significantly higher levels of antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein than control subjects. Testing women for antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein will provide a specific noninvasive diagnosis of endometriosis.[Study on interferon gamma and interleukin-4 contents of plasma and cultured monoclear cell supernatants in patients with endometriosis].To investigate the cytokin production of T helper cell (Th) 1, Th2 subsets in patients with endometriosis(EM).The cytokine production of Th1, Th2 cells expressed by interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) and interleukin-4 (IL-4) contents respectively in supernatants of cultured PHA induced peripheral blood mononuclear cell (PBMC) and plasma, obtained from 30 EM patients and 15 normal controls were determined by enzyme linked immunoabsorbent assay (ELISA).IL-4 contents of EM patients were elevated both in plasma and PBMC supernatants[(32.0 +/- 22.6) ng/L and (32.8 +/- 12.5) ng/L, respectively], while IFN-gamma levels was suppressed in PBMC supernatant as compared with normal controls [(1,095.6 +/- 375.6) ng/L and (1,549.3 +/- 361.9) ng/L, respectively] (P < 0.01, P < 0.05). As a results, the ratio of IFN-gamma/IL-4 decreased in EM patients.Changes of IFN-gamma and IL-4 contents in EM patients may reflect functional inbalance between Th1 and Th2 cells, which may play a role in the pathogenesis of EM.[Study on the changes of T-lymphocyte subsets in the patients with endometriosis].To investigate the function of T-lymphocyte subsets in patients with endometriosis.The levels of interleukin-2 (IL-2) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) in the serum, and peritoneal fluid of 30 cases with endometriosis were detected using enzyme linked immunoabsorbent assay and compared with those of 20 non-endometriosis cases. The expression of IL-2 and IL-6 in ectopic endometrial tissue from the patients with endometriosis and the endometrial tissues of 10 normal women was investigated by immunohistochemistry method.Significantly elevated levels of IL-6 (cytokines of T help cell 2) were found in the serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis (Median: 5.3 ng/L, 2.1 ng/L, P < 0.05) compared with that of non-endometriosis patients median: 2.5 ng/L, 0.9 ng/L). The level of IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid of endometriosis patients in early stages (stages I, II) was 3.7 ng/L, 1.6 ng/L, significantly lower than those in advanced stages (stages III, IV) (13.6 ng/L, 4.1 ng/L) (P < 0.05). The ratio of IL-2/IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid in patients with endometriosis (0.7, 1.1) was significantly lower than those in the control non-endometriosis group (0.8, 6.2, P < 0.05). The levels of IL-6 detected in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis had a positive correlation with those in the serum (r = 0.745, P < 0.01). The levels of IL-6 in serum and peritoneal fluid in the patients with endometriosis had a negative correlation with the IL-2/IL-6 ratios in the serum and peritoneal fluid respectively (r = -0.406, r = -0.480, P < 0.05). IL-2 and IL-6 were expressed in the interstitial cells of ectopic endometrial tissue, with an expression rate of 56.7%, and 60.0% respectively. There was significant difference in the expression of IL-2 and IL-6 between the ectopic endometrial tissue and normal endometrial tissue.The levels of IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis are increased, implying that IL-6 might play a role in the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The ratio of IL-2/IL-6 in the serum and peritoneal fluid was decreased in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group, suggesting shift of Th1 cell toward Th2 cell in patients with endometriosis. Stronger expression of IL-2 and IL-6 in the ectopic endometrial tissues may contribute to the disturbed immune regulation in patients with endometriosis.Elevated levels of macrophage migration inhibitory factor in the peripheral blood of women with endometriosis.To evaluate the concentrations of macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF) in the peripheral blood of normal women and patients with endometriosis.Retrospective study using ELISA to measure peripheral blood MIF.Gynecology clinic and human reproduction research laboratory.Thirty-eight normal women and 55 women with endometriosis.Peripheral blood samples were obtained a few days before laparoscopy.The MIF concentrations in blood serum.This current study showed a 364% increase in MIF concentrations in women with endometriosis as compared to normal women. A significant increase was seen in endometriosis stages I-II, but a more marked increase was observed in the more advanced stages of the disease (III-IV). Both fertile and infertile women with endometriosis had higher levels of MIF than normal controls, but the difference was more significant in infertile women with endometriosis. Women with endometriosis with no pelvic pain had higher levels of MIF than normal controls, but a more significant increase in MIF levels was observed in women with endometriosis reporting pelvic pain.This study showed a marked increase in MIF concentrations in the peripheral blood of women with endometriosis and a relationship with disease progress, and suggests that MIF may be involved in endometriosis-related pain and infertility.Measurement of hs-CRP is irrelevant to diagnose and stage endometriosis: prospective study of 834 patients.The pathogenesis of endometriosis is associated with an inflammatory process. Here, we assessed if the levels of high-sensitivity C-reactive protein (hs-CRP) in serum could constitute an effective method for detecting systemic inflammation during endometriosis.This was a prospective, laboratory-based study, which was carried out in a tertiary care university hospital. Patients with histologically proven endometriosis (n = 370) and unaffected women (n = 464) were enrolled from January 2005 through December 2009. We performed complete surgical excision of endometriotic lesions with pathological analysis. In addition, hs-CRP levels were determined through a particle-enhanced immunoturbidimetric method. The hs-CRP levels were measured in both controls and women with endometriosis according to the established surgical classifications of endometriosis: superficial peritoneal endometriosis, endometrioma, and deep infiltration endometriosis. Also, hs-CRP levels were evaluated according to hormonal treatment and menstrual cycle.The hs-CRP serum levels did not statistically differ between women with endometriosis and controls (median in ng/mL [range]: 0.82 [0.04-42.89] vs 0.9 [0.03-43.73], respectively; P = .599). Moreover, subgroup analysis revealed no difference among superficial peritoneal endometriosis, endometrioma, deep infiltration endometriosis, and controls: 0.8 (0.15-13.35), 0.81 (0.04-38.82), 0.83 (0.09-42.89), and 0.9 (0.03-43.73), respectively; P = .872. Furthermore, no effect was observed regarding hormonal treatment or menstrual cycle.Although endometriosis is an inflammatory disease, we failed to identify any systemic changes in hs-CRP serum levels. Therefore, hs-CRP analysis appears to be irrelevant to the diagnosis and staging of endometriosis.Changes of peripheral blood lymphocyte subsets before and after operation of patients with endometriosis.This study was performed to elucidate whether endometriotic lesions can affect peripheral blood lymphocyte-subsets. Changes of lymphocyte-subsets of normal healthy women and patients with uterine myoma or endometriosis before and after operation were also examined by using two-color assay methods. The percentage and absolute number of CD57+CD16+ cells [moderately differentiated natural killer (NK) cells] of NK cell subsets in peripheral blood from patients with endometriosis were significantly lower than values from normal healthy women and patients with uterine myoma, while there was no difference in CD4+ and CD8+ lymphocyte-subsets between normal healthy women and patients with uterine myoma or endometriosis. In patients with endometriosis the percentage and absolute number of CD8+CD11+ cells (suppressor T-cells) was significantly increased after operation, while those in patients with urine myoma did not change. On the other hand, resection of endometriotic lesions resulted in a significant decrease of the percentage of CD57+CD16- cells (immature NK cells) and a significant increase of not only the percentage but also the absolute number of CD57+CD16+ cells (moderately differentiated NK cells), suggesting that existence of endometriotic lesions disturbs differentiation of the NK cells. Furthermore, suppressor inducer T-cells as shown by measuring CD4+2H4+ and CD4+4B4- cells were significantly increased after operation of endometriosis.(ABSTRACT TRUNCATED AT 250 WORDS)Serum CA-125 in women with endometriosis and chronic pelvic pain.Since serum CA-125 concentrations are increased in women with endometriosis, the authors evaluated CA-125 levels to determine whether this serum test would be useful in differentiating between pelvic pain due to endometriosis and other causes. During a 30-month period, 163 women who had had pelvic pain for at least 3 months had a CA-125 level obtained prior to surgery. Serum CA-125 was measured by an immunoradiometric assay. Of the 82 women with endometriosis, 66 (80%) had CA-125 concentrations greater than or equal to 16 U/ml (95% upper limit). The frequencies of elevated levels in minimal, mild, moderate, and severe endometriosis were 52, 86, 100, and 100%, respectively. Of the 81 women without endometriosis, 5 (6%) had elevated concentrations. With the use of serum CA-125 determinations for the detection of endometriosis, the sensitivity was 80%, the specificity was 94%, and the accuracy was 93% when the prevalence of endometriosis was 50%. The authors conclude that determination of CA-125 levels may assist in the evaluation and treatment of women with chronic pelvic pain.Serum concentrations of insulin-like growth factor-1, soluble tumor necrosis factor receptor-1 and angiogenin in endometriosis patients.Many soluble factors contributing to the pathophysiology of endometriosis are found at abnormal levels in patients suffering from the disease. We postulated that levels of these factors could also be altered in the serum of patients. We compared levels of insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1), soluble form of tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) receptor-1 (sTNFR-1) and angiogenin in the serum of patients with endometriosis and controls.Levels of IGF-1, sTNFR-1 and angiogenin were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in samples from 148 patients (77 cases and 71 controls) with diagnostic confirmed by laparoscopy. Correlations with demographic data and stage of the disease were evaluated and potential confounders in the study population were controlled.A significant increase in sTNFR-1 and angiogenin serum levels was observed in cases in comparison with controls, but only for patients in the follicular phase of the cycle. No significant difference was found in serum levels of IGF-1, sTNFR-1 and angiogenin between cases and controls in the luteal phase of the cycle. Correlations between levels of angiogenin and stage of the disease could also be observed.sTNFR-1 and angiogenin represent potential blood markers for endometriosis.Serum CA-125 in the evaluation of benign adnexal cysts.Because serum CA-125 concentrations are increased in women with endometriosis, our objective was to determine whether CA-125 levels could be used to differentiate endometriotic from nonendometriotic benign cysts. During a 2-year period, all women who had an endometrioma (n = 33) or a nonendometriotic cyst (n = 27) that was greater than or equal to 4 cm were included. Serum CA-125 levels were measured by an immunoradiometric assay, and the mean concentrations in women with an endometriotic cyst increased as the diameter of the cyst increased. The mean CA-125 concentrations in women with cysts greater than or equal to 4 cm were 53 +/- 2 U/ml in 19 women with an endometriotic cyst, 11 +/- 1 U/ml in 20 women with a nonendometriotic cyst, and 15 +/- 1 U/ml in 7 women with a nonendometriotic cyst and endometriosis. In the fluid of 10 endometriomas, the mean CA-125 concentration was 290 +/- 94 X 10(3) U/ml (range 10 to 900 X 10(3) U/ml). With cysts diameters greater than or equal to 4 cm, 19 of 19 women with endometriotic cysts, zero of seven women with nonendometriotic cysts and endometriosis, and zero of 20 women with nonendometriotic cysts had CA-125 concentrations greater than or equal to 20 U/ml (99% upper normal limit). We conclude that serum CA-125 determinations offer an excellent method to differentiate endometriotic from nonendometriotic benign cysts.Antiendometrial antibodies in patients with endometriosis.Sera from 42 patients complaining of infertility were evaluated by indirect immunofluorescence for the presence of antibodies to the endometrium. The presence or absence of antibodies was matched with the findings at laparoscopy. Of the 42 patients examined for infertility, 28 (66.7%) had laparoscopic findings that corresponded to the presence or absence of endometriosis. Of 28 patients with positive antibody tests, 24 (85.7%) were found to have endometriosis. No correlation between the degree of immunofluorescence and the clinical severity of endometriosis could be determined. These findings suggest the possibility of developing a noninvasive immunological test for the presence of endometriosis.Concentrations of receptor for advanced glycation end products, VEGF and CML in plasma, follicular fluid, and peritoneal fluid in women with and without endometriosis.The etiology and pathogenesis of endometriosis is largely unknown. It has been reported that advanced glycation end products-receptor for advanced glycation end products regulation relates to oxidative stress, inflammatory reaction, apoptosis, and angiogenesis through vascular endothelial growth factor activation. The purpose of this study was to examine whether advanced glycation end products-receptor for advanced glycation end products regulation contributes to the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Plasma, follicular, and peritoneal fluid samples were collected from women with or without endometriosis, and soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products, vascular endothelial growth factor and carboxymethyl lysine levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. Vascular endothelial growth factor and soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products concentrations were similar in plasma; however, their concentrations in follicular fluid were significantly increased in endometriosis patients (soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products was 132 + 31 pg/mg of protein vs. 105 + 27 pg/mg; vascular endothelial growth factor was 70 + 3 pg/mg vs. 49 + 18 pg/mg, expressed as the mean + standard deviation). Increased soluble receptor for advanced glycation end products and vascular endothelial growth factor levels in a local environment suggest that the advanced glycation end products-receptor for advanced glycation end products may contribute to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Survivin promoter polymorphisms and autoantibodies in endometriosis.Expression of survivin, an inhibitor of apoptosis, is increased in endometriotic lesions and probably favors the survival of endometrial fragments in the peritoneal cavity. The aim of this study was to evaluate associations between survivin promoter polymorphisms and the risk of endometriosis, as well as to compare the immunoreactivity to survivin in sera of patients with and without endometriosis. We studied 149 women with endometriosis, 196 fertile women from the general population (control group A) and 47 women who had undergone diagnostic laparoscopy and had no evidence of endometriosis (control group B). There were no significant differences in the genotypic distribution of the survivin gene promoter region -241C/T, -235G/A and -31G/C single nucleotide polymorphisms (SNP) between endometriosis patients and the two control groups. In addition, also median anti-survivin autoantibody levels were similar among patients and controls (group B). However, anti-survivin antibody concentrations seemed to be influenced by cigarette smoking, being significantly lower in sera of actively smoking women compared to non-smokers (median OD: 0.019 vs. 0.155, respectively, P<0.001), and by the -235G/A SNP, as A allele carriers were significantly more frequent among women with a high antibody level (OD≥2.0) compared to those with lower concentrations (OD<2.0) (23.1% vs. 4.1%, respectively, P=0.008). Based on these results, we conclude that survivin promoter polymorphisms are not associated with susceptibility to endometriosis in the Estonian population, and though the expression of survivin is increased in endometriotic lesions, autoimmune reactivity against it is similar in women with and without the disease.The value of urocortin and Ca-125 in the diagnosis of endometrioma.In this study, we sought to establish the value of a new molecule, urocortin (Ucn), in the diagnosis of endometrioma and compare with Ca-125 to identify superiority of urocortin.Of the patients operated on at our hospital with the initial diagnosis of adnexal mass, 88 patients whose pathology results were endometrioma and benign ovarian cyst were included in the study. As a result of the pathological examination, the patients were assessed in two groups. Group 1 consisted of 42 cases of endometrioma and Group 2 included 46 cases of benign ovarian cyst (control group). The serum Ucn and CA 125 levels of patients were measured from the blood samples drawn prior to the operation.While the serum Ucn level was 4.8 ± 1.00 ng/ml in the endometrioma group, it was 4.5 ± 1.03 ng/ml in the control group (P = 0.21). The difference was statistically not meaningful. On the other hand, mean serum Ca-125 level was 43.8 U/l (11.7-251) in the endometrioma group, it was 16.5 U/l (4.3-121.1) in the control group. The difference was statistically meaningful (P = 0.001). When the cut-off point for Serum Ca-125 level was taken as 21.38, sensitivity and specificity levels were found to be 88.1 and 63%. When the cut-off point for Ucn was taken as 4.16, sensitivity was 76.2%, and specificity 45.7%.Ucn was not found to be efficient in distinguishing endometrioma from other benign ovarian cysts or to be superior to CA125 in the diagnosis of endometrioma.Use of the concomitant serum dosage of CA 125, CA 19-9 and interleukin-6 to detect the presence of endometriosis. Results from a series of reproductive age women undergoing laparoscopic surgery for benign gynaecological conditions.Recent studies have proposed the measurement of CA 19-9 and IL-6 as an alternative to CA 125 as markers for endometriosis. This study was performed in order to verify the clinical value of serum CA 125, CA 19-9 and IL-6 levels, either by themselves or combined, in the detection of the disease.In a prospective cohort study, serum concentrations of CA 125, CA 19-9 and IL-6 were measured in a consecutive series of 80 women of reproductive age who underwent laparoscopy for benign gynaecological pathologies.Endometriosis was documented in 45 women (stage I-II in 14 cases and stage III-IV in 31 cases). Patients with endometriosis had significantly higher levels of CA 125 than controls [23.4 IU/ml (13.3-37.6) versus 11.4 IU/ml (9.1-18.5), P < 0.001)]. Conversely, women with and without the disease were shown to have similar levels of both IL-6 pg/ml [0.6 (undetectable-1.4) versus 1.0 pg/ml (0.4-1.9), P = 0.09] and CA 19-9 [9.8 IU/ml (4.5-20.8) versus 7.4 IU/ml (2.8-11.5), P = 0.11]. The area under the receiver operating characteristics curve resulted in a statistically significant difference from the null hypothesis only for CA 125 (P < 0.001). Sensitivity and specificity of CA 125 were 27 and 97% respectively and were higher than those related to CA 19-9 and IL-6. Concomitant use of the three dosages led to a sensitivity and a specificity of 42 and 71% respectively.The concomitant dosage of CA 125, CA 19-9 and IL-6 does not add significant information in respect to the CA 125 test alone in diagnosing either early or advanced stages of endometriosis.Comparison of the effects of leuprorelin acetate and danazol treatments on serum CA-125 levels in women with endometriosis.To investigate the effects of danazol and leuprorelin acetate on CA-125 levels during treatment for endometriosis.Fifty women with laparoscopically diagnosed and treated endometriosis, and 50 women without pelvic disease as a control group. Following surgical treatment, 35 women with endometriosis were divided into two groups. The first group (20 women) received 200 mg danazol three times daily for 6 months; the second group (15 women) received 3.75 mg leuprorelin acetate depot every 28 days for 6 months. Serum CA-125 levels were measured before medical treatment, during the last 15 days of the 6-month treatment course, and 3 months after treatment.Serum CA-125 levels were significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in women in the control group. Before treatment, CA-125 levels in patients with stage III/IV endometriosis were significantly higher than those in stage I/II endometriosis. Six months of danazol or leuprorelin acetate depot treatment decreased serum CA-125 levels. Three months after stopping danazol, CA-125 levels remained significantly lower than pretreatment levels. On the other hand, 3 months after stopping leuprorelin acetate, CA-125 levels returned to pretreatment levels.(a) Danazol and leuprorelin acetate are equally effective in the treatment of endometriosis. (b) Moreover, the results support the view that the determination of CA-125 levels may assist in evaluating progress of endometriosis treatment.Serum CA-125 concentrations during midfollicular phase, a clinically useful and reproducible marker in diagnosis of advanced endometriosis.Tumor necrosis factor in plasma and peritoneal fluid of women with and without endometriosis.To determine whether in vivo levels of tumor necrosis factor a in plasma and peritoneal fluid differ in infertile subjects with and without endometriosis, peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid samples were collected in 94 women undergoing laparoscopy for infertility. Quantitative determinations of tumor necrosis factor a were performed by an enzyme immunoassay test. Tumor necrosis factor a levels were below the detection limit (10 pg/ml) in plasma and peritoneal fluid of 42 (91%) and 30 (90%) patients with endometriosis and 40 (83%) and 31 (91%) subjects without the disease, respectively. In our series, plasma and tumor necrosis factor a levels were not different in infertile women with and without endometriosis.Multiple serum marker assay in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum levels of CA-125, CA-15-3 and TAG-72 were measured in 81 patients with endometriosis, diagnosed by laparoscopy, and staged according to the Revised American Fertility Society, and in 31 control subjects. The values of CA-125 and CA-15-3 were also determined in peritoneal fluid. The aim of the present study was to evaluate the clinical usefulness of these various markers in the diagnosis of endometriosis by using them either by themselves or combined. High serum levels of CA-125 were found in 43 of 81 patients with endometriosis (53%) and in five of 38 control subjects (13%). The values of serum CA-125 progressively increased in relation to the severity of the disease. High serum values of CA-15-3 and TAG-72 were also found in patients with endometriosis, but with a similar incidence also in control patients. High CA-125 and CA-15-3 values in peritoneal fluid were found in all patients investigated. These results suggest that measurement of serum CA-15-3 and TAG-72 in addition to CA-125, does not provide any advantage for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Cytokeratin-19 as a biomarker in urine and in serum for the diagnosis of endometriosis--a prospective study.Endometriosis compromises the quality of life of countless women worldwide and is a leading cause of disability. Clinical symptoms of endometriosis can be very heterogeneous leading to a long interval between onset of symptoms and surgical diagnosis. A noninvasive, rapid diagnostic test is urgently needed. In this prospective study, we evaluated the usefulness of Cytokeratin-19 (CK19) as a biomarker for the diagnosis of endometriosis through urine and serum ELISA. 76 reproductive-aged women undergoing laparoscopy for benign conditions were included to this study and divided into two groups by the presence (n = 44) or absence (n = 32) of endometriosis. There was no statistically significant correlation between the concentration of CK19 in urine (p = 0.51) or in serum (p = 0.77) and the diagnosis of endometriosis. Assigning the samples to the proliferative or secretory cycle stage did not sufficiently lower the p values. In this study, the promising data reported in the recent literature about CK19 serving as a sufficient biomarker for endometriosis could not be verified when tested in a larger sample size. Further studies are warranted to explore the usefulness of CK19 in the diagnosis of endometriosis.Serum CA 125 levels in patients with endometriosis: changes in CA 125 levels during menstruation.We investigated serum CA 125 levels in 120 patients with benign gynecologic disease, and examined variations in CA 125 levels during the menstrual cycle in six normally cycling women. CA 125 levels were elevated transiently during menstruation, suggesting that blood samples taken during menstruation can give a false-positive result. Whereas the CA 125 values during the nonmenstrual part of the cycle were significantly higher in the patients with adenomyosis and advanced endometriosis (stages III and IV) than in those with a normal pelvis, there was no difference between the patients with mild endometriosis (stages I and II) and the normal-pelvis group. CA 125 levels during menstruation were significantly elevated, not only in women with adenomyosis and advanced endometriosis, but also in those with mild endometriosis, compared with those with a normal pelvis. These data suggest that the measurement of serum CA 125 during menstruation may increase the rate of detection of endometriosis over that in studies done during other phases of the cycle.Evaluation of high-sensitivity C-reactive protein in comparison with C-reactive protein as biochemical serum markers in women with endometriosis.To compare high-sensitivity C-reactive protein (hs-CRP) with CRP as a soluble serum marker for the diagnosis of women with endometriosis.Prospective nonrandomized controlled trial (Canadian Task Force classification II-1).University hospital.Eighty-two women were laparoscopically evaluated. No endometriosis was diagnosed in 34 women (the non-E group). Endometriosis was confirmed by histology in 48 women (the E group). Eighty-two women did not undergo laparoscopic evaluation (the unknown-E group). Afterward, the women were staged according to the revised American Society for Reproductive Medicine criteria (r-ASRM).CRP and hs-CRP were measured initially before laparoscopy.The hs-CRP and CRP levels and the correlation of those parameters with the stage of the disease.There was a trend toward higher CRP levels and higher hs-CRP levels in the E group, while the lowest levels of both markers were found in the non-E group. There was a significantly lower hs-CRP level in the non-E group in comparison with the CRP level in this group. No differences between the different stages of the disease were found with either marker.Measurement of the two markers did not appear to be advantageous for the diagnosis of endometriosis independent of the stage of the disease. Nevertheless, a very low hs-CRP level might serve as a marker for an absence of endometriosis.CA 125 antigen is an effective diagnostic for external endometriosis.We measured serum levels of CA 125 in 26 patients with external endometriosis, using CA 125 RIA Kits. The normal range was instituted below 39 U/ml. The mean CA 125 level (+/- SD) was 55.1 +/- 24.9 U/ml in patients with external endometriosis, the positive rate being 71.4%. Considering the clinical stage of external endometriosis, the mean CA 125 level and positive rate increased to 64.5 +/- 23.2 U/ml and 93.3%, respectively. The CA 125 levels in these patients gradually decreased after surgery and/or Danazol treatment and the levels were below 39 U/ml within four weeks. Thus, progressive external endometriosis can be accurately diagnosed by determining the serum levels of CA 125, and appropriate clinical treatment designed.Identification of biomarkers for endometriosis in plasma from patients with endometriosis using a proteomics approach.The present study aimed to examine potential biomarkers for the diagnosis of endometriosis. A plasma-based proteomic approach, including 2-dimentional electrophoresis and mass spectrometry, was used. Samples were obtained from patients with (n=15) and without (n=15) endometriosis, or from mice with surgically induced endometriosis. Seven spots corresponding to six differentially expressed proteins were identified in the human plasma samples. However, only haptoglobin (Hp) was identified to be significantly decreased in the plasma levels of patients with endometriosis (P<0.05) and in mice with surgically induced endometriosis (P<0.05). The results demonstrated that Hp was downregulated in females with endometriosis, and it therefore, may be a useful diagnostic tool as a biomarker of endometriosis. [Evaluation of tumor necrosis factor-alpha and interleukin-6 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis].To evaluate the levels of tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) and interleukin-6 (IL-6) before and after conservative laparoscopic surgery in patients with endometriosis.The TNF-alpha and IL-6 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid of 20 endometriotic patients and 10 control patients were determined by radioimmunoassay.Significant parallel relationship existed between the stage of endometriosis and the TNF-alpha and IL-6 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid in endometriosis patients (r values: serum: 0.80, 0.52; peritoneal fluid: 0.79, 0.49, P < 0.05). After clearance of endometriosis foci with laparoscopic conservative surgery, the TNF-alpha and IL-6 levels decreased significantly.Measuring TNF-alpha and IL-6 level may have important value in postoperative follow-up, surveillance and evaluation of the effectiveness of surgery.CA 125 in serum, peritoneal fluid, active lesions, and endometrium of patients with endometriosis.Ca 125 levels in serum and peritoneal fluid were measured in 39 patients with endometriosis and 18 patients with normal pelvic anatomy at laparoscopy, and the presence of this antigen in endometriotic tissue and endometrial mucosa was also investigated. Serum CA 125 concentrations were elevated in patients with Stage III or IV endometriosis compared with control subjects (32.9 +/- 11.2 versus 16.4 +/- 8.9 U/ml, means +/- SD; p less than 0.001). CA 125 values were greater than 35 U/ml in 36.8% of women with Stage III or IV endometriosis and in none of the control subjects. No significant differences in CA 125 levels in peritoneal fluid were found between patients with endometriosis and control subjects. The immunohistochemical studies found CA 125 in 10% of the endometriotic lesions and 37.5% of the endometrial samples of patients with endometriosis and in 33.3% of the endometrial samples of control subjects.Tumor markers in endometriosis.The objective of the present study was to determine the concentrations of CA 125, CA 15-3, CA 19-9, carcioembryogenic antigen (CEA), alpha-fetoprotein (AFP) and beta-2 microglobulin (B2MG) in patients with pelvic endometriosis.Fifty women were divided into two groups: group A (control) had no endometriosis or other diseases, and group B consisted of 35 women with pelvic endometriosis. All women were submitted to serum determination of CA 125, CA 15-3, CA 19-9, CEA, AFP and B2MG. Samples were collected during the menstrual cycle and 1 week later.Mean CA 125 concentrations were altered in patients with endometriosis, but all 50 patients studied presented normal CEA, AFP and B2MG concentrations. Small variations detected in CA 19-9 and CA 15-3 had no statistical significance.CA 125 is the only important marker in the diagnosis of stages III/IV of endometriosis, especially when blood samples for its determination are obtained during the first 3 days of the menstrual cycle.Hormonal and immunologic methods in the diagnosis and treatment of patients with benign ovarian tumors and endometriotic cysts.To compare efficacy of various methods for characterizing endometriosis and benign ovarian tumors.Two parallel groups of patients, 54 with endometriotic ovarian cysts and 48 with benign tumors.Central clinic.Patients referred from all regions over a 5-year period.Estrogen Estrogen and progesterone receptor levels of endometrium and endometriotic foci, CA-125 concentration, and estradiol, progesterone, LH, and testosterone blood levels.LH levels elevated during follicular phase in patients; estradiol levels reduced; receptor levels abnormal in endometriosis, but not in benign ovarian cysts.Hormone therapy is adequate treatment for endometriotic cysts. CA-125 is not a reliable indicator for differential diagnosis.[Changes of serum epithelial neutrophil-activating peptide-78 in patients with endometriosis].To investigate the role of serum epithelial neutrophil-activating peptide-78 (ENA-78) in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Serum concentrations of ENA-78 were measured by means of enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in 42 patients with endometriosis (20 in stages I and II and 22 in stages III and IV) in comparison with 25 women without endometriosis (control group).Serum concentrations of ENA-78 were significantly higher in endometriosis group than in the control group (2.97+/-1.91 ng/ml vs 0.72+/-0.24 ng/ml, P>0.001), and ENA-78 levels in stages III and IV were significantly higher than those in stages I and II (4.48+/-1.25 ng/ml vs 1.30+/-0.74 ng/ml, P>0.001). Significant difference in ENA-78 levels between follicular phase and luteal phase was found in neither of the groups.Patients with endometriosis have elevated serum ENA-78 levels, which might be a pathogenic factor of endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and serum autoantibody levels in patients with endometriosis.Patients with endometriosis demonstrate autoantibody abnormalities in their peripheral blood. Whether such abnormalities can also be detected in the peritoneal cavity, has not been established. We therefore investigated autoantibodies to 6 phospholipid antigens, 5 histones and histone subfractions and 4 polynucleotides in 14 laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis and 9 control patients, undergoing laparoscopic tubal occlusion, in both serum and peritoneal fluid. Endometriosis patients demonstrated significantly lower total immunoglobulin G (IgG) levels in peritoneal fluid than controls. In contrast, specific IgG autoantibody levels were higher in peritoneal fluids of endometriosis patients. Mean antiphospholipids and antihistones autoantibodies reached significance when serum/peritoneal fluid ratios were compared with controls. Significant differences between endometriosis and control patients were restricted to IgG isotypes and were not observed for either IgM or IgA isotypes. These data suggest an abnormal concentration of IgG antiphospholipids and antihistones antibodies within the peritoneal cavity of endometriosis patients, which may play a contributing role in the peritoneal pathology of this condition.CA-125 and endometriosis.[Value of CA125 (carbon hydrate tumor-associated antigen) and endometrial antibodies for the detections of endometriosis].Levels of CA125 and endometrial antibodies (EMAb) in serum and peritoneal fluid were determined in 42 cases, including 28 cases of endometriosis as trial group and 14 infertile patients without endometriosis as controls. Results showed that the levels of CA125 and EMAb in peritoneal fluid were higher significantly than in serum, but no difference were found between two groups. Serum EMAb levels were significantly higher in the trial group than in the controls. There was no significant difference in the levels of serum CA125 between two groups. The positive rate of serum CA125 and EMAb were 71.43% and 82.14% respectively. The sensitivity of CA125 and EMAb measurements in the diagnosis of endometriosis were 71.43% and 82.14%, and the specificity were 57.21% and 57.14% respectively.Concentration of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in serum samples from patients with endometriosis collected during the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle.Soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (sICAM-1), released by endometriotic lesions, is involved in the regulation of cytotoxic processes. Altered levels of sICAM-1 in the circulation could parallel its deregulation in the peritoneal cavity. We therefore investigated whether sICAM-1 could represent a serum marker for endometriosis.sICAM-1 levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay in serum samples from 176 subjects with surgically confirmed endometriosis (134 patients with stage I-II and 42 patients with stage III-IV) and 198 controls with no surgical evidence of the disease. All serum samples were collected during the luteal phase of the menstrual cycle. Detailed information about demographics, symptoms and clinical profile were collected.Mean levels of sICAM-1 appeared significantly reduced in patients with stage III-IV endometriosis in a crude comparison of means. However, when means were adjusted for potential confounders such as the pre-operative indication or fertility status, no significant difference between cases with stage III-IV disease and controls was observed.Serum levels of sICAM-1 during the luteal phase of the cycle are not able to discriminate women suffering from endometriosis from controls when confounders are taken into account. These results underline the importance of careful identification of confounders, based on patients' demographic and clinical data in studies aiming at discovering diagnostic markers for endometriosis.New serum biomarkers for detection of endometriosis using matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry.This study used proteomic fingerprint technology, combining nano-sized magnetic beads with matrix-assisted laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (MALDI-TOF-MS), to screen for potential protein biomarkers for the diagnosis of endometriosis. Serum proteins from 126 patients with endometriosis and 120 healthy controls were profiled and compared. Biomarker pattern software identified 46 discriminating mass-to-charge m/z ratio peaks that were related to endometriosis. The model constructed by the software, based on three of these peaks (m/z 5988.7, 7185.3 and 8929.8), generated excellent separation between the endometriosis and control groups. The sensitivity was 91.4% and the specificity 95.0%. Blind testing on a second series of serum samples from patients with endometriosis and healthy controls indicated a sensitivity of 89.3% and a specificity of 90.0%. Biomarkers for endometriosis can be discovered in serum by MALDI-TOF-MS in combination with nano-sized magnetic beads. The pattern of combined markers provides a powerful and reliable diagnostic method for endometriosis, with high sensitivity and specificity.Endometriosis is associated with aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase and increased telomere length.In order to test our hypothesis that endometriosis is associated with abnormal expression of telomerase and telomere lengthening in endometrium, we assessed endometrial expression of the human telomerase enzyme and telomere length (TL).This prospective pilot study, included 29 women with symptomatic, surgically diagnosed endometriosis (Group 1) and 27 healthy, fertile, symptom-free women without endometriosis (Group 2, confirmed by laparoscopy). Seventeen women in Group 1 and 15 women in Group 2 had endometrial biopsies taken on Day 21 +/- 2 of the cycle. A further 12 women in each group were biopsied on Day 26 +/- 2. Telomerase and estrogen receptor beta (ERbeta) expression was evaluated by immunohistochemistry. Mean TL was determined by quantitative PCR.The endometria of fertile healthy women showed either weak or no telomerase immunoreactivity throughout the luteal phase. Immunostaining for telomerase was significantly increased during the implantation window and the premenstrual endometria of women with endometriosis (P < 0.0001). This was associated with a loss of stromal and vascular ERbeta immunostaining (P < 0.05). The mean TL were significantly longer in endometria of women with endometriosis during the implantation window (P = 0.005), indicating the biological relevance of our novel finding of telomerase in benign endometrium. There was positive correlation of the circulating estradiol with peripheral blood TL in women.We speculate that aberrant endometrial expression of telomerase mediates alterations in cell fate that enhance proliferation, contributing to the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Autoimmunity in endometriosis: relevance to infertility.Endometriosis is a complicated multi-factorial disease. Genetic and immunologic factors play a key role in its pathophysiology. We were the first to describe endometrial and ovarian autoimmunity in women with endometriosis in 1981.ELISA and Western blot analysis. It is accepted that women with endometriosis have autoimmunity to endometrial, ovarian and nuclear antigens. We have now established that: 1. The endometrial autoantigens to which the endometriosis patients have autoimmune reactions are endometrial transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein. 2. Levels of antibodies to both these proteins are specifically elevated in women with endometriosis, thus making them important candidates for developing an endometrial antibody assay for a non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis. 3. Levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein are significantly elevated in the peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis. 4. Antibodies to transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein also inhibit in vitro sperm motility.These data strongly suggest the possibility of endometrial autoantibodies playing an important role in the infertility often associated with endometriosis.Müllerian-inhibiting substance in follicular fluid and serum: a comparison of patients with tubal factor infertility, polycystic ovary syndrome, and endometriosis.To determine Müllerian inhibiting substance (MIS) levels in follicular fluid (FF) and sera of IVF patients.Prospective study.Fertility center.Sixty-six patients: 20 with tubal factor infertility, 17 with polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), and 29 with endometriosis.All patients underwent ovarian stimulation with hMG and/or FSH, as well as oocyte retrieval for IVF.Follicular fluid and serum MIS levels and oocyte fertilization rates.Levels of MIS in FF and sera of PCOS patients were significantly higher than those in tubal factor patients: 7.01 +/- 1.52 versus 1.65 +/- 0.23 ng/mL (mean +/- SE) and 2.97 +/- 0.52 versus 0.92 +/- 0.19 ng/mL, respectively. In endometriosis patients, follicular fluid and serum MIS levels were not significantly different from those in tubal factor patients. In PCOS patients, the percentage of immature oocytes retrieved (17.9% +/- 5.0%) was significantly higher compared with tubal factor (1.5% +/- 1.0%) and endometriosis (9.2% +/- 2.3%) patients. The percentage of oocytes fertilize was significantly lower in PCOS patients (30.2% +/- 5.3%) compared with tubal factor (62.2% +/- 5.5%) and endometriosis (37.5% +/- 5.7%) patients.Women with PCOS had higher serum and follicular fluid MIS levels, a higher percentage of immature oocytes, and lower fertilization rates than women with endometriosis or pelvic adhesions.Adding cancer antigen 125 screening to gray scale sonography for predicting specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women: is it worthwhile?The purpose of this study was to assess whether a single determination of the serum cancer antigen 125 (CA-125) level provides additional information to sonography for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal masses in premenopausal women.We conducted a retrospective study comprising 1058 premenopausal women (mean age, 34.8 years) with histologically proven benign adnexal masses. All women had undergone transvaginal sonography and serum CA-125 determination within 1 week before surgery and tumor removal. According to "pattern recognition" analysis, a presumptive diagnosis was provided on gray scale transvaginal sonography for all masses. Positive and negative likelihood ratios were calculated for gray scale sonography and gray scale sonography plus CA-125.Eighty-five women had bilateral masses (1143 masses analyzed). In 7 women with bilateral masses, the histologic diagnoses of the masses were discordant and were excluded. Histologic diagnoses were as follows: endometrioma, n = 452; dermoid cyst, n = 180; serous cyst, n = 158; hemorrhagic cyst, n = 119; mucinous cyst, n = 54; hydrosalpinx, n = 37; and other, n = 109. The median CA-125 level was significantly higher in endometrioma (71.9 IU/mL; range: 5-2620 IU/mL) and hydrosalpinx (59.2 IU/mL; range, 5-601 IU/mL) compared to all other tumor types (P < .001). The CA-125 level was 35 IU/mL or higher in 74% of endometriomas, 58% of hydrosalpinges, 34% of hemorrhagic cysts, 18% of mucinous cysts, 14% of dermoid cysts, and 8% of serous cysts. The positive and negative likelihood ratios for sonography and sonography plus CA-125 (335 IU/mL) for each kind of tumor were not statistically different except for endometrioma, for which the positive likelihood ratio for sonography plus CA-125 (55.0; 95% confidence interval, 27.5-109.9) was significantly higher than for sonography alone (19.2; 95% confidence interval, 13.6-27.1).Cancer antigen 125 screening does not add useful information for specific diagnosis of benign adnexal tumors, except for endometrioma. An elevated CA-125 level significantly increases the probability of such a lesion.Soluble serum interleukin-2 receptor, interleukin-6 and interleukin-1a in patients with endometriosis and in controls.The aim of this study was to verify to what extent danazol alters cell-mediated immunity. To this end, cell-mediated immunity was studied in 10 infertile patients with endometriosis and in 10 normal controls. Nonspecific parameters studied included serum SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a levels. We also investigated the effect of treatment with Danazol on the levels of SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a in women with endometriosis. Blood SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a levels were measured in endometriotic women before treatment, during the last fifteen days of a 6-months course of Danazol and three months after treatment. Only one blood sample was taken from 10 women without endometriosis. SIL-2R, IL-6 and IL-1a levels were higher in women with endometriosis before treatment compared with controls. Administration of the drug significantly reduced the levels of SIL-2R (P < 0.001), IL-6 (P < 0.05) and IL-1a (P < 0.01). Our findings suggest that endometriosis is a condition which induces a rise in interleukin levels. Danazol also appears significantly to reduce endometriosis-associated autoimmune abnormalities.Elevated serum levels of endometrial secretory protein PP14 in patients with advanced endometriosis. Suppression by treatment with danazol and high-dose medroxyprogesterone acetate.The circulating concentration of endometrial protein PP14 varied during the menstrual cycle in patients with endometriosis. The highest levels were found on days 1 to 4 of the cycle (176 +/- 123 micrograms/L; mean +/- SD), and the lowest on days 5 to 20 (44.1 +/- 29.7 micrograms/L). Rising levels were observed on days 21 to 30 (58.3 +/- 62.6 micrograms/L). On days 5 to 20 (i.e., during period of the lowest levels) patients with advanced endometriosis had higher PP14 levels (63.9 +/- 39.0 micrograms/L) than those with mild endometriosis (29.3 +/- 18.2 micrograms/L; p less than 0.01). Patients with mild endometriosis had slightly higher serum PP14 levels than apparently healthy control subjects (p less than 0.05), but overlapping of values between the two groups is remarkable. Conservative surgical elimination of endometriosis significantly decreased the serum PP14 levels. Treatment with danazol (600 mg/day), or with medroxyprogesterone acetate (100 mg/day) after laparoscopy also resulted in significant decreases in the serum PP14 concentration. After 6 months of treatment, conservative surgery in combination with danazol or with medroxyprogesterone acetate, yielded more pronounced declines in serum PP14 level than conservative surgery plus placebo. No significant difference was observed between the effects of danazol and medroxyprogesterone acetate. We conclude that endometriosis tissue contributes to the circulating PP14 level, and the decline in PP14 level during danazol and medroxyprogesterone acetate treatments reflects regression of intrauterine and ectopic endometrial tissues.Use of serum-soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 as a new marker of endometriosis.To investigate the hypothesis that soluble intercellular adhesions molecule-1 (sICAM-1) may be used as a new serum marker of endometriosis.Prospective cohort study.An academic department specializing in gynecologic laparoscopy.Consecutive series of 120 women of reproductive age who underwent laparoscopy for benign gynecologic conditions.Data were collected on baseline clinical characteristics, and surgical and histologic diagnosis.Serum concentration of both CA125 and sICAM-1.Endometriosis was documented in 71 women (stage I to II in 24 cases and stage III to IV in 47 cases). Serum levels of sICAM-1 were only slightly but not significantly increased in women with endometriosis compared with women without the disease. However, serum concentration of sICAM-1 in the 21 women who were found to have deep peritoneal endometriosis was significantly enhanced when compared with both women without the disease and those with other forms of endometriosis. The sensitivity and specificity of sICAM-1 in detecting deep peritoneal endometriosis were 0.19 and 0.97, respectively; whereas those of CA125 were 0.14 and 0.92, respectively. When both parameters were used concomitantly, the sensitivity and specificity were 0.28 and 0.92, respectively.Although the present study tends to support a role of sICAM-1 in the development of endometriosis, serum concentrations of this molecule do not seem to be an effective indicator for the diagnosis of either the early or advanced stage of endometriosis. However, an integrated clinical and laboratory approach using both CA125 and sICAM-1 may be helpful in specifically identifying women with deep peritoneal endometriosis.Local immune response in infertile patients with minimal endometriosis.To evaluate the role of local immunity in women with minimal endometriosis.Uterine endometrium and endometrial implants were obtained simultaneously from 30 infertile women with minimal endometriosis and examined immunohistochemically using antibodies of T cell, B cell, macrophage, Langerhans cell, immunoglobulin (Ig)G, and complement (C) 3d. Serum IgG, IgA, IgM, C3, C4, antinuclear antibody and anti-DNA antibody were also examined in 24 of the women. Data from uterine endometrium and serum were compared with 10 fertile women without endometriosis as a control.Microscopic examination revealed that the endometrial implants were divided into two groups: group 1 (n = 13) showed lymphocytic infiltration in the endometrial implants and group 2 (n = 17) showed no or slight lymphocytic infiltration. The endometrial implants of group 1 showed significantly more dense T-cell infiltration than those of group 2. Other types of infiltrating cells and deposits of IgG and C3d revealed no significant differences between groups 1 and 2. The immunohistochemical examination of the uterine endometrium and the serum data revealed no significant differences among all three groups. Cumulative pregnancy rates showed no significant difference between groups 1 and 2.The difference of local immune response in endometrial implants did not affect systemic immunity.Serum soluble CD163 and interleukin-6 levels in women with ovarian endometriomas.CD163 is a hemoglobin scavenger receptor exclusively expressed in the monocyte-macrophage system and its soluble form (sCD163) has not yet been studied as a serum marker in women with endometriosis. The purpose of this study was to evaluate whether serum levels of sCD163 and interleukin-6 (IL-6) could be possible markers for ovarian endometriomas discriminating adnexal benign cystic tumors.The concentrations of sCD163 and IL-6 were determined using commercial ELISA kits in frozen sera collected from 95 women prior to surgery for adnexal benign cystic tumors: 44 with ovarian endometriomas, 24 with mature cystic teratomas, 10 with mucinous cystadenomas, 8 with serous cystadenomas and 9 with parovarian cysts. Serum levels of CA-125 were also recorded preoperatively. The volume of cysts was evaluated in women with ovarian endometriomas.The serum levels of sCD163 and IL-6 were not significantly different among the women with various adnexal benign cystic tumors. In patients with endometriomas (n = 44), the levels were similar to those with nonendometriotic benign cystic tumors (n = 51): 3,431.7 +/- 343.9 vs. 3,231.0 +/- 391.7 ng/ml for sCD163 and 5.3 +/- 0.9 vs. 12.9 +/- 4.0 pg/ml for IL-6 (mean +/- SEM). No correlation was noted between serum levels of two markers with volume of endometriomas.Our findings suggest that serum levels of sCD163 as well as IL-6 are not useful markers for ovarian endometriomas.Aberrant expression of intercellular adhesion molecule-1 and killer inhibitory receptors induces immune tolerance in women with pelvic endometriosis.To investigate host immunologic response to endometriosis in terms of intercellular adhesion molecule (ICAM)-1 expression by macrophages and killer cell inhibitory receptor (KIR) expression by natural killer (NK) cells.Case-control study of immunologic markers.University hospital.Twenty-eight Japanese women with endometriosis. Control subjects were 26 women without endometriosis. Diagnoses were made at laparoscopy.Venipuncture and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid collection.ICAM-1 expression by macrophages and KIR expression by NK cells, measured by flow cytometry.In women with endometriosis, expression of ICAM-1 by peritoneal macrophages was significantly lower and expression of KIR by NK cells in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood was significantly higher than in control subjects.Properties of macrophages and NK cells in women with endometriosis promote immunotolerance to implanted tissue in the peritoneal environment. Increased KIR(+)NK cells in peripheral blood may represent a risk factor for endometriosis.Enhanced T cells interactions with extracellular matrix proteins in infertile women with endometriosis.Essential features of endometriosis involve interactions with extracellular matrix (ECM). Recent data emphasize the important role of ECM proteins in the regulation of T cell function. The aim of this study was to determine activated T cell adhesion to ECM proteins in infertile women with endometriosis. Nine women with endometriosis diagnosed by laparoscopy according to the Revised American Fertility Society classification and ten normal healthy women with a previous successful pregnancy outcome were studied. We investigated phorbol acetate myristate (PMA) or phytohemaglutinin (PHA) activated peripheral blood T cell adhesion to the following proteins of ECM: collagen IV (C-IV), elastin (E) and fibronectin (Fn). In addition, CD4, CD8, CD29, CD45RO expression on peripheral CD3(+) T cells were studied using flow cytometry. We determine that PHA-activated T cell adhesion to C-IV and Fn are significantly higher in infertile women with endometriosis when compared to normal healthy women (P<0.05). No significant differences were noted in T cell's surface antigens expression between study groups. Our data suggest the existence of disturbed T cell-ECM interactions in infertile women with endometriosis. Further studies are needed to determine the role of these abnormalities in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Increased killer inhibitory receptor KIR2DL1 expression among natural killer cells in women with pelvic endometriosis.To investigate the host immunologic response to endometriosis in terms of killer inhibitory receptor (KIR) expression by natural killer (NK) cells.Case-control study of immunologic markers.University hospital.We compared cells from Japanese women with laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis to cells from 40 women with other laparoscopic diagnoses.Peripheral venous blood sampling and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid collection.Flow cytometry was used to assess expression of KIR by NK cells in the cell samples.The percentage of cells that expressed KIR2DL1 among NK (KIR2DL1(+)NK) cells in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood was significantly higher in women with endometriosis than in controls. The proportion of KIR2DL1(+)NK cells in peripheral blood NK cells before and 1 month after laparoscopic surgery did not differ significantly.The proportion of KIR2DL1(+)NK cells was increased in peritoneal fluid and peripheral blood in women with endometriosis; this difference is probably related to NK cell suppression in endometriosis. This increase in KIR2DL1 expression by NK cells may represent a risk factor in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Comparative study between VEGF-A and CA-125 in diagnosis and follow-up of advanced endometriosis after conservative laparoscopic surgery.To evaluate the role of serum level of VEGF-A in comparison to CA-125 in diagnosis and follow-up of patients with advanced endometriosis after conservative laparoscopic surgery.A prospective randomized case-control study was performed on patients referred for laparoscopy complaining of unexplained primary infertility with or without chronic pelvic pain. Thirty patients with advanced endometriosis; stage III-IV were included (study group), another 30 women without endometriosis or any other medical conditions were settled as a control group. Pre-operative blood samples were collected from study and control cases. Post-operative blood samples were collected from 25 treated patients in the follicular phase of the third menstrual cycle; 5 cases were drop-outs. Serum level of cancer antigen-125 (CA-125) and vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF-A) were assayed by using enzyme linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) kit.There was a statistically significant difference in serum CA-125 and VEGF-A level in patients with advanced endometriosis before conservative laparoscopic surgery and those without endometriosis (p < 0.001) and after conservative laparoscopic surgery (p < 0.001). High sensitivity (93.3 %), specificity (96.7 %) and accuracy (95.0 %) of VEGF-A assay than in CA-125 distinguishing between patients with endometriosis from those without endometriosis; CA-125 has 70.0 %sensitivity, 90.0 % specificity and 85.0 % accuracy. Percentage of decrease of VEGF-A level after operation was higher than that of CA-125 (45.9 vs. 25.8 %) p < 0.001, respectively.The use of VEGF-A for diagnosis of advanced endometriosis at cut-off 680 pg/ml and for follow-up is better than CA-125.Haptoglobin beta chain isoforms in the plasma and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.To estimate the expression of haptoglobin (Hp) beta chain isoforms in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and plasma (PL) of women with and without endometriosis.Cross-sectional study.University hospital.Seventy-two patients with endometriosis and 35 controls.Peritoneal fluid and PL samples were subjected to two-dimensional gel electrophoresis, silver stained, digitally captured, and compared by semiquantitative computerized analysis.Expression of Hp beta chain isoforms.No significant difference was observed in the frequency of expression of the Hp beta chain isoforms between the two groups. One beta chain isoform (HpbetaE; molecular weight, 38.40 +/- 0.94 kD; and isoelectric point, 5.63 +/- 0.17) had significantly higher expression in both the PF and PL of women with endometriosis than in the PF and PL of controls. No significant difference was observed in HpbetaE expression between women with mild (revised American Fertility Society [rAFS], stage I-II) and severe (rAFS, stage III-IV) endometriosis. In the control group, HpbetaE expression was correlated with the phase of the menstrual cycle.Women with endometriosis have higher PF and PL levels of HpbetaE. Further investigation should be aimed at producing antibodies against the HpbetaE-specific epitopes to determine whether its measurement may improve the clinical diagnosis of endometriosis.The utility of human epididymal protein 4, cancer antigen 125, and risk for malignancy algorithm in ovarian cancer and endometriosis.In women with pelvic mass, cancer antigen 125 (CA125) had not achieved satisfactory sensitivity and specificity in the detection of ovarian cancer, particularly in patients with underlying endometriosis. The aim of this study was to determine the diagnostic potential of human epididymal protein 4 (HE4), the combination of HE4+CA125, and the Risk of Ovarian Malignancy Algorithm (ROMA) for patients with pelvic mass, particularly in differentiating endometriosis from carcinoma.A prospective cross-sectional study was conducted at the Clinic for Gynecology and Obstetrics, Clinical Center of Serbia. Serum samples were obtained preoperatively from 108 women undergoing surgery for pelvic mass; 29 of them had ovarian carcinoma, and 79 had a nonmalignant ovarian disease (39 with benign tumor, 20 with endometriosis, 20 healthy controls). Sera were analyzed for the levels of HE4 and CA125 and were then compared with the final pathologic results. The diagnostic performance of HE4 and CA125 was estimated using receiver operating characteristic curve and area under the receiver operating characteristic curve.The level of HE4 and CA125 was significantly higher among the patients with malignant tumors, compared with patients with nonmalignant disease. At the predefined specificity of 95%, HE4 and CA125 showed sensitivity of 65.5% and 58.6%, respectively, whereas the combination of HE4+CA125 reached 68.9% at the same specificity. Importantly, the level of HE4 did not differ significantly between the patients with endometriosis and with other nonmalignant diseases (which was not the case with CA125). Risk of Ovarian Malignancy Algorithm classified 96% of benign premenopausal cases as at low risk for ovarian cancer.HE4 showed satisfactory capability of distinguishing endometriosis from ovarian cancer, which CA125 lacked. The Risk of Ovarian Malignancy Algorithm score proved to be useful in excluding malignant diagnosis in premenopausal women.Levels of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) in serum of patients with endometriosis.Elevated concentrations of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) have been detected in the peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis. Furthermore, it was postulated that VEGF is involved in the development of endometriotic lesions. The present study is aimed at determining whether high levels of VEGF could also be found in the serum of patients with endometriosis.VEGF levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in serum from 131 subjects with surgically confirmed endometriosis and 146 controls with no clinical evidence of the disease or detectable endometriotic lesions at the time of surgical examination. Parameters such as demographics, personal habits, menstrual characteristics and clinical profile were collected from each subject included in this study.The mean VEGF levels were not significantly modulated in serum samples of cases compared with controls in a crude general linear model and in a model adjusted for possible confounders. VEGF serum levels did not correlate with the score, stage of endometriosis or the presence of benign gynaecological disorders. However, a correlation was found between circulating concentrations of VEGF and body mass index.Although VEGF seems to play a pivotal role locally in the implantation and development of endometriotic lesions, the disease is not associated with a significant modulation in the levels of circulating VEGF.Serum and cyst fluid levels of interleukin (IL) -6, IL-8 and tumour necrosis factor-alpha in women with endometriomas and benign and malignant cystic ovarian tumours.Altered expression of cytokines has been suggested as a specific event for the maintenance and progression of endometriomas. Few data exist on cytokine expression in endometriomas compared with benign and malignant ovarian tumours. Hence, serum and cyst fluid levels of interleukin (IL)-6, IL-8 and tumour necrosis factor-alpha (TNF-alpha) were evaluated in women with endometriomas and compared with those in women with benign or malignant ovarian tumours.Investigations included immunoradiometric determination of serum and cyst fluid concentrations of IL-6, IL-8 and TNF-alpha in 34 women with endometriomas, 30 women with benign and 13 women with malignant cystic ovarian tumours.Serum IL-6 levels were higher in ovarian cancer than in endometriomas (P<0.01) or benign tumours (P<0.01). Serum TNF-alpha levels differed between benign tumours and endometriomas (P<0.01), but not between endometriomas and malignant tumours. Cyst fluid levels of IL-8 were higher in endometriomas than in benign tumours (P<0.001) and lower than in malignant tumours (P=0.03). Cyst fluid levels of TNF-alpha differed between malignant tumours and endometriomas (P<0.01) and benign tumours (P<0.01), but not between endometriomas and benign tumours. In the endometriomas group, a positive correlation was found between serum and cyst fluid levels of IL-6 (P=0.003, rho=0.633), and between serum levels of IL-6 and IL-8 (P=0.03, rho=0.415).Endometriomas were associated with serum TNF-alpha levels similar to those found in women with ovarian cancer, while serum IL-6 levels and cyst fluid IL-8 levels were intermediate between those observed in benign and malignant ovarian tumours.Serum CA-125 levels in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.The value of CA-125 for the diagnosis and management of endometriosis (EN) was investigated by assaying the marker in the serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) from patients with the disease in comparison with control subjects. Of women who underwent 270 consecutive laparoscopies, 81 with various stages of EN (18 stage I, 13 stage II, 35 stage III and 15 stage IV) and 38 with normal pelvic findings were studied. CA-125 serum values increased progressively in relation to the severity of the disease. The levels in stages III and IV EN were significantly higher (P less than .01) than in stages I and II or control patients. The latter two groups did not differ from each other. High CA-125 PF values were found in all the patients investigated. Twenty-two patients with EN were treated with a gonadotropin releasing hormone agonist for six months before second-look laparoscopy or laparotomy. CA-125 values decreased significantly after one month of medical treatment and remained unchanged during the course of therapy. No significant relationship was found in the outcome after therapy.Soluble c-Met expression in the peritoneal fluid and serum of patients with different stages of endometriosis.Hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), also known as scatter factor, and its receptor c-Met have been shown to be implicated in endometriosis. HGF acts as a mitogen, motogen, and morphogen on endometrial epithelial cells. The expression of c-Met on human endometrial cells has been reported. Many proteins are proteolytically released from the surface by a process known as ectodomain shedding. The aim of this study was to determine the levels of soluble c-Met (s-cMet) in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum samples of patients with different stages of endometriosis.39 PF and serum samples from normal healthy and 130 samples from different stages of patients with endometriosis (33 cases of stage I, 38 stage II, 30 stage III and 29 stage IV) were included in this study. Total protein concentration (TPC) and the level of s-cMet in the PF and serum were determined by Bio-Rad protein assay based on the Bradford dye procedure and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay, respectively.No significant change in the TPC was seen in the serum and PF of patients with endometriosis when compared with normal controls. Results obtained demonstrated that all PF and serum samples presented s-cMet expression, whereas, starting from stages I to IV endometriosis, a significant increase of s-cMet expression was observed as compared to controls.The results of this study show that a high expression of s-cMet is correlated with advanced stages of endometriosis. It is also concluded that the detection of serum and PF s-cMet may be useful in classifying endometriosis.Anti-endometrial antibodies in women measured by an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.An enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was developed to measure anti-endometrial antibody concentrations in the serum of women with endometriosis. Pooled cytosolic protein extracts from the endometrial gland cells of 10 women were used as an antigen source. Serum samples were obtained from women with endometriosis before (n = 51) and after 6 months treatment with danazol or nafarelin (n = 30). Control sera came from women with a normal pelvis at laparoscopy, performed for sterilization (n = 23) or the investigation of pain and/or infertility (n = 22), 13 women with Rokitansky syndrome, and 10 umbilical cord bloods and adult males. There were no significant differences in serum anti-endometrial antibody concentrations before and after treatment, or between women with endometriosis and without endometriosis. Concentrations were lower in male and cord blood serum than in female's serum (P < 0.0001). We conclude that the ELISA is not a useful diagnostic tool for endometriosis unless more specific antigens can be isolated.Levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in women with and without endometriosis.The study objective was to test the hypothesis that elevated levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein occur in the peritoneal environment of patients with endometriosis that may lead to the observed autoimmunity to these proteins. We set up a double sandwich enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) for measuring levels of transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein in the serum and peritoneal fluid samples from women with (n = 24-60) and without endometriosis (n = 35-49). Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of alpha 2-HS glycoprotein and peritoneal fluid levels of transferrin were significantly elevated in patients with endometriosis, in contrast to the controls. Serum levels of transferrin in patients, however, were significantly less in the patients than in controls. We conclude that transferrin and alpha 2-HS glycoprotein are present at high concentrations in the peritoneal fluids of patients with endometriosis. This may play a significant role in the autoimmune pathophysiology of endometriosis.Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and ovarian endometriosis: correlation between VEGF serum levels, VEGF cellular expression, and pelvic pain.Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) serum levels and VEGF and cellular expression were prospectively analyzed in 60 patients (group A consisted of asymptomatic patients or patients presenting mild dysmenorrhea; 30 women comprised group B severe dysmenorrhea and/or chronic pelvic pain and/or dyspareunia) who underwent surgery for cystic ovarian endometriosis to asses whether a correlation exists among VEGF serum levels, VEGF cellular expression, and pelvic pain. No differences were found in VEGF serum levels and VEGF cellular expression between both groups. Therefore, we conclude that pain symptoms in ovarian endometriosis are not correlated with VEGF serum levels and VEGF cellular expression.Serum CA-125 concentration in endometriosis patients: role of pelvic and peritoneal irritation.Serum CA-125 concentrations were investigated preoperatively in 91 consecutive women undergoing laparoscopy for infertility, pelvic pain and/or annexial cysts. The presence and extent of endometriosis were carefully assessed, including the American Fertility Society stage of disease, and implant and adhesion scores. Postoperative CA-125 measurements were obtained in 32 of 53 endometriosis patients and evaluated with respect to clinical evolution of the disease. Serum levels of CA-125 were significantly increased in patients with endometriosis (46.5 +/- 39.5 vs. 13.5 +/- 7.3 U/ml in controls, p < 0.001) and correlated with the severity of disease. A positive correlation (r = 0.7, p < 0.001) was observed between adhesion score and CA-125 levels, while the relationship with implant score was not significant (r = 0.3, p = 0.07). CA-125 level was also significantly increased in women with peritoneal endometriosis (70.7 +/- 47.3 vs. 33.5 +/- 25.6 U/ml for those with ovarian endometriosis), and in these patients the post-operative CA-125 level was significantly related to the clinical evolution of the disease, being higher in patients whose disease recurred compared to those with negative follow-up, irrespective of the adhesion score. We conclude that in endometriosis patients, serum CA-125 level is directly related to the adhesion score and peritoneal involvement, suggesting a central role of pelvic and peritoneal irritation in the increased level of this serum marker.The G(-2518)A polymorphism of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) and its serum and peritoneal fluid levels in Korean women with endometriosis.To investigate the associations between endometriosis and the G(-2518)A polymorphism of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1), and serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels in Korean women.The G(-2518)A polymorphism of MCP-1 was analyzed by restriction fragment length polymorphism in 105 women with and in 101 women without endometriosis. Serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA).The genotype frequencies of the MCP-1 G (-2518)A polymorphism were GG 36.9%, AG 52.9%, and AA 10.2%. MCP-1 genotype frequencies and serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels were similar in those with or without endometriosis and were not dependent on disease stage. A significant correlation was found between serum and peritoneal fluid levels of MCP-1. However, no differences were found between MCP-1 genotypes in terms of serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels.Serum and peritoneal fluid MCP-1 levels and the G (-2518)A MCP-1 polymorphism were found not to be associated with endometriosis in Korean women.The relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and expression of vascular endothelial growth factor-A and its receptors in eutopic endometrium and endometriotic lesions.Studies were performed to elucidate the possible relationship between microvessel density, proliferative activity and angiogenesis in eutopic endometrium from women with and without endometriosis and peritoneal endometriotic lesions. The question whether changes in these parameters in endometriotic lesions were reflected by the level of vascular endothelial growth factor-A (VEGF-A) in serum and peritoneal fluid was also studied. Biopsy specimens of both eutopic endometrium and peritoneal endometriotic lesions from women with endometriosis (n = 25) as well as eutopic endometrium from women without endometriosis (n = 14) were analysed immunohistochemically regarding microvessel density, proliferative activity, and expression of VEGF-A and its receptors vascular endothelial growth factor receptors 1 and 2 (VEGFR-1 and VEGFR-2) in stroma, glands and blood vessels. The VEGF-A concentration was measured in peritoneal fluid and serum. Secretory phase eutopic endometrium from women with endometriosis had significantly higher microvessel density, expression of VEGF-A in glandular epithelium and VEGFR-2 in endometrial blood vessels than those from women without endometriosis. Endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity had a higher microvessel density and showed higher vascular expression of VEGFR-2 as well as being accompanied by higher levels of VEGF-A in peritoneal fluid and serum, compared with lesions with low proliferative activity. In conclusion, there seems to be a dysregulation of angiogenic activity in the eutopic endometrium of women with endometriosis and endometriotic lesions with high proliferative activity were accompanied by higher local angiogenic activity and higher levels of VEGF in serum and peritoneal fluid.Retrospective evaluation of tumor markers in ovarian mature cystic teratoma and ovarian endometrioma.The aim of this study was to evaluate the correlation between clinicopathological characteristics and serum levels of tumor markers in patients with ovarian endometrioma (OE) and ovarian mature cystic teratoma (MCT).Values of CA125, CA19-9, and sialyl Tn antigen (STN) were retrospectively investigated in 321 patients with OE. CA125, CA19-9, STN, and squamous cell carcinoma antigen (SCC) were examined in 435 patients with MCT.Mean values of CA125, CA19-9, and STN were 105.3 U/mL, 58.0 U/mL, and 31.1 U/mL in OE, while the values were 26.8 U/mL, 246.8 U/mL, and 24.7 U/mL in MCT. Abnormal elevation of CA125, CA19-9, and STN was observed in 53.3%, 38.9, and 13.5 of OE, and in 12.9, 50.6, and 4.6% of MCT, respectively. CA125 level was significantly higher in bilaterally occurring OE and premenopausal patients with MCT, while the value of CA19-9 was significantly higher in cases of bilaterally occurring MCT. Furthermore, the levels of CA125 and CA19-9 showed significant correlations with tumor diameter, while the levels of STN and SCC showed no significant correlations with tumor diameter. The highest CA125 level (9513 U/mL) was observed in OE and the highest CA19-9 level (25 590 U/mL) was observed in MCT.Although abnormal increases in the levels of CA125 and CA19-9 were often observed, the levels of STN were not influenced by clinicopathologic factors in OE and MCT. Further studies of the clinical usefulness of STN for detecting malignant tumors in OE and MCT are needed.Expression of inhibitory-motif killer immunoglobulin-like receptor, KIR2DL1, is increased in natural killer cells from women with pelvic endometriosis.We investigated inhibitory and activation motif expression of killer immunoglobulin-like receptor (KIR) by natural killer (NK) cells, which may be pathogenetically involved in endometriosis.We compared cells from 24 Japanese women laparoscopically diagnosed with endometriosis, to cells from 25 women with other laparoscopic diagnoses. KIR expression by NK cells was assessed in peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) by flow cytometry. Intracellular immunoreceptor tyrosine-based (IT) inhibitory and activation motifs (ITIM and ITAM) of KIR in PB was assessed by Western blotting.ITIM-KIR expression by PB NK cells was significantly and similarly greater than ITAM-KIR expression in women with and without endometriosis. Percentages of CD56(+) NK cells in PB and PF did not differ significantly between women with and without endometriosis; however, the percentage of CD158a(+) cells among CD56(+) NK cells in PB and PF was significantly higher in women with than without endometriosis.ITIM-KIR expressing NK cells might confer tolerance to peritoneal endometriotic implants.Increased levels of biglycan in endometriomas and peritoneal fluid samples from ovarian endometriosis patients.In our previous low-density-array gene-expression analysis we found an increased expression of biglycan gene in ovarian endometriosis patients. In the present study we evaluated biglycan expression at the protein level in tissue, serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) from ovarian endometriosis patients, patients with benign ovarian cysts and healthy women. Twenty samples of endometriomas and 27 of control tissues (benign ovarian cysts and eutopic endometrium of healthy women) were obtained laparoscopically or by curettage. Serum and PF samples were collected from 56 ovarian endometriosis patients and 40 controls (patients with benign cysts and healthy women). Tissue biglycan levels and serum and PF biglycan concentrations were determined by Western blotting and ELISA, respectively. Biglycan was detected in endometriomas and in benign cysts tissues but differed in glycosylation levels. The PF biglycan concentrations were significantly increased in ovarian endometriosis patients (mean ± SD=220.3 ± 190.5 pg/mg protein) compared to the whole control group (101.9 ± 94.7 pg/mg protein, p<0.001), while serum concentrations did not differ significantly. Biglycan appears to be involved in ovarian pathologies and probably has different roles in benign cysts as compared to ovarian endometriomas.Dysregulated sphingolipid metabolism in endometriosis.In endometriosis, the establishment and subsistence of ectopic lesions outside the endometrium suggest an altered cellular state for pathological hyperplasia. Sphingolipids are bioactive compounds, and their biosynthesis and metabolism modulate a range of cellular processes including proliferation, migration and apoptosis. We demonstrate that aberrations in sphingolipid metabolism occur in women with endometriosis.Targeted mass spectrometry on >120 sphingolipids were measured in the sera (n = 62), peritoneal fluid (n = 63), and endometrial tissue (n = 14) of women with and without endometriosis. Quantitative RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry were performed on endometrial tissues determine the expression levels of sphingolipid enzymes.Sphingolipidomics identified the in vivo accumulation of numerous sphingolipids, including the functionally antagonistic glucosylceramides and ceramides in the serum and PF of women with endometriosis. We found upregulation of specific sphingolipid enzymes, namely sphingomyelin synthase 1 (SMS1), sphingomyelinase 3 (SMPD3), and glucosylceramide synthase (GCS) in the endometrium of endometriotic women with corresponding increased GlcCer, decreased sphingomyelin levels, and decreased apoptosis in the endometrium.Our sphingolipidomics approach provided evidence of altered sphingolipid metabolism flux in serum, peritoneal fluid, and endometrial tissue in women with endometriosis. The results provide new information on how sphingolipids and eutopic endometrium may contribute to the pathophysiology of endometriosis. The results also have implications for the use of sphingolipids as potential biomarkers.Expression and localisation of osteopontin and prominin-1 (CD133) in patients with endometriosis.In this study, we investigated the expression and localisation of the proteins, osteopontin (OPN) and prominin-1 (CD133), as well as the plasma OPN levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis. Samples of ectopic endometriotic lesions and normal endometrium were obtained from 31 women with endometriosis and 28 healthy control subjects. The mRNA and protein expression of OPN and CD133 was analysed by real‑time RT-PCR and immunohistochemistry. The plasma levels of OPN were determined by ELISA. Our results revealed that OPN mRNA and protein expression, as well as its release in the blood, was significantly increased in the endometriotic lesions in comparison to normal tissue. Although the presence of CD133+ cells was detected in the normal endometrium, as well as in the endometriosis specimens, a significant quantitative variation of this protein was not demonstrated in the patients with endometriosis. In conclusion, our data indicate that OPN is involved in the development of endometriosis by enhancing the invasiveness, proliferation and survival of endometrial cells in ectopic lesions. CD133 cannot be used as a disease marker for endometriosis, although an involvement of this protein in the pathogenesis of endometriosis cannot be excluded.Elevated glycodelin-A concentrations in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with ovarian endometriosis.The aim of this study was to evaluate serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) glycodelin-A concentrations in women with ovarian endometriosis. Ninety-nine matched pairs of serum and PF samples were included in our study. The case group comprised 57 women with ovarian endometriosis and the control group 42 healthy women undergoing sterilization or patients with benign ovarian cysts. Glycodelin-A concentrations were measured using ELISA. Endometriosis patients had significantly higher serum and PF glycodelin-A concentrations compared to controls, and this increase was observed in both proliferative and secretory cycle phases. Glycodelin-A concentrations were more than 10-fold higher in PF than in serum and correlated with each other. Intensity and frequency of menstrual pain positively correlated with glycodelin-A concentrations. Sensitivity and specificity of glycodelin-A as a biomarker for ovarian endometriosis were 82.1% and 78.4% in serum, and 79.7% and 77.5% in PF, respectively. These results indicate that Glycodelin-A has a potential role as a biomarker to be used in combination with other, independent marker molecules.Association between PTPN22 and endometriosis.PTPN22 is currently one of the few known shared-autoimmunity genes and is therefore a candidate marker for endometriosis. Our data show that female carriers of the PTPN22( *)T variant are significantly more susceptible to endometriosis than controls.Endometriosis markers: immunologic alterations as diagnostic indicators for endometriosis.Because endometriosis, a chronic disease affecting 7% to 10% of women, is associated with immunologic aberrations, the authors hypothesize that the presence of specific immune alterations may be diagnostic. Autoantibodies were assayed by Western immunoblotting using antigens derived from the plasma membrane, cytosol, and nucleus from endometrial and ovarian cells. Natural killer (NK) activity was defined by levels of signaling protein zeta and induction of interferon (IFN)-gamma following exposure to patients' sera. Patients with endometriosis exhibited autoantibodies reactive with cellular proteins; endometrial membrane proteins exhibited the greatest reactivity, followed by nuclear antigens. In all subcellular fractions, patients with stage 3 endometriosis exhibited significantly more immunoreactivity than did stage 2 patients, which was greater than that observed in stage 1 patients. The stage-associated increased reactivity resulted from both recognition of additional proteins and enhanced reactivity with shared proteins. Patient sera suppressed NK zeta expression, which resulted in suppression of NK IFN induction. Alterations in autoreactivity and NK activity are observed in endometriosis and may be useful as diagnostic markers, even in early stage disease.Serum levels of the tumour-associated trypsin inhibitor in patients with endometriosis.To show that in patients with endometriosis a 6 kD polypeptide, the tumour-associated trypsin inhibitor (TATI), can occur at elevated concentrations in serum.In a prospective study TATI serum levels were assessed prior to surgery in 368 consecutive patients suffering from benign gynaecological diseases (e.g. pelvic pain, infertility, elective sterilisation, uterine fibroids and pelvic masses) with (n = 71) and without (n = 297) endometriosis, who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy for diagnosis and/or treatment.The TATI serum levels of patients suffering from endometriosis were significantly different from those in the control group and showed a positive correlation with the stage of endometriosis. The sensitivity of TATI was 0.34 with a specificity of 0.85 for all cases of endometriosis, with an increase of sensitivity (0.67) and slight decrease of specificity (0.82), considering only a group of Stage III/IV patients. Excluding patients with benign ovarian cysts, the specificity of TATI was 0.91 and 0.85, respectively. The combination of TATI and CA125 showed an increase of sensitivity to 0.59 for all cases of endometriosis and 0.89 for patients with Stage III/IV endometriosis.The sensitivity of TATI as a screening method for endometriosis is too low, but considering its high specificity, TATI in combination with CA125 could provide an additional diagnostic tool in diagnosis and follow up of patients with endometriosis.Changes in the T-helper cytokine profile and in lymphocyte activation at the systemic and local levels in women with endometriosis.To estimate regulatory cytokine synthesis and lymphocyte activation in the peripheral blood and endometrial tissue of patients with endometriosis.Controlled clinical study.Medical center.Fifteen women with laparoscopically diagnosed endometriosis; 20 gynecologically healthy women with previously documented fertility (control group).Peripheral venous blood sampling; laparoscopic collection of ectopic and matched eutopic endometrium.Messenger RNA (mRNA) for interleukin (IL)-2, IL-4, and IL-10 expression in peripheral and endometrium lymphocytes was assessed by real-time reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction; intracellular synthesis of these cytokines and lymphocyte phenotype profile were established by flow cytometry.Both mRNA expression and intracellular synthesis of IL-4 and IL-10 were sharply increased in peripheral lymphocytes. The same changes were observed for IL-4 in ectopic endometrium of women with endometriosis. Simultaneously, elevation of the amount of pan-B cells, CD20+CD5+ B-1 cells, and activated HLA-DR+CD20+ B lymphocytes was observed in endometriosis lesions. Only an enhanced amount of B lymphocytes was seen in eutopic endometrium.Endometriosis development is accompanied by the activation of a T-helper type 2 immune response at the systemic and local levels. Our results support the hypothesis regarding the autoimmune nature of endometriosis and can explain the high level of autoantibody production in patients with endometriosis.Determination of HGF concentration in serum and peritoneal fluid in women with endometriosis.Scatter factor (hepatocyte growth factor, SF/HGF) is a multifunctional polypeptide growth factor that plays an important role in tumor proliferation, angiogenesis and invasiveness. The aim of this study was to investigate the role of HGF in endometriosis and their relationship. Peritoneal fluid and serum samples of 126 women of reproductive age receiving laparoscopy (72 with endometriosis and 54 without endometriosis) were obtained and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) was employed to measure HGF concentrations. The results revealed that the concentrations of HGF were significantly elevated in women with endometriosis stages I/II and III/IV as compared with HGF level in the control group (peritoneal fluid levels of 0.337+/-0.065, 0.458+/-0.160, 0.915+/-0.113, P<0.001; serum level of 0.335+/-0.663, 0.456+/-0.151, 0.907+/-0.170, P<0.001 respectively). A positive correlation was found between peritoneal fluid and serum levels of HGF, which varied little with phases of the menstrual cycle. Comparisons of the women in the same menstrual cycle between the three groups revealed that increased levels of HGF in patients with advanced endometriosis were not attributed to the cycle phase. Our results indicated that the degree of endometriosis was positively correlated with HGF concentration in peritoneal fluid and serum. Therefore, the detection of serum HGF concentration may be useful in classifying endometriosis, and may also help in selecting the optimal treatment methods.Evaluation of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 levels in peripheral blood of infertile women with endometriosis.To test whether serum monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) chemokine levels correlate with endometriosis in infertile women.A group of women with endometriosis (n = 18, infertile) was compared with patients with uterine leiomyoma (n = 16, fertile), unexplained infertility (n = 5, infertile), and healthy women (n = 16, fertile). MCP-1 expression levels were evaluated by ELISA assay. The data obtained were statistically analyzed using the Mann-Whitney test. P-Values <0.05 were considered as significant.MCP-1 concentrations (median; range of values) in serum were as follows: women with endometriosis (221; 101-635 pg/ml), women with unexplained infertility (167, 114-234 pg/ml), women with uterine leiomyoma (137; 88-200 pg/ml), and healthy donors (123; 98-194 pg/ml). Significant differences were observed in the women with endometriosis compared with those with uterine leiomyoma (p = 0.02) and healthy donors (p = 0.002). Among the women with endometriosis, the level of significance in MCP-1 level at rAFS stages III-IV was higher than that at rAFS stages I-II compared with healthy donors and women with leiomyoma (p = 0.002 and p = 0.02, respectively).These data show that an increased level of MCP-1 can characterize infertile women with endometriosis. However, further studies are needed to be able to determine whether increased MCP-1 chemokine expression can be related to infertility or is a result of endometriosis progress.Serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels in early stage endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) CA-125 levels were assayed using the immunoradiometric assay in 17 women with minimal endometriosis and 21 control women at the time of laparoscopy. Serum levels of CA-125 were not significantly higher in women with minimal endometriosis. Minimal endometriosis was diagnosed with a 70.6% rate of sensitivity and a 71.4% rate of specificity with 16 U/ml as the upper limit of normal. PF CA-125 levels were significantly higher than serum levels but showed no significant difference between control and endometriosis patients.Plasma miR-17-5p, miR-20a and miR-22 are down-regulated in women with endometriosis.Can plasma microRNAs be used as a non-invasive diagnostic test for the detection of endometriosis?Plasma miR-17-5p, miR-20a and miR-22 are down-regulated in women with endometriosis compared with those without endometriosis in mainland China.There is currently a pressing need to develop a non-invasive diagnostic test for endometriosis. Altered circulating microRNA profiles have already been linked to various disease states.This was a prospective laboratory study in a tertiary-referral university hospital in Beijing, PR China, between January 2012 and May 2012. Twenty-three women with histologically proven endometriosis and 23 endometriosis-free controls were enrolled in this study.Laparoscopic inspection of the abdominopelvic cavity was performed for each patient, and peripheral blood samples were collected before laparoscopy. Microarray-based microRNA expression profiling was used to identify differentially expressed microRNAs in plasma samples between women with and without endometriosis, and quantification of selected microRNAs was performed using quantitative RT-PCR.Twenty-seven microRNAs were differentially expressed between women with and without endometriosis, of which six microRNAs (miR-15b-5p, miR-17-5p, miR-20a, miR-21, miR-22 and miR-26a) were selected for validation. MiR-17-5p, miR-20a and miR-22 were significantly down-regulated in women with endometriosis compared with controls (P = 0.011, 0.0020 and 0.0002, respectively), yielding an area under the receiver operator characteristics curve of 0.74 [95% confidence interval (CI): 0.58-0.90], 0.79 (95% CI: 0.65-0.93) and 0.85 (95% CI: 0.71-0.98) in discriminating endometriosis from controls, respectively.Our sample size was small and all cases were rAFS stage III-IV, which may limit generalization of plasma microRNAs for early diagnosis of endometriosis. Moreover, only six microRNAs were selected for validation.Plasma microRNAs provide a promising opportunity for detection of endometriosis.Investigation of diagnostic potentials of nine different biomarkers in endometriosis.To investigate the diagnostic potentials of the serum levels of nine different biomarkers in endometriosis.In this case-controlled, prospective clinical study, 80 women underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy with a preliminary diagnosis of chronic pelvic pain, severe secondary dysmenorrhea, infertility, pelvic endometriosis or pelvic mass. The 60 women with confirmed pelvic endometriosis constituted the endometriosis group, and the other 20 women without endometriosis constituted the control group. Preoperative blood samples were obtained for serum biomarker measurements. Serum levels of nine different serum biomarkers including α-enolase, macrophage migration inhibitory factor, leptin, interleukin-8, anti-endometrial antibody, phosphoinositide dependent protein kinase 1, CA125, syntaxin-5, and laminin-1 were measured concurrently and compared between the control and endometriosis groups, and among control group and endometriosis subgroups including stage I, stage II, stage III and stage IV endometriosis.The serum levels of α-enolase, macrophage migration inhibitory factor, leptin, interleukin-8 and antiendometrial antibodies showed a statistically significant difference neither between control and endometriosis groups nor among control group and endometriosis subgroups. The serum levels of CA125, syntaxin-5 and laminin-1 showed a statistically significant difference both between the control and endometriosis groups (p<0.01) and among control group and endometriosis subgroups (p<0.01). Serum levels of laminin-1 in stage II and IV endometriosis; syntaxin-5 in stage I and II endometriosis; and CA125 in stage III and IV endometriosis were found to have the different levels compared to control group.These findings show that the concurrent measurement of CA125, syntaxin-5 and laminin-1 might be a useful non-invasive test in strengthening the diagnosis of endometriosis and in predicting its severity.Two novel serum biomarkers for endometriosis screened by surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry and their change after laparoscopic removal of endometriosis.To explore novel endometriosis serum biomarkers by surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS).First, we aimed to discover the potential biomarkers of endometriosis by SELDI-TOF-MS. Second, blinded test was performed to characterize the effectiveness of the model by examining the sensitivity and specificity. Third, 29 postoperative patients with endometriosis were recruited to monitor the change of potential biomarkers after laparoscopic surgery.Collaborative investigation in an academic research environment.Fifty-nine patients with endometriosis, 31 patients without endometriosis, and 30 healthy volunteers.Blood serum of endometriosis and control group patients.Protein expression.Two endometriosis-specific proteins were found in the preliminary screening study. Furthermore, the blinded test was performed and showed a sensitivity of 86.67% and a specificity of 96.77% of the markers for detecting endometriosis, which are significantly higher than those of CA-125 for distinguishing patients with endometriosis from patients without endometriosis. After surgery, the levels of these biomarker proteins decreased to levels comparable with those of patients without endometriosis.We discovered the potential biomarkers of endometriosis and set up a diagnostic model with a sensitivity of 86.67% and a specificity of 96.77%, which is significantly higher than that of CA-125 for detecting endometriosis, The levels of these proteins decreased to levels comparable with those of patients without endometriosis.Coordinated but depressed expression of human leukocyte antigen-DR, intercellular adhesion molecule-1, and CD14 on peritoneal macrophages in women with pelvic endometriosis.To investigate the macrophage response in endometriosis, we determined the expression of human leukocyte antigen (HLA)-DR, intercellular adhesion molecule (ICAM)-1, and CD14 on peritoneal macrophages.Case-control study of immunologic markers.University hospital.Forty-five Japanese women with endometriosis were compared with 48 control subjects with other laparoscopic diagnoses.Venipuncture and laparoscopic peritoneal fluid (PF) collection.Expression of HLA-DR, ICAM-1, and CD14 on peripheral blood (PB) monocytes and PF macrophages were quantitated as mean fluorescence intensities by flow cytometry. Expression of each marker on PF macrophages was divided by that on PB monocytes, as an index of macrophage activation (macrophage activation ratio).In women with endometriosis, PF macrophages showed significant positive correlations between expression of HLA-DR and ICAM-1, HLA-DR and CD14, and ICAM-1 and CD14. However, expression of individual markers on PF macrophages and their activation ratios were significantly lower than in control.Coordinated but relatively low expression of HLA-DR, ICAM-1, and CD14 on PF macrophages indicates a positive but limited immune response to events in the peritoneal cavity in women with endometriosis, which may induce immune tolerance to implanted or metaplastic endometrial tissue.Copeptin is associated with the severity of endometriosis.Endometriosis is defined as the presence of endometrial glands and stroma in ectopic locations and may be associated with local and systemic inflammatory processes. Copeptin is elevated in acute and chronic inflammation conditions. The aim of the present study was to determine whether serum copeptin levels were altered in women with endometriosis and played a role in the pathophysiology of the disease.A total of 86 women were recruited for this case-control study. 50 patients with surgically proven endometriosis were included, while 36 patients without endometriosis comprised the control group. Patients were classified as having minimal, mild, moderate and severe disease in accordance with American Society of Reproductive Medicine revised classification. Two subgroups were formed by combining patients with minimal and mild disease and with moderate and severe disease (Stage 1-2, stage 3-4; respectively). Levels of copeptin, tumor markers (CA-125, CA-19-9, CA-15-3) and C-reactive protein in serum were measured.Serum copeptin, CA-125, CA-15-3 and CA-19-9 levels were higher in the endometriosis group (p: 0.002; 0.001; 0.017; 0.015; respectively). Copeptin and CA-19-9 levels were significantly higher in stage 3-4 group as compared to stage 1-2 group (p: 0.004; 0.036 respectively). Serum copeptin levels were positively correlated with stage of the disease and size of endometriomas. ROC analysis revealed that CA-125 had the highest AUC for predicting endometriosis (0.938; 95 % confidence interval 0.882-0.993; p: 0.001).Serum copeptin levels were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis as compared to healthy controls. Moreover, severity of the disease was correlated with serum copeptin levels.Elevated levels of gremlin-1 in eutopic endometrium and peripheral serum in patients with endometriosis.To examine the expression of gremlin-1 (GREM1) on the levels of messenger RNA (mRNA) and protein in eutopic endometrium and its serum level in patients with endometriosis.Prospective, experimental study using reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction, Western blot, immunofluorescence, and ELISA.Gynecological oncology laboratory in a department of obstetrics and gynecology in a medical college in China.Thirty-five patients with endometriosis and 23 healthy control women.During surgery, the eutopic endometria and peripheral serum were obtained from the patients with endometriosis and the control women.The cellular compartment location of GREM1 expression was examined by using immunofluorescent double staining. The expression levels of mRNA and protein for GREM1 were determined by reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction and Western blot, respectively. The serum level of GREM1 was measured by indirect ELISA.The expression of GREM1 was defined within endometrial blood vessel endothelium exclusively, with the concomitant expressions of GREM1 and CD146. The expression of GREM1 on the levels of mRNA and protein was significantly higher in eutopic endometria of patients with endometriosis than in those from healthy control women. According to the ELISA established in our laboratory, the concentration of GREM1 in peripheral serum that was collected during the follicular menstrual phase of patients with endometriosis was significantly higher than that in serum from healthy control women.Gremlin-1 plays a role to some extent in the aberrant angiogenesis of eutopic endometrium in patients with endometriosis. It is possible that the peripheral serum level of GREM1 is a prospective serum biomarker of endometriosis.Evaluation of serum autoantibody levels in the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.We analyzed autoantibodies against tumor-associated antigens (TAAs) in the serum of patients with endometrioma and healthy controls to determine whether autoantibodies can be accurate biomarkers for the diagnosis of ovarian endometrioma.Serum samples were obtained from 56 patients with endometriosis and 66 healthy women who served as normal controls. The titers of antibodies against a panel of eight TAAs were analyzed using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.We found that the serum IGFII mRNA-binding protein 1 (IMP1) autoantibody and cyclin B1 autoantibody could discriminate between healthy controls and endometriosis patients (AUC-ROC 0.777; 95% confidence interval [CI] 0.694-0.860, P<0.0005, and AUC-ROC 0.614; 95%confidence interval [CI] 0.513-0.714, P=0.031, respectively). Using 0.073 and 0.007 as the cutoff values for IMP1 and Cyclin B1 autoantibody, respectively, the sensitivity and specificity of IMP1 were 85.7 and 63.6%, respectively. When cylcin B1 was combined with IMP1, the specificity increased to 72.7% and the sensitivity slightly decreased to 83.9%.Our data suggest that IMP1 alone or combined with cyclin B1 seems to fulfill the requirements of sensitivity and specificity to become a useful clinical biomarker of endometrioma. However, further studies will be required to establish the predictive value and to support the clinical use of IMP1/cyclin B1 in the diagnosis and/or screening of endometriosis.[Correlation between serum Ca-125 levels and surgical findings in women with symptoms evocative of endometriosis].To correlate preoperative serum cancer antigen 125 (Ca-125) levels and laparoscopic findings in women with pelvic pain symptoms suggestive of endometriosis.A retrospective study was conducted including all women with pelvic pain symptoms suspected for endometriosis operated by laparoscopy from January 2010 to March 2013. Patients were divided into 2 groups according to preoperative Ca-125 level (<35 U/mL and ≥ 35 U/mL). Subsequently, patients with ovarian endometriomas were excluded and a further analysis was conducted again according to the preoperative Ca-125 level. The following parameters were compared between groups: presence of ovarian endometrioma, presence and number of deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) lesions and American Society for Reproductive Medicine score. The statistical analysis was performed with Statistica version 8.0, using the Fisher exact test, Student's t-test and Mann-Whitney test, when needed. A p value of <0.05 was considered to be statistically significant.During the study period, a total of 350 women were submitted to laparoscopic treatment of endometriosis. One hundred thirty patients (37.1%) had Ca-125 ≥ 35 U/mL and 220 (62.9%) had Ca-12<35 U/mL. The presence of ovarian endometriomas (47.7 versus 15.9%), DIE lesions (99.6 versus 78.6%) and intestinal DIE lesions (60 versus 30.9%) was more frequent, and the AFSr score was higher (34 versus 6) in the former group. In the second analysis, excluding the patients with ovarian endometriomas (≥ 35 U/mL=68 patients and <35 U/mL=185 patients), similar results were obtained. The presence of DIE lesions (91.2 versus 76.2%), intestinal DIE lesions (63.2 versus 25.4%), bladder DIE lesions (20.6 versus 4.8%) and ureteral DIE lesions (7.3 versus 1.6%) was more frequent, and the AFSr score was higher (10 versus 6) in the Ca-125 ≥ 35 U/mL group.Investigation for DIE is mandatory in women with pelvic pain symptoms suggestive of endometriosis with a preoperative Ca-125 level ≥ 35 U/mL, especially when an ovarian endometrioma is not present.Ovarian endometrioma but not deep infiltrating endometriosis is associated with increased serum levels of interleukin-8 and interleukin-6.Cytokines, and specifically interleukin 6 (IL-6) and interleukin 8 (IL-8), have been associated with the pathogenesis of endometriosis. We studied serum concentrations of IL-6 and IL-8 in patients with deep infiltrating endometriosis (DIE) or ovarian endometriomas (OE), but no other forms of associated endometriosis disease type. We carried out a case-control study including 19 patients with OE alone (OE group), 14 patients with DIE alone (DIE group) and 24 healthy patients without endometriosis (C group). Serum concentrations of IL-6 and IL-8 were measured in the three groups of patients. Serum levels of both IL-6 and IL-8 were significantly higher in the OE group. A high positive correlation was found between serum IL-6 and IL-8 levels in the OE group but not in the DIE and C groups. Serum IL-8 alone achieved the highest predictive value of the presence of OE (adjusted OR: 1.44; sensitivity: 78.2%; specificity: 76.2%). The combination of IL-6 and IL-8 levels did not significantly improve the discrimination between subjects with OE and those with DIE over that of IL-8. OE but not DIE are associated with increased serum levels of IL-6 and IL-8, and thus these may become useful tools for discriminating OE alone from DIE.Relevance of CA-125 in the evaluation of endometriosis.To evaluate the clinical utility of CA-125 in the diagnosis of endometriosis and to compare the sensitivity of the serum and the peritoneal test as indicators of disease, the quantitative determination of the antigen in serum and in peritoneal fluid was performed by the IRMA-mat "two-step method", a two-site immunoradiometric assay. A total of 28 women undergoing diagnostic or operative laparoscopy with endometriosis stage I-II (10 patients), endometriosis stage III-IV (8 patients) or other benign gynecological diseases (10 patients) were studied. The results were compared with a sample of 12 women with a normal pelvis (control group). CA-125 levels in the peritoneal fluid were higher than those found in the serum and were significantly elevated (p < 0.001) when compared with the control group, both in women with endometriosis stage I-II and stage III-IV. In the serum CA-125 levels increased only in advanced stages of endometriosis. Levels of CA-125 in peritoneal fluid seemed to be a more sensitive indicator of disease than the serum test (0.88 vs 0.44), especially in early stage endometriosis (0.80 vs 0.20) which tends to be overlooked by the CA-125 serum test.Identification of molecular markers for endometriosis in blood lymphocytes by using deoxyribonucleic acid microarrays.To identify molecular biomarkers for endometriosis in peripheral blood lymphocytes by using DNA microarrays.Case-control.Multicenter academic research programs.Premenopausal women with or without endometriosis, determined by obstetrics and gynecology specialists during surgery. Microarray analysis included six endometriosis patients and five controls; 15 endometriosis patients and 15 controls were analyzed by using real-time reverse-transcription polymerase chain reaction (RT-PCR). Patients with all disease stages were included.Peripheral blood samples were collected by venipuncture.The expression levels of mRNAs in blood lymphocytes from endometriosis patients and controls were compared with those of a standard total RNA. Gene expression data were validated by real-time RT-PCR analysis.A gene selection program identified genes that were differentially expressed in samples from endometriosis patients. To validate the gene expression data, the nine most discriminatory genes were analyzed by real-time RT-PCR. Two of the nine genes identified, IL2RG and LOXL1, were shown to be significantly differentially expressed.This is the first report of genes that are differentially expressed in peripheral blood lymphocytes of patients with endometriosis, which may provide important clues regarding the pathogenesis of this disease. Moreover, they could be considered potential targets for noninvasive diagnostic assays for endometriosis and need to be validated in a larger population.Th1 and Th2 ummune responses related to pelvic endometriosis.This study analyzed the relationship between clinical characteristics of endometriosis and Th1/Th2 immune response patterns.A prospective study was performed with 65 patients with endometriosis (Group A) and 33 without the disease (Group B). Measurement of IL 2, 4 and 10, TNF-alpha and IFN-gamma was carried out in peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid.Serum TNF-alpha was higher in patients with endometriosis who had deep dyspareunia compared to controls (mean 4.5 pg/ml and 2.3 pg/ml, p<0.05). Among these patients (n=32), 65.5% had deep endometriosis. Patients with endometriosis and infertility had higher IL-2 concentrations in peritoneal fluid than controls (mean 5.9 pg/ml and 0.2 pg/ml, p<0.05). Among these patients (n=22), 63.5% (n=14) had deep endometriosis. A higher concentration of IL-10 was also observed in patients with ovarian endometriosis when compared to those without this type of disease, as well as when compared to control group patients (mean 50 pg/ml, 18.7 pg/ml and 25.7 pg/ml, p<0.05).These results suggest that when specific clinical data are associated with a higher production of certain cytokines, there is a Th1 response pattern that may be related to deep infiltrating endometriosis.Proteomic analysis of serum yields six candidate proteins that are differentially regulated in a subset of women with endometriosis.To identify potential novel biomarkers that differ between subjects with and without endometriosis and that might aid in developing a noninvasive, serum-based diagnostic test.Case-control evaluation of a diagnostic test.University medical center.Consenting women of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy for indications of pain, infertility, elective tubal ligation, tubal reanastomosis, or other benign indication.Diagnostic laparoscopy and peripheral venipuncture.Concentrations of low-molecular-weight proteins in serum; surgical staging of endometriosis.Six proteins were found that were differentially expressed between those with and without disease and that had good diagnostic properties. Taken together in a two-step diagnostic algorithm, we were able to diagnose 55% of subjects, with 99% accuracy as to the status of disease. Further combining this algorithm with that derived by our previous study of serum putative markers (monocyte chemoattractant protein-1, migration inhibitory factor, leptin, and CA-125) improved our diagnostic capability to 73% of subjects, with 94% overall accuracy.This study is the critical first step in the identification of potential novel biomarkers of endometriosis. Future identification of the proteins and further validation in a second population is needed before applying these findings in clinical practice.[Usefulness of measurement of serum CA125 levels in diagnosing and treating endometriosis].We investigated the usefulness of the measurement of serum CA125 levels for the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis. An additional study concentrated on the production of CA125. 1. Elevated levels of serum CA125 were noted in 52 of 66 patients with endometriosis in which the positive rate was 78.8% and mean was 119.8 U/ml. The mean value and positive rate of serum CA125 levels in patients with adenomyosis were higher than those in pelvic endometriosis. 2. The correlation between preoperative serum CA125 levels and the extracted tissue weight was statistically significant. The tissue concentration of CA125 of adenomyosis was 1,479.3 +/- 1,087.1 U/g and that of pelvic endometriosis was 309.7 +/- 23.1 U/g wet weight. 3. The serum CA125 levels in patients with adenomyosis fell postoperatively, and all were below 35 U/ml within two weeks. The serum CA125 levels were below 35 U/ml in 13 out of 15 patients (86.7%) with pelvic endometriosis treated with danazol and the change in the serum CA125 levels was closely related to the clinical course. 4. Clinicopathological states with a high level of serum CA125 were observed in patients with normal and ectopic pregnancy, puerperium, ovarian hyperstimulation syndrome (OHSS) and peritonitis. It was concluded that the measurement of serum CA125 levels was useful in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis, and CA125 might be produced and/or secreted not only from the endometrium but also from the peritoneum.Vitamin D binding protein in endometriosis.Two-dimensional gel electrophoresis is a powerful method for identifying post-translationally modified molecules in biological fluids. We examined the presence and expression of vitamin D binding protein (DBP) in the peritoneal fluid (PF) and plasma (PL) of women with endometriosis.PL and PF samples were obtained from 36 women with untreated mild endometriosis (revised classification of the American Fertility Society [rAFS] stage I-II), 52 women with untreated severe endometriosis (rAFS stage III-IV), 17 women with endometriosis treated with the oral contraceptive (OC), and 40 controls (infertility, n = 23; tubal sterilization, n = 12; pelvic pain, n = 5). PF and PL samples were analyzed by quantitative, high-resolution 2-dimensional gel electrophoresis.The expression of one DBP isoform (DBPE) in the PF of patients with untreated endometriosis was significantly lower than in the control group (P <.05). The levels of PF DBPE in patients with endometriosis using OC were significantly higher than in women with untreated endometriosis (P <.05). No significant difference was observed in PL DBPE expression between women with and without endometriosis, while it was significantly increased in patients with endometriosis using OC (P <.05). DBP expression was not correlated with the stage of endometriosis (rAFS classification) or the phase of the menstrual cycle.The decreased level of DBPE in the PF but not in PL of women with untreated endometriosis suggests that this molecule may be relevant in the pathogenesis of this disease.Serum and peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels in patients with endometriosis.To evaluate CA-125 in peritoneal fluid (PF) as an indicator of endometriosis.CA-125 levels in paired serum and PF were determined by the one-step immunoradiometric assay. For peritoneal samples, high dilution of the sample (1:100) was used to avoid false low results, caused by the "hook effect" phenomenon.Forty-one women with and without endometriosis, undergoing laparoscopy or laparotomy during the follicular phase of the menstrual cycle, were selected.2nd Institute of Obstetrics and Gynecology, University of Rome "La Sapienza," Rome, Italy.Peritoneal fluid CA-125 levels obtained using diluted samples were significantly higher than those found using undiluted ones.CA-125 levels in PF were approximately 100 times higher than those found in paired serum, ranging from 970 to 10,636 U/mL. In patients with endometriosis, CA-125 levels in PF were significantly elevated when compared with the control group. In serum, CA-125 levels increased only in advanced stages of endometriosis.The sensitivity of the CA-125 test for endometriosis in PF is greater than in serum. Therefore, the measurement of CA-125 levels in PF could be useful in the detection of early stage endometriosis, which tends to be overlooked by the CA-125 serum test.Evaluation of a panel of 28 biomarkers for the non-invasive diagnosis of endometriosis.At present, the only way to conclusively diagnose endometriosis is laparoscopic inspection, preferably with histological confirmation. This contributes to the delay in the diagnosis of endometriosis which is 6-11 years. So far non-invasive diagnostic approaches such as ultrasound (US), MRI or blood tests do not have sufficient diagnostic power. Our aim was to develop and validate a non-invasive diagnostic test with a high sensitivity (80% or more) for symptomatic endometriosis patients, without US evidence of endometriosis, since this is the group most in need of a non-invasive test.A total of 28 inflammatory and non-inflammatory plasma biomarkers were measured in 353 EDTA plasma samples collected at surgery from 121 controls without endometriosis at laparoscopy and from 232 women with endometriosis (minimal-mild n = 148; moderate-severe n = 84), including 175 women without preoperative US evidence of endometriosis. Surgery was done during menstrual (n = 83), follicular (n = 135) and luteal (n = 135) phases of the menstrual cycle. For analysis, the data were randomly divided into an independent training (n = 235) and a test (n = 118) data set. Statistical analysis was done using univariate and multivariate (logistic regression and least squares support vector machines (LS-SVM) approaches in training- and test data set separately to validate our findings.In the training set, two models of four biomarkers (Model 1: annexin V, VEGF, CA-125 and glycodelin; Model 2: annexin V, VEGF, CA-125 and sICAM-1) analysed in plasma, obtained during the menstrual phase, could predict US-negative endometriosis with a high sensitivity (81-90%) and an acceptable specificity (68-81%). The same two models predicted US-negative endometriosis in the independent validation test set with a high sensitivity (82%) and an acceptable specificity (63-75%).In plasma samples obtained during menstruation, multivariate analysis of four biomarkers (annexin V, VEGF, CA-125 and sICAM-1/or glycodelin) enabled the diagnosis of endometriosis undetectable by US with a sensitivity of 81-90% and a specificity of 63-81% in independent training- and test data set. The next step is to apply these models for preoperative prediction of endometriosis in an independent set of patients with infertility and/or pain without US evidence of endometriosis, scheduled for laparoscopy.Evaluation of selected angiogenic and inflammatory markers in endometriosis before and after danazol treatment.Angiogenesis and inflammation are pivotal processes in developing endometriosis in the peritoneal cavity. The aim of the present study was to evaluate these two processes in women with endometriosis who had been treated with danazol to determine the sensitivity of a non-invasive test in diagnosing endometriosis. The clinical follow-up study was conducted in a group of 103 women diagnosed laparoscopically with endometriosis. Thirty-five patients qualified for danazol treatment. Pain was assessed using a visual analogue scale, whereas endometriosis was assessed using the revised American Society of Reproductive Medicine (rASRM) scale. Cancer antigen (CA)-125 and C-reactive protein (CRP) concentrations in plasma and peritoneal fluid were determined by immunoenzymatic methods, whereas vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and interleukin (IL)-1β concentrations in plasma and peritoneal fluid were determined by ELISA. Endometrial expression of IL-8 and platelet-derived growth factor alpha polypeptide (PDGF-A) was determined using real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Women with endometriosis (68.9% of patients) had higher plasma concentrations of CA-125, as well as higher concentrations of both CA-125 and VEGF in the peritoneal fluid. Endometrial expression of IL-8 mRNA was significantly higher, whereas that of PDGF-A was significantly lower, in contrast. After danazol treatment the patients reported lower pain scores; in addition, CA-125 concentrations in the plasma were decreased (P<0.001), whereas VEGF concentration in the plasma increased (P=0.009). For the diagnosis of endometriosis, none of the combinations of given markers had a sensitivity >60%. Danazol treatment is highly effective in relieving pain and decreasing CA-125 concentrations in the plasma. Higher plasma concentrations of VEGF after treatment could imply stimulation of angiogenesis. The diagnostic accuracy of two human epididymis protein 4 (HE4) testing systems in combination with CA125 in the differential diagnosis of ovarian masses.Cancer antigen 125 (CA125) is the best known single tumor marker for ovarian cancer (OC). We investigated whether the additional information of the human epididymis protein 4 (HE4) improves diagnostic accuracy.We retrospectively analyzed preoperative sera of 109 healthy women, 285 patients with benign ovarian masses (cystadenoma: n=78, leimyoma: n=66, endometriosis: n=52, functional ovarian cysts: n=79, other: n=10), 16 low malignant potential (LMP) ovarian tumors and 125 OC (stage I: 22, II: 15, III: 78, IV: 10). CA125 was analyzed using the ARCHITECT system, HE4 using the ARCHITECT(a) system and EIA(e) technology additionally.The lowest concentrations of CA125 and HE4 were observed in healthy individuals, followed by patients with benign adnexal masses and patients with LMP tumors and OC. The area under the curve (AUC) for the differential diagnosis of adnexal masses of CA125 alone was not significantly different to HE4 alone in premenopausal (CA125: 86.7, HE4(a): 82.6, HE4(e): 81.6% p>0.05) but significantly different in postmenopausal [CA125: 93.4 vs. HE4(a): 88.3 p=0.023 and vs. HE4(e): 87.8% p=0.012] patients. For stage I OC, HE4 as a single marker was superior to CA125, which was the best single marker in stage II-IV. The combination of CA125 and HE4 using risk of malignancy algorithm (ROMA) gained the highest sensitivity at 95% specificity for the differential diagnosis of adnexal masses [CA125: 70.9, HE4(a): 67.4, HE4(e): 66.0, ROMA(a): 76.6 and ROMA(e): 74.5%], especially in stage I OC [CA125: 27.3, HE4(a): 40.9, HE4(e): 40.9, ROMA(a): 45.5 and ROMA(e): 45.5%].CA125 is still the best single marker in the diagnosis of OC. HE4 alone and even more the combined analysis of CA125 and HE4 using ROMA improve the diagnostic accuracy of adnexal masses, especially in early OC.T regulatory lymphocytes in patients with endometriosis.The present study aimed to investigate the presence of T regulatory cells (Tregs) in the peripheral blood (PB) and peritoneal fluid (PF) in females with endometriosis. The present study included 42 patients who underwent laparoscopy between 2010 and 2011. Flow cytometry was used to determine the percentage of Tregs in the PF and PB of the patients. No significant difference was observed in the percentage of Tregs in the patients in the endometriosis group compared with those in the control group in the PF (9.1±5.4 vs. 9.1±3.8%) or the PB (6.5±3.2 vs. 6.5±3.7%). However, the percentage of Tregs was found to be higher in the PF compared with the PB in the patients in the endometriosis and control groups, but significance was found only in those in the control group. Furthermore, no significant difference was observed in the Treg concentration in the patients with early stage (I/II) endometriosis compared with those with late stage (III/IV) endometriosis. Moreover, no significant correlation was found between the percentage of Tregs and the white blood cell count, lymphocyte count or CA125 concentration in the patients. These findings suggest that the local host‑defense mechanism is deficient in patients with endometriosis, thus endometriosis should not be treated as an autoimmune condition. Increased monocyte chemotactic protein-1 level and activity in the peripheral blood of women with endometriosis. Le Groupe d'Investigation en Gynécologie.Our purpose was to evaluate monocyte chemotactic protein-1 in the peripheral blood of women with and without endometriosis.Fifty-seven patients with endometriosis at laparoscopy done for infertility and pelvic pain were compared with 44 fertile women with no evidence of endometriosis at tubal ligation by laparoscopy. Monocyte chemotactic protein-1 concentration in the plasma was determined by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and its biologic activity was evaluated by measuring monocyte chemotaxis with use of a human histiocytic cell line (U937).Monocyte chemotactic protein-1 concentrations (median and range of values) found in the plasma were higher in patients with endometriosis (163, 0 to 788 pg/ml) than in normal controls (0, 0 to 355 pg/ml). This elevation was significant only in the minimal stage of endometriosis (revised American Fertility Society stage I). However, increased chemotactic activity (mean number of migrating cells/mm2 +/- SEM) was found in the stages I (1240 +/- 141), II (519 +/- 30), and III-IV (523 +/- 23) of the disease compared with normal controls (205 +/- 20). A total of 35% to 44% of this activity was inhibited in the presence of an antibody specific to monocyte chemotactic protein-1.Endometriosis is associated with increased level and activity of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 in the peripheral blood. The elevation and activation of this cytokine could play a relevant role in the immunoinflammatory process associated with the disease.[TNF-alpha serum levels in women with endometriosis: prospective clinical study].To determine serum levels of TNF-alpha (tumor necrosis factor alpha) as a prediction of endometriosis.Prospective clinical case control study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology and Department of Pathology, Jessenius Faculty Hospital, Kollarova 2, Martin, Slovakia.The serum TNF-alpha was determined in women who underwent laparoscopy or laparotomy due to pelvic pain, infertility, dysmenorea or pelvic tumor. Endometriosis was confirmed histologically and classified by rAFS.On the basis of entering criteria 65 women were enrolled in this study. In 61 cases serum level of TNF-alpha was evaluated. The average serum level of TNF-alpha in the endometriotic group was 73.847 pg/ml (n=30) and without endometriosis was 21.089 pg/ml (n=31). We have found a significant statistical difference between the above mentioned groups in the medium levels of TNF-alpha (p<0.0001). We did not find statistical significance between TNF-alpha levels and in the group of women with endometriosis in relation to the stage of the disease (I.-II., III.-IV., adenomyosis). At a cut-off level of TNF-alpha 30 pg/ml there was a 63.33% sensitivity, 77.42% specificity, a positive prediction value 73.07%, and 68.57% of negative predictive value.TNF-alpha serum levels are good diagnostic markers of endometriosis in the spectrum of noninvasive methods.Measurement of serum and peritoneal levels of amyloid protein A and their importance in the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis.To evaluate serum and peritoneal concentrations of amyloid protein A in women with endometriosis and to compare them with those of women without endometriosis.A prospective study evaluated 76 women suspected of having pelvic endometriosis. Fifty-seven women (group A) were confirmed by videolaparoscopy and had their serum and peritoneal amyloid A concentrations measured by ELISA. The average levels from group A were compared to those obtained in group B. Group B was composed of 13 women without endometriosis, submitted to elective laparoscopy for tubal ligation.Peritoneal amyloid A concentrations in group A (310.3 +/- 97.8 ng/mL) were higher than those of group B (53.4 +/- 58.2 ng/mL); p = 0.0. However, serum concentrations in groups A (14.01 +/- 32.3 ng/mL) and B (9.5 +/- 15.9 ng/mL) did not differ significantly; p = 0.35.The peritoneal amyloid A protein concentration in pelvic endometriosis was higher when compared to normal controls, corroborating the inflammatory nature of the disease. This finding suggests that the procedure of evaluating the peritoneal amyloid A concentration in endometriosis merits further investigation.[The concentration of exfoliative adhesion molecules (ICAM-1 and E-Selectin) in serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis].It is commonly known that retrograde transport of exfoliative fragments of endometrium to peritoneal cavity during the menstruation is an important factor of the ethiopathogenesis of endometriosis. The mechanism of inplantation of endometrial cells to peritoneal sites still remains unclear. Adhesions molecules are suggested to take part in this process. In our study we tried to establish the concentration of the adhesion molecules (ICAM-1 and E-Selectin) in the sera and peritoneal fluids of women with endometriosis in comparison to the control group. These concentrations were significantly higher in the sera of all patients. We did not find any significant differences between two examined groups although further studies should be carried out.Increase in serum leptin concentrations among women with endometriosis during danazol and leuprolide depot treatments.This study was undertaken to evaluate serum leptin concentrations in women with endometriosis during treatment with danazol and with leuprolide depot.Twenty patients aged 18 to 42 years with regular menses and documented pelvic endometriosis were recruited from a university hospital setting. Treatment was 200 mg danazol 3 times daily for 6 months or 3.75 mg leuprolide depot every 28 days for 6 months. Serum leptin concentrations were measured before, during, and after treatment. A single blood sample was taken from each of 10 control women without endometriosis for comparison. Serum leptin level was measured with a radioimmunoassay kit with human leptin, and analysis of variance and paired t tests were used for statistical analysis.Serum leptin levels were almost the same among women with endometriosis as in the control group. Leptin levels were higher among women with endometriosis during treatment with danazol and leuprolide(P <.001). Three months after treatment, leptin values remained moderately higher than before treatment.Danazol and leuprolide increased serum leptin levels. The mechanism of leptin increase is unclear. Further studies are needed to determine whether an adipogonadal axis exists.[Evaluation of the generation of interleukin-10 by peripheral blood lymphocytes in women with endometriosis].The aim of study was the evaluation of generating the IL-10 by peripheral blood lymphocytes in women with endometriosis according to the stage of of the disease. Cytokine was estimated by immunoenzymatic method Elisa. The generation of IL-10 by peripheral blood lymphocytes was lower in patients with all stages of endometriosis than in control group. Decreased IL-10 generating observed in our study was not statistically significant, but it may correlate with disorders of immunological cell response. It may also play a role in a development and progression of endometriosis.Proteomics analysis of plasma for early diagnosis of endometriosis.To test the hypothesis that differential surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry protein or peptide expression in plasma can be used in infertile women with or without pelvic pain to predict the presence of laparoscopically and histologically confirmed endometriosis, especially in the subpopulation with a normal preoperative gynecologic ultrasound examination.Surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry analysis was performed on 254 plasma samples obtained from 89 women without endometriosis and 165 women with endometriosis (histologically confirmed) undergoing laparoscopies for infertility with or without pelvic pain. Data were analyzed using least squares support vector machines and were divided randomly (100 times) into a training data set (70%) and a test data set (30%).Minimal-to-mild endometriosis was best predicted (sensitivity 75%, 95% confidence interval [CI] 63-89; specificity 86%, 95% CI 71-94; positive predictive value 83.6%, negative predictive value 78.3%) using a model based on five peptide and protein peaks (range 4.898-14.698 m/z) in menstrual phase samples. Moderate-to-severe endometriosis was best predicted (sensitivity 98%, 95% CI 84-100; specificity 81%, 95% CI 67-92; positive predictive value 74.4%, negative predictive value 98.6%) using a model based on five other peptide and protein peaks (range 2.189-7.457 m/z) in luteal phase samples. The peak with the highest intensity (2.189 m/z) was identified as a fibrinogen β-chain peptide. Ultrasonography-negative endometriosis was best predicted (sensitivity 88%, 95% CI 73-100; specificity 84%, 95% CI 71-96) using a model based on five peptide peaks (range 2.058-42.065 m/z) in menstrual phase samples.A noninvasive test using proteomic analysis of plasma samples obtained during the menstrual phase enabled the diagnosis of endometriosis undetectable by ultrasonography with high sensitivity and specificity.II.Diagnosis of deep endometriosis by clinical examination during menstruation and plasma CA-125 concentration.To evaluate a clinical examination during menstruation and plasma CA-125 concentrations to diagnose deep endometriosis.Prospective study in 61 women scheduled for a laparoscopy, a retrospective study in 140 women with deep endometriosis, and a clinical validation study in 16 women with painful pelvic nodularities during menstruation.University Hospital Gasthuisberg, a tertiary referral center.In the retrospective study, deep endometriosis was detected by routine clinical examination in only 36% of women. Lesions infiltrating deeper than 15 mm were detected in 50%. In the prospective study pelvic nodularities were detected by routine clinical examination in 4 women but were detected in 22 by clinical examination during menstruation. The latter was highly reliable to diagnose deep endometriosis, cystic ovarian endometriosis, and cul-de-sac obliteration. CA-125 concentrations were higher during menstruation and correlated with deep endometriosis and with deep and cystic ovarian endometriosis. Nodularities at clinical examination or follicular phase CA-125 concentrations > 35 U/mL are useful to decide that a bowel preparation should be given, achieving a sensitivity of 87% and a specificity of 83%. In the clinical validation study, deep endometriosis was found in 14 of 16 women.Clinical examination during menstruation can diagnose reliably deep endometriosis, cystic ovarian endometriosis, or cul-de-sac adhesions. This test, preferentially combined with a follicular phase CA-125 assay, should be used to decide whether a preparation for bowel surgery should be given.Macrophage migration inhibitory factor as a potential biomarker of endometriosis.To evaluate the expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 in normal, ectopic, and eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle and to assess MIF level in peripheral blood.The expressions of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 in normal, ectopic, and eutopic endometrium were evaluated with the use of real-time polymerase chain reaction. MIF protein in peripheral blood samples was checked with the use of ELISA.Reproductive biomedicine research center.Sixteen normal women and 20 women with endometriosis.Ectopic biopsies were obtained with the use of laparoscopic procedure, and eutopic and control biopsies were obtained with the use of Pipelle. Peripheral blood samples were collected before laparoscopy.The expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 in normal, ectopic and eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle and the expression level of MIF in peripheral blood samples.Relative mRNA expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 were significantly higher in ectopic endometrium than in eutopic and control endometrium. Also, there were significant differences in expression of these genes in normal, ectopic, and eutopic endometrium during the menstrual cycle. Moreover, women with endometriosis had significantly higher circulating levels of MIF compared with control subjects.Dynamic expression of MIF, CD74, and COX-2 during the menstrual cycle could play an essential role in reproduction, inflammation, and endometrium reconstruction. A higher expression of these genes in ectopic endometrium can be considered as a molecular biomarker for endometriosis development and pathophysiology. Also, a high level of MIF in blood serum can act as a biomarker in the diagnosis of endometriosis.[The use of biochemical markers in diagnosis of endometriosis].The aim of this study was to evaluate Ca 125 II, C-reactive protein (CRP) and serum amyloid A (SAA) and anticardiolipin antibody (aCL) concentrations for the diagnosis of pelvic endometriosis. The study population consisted of 15 women without endometriosis, as confirmed by laparoscopy (group A), and 35 patients with pelvic endometriosis. All of them were diagnosed by laparoscopy or laparotomy. Group B patients were divided into those at stages I and II of the disease (B I/II) and those at stages III and IV (B III/IV). Blood samples were obtained twice during the menstrual cycle: on day 1-3 of the cycle and on day 8-10 of the cycle. Our results claim that the measurement of these molecules may therefore provide a valuable tool in the diagnosis and management of endometriosis.The role of placental protein 14 in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Placental protein 14 (PP-14) is the principal secretory phase product of endometrium and has been shown to inhibit cell immune function. But its role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis is controversy. The objective of this study is to determine the concentrations of PP-14 in peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum and PP-14 protein expression in endometriotic lesions in women with ovarian endometriosis (n = 75) when compared to women without endometriosis (n = 49) between day 7 and day 20 of their menstrual cycle. Concentrations of PP-14 in PF and serum as well as PP-14 protein expression in endometriotic lesions in women with and without endometriosis were evaluated by using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay and immunohistochemical staining, respectively. Serum PP-14 concentrations were significantly increased in women with endometriosis (7.5 ± 1.4 ng/mL) compared to those in women without endometriosis (5.8 ± 0.9 ng/mL; P < .05) and statistically decreased after surgery and further reduced by using gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist therapy (P < .05). However, the concentrations of PP-14 in PF did not reach a significant difference between women with and without endometriosis (P > .05). In women with endometriosis, scores of PP-14 protein expression in the lesions (n = 50, 2.2 [0~5.8]) were significantly correlated with serum PP-14 concentrations (n = 50, 7.6 ± 1.3 ng/mL; P < .01). Our results suggest that PP-14 may play an important role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis.Inflammatory markers in endometriosis: reduced peritoneal neutrophil response in minimal endometriosis.Inflammation is considered to play a role in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. Inflammatory activation in endometriosis was tested based on the hypothesis that pain and endometriosis stage are related to the degree of local and systemic inflammation.Eighteen patients with endometriosis and 14 controls without endometriosis were studied. Cancer antigen 125 and C-reactive protein were analyzed in blood, and in aspirated peritoneal fluid, lactoferrin, myeloperoxidase (neutrophil granulocyte activation marker), sC5b-9 (terminal complement complex), soluble intercellular adhesion molecule 1 (marker for extent of endometriotic tissue), neopterin, and tumor necrosis factor alpha (monocyte/macrophage activation) were evaluated and related to pain, endometriosis stage, and clinical data.None of the measured markers were different between control and endometriosis patients, or in women with or without menstrual pain, dyspareunia, or other types of pelvic pain. Lactoferrin and myeloperoxidase concentrations were significantly lower in patients with endometriosis stage I compared to control patients and endometriosis patients with stage III/IV disease. As expected, cancer antigen 125 concentrations were increased in endometriosis patients of stage III/IV.Neutrophil granulocytes in endometriosis patients may have a lowered ability to respond to weak activation signals, while in more extensive endometriosis stronger neutrophil activation may be related to a proinflammatory effect of endometriotic tissue.[Clinical significance of CA19-9 for endometriosis].We investigated the usefulness of measuring the serum CA19-9 concentration in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis, and compared it with the serum CA125 concentration. We added an immunohistochemical study on CA19-9 and CA125 to find their localization in the various lesions of endometriosis. 1. The positive rate of serum CA19-9 in patients with endometriosis is 52.0% and that of CA125 is 48.0%. When both markers are examined, their positive rate increases to 71.4%. 2. As the Beecham classification stage advanced, the serum CA19-9 positive rate tended to increase. 3. The patients with endometriosis were followed up after surgery or during Danazol therapy. CA19-9 correlated closely with the clinical course. 4. The immunohistochemistry of CA19-9 shows that it localizes in chocolate cysts, but not in the lesions of adenomyosis. CA125 is seen in both lesions. The localizing of CA19-9 is thus seen to be different from that of CA125. It is concluded that the measurement of the serum CA19-9 concentration combined with that of CA125 is useful in the diagnosis and therapeutic monitoring of endometriosis.Serum markers of oxidative stress and endometriosis.To assess the changes secondary to chronic inflammation in women with and without pelvic endometriosis by the determination of serum thiols and carbonyls.Sixty-seven women with endometriosis consecutively submitted to laparoscopy and 41 women without endometriosis consecutively submitted to tubal ligation (control group) were selected. Serum levels of total thiols and carbonyls were determined in both groups.Patients with endometriosis had significantly lower thiol levels than controls (342.37 +/- 142.09 microM vs 559.60 +/- 294.05 microM) (p < 0.001), as well as significantly lower carbonyl levels (8.97 +/- 3.76 microM vs 16.40 +/- 9.26 microM) (p < 0.001). Other clinical characteristics were not associated with changes in marker levels. The cutoff point established by the ROC curve was 396.44 microM for the thiols, with 73.1% sensitivity and 80.5% specificity, and 14.9 microM for the carbonyls, with 94% sensitivity and 51.2% specificity.The serum thiol levels revealed an increase in oxidative stress related to the development of pelvic endometriosis.Increased circulating MMP-2 levels in infertile patients with moderate and severe pelvic endometriosis.The current study compares the levels of matrix metalloproteinase (MMP)-2 and MMP-9 in the follicular fluid (FF) of infertile patients with and without endometriosis submitted to ovarian stimulation for in vitro fertilization and the levels of MMP-2 in the serum of the same patients. We also evaluated whether the severity of endometriosis can influence serum and/or FF concentration of these metalloproteinases. A cross-sectional study was conducted on 30 patients: stage I/II endometriosis (n = 10), stage III/IV endometriosis (n = 10), and control (infertility due to tubal and/or male factor; n = 10). Blood samples for the analysis of MMP-2 levels were obtained during the early follicular phase of the menstrual cycle. The FF samples for the analysis of MMP-2 and MMP-9 were obtained on the day of oocyte retrieval. The concentrations of MMP-2 and MMP-9 were determined by zymography. No intragroup or intergroup difference was observed in MMP-2 or MMP-9 levels in FF. Significantly higher MMP-2 levels were detected in the serum of infertile women with stage III/IV endometriosis compared to women with stage I/II endometriosis. In conclusion, no differences were observed in the follicular levels of MMP-2 and MMP-9 between infertile patients with and without endometriosis. However, the levels of MMP-2 were significantly higher in the serum of infertile women with advanced stages of endometriosis. Taken together, the present results demonstrate that advanced pelvic endometriosis severity is related to higher serum MMP-2 levels but does not influence follicular MMP-2 or MMP-9 levels in periovulatory follicles obtained from stimulated cycles.Measurable serum markers of oxidative stress response in women with endometriosis.To evaluate the hypothesis of increased systemic oxidative stress in patients with endometriosis.Tertiary care university hospital.Cross-sectional study.Sixty-six women of reproductive age undergoing laparoscopy.All women were investigated for endometriotic foci during laparoscopy. Forty-five women had laparoscopically and histologically confirmed endometriosis, and 21 women did not have endometriosis.Four markers of oxidative stress were assessed in the serum of each patient: heat shock protein 70 (HSP70), HSP70b', thioredoxin (TRX), and ischemia-modified albumin (IMA).Mean serum HSP 70b' level was higher in patients with endometriosis compared with controls (0.178 ng/mL, SD 0.103, and 0.135 ng/mL, SD 0.014, respectively). The disease stage did not affect HSP70b' levels. Heat shock protein 70, IMA, and TRX levels did not differ between patients with endometriosis and controls. Women with a history of arterial hypertension had higher mean IMA levels compared with women with normal blood pressure independently of the presence of endometriosis (106.7 [SD 25.4] U/mL and 85.0 [SD 11.5] U/mL, respectively).Endometriosis is associated with increased systemic oxidative stress. The implication of increased systemic oxidative stress in disease progression or the association with other oxidative stress-related pathologic conditions needs to be addressed in further studies.Anti-endometrial and anti-endothelial auto-antibodies in women with endometriosis.The present study investigates the specificity of anti-endometrial antibodies present in serum of women with endometriosis. A two colour indirect immuno-histochemical method was used, so that the antigenic reactivity of endogenous immunoglobulins was blocked and specific anti-endometrial antibodies were readily distinguishable. Serum was collected from women with endometriosis, before and after 6 months of treatment, and from women without the disease. The reactivity of serum with uterine and ectopic endometrium from women with and without the disease was studied. The frequency of anti-endometrial antibodies in the serum of women with endometriosis was higher (P < 0.001) than in control sera. Most antibodies specifically reacted with glands in ectopic and uterine endometrium. Antibody reactivity was strongest with endometrium from control women, compared with uterine and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis (P < 0.01). A proportion of sera containing anti-endometrial antibodies also reacted with vascular endothelium. Binding was strongest to vessels in uterine and ectopic endometrium from women with endometriosis compared to endometrium from women without the disease (P < 0.01). The presence of anti-endometrial antibodies was associated with infertility.Mild endometriosis and luteal function.The luteal function of 27 patients with mild endometriosis and infertility was compared with that of 50 infertile patients without endometriosis. The incidence of endometrial luteal phase deficiency was similar in both groups of patients. Luteal phase length and plasma levels of progesterone (P), estradiol (E2) and prolactin (PRL) in infertile patients (both groups) were similar to those in a group of 10 fertile women. We conclude that luteal phase defects should not be considered as a primary cause of infertility in mild endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid and serum levels of hepatocyte growth factor may predict the activity of endometriosis.The suitable parameter in PF as well as in serum that may predict the activity of endometriosis is not well described. Therefore, we tried to examine the peritoneal fluid (PF) and serum concentrations of hepatocyte growth factor (HGF) in different revised American Society of Reproductive Medicine (r-ASRM) staging and morphologic appearances of endometriosis in an attempt to determine whether HGF can be clinically useful to predict the activity of pelvic endometriosis.Peritoneal fluid was collected from 137 women with endometriosis and 57 women without endometriosis during laparoscopy and blood sampling was collected from 37 women with endometriosis and 21 women without endometriosis before laparoscopy. The concentration of HGF in PF and serum was measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay. The ability of isolated macrophages and stroma to secrete HGF in response to lipopolysaccharide (LPS) was evaluated.A significantly increased concentration of HGF in PF was found in women with endometriosis (1451.75 +/- 90.7 pg/mL) than that in non-endometriosis (1120.5 +/- 77.3 pg/mL, p < 0.01) without any remarkable difference in HGF levels between women with stage I-/II endometriosis and stage III-/IV endometriosis. When we distributed serum and PF levels of HGF according to different color appearances of endometriosis, we found a significantly higher serum and PF levels of HGF in women containing dominant red peritoneal lesions in pelvic cavity (740 +/- 109.3 pg/mL for serum; 1685 +/- 183.4 pg/mL for PF) than those having other pigmented lesions (649 +/- 79.5 pg/mL, p < 0.05 for serum; 1224 +/- 67.8 pg/mL, p < 0.05 for PF) or chocolate cysts (485 +/- 43.1 pg/mL, p < 0.05 for serum; 1118 +/- 83.1 pg/mL, p < 0.01 for PF). Exogenous stimulation with LPS significantly increased the production of HGF in the culture media by macrophages and stroma derived from women with endometriosis than that in women without endometriosis.These results suggest that women with early or advanced endometriosis as measured by r-ASRM scoring system are not associated with an increase in either serum or PF concentrations of HGF. Rather HGF levels in serum and PF were significantly increased in women harboring blood-filled red peritoneal lesions and may be clinically useful to predict the activity of pelvic endometriosis.Serum CA 125 levels before, during and after treatment for endometriosis.The aim of this study was to assess the treatment of endometriosis with a gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist in terms of changes to the extent of disease and to CA 125 levels as well as to recurrence during follow-up.The levels of serum CA 125 were evaluated in 66 patients with endometriosis diagnosed and staged by laparoscopy according to the revised American Fertility. Society classification, who received a 6-month course of a GnRH agonist. Serum CA 125 levels were measured before, during (3 and 6 months after the initiation of therapy) and 6 months after cessation of therapy.Patients with minimal and mild endometriosis had significantly higher mean pretreatment values than control subjects in the luteal phase of the cycle or than postmenopausal women (P < 0.05), but the overall mean value was still below 35 U/ml. Levels of CA 125 fell during treatment to those found in normal controls, but rose again after the end of treatment. The sensitivity and specificity of CA 125 were 75% and 83.3%, respectively, and its positive predictive value as a marker of recurrence was 46.36%.These data suggest that CA 125 may be a reliable indicator for monitoring the efficacy of GnRH agonist treatment of endometriosis, but its value as a predictor of recurrence is low, probably due to the suppression of all CA 125 sources such as endometrium, ovaries and implants.The roles of thioredoxin and thioredoxin-binding protein-2 in endometriosis.Oxidative stress is considered to be involved in the establishment and development of endometriosis. Thioredoxin (TRX) is an endogenous redox regulator that protects cells against oxidative stress, and TRX-binding protein-2 (TBP-2) is a negative regulator of TRX in the biological function and expression. The aim of this study was to investigate the roles of TRX and TBP-2 in the pathophysiology of endometriosis.A total of 35 patients with histologically confirmed endometriosis and 31 patients without endometriosis participated in this study. Real-time polymerase chain reaction was used to quantify TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels, and immunohistochemistry (IHC) was used to assess TRX and TBP-2 protein localization in the endometrium. Serum and peritoneal fluid levels of TRX and TBP-2 were measured using a specific commercial ELISA.There were no significant differences in TRX mRNA levels in the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and the control groups. However, TBP-2 mRNA levels in the endometrium were lower, and the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was higher in patients with endometriosis than in the control group. In particular, the TRX to TBP-2 ratio was significantly higher during late secretory and menstrual phase in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. IHC studies also showed the decreased TBP-2 immunoreactivity in patients with endometriosis compared with the control group. There was no correlation between TRX and TBP-2 mRNA levels in patients with endometriosis, whereas TRX mRNA levels were positively correlated with TBP-2 mRNA levels in the control group. There were no significant differences between the two groups in TRX and TBP-2 levels in serum or peritoneal fluid.Aberrant expression of TRX and TBP-2 in the endometrium may be associated with the establishment of endometriosis.Expression of soluble adhesion molecules in sera of women with stage III and IV endometriosis.To determine the effect of stage III and IV endometriosis on serum concentration of soluble intracellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1), vascular cellular adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1), and E-selectin.Sera from women with laparoscopically proven stage III and IV endometriosis were analyzed for the presence of soluble ICAM-1, VCAM-1, and E-selectin using enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays. Concentrations of these molecules were compared with those of laparoscopically proven disease-free controls.When compared with controls, women with stage III and IV endometriosis had higher serum concentrations of soluble VCAM-1, lower serum concentration of soluble ICAM-1, and no difference in serum concentration of soluble E-selectin.Significant aberrations in levels of circulating adhesion molecules were found in women with stage III and IV endometriosis. These findings might shed light on the pathogenesis of endometriosis and be useful in the development of biochemical markers for disease stage.Circulating cell-free DNA as a potential biomarker for minimal and mild endometriosis.It has recently been reported that high concentrations of circulating cell-free (ccf) nucleic acids in plasma and serum could be used as biomarkers for non-invasive monitoring a wide variety of malignant and benign proliferations and inflammatory conditions. Endometriosis is one of the most common benign gynaecological proliferations with inflammatory activation in premenopausal women. Real-time multiplex polymerase chain reaction was used for synchronized quantification of the glyceraldehyde-3-phosphate dehydrogenase gene sequence in nuclear DNA (nDNA) and the ATP synthase-8 gene sequence in mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA). DNA was extracted from 500 microl serum and plasma of 19 cases with endometriosis to measure the total amount of ccf nDNA and ccf mtDNA. The concentration of ccf nDNA in plasma was significantly higher in the endometriosis group than in the control group (P = 0.046). The cut-off value selected by a receiver operating characteristic curve could provide a sensitivity of 70% and a specificity of 87% to discriminate between the minimal or mild cases and normal controls. The finding of significantly increased concentrations of ccf nDNA in plasma of patients with endometriosis suggests that ccf nDNA might be a potential biomarker for developing non-invasive diagnostic test in endometriosis.The expression of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 in endometriosis.To investigate the association between concentrations of soluble intercellular adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1) and interferon-gamma (IFN-gamma) with regard to the severity of endometriosis.Cross-sectional study.Infertility unit in a university hospital.Seventy-one infertile patients who underwent laparoscopic evaluation were divided into two groups: 36 patients with endometriosis served as cases, and 35 patients without endometriosis served as control subjects.Peripheral blood and peritoneal fluid (PF) were collected from these patients during laparoscopic examination.Quantitative determination of levels of human ICAM-1 and IFN-gamma was performed with the use of an ELISA. The data were evaluated by Student's t-test, analysis of variance, and regression analysis.Significantly elevated levels of soluble ICAM-1 were found in the sera of patients with endometriosis, especially those with advanced stages of the disease. Decreased IFN-gamma levels, which were negatively correlated with serum levels of soluble ICAM-1, also were noted in the PF of patients with endometriosis.The increased serum levels of ICAM-1 found in patients with endometriosis may indicate the presence of an active disease process. Further, the increased levels of soluble ICAM-1 in peripheral blood were inversely correlated with the concentrations of IFN-gamma in PF. The increased levels of soluble ICAM-1 in plasma may be associated with an immunologic feedback response that blocks further infiltration of immune cells. These findings may be of value in the diagnosis and evaluation of endometriosis.Elevated vascular endothelia growth factor-A in the serum and peritoneal fluid of patients with endometriosis.There has been emergence of evidence suggesting that specific variants of the vascular endothelia growth factor (VEGF) family, based on their ability to regulate angiogenesis, would be pivotal in the pathogenesis of endometriosis. This study was aimed at determining whether high levels of VEGF-A could be found in the serum and peritoneal fluid (PF) of patients with endometriosis. VEGF-A levels were measured by enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) in serum and PF from 46 patients with surgically confirmed endometriosis, and 40 controls with no clinical evidence of the disease or detectable endometriotic lesions at the time of surgical examination. The results showed the mean VEGF-A levels were significantly higher in the serum and PF of patients with endometriosis than in the controls. The VEGF-A levels in the serum and PF of patients with severe endometriosis (stages III-IV) were significantly higher than in those with minimal endometriosis (P<0.001). It was concluded that endometriosis was associated with significant modulation in the levels of circulating VEGF-A.Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay of CA-125 in serum of patients with endometriosis: efficacy in diagnosis.We used an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay to quantify CA-125, a cancer antigen, in serum of patients with endometriosis. Concentrations of CA-125 in 103 patients with untreated endometriosis significantly (P less than 0.005) exceeded those for 31 controls with no evidence of disease: 9.1 (SD 12.3) vs 2.2 (SD 3.2) arb. units/mL. Values for patients with treated endometriosis were lower (2.3, SD 2.6, arb. units/mL, n = 9) than those for patients with untreated endometriosis. The mean concentrations of CA-125 in different stages of untreated endometriosis were 4.8 (SD 4.5), 7.1 (SD 9.9), 9.8 (SD 13.2), and 10.8 (SD 13.0) arb. units/mL for Stages I, II, III, and IV, respectively. The differences between controls and each stage were statistically significant (for all stages: P less than 0.05). We also assayed serum sampled from controls and patients with untreated endometriosis during menstruation (Group A) and during nonmenstruation (Group B). The efficacy of the present assay for concentrations of CA-125 in serum of patients with endometriosis was greater for Group B than for Group A. Evidently, determination of CA-125 in serum by the present assay may assist in such diagnosis.Autoantibodies associated with endometriosis: can their detection predict presence of the disease?To evaluate the usefulness of autoantibody detection as a nonoperative method of diagnosing endometriosis, we tested 221 sera from 215 patients from the infertility, gynecology, and gynecologic oncology services by an indirect immunofluorescence assay using monolayer cultures of an endometrial carcinoma cell line. The assay showed positive cytoplasmic staining, demonstrating a sensitivity of 83% in the patients with laparoscopically confirmed endometriosis. The specificity of the assay was 65% for the infertility patients and 76% for the infertility and gynecology patients combined. Several gynecologic cancer patients showed either nuclear or nuclear and cytoplasmic staining, but few showed exclusive cytoplasmic staining. These initial results suggest that detection of antibodies might be useful for the diagnosis of endometriosis.Identifying biomarkers of endometriosis using serum protein fingerprinting and artificial neural networks.To use surface-enhanced laser desorption/ionization time-of-flight mass spectrometry (SELDI-TOF-MS) protein chip array technology to detect proteomic patterns in the serum of women with endometriosis; build diagnostic models; and evaluate their clinical significance.Serum samples from women with endometriosis and healthy women were studied using SELDI-TOF-MS protein chip technology. For every matched pair, two-thirds of the samples were used to look for different patterns and one-third was used for cross-validation.Five potential biomarkers were found and the diagnostic system distinguished endometriosis from validation samples with a sensitivity of 91.7% and a specificity of 90.0%.This method shows great potential in identifying biomarkers to be used for endometriosis screening.Differential expression of VLA beta 1 (CD29) on monocytes from patients with endometriosis.Previous studies have established that in vitro proliferation of endometrial cells is enhanced by peripheral blood monocytes (PBM) and suppressed by peritoneal macrophages (PM) from patients with endometriosis but only suppressed by PBM and PM obtained from normal subjects. The functional activity of PBM and PM is influenced by the engagement of numerous cell surface receptors with their respective physiological ligands.In this study, PBM and PM from fertile women (Group 1), women with unexplained infertility (Group 2), and women with limited (Group 3) or severe (Group 4) endometriosis were isolated in order to analyze these cells for the expression of CD54, CD58 and HLA-DR (immunoglobulin supergene antigens) CD18 and CD29 (integrins) and CD44 (an addresin). These cell surface antigens are involved in monocyte/macrophage trafficking, activation, signal transduction and/or adhesion.No differences were detected in the percentage of PBM expressing CD18, CD44, CD54, CD58, or HLA-DR among the four groups of subjects. Furthermore, the density of these antigens expressed on PBM was identical in patients and control subjects. In contrast, the percentage of PBM expressing CD29 (also known as VLA beta 1) and the density of CD29 expressed per cell were significantly reduced (P < 0.01) in patients with limited endometriosis compared to controls and patients with severe disease. Interestingly, although the percentage of CD29+ PBM from women with severe endometriosis was not statistically different from the percentage of CD29+ PBM from controls, the density of CD29 expressed per cell was significantly elevated among patients with severe disease. Analysis of PM from the four subject groups revealed no differences in CD29 expression or density. However, the percentage of PM expressing CD18 was significantly decreased in patients with limited (but not severe) endometriosis.Since both CD18 and CD29 play a role in cell trafficking and/or adhesion, alterations in their expression among patients with endometriosis suggest that these integrin beta chains may play a role in the pathogenesis of the disease.Vascular endothelial growth factor concentrations in the serum and peritoneal fluid of women with endometriosis.To investigate whether there is an association between vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) levels in serum and peritoneal fluid, and the presence of pelvic endometriosis and its clinical symptoms.Blood and peritoneal fluid sample levels of VEGF were measured in 46 women undergoing laparoscopy: 32 with suspected endometriosis and 14 with confirmed endometriosis. Data were analyzed according to phase of the menstrual cycle, symptoms, disease stage, and disease site.There were no significant associations between serum and peritoneal fluid levels of VEGF and the presence of endometriosis, even when controlling for the menstrual phase. However, among the women with confirmed endometriosis, there was a significant increase (P=0.002) in the mean peritoneal VEGF level in those in the late secretory phase compared with those in the proliferative and early secretory phases.Measuring VEGF levels in symptomatic patients is not helpful to differentiate those with endometriosis from those with a different condition. However, in the late secretory and menstrual phases, mean VEGF levels were higher in women with confirmed endometriosis than in those suspected of having the disease.Antigenic differences between the endometrium of women with and without endometriosis.Serum and peritoneal fluid from 12 women with endometriosis, 4 women with uterine leiomyomata and 6 fertile women without endometriosis (controls) and serum from 4 women with adenomyosis were tested with a passive hemagglutination assay for antibodies against endometrium from all the controls, 8 patients with endometriosis and all patients with uterine leiomyomata and from implants from 8 patients with endometriosis. Serum antibody titers in patients with endometriosis or leiomyomata were significantly higher against endometrial or implant antigens from patients with endometriosis and 2 patients with leiomyomata than those against the controls' endometrium. Peritoneal fluid endometrial antibody titers failed to reflect these antigenic differences. Controls and patients with adenomyosis had low titers of endometrial antibodies in their serum or peritoneal fluid. Antigenic differences appear to exist between the endometrium of patients with endometriosis and that of controls.Combination of CCR1 mRNA, MCP1, and CA125 measurements in peripheral blood as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.This study investigated the possible use of CCR1 mRNA measurement in peripheral blood leukocytes in combination with measurements of monocyte chemotactic protein-1 (MCP-1) and CA125 protein in serum as a diagnostic test for endometriosis.The expression of CCR1 mRNA in peripheral blood leukocytes was measured by quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction. MCP-1 and CA125 levels in serum were determined by ELISA and ECLIA.The ratio of CCR1/HPRT mRNA in peripheral blood of patients with endometriosis and adenomyosis was significantly elevated compared with women without endometriosis. Additionally, serum levels of MCP-1 and CA125 were significantly higher in patients with endometriosis. This method showed a sensitivity of 92.2%, a specificity of 81.6%, a negative predictive value of 83.3%, a positive predictive value of 92.3%, a likelihood ratio of a positive test result of 5.017, and a likelihood ratio of a negative test result of 0.096 to predict the presence or absence of endometriosis.The results imply the potential use of CCR1 mRNA, MCP-1, and CA125 protein measurements for the diagnosis or exclusion of endometriosis.